0 "genes that were downregulated" "...sion data into unbiased distinct patterns. There were four clusters with no difference between diets (figure 2 A, B, and C). Cluster A and B contains genes that were downregulated and upregulated respectively between 15 to 24 months. These two cluster have similar Reactome enrichment as seen in the differential expression compa..."
1 "hope is that there" "...me happened to our family, how it changed our lives, what steps we took to get the help we needed and what I have found to currently be available. My hope is that there will never be another child to ever suffer from this crime again or for a family to never have a need to pick up a book like this. I would be satisfi..."
0 "essentially means that most" "... the precautionary principle in the 1990s when scientific disagreement and public protest intensified. Today, the strict application of the principle essentially means that most GM crops in Europe are banned minus the exception of one soybean variety and a few GM corn varieties.    Application of the Precautionary Principle  ..."
1 "Please remember that we" "...he meeting.   If your student receives any related services, check with the provider and list them on the services form with frequency and duration.  Please remember that we need time to process these services before the meeting.  Please remind the general education teacher of the date and time of their students’ meeting...."
0 "good is that to" "...of as a compliance to what she has done. Nora tells him that when she disappears  everything will be fine, he will be free. He replies by saying what good is that to me? Krogstand can still go public and ruined me. Throughout all this time all he can think of was himself and his reputation. How can Nora do this To..."
1 "printer that was in" "...she understood and agreed to speak with him. Valeria told Detective Wolffbrandt that she, along with Adan and Vanessa were making fake checks using a printer that was in the silver Nissan. Valeria started, there is three laptops in the silver Nissan along with disk drives that had stolen identities and check making in..."
1 "support group that I" "...the many things they provide is financial support to musicians suffering due illness, of which I was one. They also endorsed VoxOp which was a unique support group that I set up specifically for for singers undergoing emotional and physical  trauma. VoxOp; the UK's only support group of its kind, was created as a resul..."
0 "I hypothesize that Pound" "...rcise. The purpose of this study is to determine energy expenditure and rate of perceived exertion using  Pound a full-body exercise fitness program. I hypothesize that Pound will follow ACSM guideline recommendations for exercise intensity and caloric expenditure.  METHODS Subjects \tTwenty apparently healthy male and fema..."
0 "way that is in" "...t would be in violation of the rights of a third party, including any intellectual property rights or privacy rights; access this site for use in any way that is in conflict with these Terms and Conditions; attempt to gain unauthorized access to any area of the site that is not made readily available by us; Use t..."
1 "citizen that is against" "...popular skateboarding gets,the more likely serious injuries will occur, and its not always the skater that gets seriously injured. The same concerned citizen that is against skateboarding also mentioned how “[skateboarders] weave through crowded walkways” and that their mother-in-law was once knocked down by a skater. If ..."
0 "site that is prototypical" "...es were described as “clear”, “simple” and “easy to read”, this gave the user a more positive experience. Research has shown a more simple and modern site that is prototypical will leave users with a better experience.   Aesthetically pleasing sites use images that communicates to the user and have contrasting colours that ..."
1 ") states that children" "...to set individual goals.   Partnership with parents in an effective practice in assessing children’s learning. The Early Year Learning Framework (EYLF) states that children’s learning outcomes have higher possibilities of being achieved if educators work with families (2009), and also the Victoria Early Year Learning and..."
1 "to find that a" "... The only thing missing was a dishwasher, but she could live without that.  Steeling herself she opened the refrigerator door slowly and was relieved to find that a good samaritan had emptied it and there was no rotting food inside. Walking over to the pantry/utility room, she took a peek inside and confirmed the..."
1 "I trust that my" "...I enjoy being intellectually challenged and I strongly appreciate constructive criticism — this will increase my insight and allow me to gain wisdom. I trust that my background, combined with my passion for a career in law as well as your company, would make me uniquely qualified to train in your company as a pupi..."
0 "a said that Natalia" "...u doing ossan? And why do you have these weapons?\", Kiritsugu saw the troubled face and worry laced in his voice, though he calmly said \"Remember how a said that Natalia adopted me? Well, this was my life before I took you two.\", and with a blank face continued \"I did many things, which nowadays I regret, for a better..."
1 "I feel that we" "...k) you gave me. But I need more direction to discipline myself to take my home training more seriously to make more progress in my over all training. I feel that we should come up with a daily regiment of exercises (arm, leg, etc.) to work independently on everyday besides the homework exercises you give me at ea..."
1 "that implies that he" "...eded to pursue his Personal Legend. You also encounter this lesson when Santiago has met the crystal merchant. He just wants to continue dreaming and that implies that he’s given up because he’s sees nothing beyond a visit to Mecca. Another lesson that Santiago learned was that not everyone learns the same way. You see..."
1 "has concluded that the" "...d to examine Sonia cause distress and her levels of anxieties escalate, this could constitute a DoL (not neglible period of time)   The paediatrician has concluded that the injuries may have been sustained while Sonia was under her mother’s care and as such he has raised a safeguarding alert which the local authority has..."
1 "as upset that Lanyon" "...uld be doing the exact opposite. I feel like I could relate to Utterson the most, and it saddens me that he lost one of his dearest friends. I am not as upset that Lanyon died, but that's only because I didn’t know much about his character. As for Jekyll, I can’t relate to him at all. He is almost bipolar. His mood is ..."
0 "irony that is slightly" "...cause it was the commandment he broke. When he forgets however, Elizabeth emphasis this irony by “delicately” saying “Adultery, John”. It is dramatic irony that is slightly humorous to the reader due to how they still haven’t resolved their conflicts (67).  Act 2 #28 The poppet is a symbol of Abigail’s control of society..."
1 "to ensure that their" "...In Japan, the average parent spends 16% of their income on their child's education. Although Juku is expensive, parents are eager to pay their income to ensure that their child has a good future. As well as offering the academic subjects (maths, Japanese, science etc.), it offers extra curricular subjects including cal..."
0 "reason is that at" "...sons why flora and fauna are not found near the top of Mt. Everest. One main reason is because on Mount Everest of the freezing temperatures. Another reason is that at high altitudes, there is not enough oxygen for animals to breathe. The large amount of snow also make vegetation impossible to be grown and consequen..."
0 "be seen that they" "...ugh a comparative study of each school of thought’s underlying assumptions, main focus, the role of markets and determining a product’s value, it can be seen that they are similar at their core yet diverge in overall focus.     Both schools of thought are based in rationalism and use deduction to identify some under..."
0 "melody that is 8" "... “Ure” greatest hits.  Intermediate Exercise Objective: Compose a melody and harmony. Create a trigger to start your activity. Notate, play or sing a melody that is 8 bars long.  Work through the tune for 5 - 8 minutes. Write the melody down. Create a harmony for the song, and attempt to hear it accurately play bac..."
1 ") notes that the" "...tion posit the system as either a factory of testing focusing on a final product, or a mash up of decentralized and disorganized systems. Graham (1998) notes that the national attitudes about schools tend to change over time, sometimes cycling through the same set of different opinions. Through most of the criticis..."
1 ") reported that there" "...is responsible for approximately 80,000 deaths annually in the United States alone (Centers for Disease Control and Prevention [CDC], 2008). WHO (2004) reported that there are approximately 76.3 million people worldwide with an alcohol use disorder (AUD). In 2011, there were over 16 million people in the United States c..."
1 "advised that" "....   ***Grades will be updated weekly*** Classroom Rules: Attendance is important for a hands-on type class. Missed work will need to be made up. It’s advised that you schedule make up time before absence. Google Chrome books may be used in class when allowed. Follow student handbook for safe, responsible and pr..."
0 "How sad that she" "...back onto the port where she had been delivered. Up that same glass shaft to see the marble blue planet with oceans that must be quivering with life. How sad that she didn’t learn it’s name before she lost sight of it. She had been spoiled all her life, going from planet to planet never once thinking about the imme..."
1 "means that" "...he Aleutian. The dogs killed many of the wildlife on the island, decreasing the marine and bird population. Because it was easy to get Rontu’s trust, means that he was a domesticated breed used by the native Aleutians.            \tUnlike wild dogs, my favorite animal is a chimpanzee. Chimpanzees are cute anim..."
0 "but that is about" "....  Features: 3 Compared to other power banks out there EPB charger is a litter on the shallow side. It supports rapid charging in one of the outputs, but that is about it. 8000mAh captivity isn’t anything to write home about but it sufficient enough to get at least 2 charges out of any major device right now.   Valu..."
1 "Which means that you" "...s some reliable internet service providers to keep the flow of communication. Without that movement of data from point to point will not be possible. Which means that you need to have two internet service provides available on the premises, this too comes with monthly cost from both service providers.  Hardware mainten..."
1 "very upset that he" "...ning what Kaylee could do for New Years.  I read about half of it and when I realized it was about Kaylee, I gave him back his phone and left.  I was very upset that he would post such personal information about Kaylee on Facebook. January, 2016 - He told my mom, Susan Farley, that he had someone post on Facebook abo..."
1 "was concluded that tobacco" "... conducted a survey in a cross section of school students in 2011 before the introduction of plain packaging and in 2013 (7-12 months) afterwards; it was concluded that tobacco plain packaging reduced the appeal of cigarettes packs. However, the study did not show whether education in those schools had an impact on how those..."
"shot that was aimed" "...mperatures and acidic flows\" Mark said.  Zap, when the Aurora and Steve became into a microscopic size Mark implanted them into the random man with a shot that was aimed in the right arm           " 1
1 "also believed that a" "...so felt that husband and wife should live as equals, and in these times it was consider immoral. Ibsen’s way of thinking was highly criticized. Ibsen also believed that a man or a woman had the right to be their^own individual, without anyone holding you back from being your own person,  which is what he brings to ligh..."
0 "also recognise that there" "...rfect knowledge and seek to maximise utility or pleasure. However, neo-classicists also recognise the main goal of the firm to maximise profits. They also recognise that there are more than two sectors within the economy such as the services sector. Moreover, neoclassical economists use demand and supply curves to analyse t..."
0 "I believe that they" "...dsuckers”. Don’t get me wrong, I’ve been in love with mythological stories of gods, goddess, vampires, dwarves, and other mythical creatures, but can I believe that they're using the insults literally?   No, that can’t be. They can’t be real.   “Cupcake, we’re here,” Luke said, bringing me to focus on my surroundings ..."
"can consider that as" "...oi Min-nho, r-release me ri-ight n-now.” Junmyeon is let go immediately, he savors the oxygen back in his lungs. Junmyeon glares at the tall male, “I can consider that as assault, you know." 0
1 "know is that this" "... I don't care if you take me away or kill me and i don't know if you'll do either of those things.\" Were so close were almost touching \"But what I do know is that this life of killing innocent people and children^has gone on long enough.\" I dig my knife into his stomach and pull him close  and say in a whispered ton..."
1 "SHPE that was offer" "...iety Hispanics Profession Engineers the most intriging club/organiation on the campus life tab. I would like to compare and contrast CSUF SHPE to the SHPE that was offer in my highschool The UC Irvine SHPE JR. organization empowers and promotes high school students, such as myself, to pursue a higher education in Scie..."
1 "steps ensures that we" "...ok.  The vivid story of him meeting with that nameless client, shows up the mistake that we as designers when viewing the clients.  Going through his steps ensures that we do not make the mistake that builds fiction rather than unite.   "
0 "so low that as" "...ter everyday life for the many people” and business idea being “to offer a wide range of well-designed, functional home furnishing products at prices so low that as many people as possible will be able to afford them”, they offer products which are affordable to the economy and are recognised for it (IKEA /US/EN,..."
0 "program that was designed" "...Jarvis, Matulis, and Ralston (2016) conducted this research study in order to implement a program for neonatal abstinence syndrome.  That coordinated program that was designed had standard protocols for scoring, medications, weaning, and environmental controls that would decrease both the length of stay and hospital costs (..."
1 "character is that of" "...oversial one.   The play was written in three acts. The first act opens up with the main character Nora returning home from a day of shopping. Nora’s character is that of a childish, cheery and playful housewife and mother. Nora pays the doorman twice what she owed him, presumably because she is filled with the Christm..."
1 "are told that Hyde" "...inspector that he would be able to take him to the murder, and they show up at Mr. Hyde´s apartment. When they arrive a women opens the door and they are told that Hyde isn't there. They then proceed to search the apartment where they find a burned checkbook, and the other half of the murder weapon. Utterson and the ..."
0 ") argues that bandwagoning" "... also states that foreign aid catalyzes alliances and so does similarity in political and socio economic ideologies among allying states.   Walt (1985) argues that bandwagoning is not as popular as balancing. Bandwagoning leads a state to be at the mercy of the threatening state, which is a risky affair. This arrangement is ..."
1 "century that were drawn" "Currently within the textbook there is lack of pieces from the High Renaissance in the 16th century that were drawn autonomously, but instead were commissioned by high standing figures such as churches. As well as the majority of pieces within this section were pai..."
0 "President noted that the" "...ding areas where the U.S. troops were located. The U.S. wrote the letter a day before the attack was orchestrated and in his address to Congress, the President noted that the attacks were planned amid months of negotiations (Worth, 2004). The U.S. government was aware that there would be an attack orchestrated by Japan in ..."
1 "I hope that he" "...ughter who ran off with some stranger because she believes that she is in love with him. In reality, he just wants his money. I despise this man, and I hope that he spends eturnity alon                       In Chapter 56                        In Chapters 59, 60 and 61                       "
0 "we believe that Jesus" "... previously taught them concerning the 'end times'...2 Thessalonians 2:5.  1 Thessalonians 4:15-17 and the 'Word of the Lord'  1Th 4:14-17 KJV For if we believe that Jesus died and rose again, even so them also which sleep in Jesus will God bring with him. 15 For this we say unto you by the word of the Lord, that we whi..."
1 "” that is ask" "...better satisfy learner needs. Finally, we must determine whether the students achieved the goals. For example instructors may use the “K-W-L technique” that is ask students list what they know, what they want to know and what they learned each class (Ogle,1986).       3.3Managing the curriculum According to Taba..."
0 "and that is how" "...h design and layout choices. So the only thing left is to have the site built by a developer, right? Actually, there is one additional consideration, and that is how people might interact with your site aside from using a standard full-featured web browser.  WEB ACCESSIBILITY DEFINED & REDEFINED Web accessibility ..."
0 "IGeneX supports that some" "...orkscrew bacteria), but is not absolutely specific for Borrelia. Acute viral infections can cause false positive results. Recently reported data from IGeneX supports that some Lyme patients may have only restricted IgM response to B. burgdorferi. Because Lyme patients have different immune systems, only approximately 70% of..."
0 "me is that not" "...ined I would be completely set free from the daily routine of drug addiction and the lifestyle that comes with it... But what is even more amazing to me is that not only have I no behavior of drug abuse now, I have no desire or want to even use again. All through the power and Blood  of Jesus Christ"
1 "agency believed that “" "...tation, and in fact represent the birth-place of the Ghadr Party” (“Indian Workers’ Association” 14 April 1942, Ibid.). Furthermore, the Intelligence agency believed that “it is quite clear...that the leaders of the Indian Workers’ Association regard it as one of their functions to educate the Indian workers in this coun..."
0 "crime that is expressed" "...of the perpetrator for the crimes committed; this reinforces the limitless ability of facades and society's ignorance in which relates the concept of crime that is expressed in the novel.  The final notion of crime is explored and exploited in \"The Life and Crimes of Harry Lavander and is evident through the storyline of ..."
1 "currently believe that BACRIM" "...ty forces ‘neutralised’ 1448 BACRIM members this year and seized 121 tonnes of cocaine. Due to increased government pressure on the groups, we do not currently believe that BACRIM will be able to expand their influence outside of rural areas. If the FARC demobilisation is successful, the government should have more resources to..."
1 "call stated that a" "...6, at approximately 1705 hours, Officer E. Nelson was dispatched to a forgery call located at 4401 4th St NW (El Alamo Check Cashed). Comments on the call stated that a repeat offender was attempting to cash a fraudulent check for $800.00. The subject provided an expired identification card and the picture did not ma..."
1 "whisper back that I" "...ooks like silver in the star lit room, his eyes are dark pools under his brows, and there’s no trace of his usual sarcasm or cynicism on his face. \tI whisper back that I love him, too, and I can feel him smile against my skin. I haven’t said that to anyone in so long, not since the last time I said it to my poor husba..."
0 "given that" "...e with self-monitoring via the APP, as it is essential for tailoring PBS to context or individual, and if individuals will attend to and use the PBS, given that difficulties in intervention engagement may limit any potential effectiveness in the future (D’Amico & Fromme, 2000; Lynam et al. 1999).   While an o..."
1 "he admitted that he" "... was asked Alex, that’s interesting, how do you know the physical facts fix all of the facts? he was unable to answer because he didn’t know that and he admitted that he was not omniscient. I want to know too, I want to be certain but the only certainty is uncertainty and yet this is a certainty. Life  is indeed a par..."
1 "he meant that since" "...ows about those two stones. So, when the Englishman tells Santiago that what happened at the crystal shop was the principal of the Soul of the World, he meant that since Santiago wanted to get enough money to travel to Egypt, God helped him because Santiago wanted it so much that he prayed to God with all his will. Go..."
1 "approach ensures that the" "...also requires an operational component which details specific tasks and activities to be undertaken in order to implement the desired strategy.  This approach ensures that the marketing efforts are consistent with organizational goals internally reasonable and fitted to market needs and that the resources available with in ..."
1 "image is that women" "...hy food through the heavy advertising in social media. Furthermore, social belief affects individuals. These days In western society concepts of body image is that women should be thin and men should be muscles , social media portray thin people as charming and fat people as unattractive which is the negative views of..."
1 "thing that is very" "...This was a very rigorous performance based process that helped me become more effective in my teaching. In conclusion, I would like to share one more thing that is very dear to me. It’s not an accomplishment but, it’s a contribution teaching and ministering to teenage girls in the Lee County-Tupelo Juvenile Detention..."
1 "Lanyon says that he" "...ondon physician named, Dr. Lanyon. Later the two talk of Dr. Jekyll, and how they have seen much of Jekyll. When Utterson asks Lanyon of Edward Hyde, Lanyon says that he never heard of him. Once Utterson leaves he begins to watch the door until he finally spots Mr. Hyde.  \tThe beginning of the novel was a bit strange ..."
"disposable diaper that Abbie" "...nged darling. Cassie takes a disposable diaper that she opens and she lift up Abbie’s feet and slide the clean disposable diaper underneath her dirty disposable diaper that Abbie is wearing. I ope   " 1
1 "to mention that I" "Dear Sir,  Hope you find this mail in good health.I am also keeping well here and regardless to mention that I miss my time in ICICI every single day till now.  The purpose of this mail is to request for job^opportunity in ICICI for a current colleague in Mash..."
"disposable diaper that Abbie" "... her some ointment and babypowder. I throw the used disposable diaper in the trash and folds the clean disposable diaper and fasten the tabs on clean disposable diaper that Abbie is now wearing.    " 1
1 "also indicated that there" "...Es). The results of the study stated that individuals who are continuously exposed to stress are at a major risk to suffer from depression. The study also indicated that there was considerable^heterogeneity, meaning that there was a diverse group and not all people ended up with the same outcome after stress; which meant mo..."
1 "Is that enough" "...to buy a packet of chips. Only 10 percent Australian. Is it enough? You pick another packet of chips. Not you favourite flavour but it is 75 percent. Is that enough ? You walk out of the shop with nothing. You're going shopping. You pick up a t-shirt. The label says made in china.  You empty the whole shop but fi..."
1 "simply replies that Hyde" "... into the house. The servant tells Utterson that Dr. Jekyll is out. Utterson questions why Hyde has a key to the old dissecting room, and the servant simply replies that Hyde has a key and that the servants are to obey to him. Hearing this Utterson leaves in complete shock and with the thought of Hyde having cruel intentio..."
1 "I feel that although" "... is the implementation that is key. While reading through the application of Inquiry Learning I found myself eager to put these ideas into practice.  I feel that although the concept of collaboration and students’ interest is a driving force in my teaching I do not offer my students the opportunity to observe and ident..."
1 "performance that was held" "...ttended the production of Vanya and Sonia and Masha and Spike in the Edward K. Daniels Auditorium at Southern State Community College. I attended the performance that was held on Sunday July 24th 2016 at 3:30 pm. "
1 "this indicates that empathy" "...ustrate how the emotions of others are differently engaged, depending on the magnitude used to understand other people’s emotional encounters. Hence, this indicates that empathy can generally be induced by observing what others face in life.     Question 4: The implication of Morelli’s Quote for Civic Engagement  ​Civic engag..."
1 "that indicates that there" "...nate (zoom, row, column), its pixel data (retrieved from the LERC file), and its no data value (retrieved from the LERC file) which specifies a value that indicates that there is no data at a point.  \tThe interpretation of the LERC pixel data happens in the postcompose event, which was used in the original encoded PNG to re..."
1 "She believes that it" "...cation. The author first starts talking about how on terms of education we are ranked pretty low. Our education in the US is ranked #21 in the world. She believes that it’s exciting that Apple is pushing for schools to have iPads. The iPads are a good thing but it is going to be hard to integrate them into our school s..."
1 "men realize that it" "...saying that Mr. Utterson is there to see him, but a voice calls back saying he won’t be seeing any guest. After leaving back into the kitchen the two men realize that it wasn’t Jekyll that had spoken and are completely baffled. Poole begins to make an assumption but Utterson tries his best to stay rational about the w..."
1 "I mentioned that I" "... and making Squadron leadership’s “empowerment mantra” difficult to realize.  A “Work-Life” balance example follows.  At the beginning of this paper, I mentioned that I made it a point to emphasize that I did not expect them to work as late as I do.  Yet, it was a challenge for me to have the Section Chiefs (Some of ..."
0 "I believe that I" "...ified by completing 100 hours of continued education every 2 years and taking a certification exam every 10 years. (Bureau of Labor Statistics, 2015) I believe that I will find satisfaction in this career and it will be fulfilling. Based on the Texas Reality Check website, my annual expenses would be an estimated $..."
1 "being is that the" "...aring sleep for this to happen. It’s a good state for the initial realization of a composition, but it’s not very effective for composing. The reason being is that the moment you begin to notate your music, you’ll lose the clarity of the music. You’ll also notice that this exercise takes longer than 15 minutes. You ..." 0
1 "to show that you" "...with recording your findings and written reflections in your sketchbook/portfolio. You should also include evidence of Health and Safety requirements to show that you know appropriate ways to work safely within the studio/workshop.                           Jason Decaires Taylor, Human Nature, 2012            Ellen..."
1 "fear is that you" "... never sold one single copy, because that would mean that the world has no purpose for this book and there would be no reason to read it. But my true fear is that you are reading this for a reason and please know that I am TRULY sorry you are here, in this place.   This is my story!"
1 "could understand that right" "...g different for executive management, both private and public company will set up CFO, CEO, COO. it depends on the company size. From the meeting, we could understand that right now all the member of the Board of Directors have relationship with executive management. From my point of view, i would like to recommend that to ma..."
1 "further proposed that 47" "...ve to 25 per 1000 live births, as 79 countries have child mortality of more than 25 per 1000 live births among under-five children. Liu et al. (2015) further proposed that 47 of the 79 countries are unlikely to meet the newly proposed goal of SDG by reducing child mortality to 25 per 1000 by 2030 with the present rate at w..."
0 "way that is hard" "...which makes them feel better and more united.  Also, it builds trust in your leadership.   \tThe third strategy and fourth strategy work together in a way that is hard to separate them.  Theme is in essence the idea beneath the story being told.  So if you listen to Michael Jackson’s History, the common theme is the..."
0 "then realized that some" "...l, ambitious people it motivated me to focus more towards my professional career goals. By observing my co-workers, managers and peers work ethics, I then realized that some major key factors which include, pocessing a positive attitude, becoming a more efficient team player and staying consistent with my work duties in w..."
"Director explains that the" "...This process includes using a surgically removed ovarie, and shocking an egg to create up to 96 identical embryos. At the beginning of the novel, the Director explains that the Bokanovsky Proc" 0
1 "believe that" "...ime. I learned all the secrets of his body and he learned mine. I touched him where no one else had, and the first time he kissed me there I couldn’t believe that anything could possibly feel so good. Sometimes it^was tender and sweet, and others he told me what to do and he took me roughly, his pinches and bit..."
1 "saved views that you" "... is “Shared Views” and “My Views”? 'Shared Views' are created by Clari and are available to the entire org or a role within that org.  'My Views' are saved views that you have created yourself.  Can I edit a View that already exists? No, you will not be able to make changes to an existing view. But here are the instruc..."
"like that is illogical" "...”* A-SU spoke with hesitation as several thoughts crossed its mind.* “But yours did.in a significant manner. Throwing your body of meat into the fray like that is illogical.”    \"You're welcome " 0 1
1 "was believed that the" "...ucted closer to places that had water with enough current to power the mill. Therefore, some plantations and or mills were moved closer to rivers. It was believed that the Asians were the first to utilize^this technology. And again, the technology spread across the world. There are few places that still use water mills ..."
0 "to recommend that he" "... He is facing difficulties coping with the academic demands in school despite putting in his best efforts.  In view of his difficulties, I would like to recommend that he be granted extra time for his Primary School Leaving Examination.    Thank You  Yours Sincerely,    Dr. Abhinav Joshi  Medical Officer  Child Guidanc..."
1 "be argued that customers" "...ovides banks with additional revenue streams and additional service offerings. Enhancing management quality compared to non-automated banks. It could be argued that customers are willing pay additional fees for the convenience automation provides. This was the least differentiator between automated and non-automated banks...."
1 "platform that was chosen" "...dience, the next step is to digitize the educational board games. The game is being developed for a web-based platform. Unity is the game development platform that was chosen because of its simple layout, community support, and most importantly it is multi-platform. Unity has the unique ability to run scripts made on  C# o..."
0 "is projected that we" "...ces such as paper, water, and plasticware. Further, usage of nonrenewable resources, such as gas, would also be decreased. This is crucial because it is projected that we will run out of gas in as little as sixty to ninety years (“Will We Run Out?” 1). The rural counties will benefit the most with the change to a four ..."
1 "great full that You" "...a session when ever you are able to schedule. I will have checks rewritten to make sure I will have it to pay for sessions when ever you can. I am so great full that You have continued to work with me almost 12 years."
1 "I propose that these" "...simulation room which can imitate obstetric emergencies and are used as skills drills for registered midwives to refresh their skills and knowledge.  I propose that these skills drills scenario simulation room not only be for midwives but to be available for the student.  This could be approached in two ways.  The ment..."
1 ": Ensure that the" "...0.01cm / 0.1mm Micrometer screw gauge 0.001 cm  / 0.01mm                      Tape Measure Has  a range of a few metres and it is flexible Precaution : Ensure that the tape is not slack                                             "
1 "and says that he" "...m what she wants it's money so she can buy things to her liking. Torvald accuses her of being wasteful, but after all the back and forth he gives in, and says that he loves her just the way she is, and wouldn't want her to change. This makes Nora very happy only because beneath Nora’s child-like disposition, she ha..."
1 "is deemed that no" "...e of journey.  PAYMENTS All the booking made by the Customer shall be complete only after the full payment is made. Unless the payment is credited it is deemed that no booking is confirmed. In regard to all the bookings hereunder, Customer undertake to make an Advance Payment of 25% (Twenty-Five Percent) from the Es..."
0 "and use that information" "...rs. The sales game has changed over the years. We now live in an era where buyers have the ability to do independent  research on prospective sellers and use that information to evaluate and compare them before ever agreeing to meet. If you do a bit of research on your own you’ll notice that, no matter what the brand or th..."
1 "thing that is permanent" "...st source of inspiration always says, “It is easier to go down the hill than go up, but the view is much better on top”. There is a saying, “The only thing that is permanent in life is CHANGE”. This is perfectly true in the world of Computer Science. It is ever evolving, opening up new opportunities for exploration and re..."
1 "they believes that no" "...aw my friends who severing with smoking when they pregnant and that big responsibility because will affect on the new generation.  On the other hand, they believes that no problem if the man smoke cigarette and they consider that manliness the consequence of my brother's health and their family's health, also they canno..."
1 ")suggested that participants" "...person matters and individual person have the right to privatize their affair, although upholding this right is far from straightforward. Witman (2005)suggested that participants should be asked to select the pseudonym to be used in the final writing up to ensure that no individual is identified .   The rich data generated fro..."
1 "discover that is a" "...gets closer to the object and sees that it is not a human, it is a figure. One of the dogs come up to explore it, then pees on it. This helps the man discover that is a stump that soaked up phosphorus, a poisonous, waxy substance that glows in the dark. If it had not been a pitch black night, the man probably would n..."
1 "walls that were once" "...tside and make a couple of calls.  Just give a yell if you have any questions .”  Mr. Being called out to them. “OK, will do.” Sara acknowledged. The walls that were once a soft sand color, were dull, chipping and had many cracks.  There were two huge bay windows with curtains tied back to the sides to allow the sunlig..."
1 "never complained that she" "... characters their true identities in different ways. Negis reacted to all of this by being appreciative of what she had even though she was poor. She never complained that she was poor either. Ponyboy reacted in a different way he tried being nice to the Socs Gang even though they were bullying him just because he was a gre..."
1 "reservation is that they" "... Your Direct Booking  Research has shown that the number one reason that consumers leave a hotel direct booking site and head to an OTA to book their reservation is that they believe that the OTA rate will be cheaper.  This is the year that the large chains have chosen to spend millions educating their customers that it is..."
0 "hand that is closest" "...act and kill the Kee warriors. They imediatly i ask about there father is. I tell them to hold hands and not to let go no mater what. I grab the boys hand that is closest to me and began to lead him toward his father his siblings not to far behind. When i return to the city several hours later i direct random families ..."
1 "product that is so" "...illate  In order to create our distillate, we heat our oils at high temperature and low pressure, allowing us to eliminate any impurities and offer a product that is so high in THC/CBD purity that it is actually clear. It’s the cleanest way to vape!   Sales process  Research   Grading The first step in any sales proc..."
1 "communications package that the" "...eded to build an understanding of the problem and more importantly provide solutions to Group and Wing Leadership.  A perfect example was the initial communications package that the Wing required for their mission.  There had been previous attempts at developing and actually sourcing a capability, but in the end the decision from..."
1 "array that is identical" "... PNGs. This tile load function draws the tile onto a blank canvas offscreen and then retrieves the pixel data from the canvas, saving it into a layer array that is identical to the one used in the LERC client. All of the other methods stayed the same between the two clients. \tThe last client implemented was the w10n clien..."
0 "to that is welcome" "...ting the music by hand is going to take you hours, it might even make you angry and create massive amounts of frustration in your life. All I can say to that is welcome to the life of a composer. You might think this assignment is a waste of time, and you might even curse me, but complete this exercise and you will i..."
1 "people disagree that we" "...n, nobody willing to live with serious pain until die. People who suffering from serious illness have the right to choose their death.  However, some people disagree that we have the right to decide our death by ourselves. They believe the life is holy. Euthanasia is against to their religion. In various religions’ rules,..."
1 "school said that the" "...d hug Jack tightly in need of comfort. Seeing that the girl was in distress, Jack returned the hug and kissed Fareeha on the cheek.  “Th-This girl at school said that the reason wh-why I don’t have a daddy is because tha-that.” Fareeha cried again before speaking again. “He blew himself up.”  Hearing this Jack felt ang..."
1 "also advocate that the" "...ethic admitted the moral law to judge the right or wrong of one’s action. Be more specific, relativism respects the different culture of people, they also advocate that the truth of all moral claims should base on a different culture, but they mix up the culture difference and core of morality. In other words, the common..."
1 "they felt that they" "... also affects the individual’s level of happiness. For instance, more respondents from the Democratic party felt happier than the Republicans because they felt that they were more connected than others.  Question 3: The physiological and psychological processes Used in the study of empathy.  According to Lieberman and..."
0 "dwarfism that is related" "... TREATMENTS  Early diagnosis and treatment can help prevent or lessen some of the problems associated with dwarfism (Benaroch, 2014). People who have dwarfism that is related to growth hormone deficiency can be treated with growth hormone (Benaroch, 2014). Individuals who are diagnosed with dwarfism may experience orthopae..."
1 "and agree that arbitration" "...orced as a foreign arbitral award.   2.2  DEFINITION AND TYPES OF ARBITRATION Arbitration is basically an agreement between parties who come together and agree that arbitration will be used as a mean to decipher disputes which are likely to occur in the future out of the legal relationship. Arbitration can also be defined as..."
1 "was decided that the" "...on which makes codes and break them. After they lost, there was a new government. Page 4 Now the new government did not like their father or them. It was decided that the would have to enter a re-education camp for 2 years! Page 5 Conditions were looking desperate. While her father was at the camp, her mum became the o..."
1 "Waldman says that the" "...ted powers; they can command the thunders of heaven, mimic the earthquake, and even mock the invisible world with its own shadows\" (Shelley, 59).  M. Waldman says that the modern scientists of their time had uninteresting and boring ideas whereas to the earlier alchemists, but Victor believes this is some astounding inf..."
1 "must understand that permission" "...ted in all areas of suspected disability. Procedural safeguards and thorough explanations are critical as “informed consent” is the standard. Parents must understand that permission for this assessment may lead to the recommendation for special education eligibility.   The purpose of the initial IEP is to review all assessment da..."
0 "stench that was a" "... the stairs and wish I could muster the courage to go down and retrieve it. The stairs were creaky, the furnace was loud, it was dark and there was a stench that was a cross between damp mildew, dirt and heating oil. The oil tank was located at the bottom of the stairs. The landlord put a pile of sand under the tank..."
0 "and added that the" "...quire doing everything for the patient but in the surgical unit will require just helping the patient with little of things. Mosa, et al (2012) agree and added that the nurse uses her critical thinking skill by helping the patient in decision making for his treatment and the nurse will evaluate him and recognize his ..."
1 "floor that was covered" "...body laid there before me. Sans lifted his head up, blood was leaking out of his mouth. “So… guess that's it huh?” Sans sighed and looked down at the floor that was covered in both of our blood. “Just… don't say I didn't warn you.” He added, slightly wheezing. “Welp. I'm going to Grillby’s.” He wheezed, he stood up slowl..."
0 "stated that" "...painted, presumably to admit light, the shop window of No. 9 is permanently shuttered.” When questioned by police, Banta Singh, the building manager, stated that the men who lived at 9 Adler Street were effectively self-employed pedlars who “as a rule purchase their goods from the local wholesalers and arrange..."
0 "to see that there" "...de by the National Institute for Japanese Language for rephrasing for making the official standard of rephrasing. On the other hand, it is surprising to see that there are 47.5% people do not consult a dictionary. For people over 60, the figure is even over 50%. That’s why the problems of communication arouse.  Desp..."
0 "research found that “" "...at what little resources available were insufficient and inadequate. This lack of resources can significantly add to the level of family stress. This research found that “post-adoption support is a resource that has the potential to enhance parents’ ability to cope with stress… [and] pre-adoptive trainings appeared to b..."
1 "Views that this" "...ing back to the concept of social hypocrisy, the practice of using cannabis within this culture has created the idea that cannabis use is legitimate. Views that this practice is legal, only applies to this minority group because it applies to their culture.  In this case, the Twa people believe that its legal to c..."
1 "he realizes that he" "...live is where most travelers wish they could stay forever, but Santiago continues to tell his side. Eventually, his father gives his blessing because he realizes that he doesn’t want his son to live a life he will regret later, wishing he had done what he’s always wanted to do.  4.\tWhat Santiago’s father says is true ..."
1 "I predict that it" "... am sure it will be in the range should be between 7086 million and 8453 million.   And if we look at other main rises earlier in that year, Mar2015, I predict that it should rise to 6530 million of total transactions. However,  because it is a prediction, the range should be between 5945 million and 7125 million.  ..."
1 "person that was done" "...eally fun to hang around as he had for the majority of the time that he knew that Eric had always been the life of the party. But now he saw an empty person that was done with existence and just wanted to escape the pain.  “Well, that’s really not true Eric, You have me you also have whatever customer walks through my ..."
0 "Wendy says that she" "...inion of growing up? How is this setting different from the previous scene? Extension questions: What does Hook say that makes Wendy want to grow up? Wendy says that she “once thought of” being a pirate. What might ‘piracy’ symbolise?  Scene #3 - The demise of Captain Hook Questions: Peter and Hook have different atti..."
1 "truth is that if" "...ne. Without a single complicated theory assignment or score analysis, you'll learn the core concepts that are necessary for any serious composer. The truth is that if you don't study music composition formally, you're at a disadvantage. Formal instruction introduces you to the principles and insider information tha..."
0 "think that" "...linton that “political hack” or not, she was “willing to listen”.  Does Caitlyn’s work ever end?  Speaking of influential families and politics don't think that Caitlyn falls behind in pedigree. If you need to be reminded that our girl reigns from the millennium's answer to royalty, the greatest American, Alb..."
1 "of that it felt" "...d to shift their grip on him, though he was fairly certain he was not moving much on the account of not being able to properly feel his limbs, on top of that it felt like he had five instead of four.  He didn’t need any of those sensations to tell him there was more going on than the haziness to his mental faculti..."
1 "and that is to" ".... She talks about how strangers react with kindness and how her friends and family have helped her with the disease. This link to part of her purpose and that is to be sensitive but not overly sensitive to people with a disability. On a more personal note I have a friend with cerebral palsy. Although not a degene..."
1 "be seen that the" "...haft 2.  AT was asked forthe current activations that had been identified in the adjoining areas, it was seen to be  smoke heads activated  and could be seen that the heat had risen in this location.     LFB and AT identified the staircase that would lead them to the floor below the activation, which DC had opened,..."
1 "to ensure that precautions" "...may  Be used but this must be of the appropriate standard.    The employer must provide sufficient information, instruction, training and supervision to ensure that precautions are effective.    Pesticides: There are specialist training requirements for the use of pesticides. See \"Green Code: Code of Practice for the Safe Us..."
1 "BMAD is that this" "..., she is unsure what her clients really want and needs. (personal communications, July, 26, 2016).  The benefits of conducting marketing research for BMAD is that this is a new business and will assist the owners to understand their clients and the industry better so they can provide the best possible service/produc..."
1 "and that it was" "...out it” (J. Doe, personal communication, August 11, 2016). James said his father taught him that all women were “whores” but has realized differently and that it was just another form of his father’s abuse. The children were tormented and even had a gun pulled on them while when their father was in a drunken state..."
0 "already tell that I" "...o improve, but it always ends up different. But different is a good thing so I have no complaints about my work. After I’m done with highschool I can already tell that I will make more progress than I ever have.   \tStudying visual arts will give me more than enough choices for my career in art. With the things I learn..."
1 "to ensure that the" "... with other areas of the business such as marketing or other administrative functions.     \tWhen hiring new people, it would prove to be advantageous to ensure that the new people are qualified, motivated, and highly trained.  Responsibilities will have to be delegated during the production process, delegating respon..."
1 "genes that were suppressed" "... B contained genes that were upregulated between 15 to 24 months, and was enriched for chromatin organization, and splicing genes. Cluster C included genes that were suppressed at 15 and 30 months but upregulated at 3 and 24 months, they were enriched for hedgehog suppression. Clusters D, E and F represent clusters with a de..."
0 "confidently say that Marsha" "...o function as a valuable team member in group projects. She’s an honest, hard-working individual who knows how to work quickly and efficiently. I can confidently say that Marsha’s level of service, professionalism and follow-through will make a positive and beneficial addition to your program.   If you have any further questi..."
1 "rules states that;" "...RAL has made a great attempt to improve the enforceability of awards and to eliminate any obstacle to their recognition. Article 1(1) of the UNCITRAL rules states that; “ where parties have agreed that disputes between them in respect of a defined legal relationship whether contractual or not shall be referred to arb..."
1 "is known that the" "... Stream which is an compelling current in the Atlantic Ocean, this current starts off in the Gulf of Mexico and pushes through into the Atlantic.  It is known that the Gulf Stream was first observed in 1513 by Ponce de Leon but was only later charted by Benjamin Franklin in the early 1770s. Benjamin Franklin discove..."
"I get that now" ".... We will never come to an understanding on this because i really liked you. This just isn't your kind of scene right now. You just need a friend and I get that now. I wish I wouldn't have let you fuck with my mind." 0
1 "and that is something" "...n outcast. I will say again yes I have been through a lot but it is a lot that I have been through that has made me the strong person that I am today and that is something I don't ever change."
0 "we believe that Jesus" "... previously taught them concerning the 'end times'...2 Thessalonians 2:5.  1 Thessalonians 4:15-17 and the 'Word of the Lord'  1Th 4:14-17 KJV For if we believe that Jesus died and rose again, even so them^also which sleep in Jesus will God bring with him. 15 For this we say unto you by the word of the Lord, that we whi..."
1 "am delighted that Samuel" "...oyinbo,  Thank you for getting in touch with your feedback, has Samuel did not inform me of the session you had with him during this school term.   I am delighted that Samuel is receiving merits and progressing positively in his academic achievements. Even so, what's worrying still is his continuation of detestations and e..."
1 "Zera figured that if" "...even certain who her cell block captain was. She tossed and turned trying to think of the best way to communicate without getting herself in trouble. Zera figured that if she could get the books she would be able to have a good standing in the prison, she wanted to make sure that she was not going to be confined to the..."
1 "would imagine that there" "...set goals for us, all with the purpose of encouraging us. I found it fun and funny so I wanted to go to the cram school every day.\"  If I did Juku, I would imagine that there would be the good and the bad aspects as there are with most things. What I would like about going to Juku is being able to study at my own pace and ..."
"Steve that was fascinated" "In the 200th century there was a kid called Steve that was fascinated on the art of science" 0
1 "can ensure that every" "...a great strategy for incoming freshmen to participant in. It allows them to receive new information that can be use throughout their college years. I can ensure that every Abrego Future Scholar did learn^something new. By doing so it will make college transition  smoother.    "
1 "not forget that GMOs" "...from their products. They argue that organic activist are only clamming GMOs are bad to grave the attention of consumers to buy their products. Let's not forget that GMOs helps reproduce food at a faster rate which makes food available for almost everyone. In my opinion, if companies like Monsanto don't cooperate with ..."
1 "2008 that it is" "...nt of both acute and chronic illness. There are many ethical challenges that arise in relation to the care of individuals with dementia(Edberg et al, 2008 that it is difficult to  recognize, when  a person with dementia enters  end-of-life stage, given the slow and often the unpredictable progression of functional..."
1 "pillars that is necessary" ".... Travel and Tourism Competitiveness Index intends on “Reducing Barriers to economic growth and job creation” (TTCI,2013) . TTCI indicates a list of  pillars that is necessary for the availability and sustainable existence of Travel and Tourism. These 14 pillars are made up 5 that are essential to the economic development a..."
0 "He Mean That?" "... these secondary characters because it keeps the story new, and lets us focus are attention on things other than the main character. Interlude: “Does He Mean That?” Authors purposely place symbols and patterns in every corner of their writing. \tAuthors purposely place symbols and patterns in every corner of thei..."
0 "stated that" "...d life expectancy, or the body reacting to something foreign, causing unusual symptoms, disability, discomfort or death (Wylie, 1970). Samuel (2007), stated that older definitions on health are considered outdated and fairly textbook, due to being primarily focused on disease only. There are four types of dise..."
0 "ear is that it" "...l world. I’m going to focus on giving you the basic structure necessary to start developing your inner ear. The good thing about improving your inner ear is that it doesn’t require the ability to recognize and identify intervals. Learning the skills of interval recognition, chord identification, and music dictati..."
0 "think that is enough" "...n the Olympics. I want to play on the beach or on a court. The only problem is it just seems so impossible. I play recreation volleyball but I do not think that is enough. Hopefully when I go to high school I will make the volleyball team and make my way up. After school I plan the play in college and join the national..."
1 "that requires that we" "...ources.   Information will be released only in response to a specific authorized request. This means that when you apply for a loan, or anything else that requires that we release information about you to a third party, you must provide written permission for release of information to us before we will pass along the ap..."
1 "to ensure that it" "...ement choose which ever procedural rules they are comfortable with, can also be their own rules. An arbitration agreement should be drafted carefully to ensure that it will be recognised and enforced without difficulties by the courts at the place of the arbitration. Arbitration awards are easily enforced across nat..."
1 "best practices that we" "...er organizations are not a benchmarking. Instead, benchmarking is a broad process that seeks to know strength and weaknesses in organization to apply best practices that we learned from other organizations (Camp, 2006). As one of results of total quality management (Blackiston, 1992), benchmarking seeks to achieve many b..."
1 "to realize that the" "...s a possibility of witchcraft (28).   Act 1 #28 It is significant that Hale recognized Rebecca as a highly respected person because it will allow him to realize that the witch trials are a pool of baseless accusations. When Hale says that Rebecca “[looks] as such a good soul should”, it sets up her false accusation of..."
1 "study concluded that self-management" "...rolled trials took place between 2000 and 2011 to evaluate the benefits from Chronic Obstructive Pulmonary Disease self-management interventions; the study concluded that self-management interventions reduced the burdens on patients, improved patient physical activity, and improved total patient health (Bentsen, Langeland, & Holm, 201..."
0 "say that is in" "...’s all me in one way or another. Tapping into that and exploring what comes across on screen happened quite organically. Or it felt that way. And I’d say that is in large part down to having written the script. I’d already got this guys back story and history created well before we ever called action. There was o..."
0 "was found that a" "...glected to insert a figure for designing and building the house in the relevant clause. In Adapt Constructions Pty Ltd v Whittaker and Luff (2015) it was found that a failure to insert a figure into the contract made the liquidated damages clause inoperable. However, unliquidated damages could still be claimed unde..."
1 "equipment that is required" "... for safety check to all patient. S19 (AfPP) states that during surgery, the surgergoens preferences and patient medical condition will determine the equipment that is required for positiong the patient. S20 The improvement in the human factors and team working aspect of healthcare are expected to bring about significant imp..."
1 "recommendation is that HVs" "...HVs did not use the checklist to assess DV risk may be because children services are already involved because of the DV concern. Notwithstanding, the recommendation is that HVs are required to assess the level of risk by using the checklist to form their own assessment.                   5.0       Discussion: The results of ..."
1 "lesson that it is" "...rounds, opinions, and understandings of  cultures. Every participant had various personal challenges and experiences, which provided our group with a lesson that it is okay to have different beliefs, abilities, and strengths, as long as we respect each other's opinions and treat our fellow students with dignity and ..."
1 "Studies show that computers" "Language and literacy development are major positives of technology use with young children. Studies show that computers encourage longer, more complex speech and the development of fluency. Young children interacting with computers engage in high levels of spoken commu..."
1 "he believes that a" "...e Mrs Linde a job. Torvald concerns himself  about women’s proper role in society. He assumes she is widow; that's why she is looking for employment, he believes that a proper married women should not work outside the home. Torvald shows content knowing his home is fit to society and what he believes to be proper. He..."
0 "now respect that and" "...or this?” I growled silently. Darren stayed quiet, growling silently back. “Look, just because you are the head does not mean you always get your way now respect that and leave me alone!” Darren hissed, as he started to raise his voice. Oh I am surprised at you I thought fiercely as I move back to my bunk with my feet ..."
1 "background mean that they" "...hey do take a huge risk when hiring an ex-convict, and negative stereotypes reinforce anxiety over this risk. It is believed a person with a criminal background mean that they cannot be trusted and may re-offend. If the applicant re-offends, the employer could be charged with negligent hiring. Reasons behind the crime This ..."
1 "also are that they" "...sation without lying. If you asked any random person on the street, chance are they would tell you that lying is bad and that they don’t lie. Chances also are that they are lying                                      http://mentalfloss.com/article/30609/60-people-cant-go-10-minutes-without-lying  "
0 "also believe that this" "...ld be him at all, or be in any aspect of his personality. He says in the passage that he had a yearning inside of him that he could not comprehend. I also believe that this yearning he has is actually the longing for the feeling he received by the end of the passage in DEJ #3, making these two points in his life signific..."
1 "to say that someone" "...y parents, education and the  environment is what makes individuals unequal. God has given humans the free will to create their own life. Is it right to say that someone's life is better? Or that life hasn't been equally opportunistic. We are all giving the equal opportunity to create the life we deserve. All lives ar..."
1 "mine is that I" "...l get, although if I were to stay planted in one area for a long time like five years I would probably find something new to write about. One goal of mine is that I would like to stop all comma splices from slicing up my pages that I have written. A second goal of mine is to figure out what a fragment is and how ..."
0 "she admits that she" "... as well.   Sofia reached her room, and she immediately threw herself unto her bed. This morning, she went to jog around New York a couple times, and she admits that she was very tired after that. She rolled, making her face stare at the blank ceiling aboved her. She extended her left hand, reaching for her phone with..."
1 "I guess that’" "Defending God's existance\u2028\u2028\u2028Does God exist? I guess that’s the question proposed to everyone at least once in their lives. It is a strange topic with so many views, opinions, and debates. If asked what a per..."
1 "know that it would" "... everybody, and where everything is!\" We both looked at each other with raised eye brows. I shrugged my shoulder, what harm could it do. Little did I know that it would do a lot of harm and no one could do anything about it, it was destiny and meant to happen, but I will save that story for later.   \"How are you goin..."
0 "now that it wasn" "...etter to set some clothes out now before the sun is gone for good. I’ll start washing when we get home. Okay?\" Naruto asked but Sasuke had learned by now that it wasn't a question. Naruto was a homemaker through and through. Sasuke was going to remind the blonde that by the time they reached home they’d only have t..."
1 "can tell that they" "...ward to how the relationship between Jace and Clary will change. In the end of the book we learn that they are related. However before that scene, we can tell that they have developed feelings for each other. I’m also looking forward to see how the relationship between Alec and Magnus will develop. Magnus was openly ..."
1 "of anticipate that a" "...rsonally, the one thing that comes to mind, once in awhile, is if there is another version of me. Does he have a better life or worse than me? I kind of anticipate that a future version of myself will just show up one day and give me advices on how to improve my life a lot better. Perhaps, tell me the people I’m going ..."
0 "also portrays that the" "... essential IT skills, communication skills  BENEFITS OF TRAINING   Employees can benefit from the training not only to better their work life, but it also portrays that the company that the employee is working for is a worthwhile place in which to be employed (Armstrong, 2009, p. 730).    CROSS-CULTURAL TRAINING  The pro..."
1 "to believe that there" "..., and your Pokeball count won't go down. This myth is so popular that it's even perpetuated by internet gaming colossus IGN, but as much as we'd like to believe that there was a way for us never to run out of Pokeballs, this myth has been debunked; touching a missed Pokeball does nothing, as in, the goggles, they do not..."
1 "People believe that the" "...ogy \tLots of people use technology to check on their social media,entertainment purposes and communicate in digital form instead of person to person. People believe that the technology is revolutionary but the after effect of technology is the worst. The truth is that"
1 "so close that I" "...and closed it again, and then nodded. I handed it to him and swung my legs over the edge of the bed, pulling my hair to one side. He shuffled closer, so close that I could feel his breath on the back of my neck. A shiver ran down my spine as he wrapped the chain around my neck and did it up, patting my shoulders g..."
1 "job that is posted" "Dear Sir or Madam:  My name is Natalie Dahl and I am interested in the Financial Aid Student Assistant job that is posted on archway. As mentioned in my resume, I have experience in multiple areas you highlighted in your job description, such as strong customer service s..."
1 "you feel that your" "...e easiest ones: going to bars, playing video games, having sexual relations, but more often than not people seek respite in substances. So, next time you feel that your mood goes down, spend a minute to analyze your recent activities in an attempt to figure out what might be going wrong, so you can adjust your mood. ..."
0 "not  represent that it" "...not create any legally binding obligations. The information contained in this document is based on material we believe to be reliable; however, we do not  represent that it is accurate, current, complete, or error free. This document will evolve as the process moves forward and requirements change/new requirements are pl..."
0 "noted that" "... where the U.S. troops were located. The U.S. wrote the letter a day before the attack was orchestrated and in his address to Congress, the President noted that the attacks were planned amid months of negotiations (Worth, 2004). The U.S. government was aware that there would be an attack orchestrated by Japan..."
1 "language that is appropriate" "...s fail in their “pedagogical realization” for insufficient clarity in their instructions. For instructions to be effective, they should be written in language that is appropriate for the target learners, and the use of the correctmetalanguage can assist in making instructions more consice and efficient.   3 My feedback of TP3 ..."
1 "I disagree that nothing" "Nothing can be done to overcome the problems of global warming. To what extent do you agree with this statement?  I disagree that nothing can be done to overcome the problems of global warming. Global warming is occurring every day and we are the ones who are sending out unnecessary emi..."
1 "Nora takes that as" "...Nora takes back what she said about having influence on her husbands decision making, but Krogstad says to her “like all married man…can be swayed,”  Nora takes that as an insult to her husband. Nora explains to Torvald that she will be finish with the loan by the new year. But Krogstad is not worry about that, he wa..."
1 "this book that’" "... I could apply not to just my life, but everyone’s. The things this book talks about really touched me because I feel like I could learn lessons from this book that’ll help me conquer life and own it. Like one of the lessons that I understand better is to not be afraid to fail. I know that many people tell me this..."
1 "that means that Tilapia" "...lematic invasive specie in Australian waters, whether deliberately or accidently introduced. Breeding Tilapia are sexually matured at a small size so that means that Tilapia tend to breed quickly. Characteristics Tilapia are competitive fish when it comes to fighting for territory and for nourishment. Tilapia are fast gro..."
1 "had said that Mr" "...ne feels abandoned by Mr. Bingley, which I can understand. He left her, without saying anything, to go to London. In the previous chapters, Elizabeth had said that Mr. Bingley’s leave                                           In Chapter 26                        In Chapter 27 and 28 \t\t\t\t \t                      In C..."
0 "scientific evidence that \"" "...c Confirmation Bias case, the author of the article of The Atlantic was obviously cherry picking -- Reminded me of the doctor who proposed apparently scientific evidence that \"compression\" of women's breasts (groping) would prevent breast cancer.     The diminishing of biases and ensuring of equality are exceedingly difficul..."
0 "to see that every" "...snarl that consumed her own expression. This dragonborn thought he was so much better than the women of the earth? After humankind had worked so hard to see that every whim of his kind was catered to. She did not realize she was drawing closer to the platform until the dragonborn male lay eyes upon her, and she fina..."
1 "level team that the" "...el option.  Perhaps more advanced core training would solve many of the issues, but historically we have had such a high turn-over rate in this entry level team that the costs of training these employees so frequently would not be feasible. "
1 "I believe that Stratford" "... invested in our community and would be very interested in contributing to a district and school that I have heard praised by teachers and parents.   I believe that Stratford’s theatre program has a strong foundation that I can help honor while providing vision and leadership for future growth.  As a theatre professional w..."
1 "ideal that is socially" "...wife and mother. Irene and Judy’s personality is completely opposite. So if we could say Judy is charming and perfect ideal for men, Irene is perfect ideal that is socially acceptable in the 1920s as wife and mother. There were limit between man and woman could do at that time.  Conclusion    I covered two main character..."
1 "stock package that they" "irene shares the best practice for getting double digit increased versus last year. She mentioned that the lift came from the stock package that they received and convert those customers coming especially during lunch as they had more footfall during "
1 "that meant that Italy" "...calize was a brittle, wobbly \"Pourquoi?!?\"  After a few emergency European meetings sans France, Germany took it upon himself to visit him. Of course that meant that Italy was not far behind, eager to follow Germany and check on 'Big brother France!'. Both nations were shocked at the scene that meet them once they arriv..."
1 "This means that when" "...y receives such a request, it should be forward to Human Resources.   Information will be released only in response to a specific authorized request. This means that when you apply for a loan, or anything else that requires that we release information about you to a third party, you must provide written permission for ..."
0 "Davis admitted that her" "...r the place, They song, danced, and  saw Betsy's favorite movie named The Dance of Reality \". Betsy described  this idea as \"rebirth.\" However, Kelly Davis admitted that her loved sister's idea still let her feel sad,but her family and her understood and respected her sister's choice because they knew Betsy endured too mu..."
0 "algorithm demonstrated that any" "... the conclusion about the algorithm. Grover’s algorithm The search is carried out using classical computation with complexity of O(N), while Grover’s algorithm demonstrated that any search can be computed with complexity of O(N). Therefore, Grover’s algorithm is considered a quadratic improvement over all classical algorithms. [6..."
1 ", that is one" "...trategy effectively for the sustainable growth of their economy.   The Travel and Tourism industry as an employer provides jobs for 284 million people, that is one out of every 11 jobs. In 2015 alone, 7.2 million jobs were created as a result of activities within the industry. It is forecasted to employ  370 mil..."
1 "content that is able" "... audience discussion is an important way for fans to connect emotionally to a experience or campaign so a successful viral campaign will need to have content that is able to be discussed by its users.   Mediums To engage users with all their senses and to appear to be everywhere it is important to consider what mediums..."
1 "block that was already" "...unate as it impacted our efforts to update WordPress to the latest version, but we were fortunate that this happened during the scheduled maintenance block that was already communicated to content owners. As a result,  the team was already resourced for the entire week with no other projects demanding their attention.  T..."
1 "teen that was found" "... couldn't just leave Darcy there with some Dude that we didn't even know. For all I knew she was going to wind up a statistic as a raped and murdered teen that was found in an ally. They would have her picture in the paper, black and white, no color, no more vibrant left. At that thought I turned, ran back to her, gra..."
1 "has shown that a" "... and Stanford University (SU) websites were described as “clear”, “simple” and “easy to read”. This gave the user a more postive experience. Research has shown that a more simple                               Table 1: Comparison table Use Case Scenario  Adelaide University  Sanford University University of Western ..."
0 "After that is done" "... it in the diaper bucket where the used cloth diapers will be stored to the diaper bucket is full of used diapers then it’s time for a diaper wash.   After that is done Abbie gets put on some ointment and baby powder by her sibling Carrie who is makes her ready to be diapered again.  Abbie then gets the disposable di..."
0 "also clear that Japan" "... there would be an attack orchestrated by Japan in the Pacific area although they did not know that the country would attack their own troops.  It is also clear that Japan had already made a stance, and its continued concentration of military presence in Indo-China was an indication of the changes that were expected. Th..."
0 "figured that was probably" "...as not a violent one, and I am here because I am not long for the grave.” Ribahn said dispassionately.  Zera wanted to ask why she was in prison, but figured that was probably not proper prison etiquette.  Ribahn stepped away from Zera, and pulled out a roster of names, with titles of books next to them. \"I need you to look..."
1 "I feel that moms" "...isease, public health intervention can help these children live a better lives by taking a stronger approach on promoting breast feeding to new moms. I feel that moms are not being educated enough on all the magnificent benefits of breast milk. Another prevention of disease would be immunizations. Children are vuln..."
1 "is estimated that DegreeWorks" "... and an academic planner to help students plan and set goals for on-time graduation. DegreeWorks is a SunGard product that integrates with Banner. It is estimated that DegreeWorks will be in place at UALR in Spring 2017 (launches Fall 2017) Core Curriculum Assessment, partner with the Core Curriculum Council to assess the new c..."
1 "use places that I" "...ntact with our school’s publications department to organise a special printing for my magazine.    A personal limitation is that I would like to only use places that I have been to myself for use in the magazine to ensure correct information and other content.    My goals by the end of this year is to have designed ..."
"they realized that they" "...aman explain how Brazil went into immediate action after the attack on Nice, France. The attack killed 84 people and Brazil upped their security when they realized that they were going to have about " 1
1 "Legislature proposed that the" "...and March 2014 to give ample and sufficient time to Yap State to reconsider its position.  In an attempt to reach an amicable solution, the Yap State Legislature proposed that the new tax regime allow^for the Yap State Government to collect the new tax and then forward it to the national government, to avoid breaching the state..."
0 "this demonstrates that the" "... states, “This portrait would be to him the most magical of mirrors. As it had revealed to him his own body, so it would reveal to him his own soul,” this demonstrates that the painting is a metaphorical mirror, acting as a visual representation of the sins that he committed. Dorian uses of the knife he killed Basil with to ..."
1 "he knows that if" "...d down any concealment, but has rather made the concealment stronger by suggesting otherwise.   Act 3 #17 Hale wants Proctor to have a lawyer because he knows that if he doesn’t get one soon, then he’ll end up in jail. Hale knows that Proctor has the odds stacked against him, and without a lawyer it is certain that..."
1 "would suggest that you" "...of this essay topic is practically paradoxical; to agree with Thoreau and say that the life experience of an elder is unrelatable to that of your own would suggest that you, a person of the modern age, have found similarities within your own mentality and that of a man who lived in the early 1800s. However, disagreeing w..."
0 "to stretch that to" "...easy storage. Battery life is spec’d at about 12 hours when being used wirelessly with ANC turned on, but you can also use them hardwired if you need to stretch that to roughly 20 hours. On top of that they have a built-in mic for hands-free calling should you need it, and a few handy playback controls built into the..."
1 "quality that is expressed" "...  To Kill a Mockingbird Essay            To Kill a Mockingbird, by Harper Lee, is a book with a lot of symbolism. Symbolism is the particular idea or quality that is expressed by a symbol or object. Harper Lee introduces us with symbolism in the title. The “mockingbird” is used as a symbol by the author. A mockingbird is a ..."
0 "Nations estimated that the" "...ldren. In addition to that, approximately 80% of trafficking involves sexual exploitation, and only 19% has to do with labor exploitation. The United Nations estimated that the human trafficking was a $31.6 billion dollar industry. (Farrell, A. & Fahy, S., 2009) Human trafficking encompasses a large framework. It is a global..."
1 "to understand that we" "...s when viewing the clients.  Going through his steps ensures we do not make the mistake that builds fiction rather than unite.  His strateies lead us to understand that we are not selling our design,  \tOver the past month, I have become a supporter of IDEO’s Human Centered Design Strategy.   Use of empathy and understan..."
0 "was thrilled that he" "...with all sorts of pipes and tubes running in different directions where they shouldn’t be” (Trachtenberg & Escherich, 2009). Eigel recovered fine and was thrilled that he could go on a forty-minute walk and not get tired (Trachtenberg & Escherich, 2009). There is no cure for genetic disorders (Rice Calhoun, 2013). Howe..."
1 "control that is needed" "...very specialized knowledge and equipment to meet your wildlife control need as a homeowner or commercial business owner. Knowing which type of animal control that is needed and contacting the right type of animal remover or exterminator will ensure the best results for each and every client.   ANIMAL REMOVER LLC WILDLIFE..."
1 "if that is good" "...k ho mubarak ho.Well, if it's a Lil girl, there's a delay of a couple of seconds to scan the skin tone, length, weight, amount of leftover lanugo and if that is good then - wow congratulations for your bundle of joy.How many achievements will it take to oversee skin tone. Anyways testosterone will not be able to t..."
1 "logically that it should" "...n. So every week end that child used to come, take that 40$ from the doctor or the attendant and leave, without meeting the parents. People might say logically that it should be given to the parents directly. The point here is that the generation who can't value their parents, how can they do well? Even if they do well, is..."
0 "conduct that is misleading" "...tatutory deceptive and misleading conduct. The Competition & Consumer Act 2010 s18 ACL states that a person must not, in trade or commerce, engage in conduct that is misleading or deceptive’. In Henjo Investments Pty Ltd v Collins Marrickville Pty Ltd (1988) Henjo Investments was found guilty of misleading and deceptive cond..."
0 "content that is familiar" "...sed in the lesson.  The teacher has a very approachable manner that helps ease the learners into engaging with the lessons content. By beginning with content that is familiar the teacher opens up the lesson to the prospect of developing their understanding and building upon known concepts. In this way, the teacher allows t..."
1 "point that it'" "...e will step out of line. Things hadn't always been so peaceful, but ever since the treaty had been signed two years ago, they have calmed down to the point that it's hard to imagine a gang war exists. And so far, the police haven't been able to catch anyone selling or in possession of any drugs. The commissioner ..."
1 "pitch that was not" "...calm and content with a sense of purposeful motion. Note Values: Half, whole, quarter notes, eighth notes, and the equivalent rests. Pitches: Use the pitch that was not used in either the first or second movement. Add this to the initial six notes from the first movement. This gives you a total of seven pitches for t..."
0 "should accept that children" "Children over 15 should be allowed to make decisions about their lives without the interferences of their parents or teachers. Society should accept that children mature at a younger age these days and should adjust the law accordingly. Do you agree or disagree? Give reasons for your answer and include any rele..."
0 "book says that they" "One theme that I recognized in Of Mice and Men is loneliness. Almost every character in this book says that they have had experienced some type of loneliness. Curly's wife, Crooks, and Candy all feel lonely at the ranch for different reasons. Curly's Wife feels ..."
1 "I feel that no" "...st ends up taking Mr. Darcy’s free arm into her own, leaving Elizabeth all by herself. These people are super rude, as I have said many times before. I feel that no words can explain how rude I think these people are. I liked how Mr. Darcy tried to walk somewhere Elizabeth could join, since the road only permitte..."
0 "” is that he" "...ar, and is able to manipulate the whole society to reach John Proctor.   Act 3 #3 What Giles means what he says that “he broke charity with that woman” is that he ruined his wife’s reputation and status through saying that she read books secretly. He says this, “openly weeping” because he never had the intent t..."
0 "of services that many" "... cause.  This book should serve only as a general guide and not as the ultimate source of subject information. Within this book, you will find a list of services that many authors purchase. We feel that it is necessary to include them along with the estimated prices (which are subject to change) you can expect to pay if..."
1 "and shows that the" "...hoping that she would consider the name Vivian because it means so much to them. She ended up taking the name which I think means a lot to the family and shows that the Nielsens think of her as a daughter not adopted at all."
1 "so prepared that I" "...y to study one last time. Math for me was period two so I had P.E. then math so I could not even study at lunch. When it was time for the test, I was so prepared that I could answer any question. I ripped right through the first page and onto the second. I finished the test with fifteen minutes to spare. I felt reall..."
1 "“Is that a" "... yet, her internal organs were still recovering from the stasis. Zera unwrapped the ration bar loudly, Doxie’s head peared from the top of the bunk.  “Is that a ration bar?” She asked, licking her lips with her blue tongue. Zera frowned, “ Do you want a piece, I can’t eat it anyway.” she offered half of the r..." 0
"issue that is prevalent" "Plagiarism is an issue that is prevalent in Tertiary institutions and the workplace, avoiding the fact that it has become an issue in our society will not lessen the impacts of plagiarising ..." 1
0 "only say that because" "... his hyung’s head lightly, “Our school is a small one, it’ll be a great experience for the freshman too.” Jinki speaks up from the storage room, “You only say that because you’re a fr"
1 "I felt that it" "...ly absorbed in the memories and impressions because they have no reliable ways of dealing with  the world. After reading the descriptions of my type, I felt that it’s a true reflection of me. Self-reflection is^very important to understand your strengths and weaknesses, to make changes to the areas we need to mak..."
1 "and saw that he" "...omeone to demonstrate specific routines about the machine gun he was the one to do it.      By the end of my 6th lesson with Shaked I got to know him and saw that he was really intelligent, and had a fast grasp for the material I taught. I also found out Shaked was a good friend and actually attempted to help any ..."
1 "information that is made" "...xual exploitation”)(United Nations). Human trafficking crimes, for the most part, get overlooked, unnoticed, or ignored simply because of the lack of information that is made available to the public. The fact of the matter is this “overlooked” or “unnoticed” crime grosses over $7 billion dollars in revenue and traffics ove..."
1 "it seems that when" "...ot is hwa, hwo, the word who. So is the words PIE kwo stem of relative and in the interrogative pronouns.  January 17, 2016 From the above etymology, it seems that when I ask “what is” it is the same as saying “who is”. As I think about it, “who is” is the one asking “what is”. In other words, I am present in the mom..."
1 "training wheels that this" "...itions. You can play your pieces on an instrument or use a sequencer or notation program to play them back. As you improve, you’ll begin to leave the training wheels that this lesson provides in the past. Then, you’ll be creating music that is truly original.    Chapter 6: Composition Technique No. 6 Musical Themes A sympho..."
1 "to believe that if" "...cklace on.  “I love you too Bo, come,\" Lauren moved down the bed and held the covers open and Bo followed. Once hidden underneath, she spoke. \"I used to believe that if I went far enough under the covers I would find another land, a magical one with unicorns and mermaids. I would hide under my duvet for hours dreamin..."
0 "to see that I" "...hool and the grades were up. The first thing I saw was that my average raised up to a “B” and was ecstatic. I clicked on my average and scrolled down to see that I aced the test. I was so happy. The reason I got the “A” was because I believed in myself and knew I could do it with hard work and determination. I b..."
0 "vanity that is his" "... pact is directly referred to again when an old woman remarks “There goes the devil's bargain!,” it foreshadows Dorians impending doom because of his vanity that is his hamartia. Within the legend of Faust, the protagonist is able to repent for his sins by asking for forgiveness, Dorian recognises that he must repent..."
0 "and that is false" "...s decision not only affects women, but the world’s view on Muslim countries. We tend to be considered countries that own and decide the lives of them and that is false. I for one do not believe men should be given any type of authority over women, you should be under your own control. I hate seeing stuff like this g..."
1 "can testify that John" "...er necessities and her extras, taking her to school and all church activities, taking her to all appointments, and supporting all her activities. She can testify that John had someone post on Facebook about Kaylee and  me in a very negative way. He told her personally that he had done that. She can also testify that Joh..."
1 "fossils that were discovered" "...d geology. We have learned that the Grand Canyon holds over 35 layers of sedimentary rock, which span over 550 million years old. There are also many fossils that were discovered at the Grand Canyon; a trilobite fossil that is over 500 million years old. Even though it is a very primitive (simple) species, it had a complex eye..."
0 "further suggests that the" "...d factors make Indigenous Australians more likely to develop Type 2 diabetes, which has major implications on these people. Diabetes Australia (2003) further suggests that the prevalence of Type 2 diabetes is largely due to limited access to culturally acceptable health care, which often leaves this disease undiagnosed and ..."
0 "CA that is busy" "...ng people:  A qualified CA that has completed an additional qualification.  A trainee CA that has completed an additional qualification.  A qualified CA that is busy completing an additional qualification.  A trainee CA that is busy completing an additional qualification.  A qualified CA that wants to do an additi..."
1 "sport is that it" "... sport also helps combat childhood obesity obviously as the more sport you do the fitter one should be. The only potential argument against potential sport is that it’s wrong to force a child into doing something they don’t want to do. While most of the time this is true, there are some exceptions. One of these exc..."
0 "can conclude that this" "... PERF's Gary Hayes Award for innovation and leadership in policing in 1996. Therefore, given his qualifications, recognition and area of expertise, I can conclude that this source is reliable.  This article explains the difficulties in spotting a drunk driver, which typically requires two separate judgments. Firstly, a v..."
1 "data that was already" "...relevant at any given time in relationship to the current circumstances. This process often involves mentally organizing and sorting through mnemonic data that was already learned; which is a process made possible by the frontal lobe of the human brain. Conclusion ​ A-fore-mentioned, the human brain is truly amazing bot..."
1 "also true that I" "...te with researchers to investigate  GMOs this will be a debate that will never be solve, and to me not cooperating  rings a bell of warning. But it's also true that I have been eating GMOs all my life, and have never suffer of any illnesses from consuming them. In addition, If it wasn't for this research I would of..."
0 "we established that there" "...ized that the main issue concerns this family was Salwa’s depression and to help her how to recover from this situation. At the end of the interview, we established that there is no communication with other social workers or psychologist to help in solving their problems. Finally, we encouraged them to keep supporting each ..."
1 "strangely relieved that Bo" "...at one, frown, look left down is when you’re feeling guilty or ashamed. Not sure yet which one it is.” Bo explained.  Lauren swallowed, surprised yet strangely relieved that Bo was so intuitive. “Guilt. That one means guilt.”  “Why?” Bo asked.  Lauren took Bo’s hand and kissed each finger, “When dad died I was shaken, I step..."
1 "Neo-realists argue that since" "...imits the extent of co-operation as individual states are wary of other states’ ability and resources that could potentially be used to surpass them. Neo-realists argue that since states occupy a similar position in terms of level of suspicion and defense-consciousness, it becomes almost impossible to promote equal co-operation..."
1 "he said that he" "...himself as a servant before the human leadership (King Artaxerxes).  Nehemiah does not use the word servant in 2:2-3 just as he used in 1:11 but when he said that he was much afraid and said to the king it means that he replied to the king out of respect and reverence. The explanation of Nehemiah’s cry before God ..."
"Jenneth proposed that after" " - Jenneth proposed that after the ESS there will be project for Supervisor, they are the one who will do floor plan and will manage the SR. Must do before the UK visitor arrival." 1
1 "colonists felt that it" "...ights of life, Liberty together with property.  For Patriots the thought of national independence became intermingled with the idea of equality.  All colonists felt that it was their duty to fix the^government which had become harmful to the New World, but the groups just had different methods they wanted to use to achie..."
0 "explains that" "...society is that it is creating a whole new way for people to connect with others and be more social. Brigette Voisinet, an average Pokemon Go player, explains that the game provides “a way to bond with her friends who are also into Pokemon Go” (Brophy 4). In America, as technology has become a major role in ever..."
0 "Kent that is a" "...ealth Services  Project Abstract  The key objective of this study is to address the health needs of the disadvantaged and unreached population of the Kent that is a small population consisting of the gypsy and the Roma travelers. This interest has developed from the previous research outcomes that evident this pa..."
1 "I feel that the" "...Conflict appear when there is a misconception that Level I and level II are less important and poor decisions are made because of this misconception. I feel that the leaders with their remarkable experience should empower subordinates and encourage shared decision making."
1 "globalization argue that it" "...d countries have power to negotiate  \tPeople unfortunately can communicate and do businesses overseas easily because of globalization. Supporters of  globalization argue that it helps many countries to improve rapidly. Oppositions feel that because of wide-spreading of famous cultures, local cultures are destroyed. This essay..."
0 "Why is that?" "... alone and it gets maddening being inside day after day. So I have those papers to read. Months of them. I have a few from out of town too.” “Really? Why is that?” “This is a pretty small village Naruto. Not much news to write about.” Kiba guessed. “Which is why I have the traveling traders bring me papers from..."
1 ", that is exceptionally" "...ties in his vision we he looked around, he was expecting everything to seem sliightly 'larger' though he did not think he was above seven feet.  Still, that is exceptionally tall even with body mods.  “If it’s any consolation I’m not wearing anything either.”   It was hard not to hear the amusement in her voice, enough to..."
0 "rather that it serves" "...ual, not social, preferences” (Wilson 457) explaining how transportation does not take away our right or ability to choose what to do as we feel, but rather that it serves as an example of something we do choose and something we choose based on what we require rather than what everyone else wants. Overall, Cars and Thei..."
1 "This shows that the" "... truth comes out. This is further emphasized when Macbeth speaks to the ghost saying “Thou canst not say I did it. Never shake you gory locks at me”. This shows that the playwright makes it more obvious to the audience that he is the one who killed Banquo and also this is giving the characters a hint that Macbeth kill..."
1 "is thought that her" "... prowess; if not for the tiger strap on her shinai, which was considered bad manners, resulting in her disqualification from official tournaments, it is thought that her name would have become famous across all Japan. She was furious but despite the insistence of her friends she would prefer quit from tournaments than..."
0 "Danforth says that a" "...h’s authority is so high that he is able to look pass through any fraud. This is somewhat ironic because Proctor has been in the right all along, but Danforth says that a “husband’s tenderness may drive him to extravagance in defense of a wife” (92). In reality he hasn’t melted down any concealment, but has rather made..."
"green grass that I" "...e feel as though I just walked into a sanctuary of light. The bush behind me seems miniature now, making me feel more dominant to the world. The deep green grass that I sit upon is a carpet  " 1
1 "disciples state that the" "...hool. One of them meant to protect the Malfoy boy.\" Voldemort let not a single twitch give away his thoughts on the matter. \"Letters from my youngest disciples state that the Malfoy boy has not been seen^since Miss Parkinson's failed attempt to kill him. Potter and his friends have disappeared as well.\" \"Yes. We have searc..."
1 "so that it is" "... form other products of a similar nature. One way to accomplish this is to focus on how my product looks to consumers, I could redesign the packaging so that it is more appealing to customers. A product that is more appealing to customers means that the product will sell and I will have to increase production in..."
1 "repetitive task that we" "...ant.  Essentially this service is designed to open up conversations by contacting X amount of people per day. The contacting part is a time consuming repetitive task that we handle. You handle warm leads who respond and move them into your sales funnel.   Level of Activity and Benchmarks With a service of this nature it i..."
1 "but think that his" "...ys wore. His facial expression was so rigid and cold that I shivered .I never really did ever see him smile or laugh for that matter. I couldn't help but think that his beautiful ocean blue orbs were the same eyes that had saved my life on multiple occasions.  I don’t deserve to be here. I should hate him and he shou..."
1 "This meant that he" "...hange with his mood. Sometimes they would be steel blue. I noticed that they did this when he was upset. Other times they would be blue as the ocean. This meant that he was in a good mood. At times they were sapphire; the type that showed every facet when held to the light. I couldn't tell you what this meant, but th..."
1 "strategy that is more" "...bjectives in the short to medium term” (Cummings & Worley, 2015). One day for me to meet my goal of gaining market share is to come up with a pricing strategy that is more attractive to customers. Reducing chocolate prices to a more agreeable price would be a effective way to beat competition and gain market share. Cust..."
1 "also testify that I" "...n family activities. We go on trips as a family, go to the movies and out to dinner, and take the girls’ dates to different activites with us. He can also testify that I am not emotionally, physically, or mentally abusive to him or either of the girls. He can also testify that he and I have primarily taken responsibil..."
1 "thriller that is very" "...as it is. This was the one book from the assigned list which I chose as my favorite. My rating for this book would be a 9.5/10. It is a very exciting thriller that is very much like The Hunger Games and it involves drama, a tiny bit of romance, and a spike of horror. I very much enjoyed my reading experience and am exci..."
1 "It indicates that a" "... better performance (Camp, 1995). According to (Huber, 1991) OLT indicates to creation new ideas that capable to improve the organization's strategy. It indicates that a firm's market inspection must be more timely and accurate than that of its competitors to enable market-based learning as a source of sustainable com..."
0 "was told that it" "...each other, and he’s got his girls besides. And for all Johnny’s teasing, I am a good girl. The first time we slept together was our wedding night. I was told that it was something that nice girls, good girls let their husbands do. Wasn’t it a surprise to find out that I wanted him, too? But I was only ever with hi..."
0 ") found that both" "...own to synchronize in music which in turn can help with motor learning (Karageorghis, 1997). When presented with background music Schwartzmiller (2003) found that both cadence of pedaling and power output similarly changed with music beat frequency. Additionally, the faster the tempo of music the higher power output..."
1 "tasks that were both" "...n check my email so I’m not distracted by what’s in front of me.    Student Book 5: Analyzing your activity log (3)  What was the total time spent on tasks that were both urgent and important?  35% of my time What types of tasks were these?  6%\tA-Assist the Teacher/Student: 21%\tF-Facilitating or attending a meeting: 3%..."
0 "Clark noted that Indians" "...as “huddled as far as there was room” and “as being men of low intelligence and social order” appearing “unmistakably dejected and dismal,” Inspector Clark noted that Indians were attracted to this part of Stepney largely because “the predominating Jewish population do not object to their presence” (Ibid.). Thus, to use Ea..."
1 "Rousseau claims that there" "... theory further in his book Emile (1762), which described the life of a young boy that was allowed to grow up and develop “naturally”.  In this book, Rousseau claims that there are three acting forces on the education of a child; nature, man, and things within our society. “Now of these three factors in education nature is w..."
0 "alcoholic that was very" "...is 28 now and is still a big part of James’ life. He has two grandsons by her and boasts about being a grandfather.                 His father was an alcoholic that was very abusive to his three children. The children was also exposed to their mother being abused. James said that when he was growing up “he wished his dadd..."
0 "was revealed that the" "...i & Kahjeh (2014) aimed at comparing the characteristics and variations of paediatric poisoning between two retrospective studies (1998 and 2008). It was revealed that the outbreak of admitted paediatric patients from poisoning is in relation to the variations of environmental agents and drug usage. Poisoning by swallow..."
0 "finding indicates that there" "... and Ng’eny (2015) state that the nominal effective exchange rate (NEER)  has a positive significant effect on stock market.  For inflation rate, The finding indicates that there is significant positive relationship between the growth rate of inflation and Shanghai Stock Exchange Composite Index. Based on the previous research..."
1 "hair that is tied" "... classmate really easy to talk to. “I’m Okuda Manami by the way. Nice to meet you.” Okuda Manami is petite girl, at the height of 4’11 ft. with black hair that is tied into two twin braid that reaches her shoulder. She wears the schoolwide uniform and don a pair of round frame glasses that covers her grey eyes. Hope..."
0 "and that is picking" "...ed with.  Alberta stated, “I would do anything and everything for my kids, and grandkids. They mean the world to me.” She has only one regret in life and that is picking up smoking. “I quit when I was pregnant for the first time, but later picked it back up again,” explained Alberta.   Many people haven’t been to Conw..."
1 "he believed that when" "...een a well respected man and, from the amount of people that came, would be missed by many.  “My dad loved that poem. But just that one line. You see he believed that when you're gone, you're gone. He was a man of science and did not conceive in any afterlife. My father meant so much to so many people, and that is shown..."
1 "know that it includes" "... a guy in a hot dog stand or if it truly was my family and Austin. I am going to think that my identity is awesome because of Texas, and my family. I know that it includes more but I think that they have shaped it and been central to it most.   \t"
0 "least that was what" "...t point, the most important things in my life were religion and self-improvement. While everyone moved in one direction, I moved in the other - or at least that was what I felt. Soon enough, I realized I was different still even among my “religious” peers. Unlike almost every other religious guy, I literally had no on..."
1 "information that is still" "...INFORMATION UTILISED As the team has been established and officially assigned to handle the mine company negotiations, the next step is to gather the information that is still outstanding.   3.1 Gathering of Information 2.1.1 Political Influences The company needs to consider the political influence of the Mayor of the town..."
1 "and staff that collectively" "...early alert system?]  The university originally formed three teams: Analytics, Metrics, and Systems.  The teams consisted of administration, faculty, and staff that collectively served as a task force for the project.  The project teams have since consolidated into an Analytics & Systems team in order to create a high degree ..."
0 "showed that" "...an experiment (Betsy Sparrow, 2011) carried out that looked at ‘computer availability on memory’ (Betsy Sparrow, 2011).  The end result of this case, showed that participants recalled more in a test, when told the computer was not recording them, than other participants who believed that a record was being kep..."
1 "was decided that two" "...classroom seamlessly. The other four groups were going to focus on the use of ‘Accountable Talk’ in the classroom. With consultation with the OUH, it was decided that two class visits a year would be suffice to allow teachers to try new skills on their own. One visit would take place semester one. The other would occur..."
"Leone has that an" "...s a national sport. Zebra crossings are only so ambulances know where to pick up the pedestrians.  5. Dubai has less than 20cm of rain a year. Sierra Leone has that an hour  " 0
1 "We noticed that the" "... door to get an understanding from the team if they would consider new opportunities. All information to date was provided over the phone.  Insights: We noticed that the follow-up conversation focused around^whether the team would consider opportunities, and often times wouldn’t know until opportunities were available..."
0 "stratification is that it" "...ditional qualification and have no intention of completing one the future ( answered “No” to question 14 and 29);    The motivation behind the use of stratification is that it is a more efficient research sampling method that provides more information with a given sample size. Stratification ensures homogeneity within each ..."
0 "algorithms that were suggested" "...e of a quantum register of size n-qubits. [3] The power of quantum computing  over classical computing was demonstrated dramatically in the different algorithms that were suggested. Shor algorithm which gave a solution to the factorization problem which was in polynomial time. Also Grover algorithm which gave a solution to findi..."
1 "allowed provided that his" "...if he was part of some vivisection. She would usually only arrive whenever she had a social experiment she wanted to conduct with prisoners, which he allowed provided that his prisoners would not suffer much. She also performed the name wiping process, reserved for the most offensive criminals.  Otherwise, it would get very..."
1 "hereby stated that the" "...LEASE DO NOT USE THIS SITE. This Site is a platform which connect the customers and the service providers. Further, for the purpose of clarity, it is hereby stated that the Website is not engaged in providing any services by itself but is merely a platform, which connects the service providers to customers. PROXIMOVE is ..."
0 "think that is one" "... my book in a perfect pile, and my clothes put in my dresser like a puzzle. I just like things to be neat and tidy. I like routines. Some some people think that is one of my best qualities but I think it is a little annoying. I can not help it though it is just natural to me to have things in a certain order. My loc..."
1 "which decided that it" "...protect by taxing imported vegetables. In 1886, an importer was taxed at the port for importing tomatoes. The case made its way to the Supreme Court, which decided that it is indeed botanically defined as a fruit. Whether fruit or vegetable, tomato is enjoyed in many sauces and foods such as; ketchup, pasta sauces, Bolo..."
1 "also believe that Jekyll" "... feel as if whatever is written in the letter that was given to Utterson by Jekyll is going to only drive Utterson to find Hyde more. At this point I also believe that Jekyll is going to die at some point. He is either going to die because he is so ill, or someone is going to murder him at some point. As for Hyde, I am not..."
0 "for States that either" "...ing the Quality Systems in place that support State LUST Corrective Action programs.  This survey is intended to evaluate procedures and requirements for States that either conduct sampling and monitoring activities or receive data from responsible parties, contractors, municipalities, or other entities. The goal is to b..."
0 "now that it wasn" "...etter to set some clothes out now before the sun is gone for good. I’ll start washing when we get home. Okay?\" Naruto asked but Sasuke had learned by now that it wasn't really a question. Naruto was a homemaker through and through. Sasuke was going to remind the blonde that by the time they reached home they’d only..."
1 "feel betrayed that you" "...being a part of the academy lately. If you’re ever M.I.A. from your team, you’re suddenly M.I.A. from their family for a long time. I just think they feel betrayed that you chose me over them, and for those few hours that you were gone from me, I felt what they might just be feeling right now. I was able to forgive you a..."
1 "parents felt that our" "...finitely had flaws. Since he lived so far, we didn’t get to see each other much, but we still continued to talk on the phone every chance we got. Our parents felt that our relationship was beginning to become a little too serious, and since his parents were so strict, this led us to break up. We were sad that we were fo..."
1 "is worried that “" "...e family and shows the Nielsens think of her as a true daughter.  Section 8 Vivian tries to avoid to getting in trouble with the Nielsens because she is worried that “...Mr. Sorenson could be on the doorstep, telling me the Nielsens have decided I’m too expensive, too much trouble, or merely a disappointment, and th..."
0 "dress that is red" "...ng to buy me.  I am given a bath in bathtub and I am washed thoroughly and she dress me in my red panties and my red bra and I am wearing my finished dress that is red.   Abbie goes up with her nanny and meets her master Alastair and another gentleman in the hallway. The gentleman introduced himself as Glenn and tel..."
0 "they report that when" "...ns such as heart disease and stroke, which can be detected with routine ECG tests, are two to four times more likely to occur in diabetics.  Further, they report that when diabetes is combined with inactivity, smoking, excess weight and high blood pressure, the risk increases even more. The kidneys are affected when ele..."
1 "Santiago is that he" "...here. He believes that if he visits Mecca, his dreams will come true and he’ll have nothing to live for in the end. However, the thing that separates Santiago is that he needs to actually live his dream for him to stay alive. The idea of succeeding in finding his Personal Legend is the only thing keeping Santiago goin..."
0 "NOTICE FURTHER THAT the" "...ive relief.    TAKE NOTICE FURTHER THAT the affidavit of MR TAMBANI ELVIS MATUMBA annexed hereto will be used in support of such application.    TAKE NOTICE FURTHER THAT the Applicant has appointed TAMBANI MATUMBA ATTORNEYS CARE OF MABUNDA AND MABUNDA, 31 HANS VAN RENSBERG STREET, RAMLIN SQUARE, POLOKWANE at which address..."
1 "you ascertain that your" "... all the nutrients they need from food, and may cause some stomach upsets like bloating and diarrhea.   Dietary solutions for German Shepherd   After you ascertain that your German Shepherd has a sensitive tummy, next begins the wearisome process to determine the cause of the reaction. The most common causes of stomach up..."
1 "cup that were specially" "... comfort thanks to the padding on the ear cups and the headband, and they also can fold down nicely for travel.   These have 53mm drivers in each ear cup that were specially designed for the environments that DJs find themselves in. It’s hard to hear the low end of your music in a loud setting, and Audio-Technica took tha..."
0 "penny dropped that Six" "...ted to their continuous improvement practices and manufacturing control systems. During our class discussions and further reading about Six Sigma the penny dropped that Six Sigma is an extension and an improvement of the way we currently do things.    I believe that our current continuous improvement model as part of our..."
0 ", that is a" "...aning the bum of Abbie with wet wipes and I throw the used wipes in the pooped disposable diaper I throw in the trash. Up with your feet again sweetie, that is a good girl so nanny can put on you some ointment and baby powder.   Caitlin puts on me some ointment and baby powder and then I get a clean disposable..."
0 "also notice that their" "... or may even recall a growth spurt (Trobisch et al., 2010).  Grow spurts plays a major role in idiopathic scoliosis (Trobisch et al., 2010).  One may also notice that their shoulders are uneven (Trobisch et al., 2010). Idiopathic scoliosis only rarely causes pain in children and adolescents and often comes to attention o..."
1 "just realized that everyone" "...going on? Your acting you haven't have any dessert in weeks!” Darren stated jokingly, his face did not seem to change. I looked up to face Darren. “I just realized that everyone else is done- or almost done!” I said, Darren’s face was left un"
0 "Explain that a" "... Background Knowledge Activation: Remind children of the discussion they had about the essential question for the unit: How do people best cooperate? Explain that a right is something we are free to do and a responsibility is something that we must do. Then act out a right and a responsibility, such as reading a ..."
1 "mean that it is" "...faces the online community today is the risk of false information or fake news being spread. Just because someone says something is true, it does not mean that it is. We have to keep in mind that we do not know this source and that we have to check with at least two more sources to make sure that the statement is ..."
1 "be notified that any" "...ity will be maintained with the volunteers in the research, as this will enable participation and sincerity in the research. The volunteers will also be notified that any disclosure relating to malpractices from health professionals, or child protection issues among families will not be disclosed without their knowledg..."
0 "I discovered that it" "...idn’t know how she could become pregnant. This is because she was a vampire before you were even born. Being in the medical field, I did research and I discovered that it would be possible, though the percentage of likeability was low, for Melody to be impregnated only once after she was turned into a vampire.”   “So h..."
1 "this shows that Molly" "...aintenance and “Multiple earrings don’t have the same punk appeal; every forty-something divorcée on the island has half a dozen hoops in her ears.”, this shows that Molly is changing the way she feels her as and is helping her in a small way to help think of the future. The social worker, Lori, tell Molly that if she (..."
0 "people that was recording" "...ct in the world\" Steve said. Every person in the science convection stated to die of laughter after Steve said that absurd thing in the stage and the people that was recording the event started to post memes in the internet    \"Ha how are you going to get a test subject for this test. No one wants to die\"a scientist shouted..."
1 "band announces that they" "...atform to build her musical career.   After more than 10 years of performing in one of the well known Haitian band, “Zin”. One of the founders of the band announces that they were taking a break. During that time Nia seized the opportunity to take a break herself from the music scene and start a family. Thus, she took the ..."
1 "investigation are that firstly" "...as then applied to the case study of marijuana and how the legalization of the drug has impacted society.    The conclusions that were drawn from the investigation are that firstly, the criminalization of a drug does not reduce the rate of crime within a specific region or area; secondly that despite a practice being deemed ille..."
1 "which suggests that they" "...ultural history and language of the region, in order to sustain cultural heritage. This organisation states that booking tours online is unavailable, which suggests that they ensure only tourists that are going to help sustain this ancient land will be able to have this experience, as they mention “to assess whether we off..."
1 "same mistakes that America" "...mistakes, “history is bound to repeat itself” To only care about the income, in the textbook industry, is to doom the upcoming generation to make the same mistakes that America did in the past.  Children who are educated and know about past mistakes are less likely to repeat them, and will also help make the world a better p..."
0 ", that is -" "...el, \"The Life and Crimes of Harry Lavender\", is the beginning of a hard-boil crime fiction series set in the 1980s. Day's novel consists of two voices, that is - of a female private investigator, Claudia Valentine and a crime leader, Harry Lavender. In the search for clues to the mysterious death of Mark, Vale..."
1 "mentor understands that no" "...n these competencies.     A good mentor should assess a mentees learning style, there are many different learning styles and it is paramount that the mentor understands that no learning style is incorrect (Rassool and Rawaf 2007).  The three main approaches to learning styles are behaviourism, cognitivism and humanism.  The ..."
1 "has requested that you" "...t clothing since my master is expecting me to get dressed. Nanny what is going.? Abbie you just obey and there will be no problems child, my employer has requested that you  Come upstairs since he has something important he going to tell you child.  Nanny takes off my dress and then she takes off my bra and panties. I am..."
1 "they consider that manliness" "...nd that big responsibility because will effect on the new generation.  On the other hand, they beliefs that no problem if the man smoke cigarette and they consider that manliness the consequence of my brother's health and their family's health, also they cannot stop smoking easily.  I know that always my family support boys mo..."
0 "and that it was" "...ng sleep, Sara thought about how much she would miss nights like this with her mom.  She knew in her heart if the house was livable she would move in and that it was the right decision to make, but she would miss her mom greatly. Waking to the warmth on her face from the rays of sunshine streaming in the window, S..."
1 "she knows that Elizabeth" "...f the more sensible people in this story, telling Elizabeth not to fall in love with Mr. Wickham because of his insiffecient amount of money. I think she knows that Elizabeth does not                                                                   In Chapter 27 and 28 \t\t\t\t \t                      In Chapter 35 and 36     ..."
1 "is assumed that the" "...e first attribute in the table is always considered the primary key. [9] In this section, the assumptions for the suggested system will be stated. It is assumed that the database system is composed of (n) qubits with domain of N2 qubits. The system contains M tables with all relational database rules being applied to ..."
1 "mean that it only" "...ferent language and catch that other books don’t have. Because Username: Evie is a graphic novel it does have a lot of illustrations but this doesn’t mean that it only has a sentence or two on each page. But because of the pictures it actually just means that the wording becomes more powerful and subjective, so just..."
1 "even understands that he" "...s his emotions and moods do not excuse him from being responsible for what he does in life. He has become able to recognize his thinking patterns and even understands that he has the ability to change those patterns but he is not confident that he can do this when he is depressed. Thhis is where he still needs work and con..."
1 "one that is needed" "...a timely manner will result in disciplinary action, up to and including termination.   Absenteeism Your contribution to company goals is an important one that is needed every day. When you are not at work, your efforts are missed. For this reason, employees should report to work as scheduled.  If you are unable to re..."
0 "actually state that Enoch" "...and having saluted them, and having confessed that strangers and sojourners they are upon the earth.  'In faith died all these' The Scriptures do not actually state that Enoch was translated alive to Heaven, according to Hebrews 11:13, Enoch was included with those who died.  Do you believe in the Rapture?   Yes  No  See re..."
0 "exams showed that you" "...'when she saw me was inexplicably afraid but with him the effect is opposite.' he mused to himself. The doctor coughed and questioned to the boy \"The exams showed that you are perfectly fine, however I need your name to fill the records\", after thinking he spoke truthful \"The only thing I remember is a name, Shirou\". Th..."
1 "he believed that Naruto" "...s and the wood to burn under them, dinner was made and Naruto was standing by the stove stirring the pot. He cleared his throat awkwardly even though he believed that Naruto heard when he entered. “I made stew,” he said not turning to greet Sasuke. Sasuke nodded as we went to take a seat at the table and wait for Naruto t..."
1 "to imagine that she" "...p in her belly, beginning to churn the acids in her empty stomach. As a child Zera had spent nights without food in her belly, and she taught herself to imagine that she had eaten a feast to calm her aching. Zera pretended that a tantalizing scent of broth was teasing her nose, and filling her stomach. It was an effec..."
0 ") discuss that market-based" "...enable market-based learning as a source of sustainable competitive advantage (e.g., Dickson, 1992; Teece et al., 1997). Weerawardena and O'Cass (2004) discuss that market-based learning enables the company to relate firm capabilities to the external environment to anticipate the market needs before its competitors, and to cr..."
1 "vine that was hanging" "... in? It started running at us, Tyrell pulled out some kind of knife to protect himself Ainsley did the same with a spear. Willow grabbed some kind of vine that was hanging from the roof and started to to try and catch the creature, but it was to fast it was like it had been made to purely to kill. I broke of a piece of ..."
1 "we recognize that to" "...ts to be writers, readers, thinkers and lovers of literature. When we put our literacy ‘goals’ for students in the context of the Bronxville Promise, we recognize that to find one’s voice and communicate clearly, to think critically and explore nature, history, and culture, and to engage with the world around you and m..."
1 "heard that" "...y mentioned is hyper self aware. The producers wanted to portray the gypsies in the least flattering way possible.  Oksana Marafioti a ethnic romani, heard that a show was being produced about the romani people of the United States. She enthusiastically reached out to the shows producers, they told her that t..."
1 "upfront is that it" "...ization are the only method of accessing the content that you’ve worked so hard to curate. The additional benefit of considering content organization upfront is that it results in a better experience for all of your visitors. This step is necessary for a mobile-first design strategy [/blog/content/designing-mobile-fi..."
1 "crime that is committed" "...day’s cyber criminal. A few years ago the majority of crimes were being committed via desktop computers. However, in today’s society just about every crime that is committed, there seems to be a cellphone tied to the crime. The rapid advancement of technology seems to be the logical answer for combating the criminal eleme..."
0 "expect that" "...ouldn’t sleep last night due to my excitement and end up waking up late this morning. I just brought enough money to buy some food. However, I didn’t expect that E-Class would be so...secluded. Still, I’m surprise that he doesn’t buy anything from within the country for lunch.” “Koro-sensei likes to go overboa..."
1 "clearly stated that everyone" "...that pet and it would be taken with them everywhere. Conclusion Even though health started out pretty much being the opposite of disease, today it is clearly stated that everyone agrees that wellness and health is more than the non presence of disease. In fact, someone with a disease or illness can actually obtain a wellbeing,..."
1 "you that it made" "...Later after lots of talking and louder and louder arguments, I remember you asking what it is that i like about the phone so much. I remember telling you that it made me happy. The phone doesn’t ask anything of me and is always there when i need it. It doesn’t talk back or hurt my feelings. After that, I was sure y..."
1 "also see that Nora" "...y. While Nora is explaining to Mrs Linde how she had to take several jobs to be able to pay off loan, Mrs Linde demeanor changes towards Nora. We can also see that Nora’s character shows maturity and determination. A side of Nora no one thought she had.  A man comes to the door wishing to speak to Torvald. Nora is no..."
"anything that is written" "...to cancel  at anytime so in essence it is a monthly endorsment and if he wears anything else we have the authority  to sue him.  I need tp forward on anything that is written but I need a few " 1
1 "Cole realizes that the" "...During the storm Cole blacked out and when he woke the tree that had the baby sparrows had fallen. This is when we see the first real change in Cole. Cole realizes that the baby sparrows did not deserve death^at all. When Cole realizes this we see that he has stopped blaming something else and noticing that he was the on..."
1 "also recall that you" "...ooking down.       “ Stop right there, I remember that you were a well-loved nurse and treated everyone with respect when you were caring for them. I also recall that you earned an award for being the best nurse. The hospital really treated you like family and this whole town loved you. So that is not true.” The barten..."
1 "claim that it'" "...this, arguing that it is not the anarchic system but rather a failure in the balance of power.   On the other hand, liberals would challenge this and claim that it's a failure in balance of power and not the anarchic system to be held accountable.It is here that the two approaches differ greatest, as whilst Reali..."
"to share that to" "...hrough the whole way and they don't want us to display patients information. I told student we have currently and the day shift techs but if you want to share that to the other shift will be greatly appreciated." 1
1 "all that was going" "...at I never seen before... That was saying something as I knew everyone in this little Podunk town. I wanted to cry, I might as well keep my pants for all that was going on. My dad got to me first he knelt and took^my shoe off comma I hung my head wanting to hide the tears that has sprung into my eyes from the pain. T..."
1 "reason been that the" "...breached the agreement. Baker further went ahead and obtained a default award of damages against them, the award was set aside by the Nigerian court, reason been that the award against Danos was not duly supported by a substantial evidence. The arbitral tribunal improperly awarded punitive damages against chevron. Bake..."
0 "is said that the" "... primarily by the goals or objectives that individuals set for themselves. It suggests that it is the goal itself that provides the driving force. It is said that the performance of an employee will improve, when they themselves set specific rather than vague goals for themselves. It is also argued that an individu..."
1 "it means that we" "...eryone focus more on the relationship between people (ethics care), and also cares about our environment (natural care). She stressed the ‘practice’, it means that we should do a real action to care about people, and the people you cared about must admit they received your care, or this cannot be considered as a ca..."
0 "think that is one" "... row, my book in a perfect pile, and my clothes put in my dresser like a puzzle. I just like things to be neat and tidy. I like routines. Some people think that is one of my best qualities but I think it is a little annoying. I cannot help it though it is just natural to me to have things in a certain order. My lock..."
0 "was found that the" "...rning) cites a study estimating the relative influence of 30 different categories of educational, psychological and social variables on learning.  It was found that the social and emotional variables exerted the most powerful influence on academic performance. So, how do we balance meeting students’ social and emotio..."
1 "to believe that the" "... the universe, only its evolution, and that, as the laws of science break down anyway as we approach the creation of the universe, there is no reason to believe that the First Law of Thermodynamics would apply. The Second Law of Thermodynamics, on the other hand, lends theoretical (albeit inconclusive) support to the ..."
1 "further revealed that the" "... were experiencing domestic abuse. Another key finding is the information sharing between children services and Health visitors and the GP. The audit further revealed that the Safe Lives DASH checklist tool was used to assess the level of domestic abuse in 5 cases out of the 10 cases. 4 of which was referred to MARAC and th..."
0 "genes that were upregulated" "...m of proteins, metabolism of lipids and lipoproteins, mitochondrial translation, cell cycle, p53-Independent DNA Damage Response. Cluster B contained genes that were upregulated between 15 to 24 months, and was enriched for chromatin organization, and splicing genes. Cluster C included genes that were supressed at 15 and 30 m..."
1 "crop is that it" "...own so the whole process of growing seeds should be repeated that takes a plenty of time and money. Ethical issues: One of the ethical issues with GM crop is that it can induce allergic response and diseases to organisms. For e.g. many crops are modified by DNA from bacterium or virus and that can do contagion to ..."
0 ", that is their" "...people tend to focus on individual weakness or lack of values as the reason why people commit crimes. Ultimately, if someone chooses to commit a crime, that is their responsibility. The individual should pay the consequences if they get caught, but how about giving these individuals who committed the crime, whom a..."
1 "suicide is that it" "... comes afterward. These are games; one must first answer.” Arthur Schopenhauer wrote in Studies of Pessimism On Suicide that the reason not to commit suicide is that it ends the very consciousness that’s inquiring whether there’s going to be a change if it ends it’s own existence. Is it a diseased brain that ends it’..."
1 "out stocks that he" "...I learn and apply it to the real world. For instance, I took what I learned from circuits to make a remote controlled car. Also, I helped my dad pick out stocks that he should buy using my experience from 4th and 6th grade in a stock market simulation. Doing this has proved useful in understanding the curriculum and ..."
0 "she views that as" "... parenting, both physically, intellectually, and emotionally. The mother of this show has a complete disregard for societal norms and seems as though she views that as a virtue. She is rude, loud, uneducated, and unhealthy, all these negative things a considered positive character traits to her. This warped view of ..."
0 "understands that is impossible" "...hat drives him to his death. His sexual perversion is a way to spew anger to the powerful system and to turn the “self”. Nevertheless, before long he understands that is impossible and he cannot free all of the system.          Bibliography      Abraham, N and Torok, M., 1994, ‘Mourning or Melancholia: Introjection versus Incorp..."
1 "Mexicans held that the" "...e annexation process because Polk persuaded Texans to grab all land to the Rio Grande and claim the river as their southern and western border, while Mexicans held that the Nueces River was the border. According to Mary Beth, this was set for conflict.  Polk wanted Mexico’s territory all the way to the Pacific and Mexico..."
1 "I sense that I" "...re of the their airman.  Thus, I found myself moving towards “micromanagement” tendencies since some of SNCOs were not performing.  In the future, as I sense that I lean towards the unproductive tendencies of this management style, I will strive to empower the troops to perform the tasks even if they do not meet ..."
0 "evil that is in" "... it says, “I’m the Beast… You knew, didn’t you? I’m part of you?... Why things are what they are?” (Golding 143). This confirms that the Beast is the evil that is in the boys, and it shows how the Beast and Lord of the Flies are one in the same.  In a way, the events occurring on the island are a reflection of the..."
1 ") revealed that knowledge" "...h delivery in the country.   Greater health Knowledge promotes health in the world. In Nigeria evidence from the quantitative study of (Babalola, 2011) revealed that knowledge is influenced by myths or rumours in child immunisation among mothers in the North.   Although partial immunisation was found to influence mothers av..."
1 "feel betrayed that you" "...being a part of the academy lately. If you’re ever M.I.A. from your team, you’re suddenly M.I.A. from their family for a long time. I just think they feel betrayed that you chose me over them, and for those few hours that you were gone from me, I felt what they might just be feeling right now. I was able to forgive you a..."
0 "she says that Peter" "...ut me out for some random girl he barely knows! I can’t let that    happen, I can’t. I gave her the fairy dust so she could even fly to Neverland and she says that Peter taught her to fly, if it wasn’t for me and my fairy dust she would never have gone to Neverland. I knew I should never has allowed Peter to take the ..."
1 "work that is at" "...th methods of how students can bump up their own work to the next level of achievement. I will model for the students an example of a sample piece of work that is at the lower end of the BIUW, demonstrating for students how to improve their work using the wall. The improvements may be as simple as proofreading/edi..."
1 "Court found that the" "...e Second Circuit has issued a ruling blocking the enforcement of an Ecuadorian court's 2011 $8.646 billion judgment against Chevron Corp.  The Second Court found that the Ecuadorian judgement against Chevron had been \"procured\" through the \"defendants' bribery, coercion, and fraud\". The court was careful to state that ..."
0 "This implies that they" "... material possessions are not what's important. The author show at the end through his statement about most people “looking for they know, not what”. This implies that they don’t know what they're looking for and that purpose or a goal is the most important thing. That is the author's purpose to try to show people what t..."
1 "things that were making" "...ernment of the city (the Paris Commune) was set up by some members of the third estate.  On 4 August 1789 the National Assembly tried to do away with things that were making the peasants so angry. A new law ended many of the powers of the nobles and the church. This stopped them punishing peasants in their own private cou..."
0 "Confucianism suggest that with" "...nce in themselves translated into the confidence in their leader.  Government was seen as only a means to bring out the good in people. The ideals of Confucianism suggest that with minimal entanglement, societies have the ability to flourish.   Many would believe that without stable direction, societies inspired by Confucius may..."
0 "opportunity that is being" "...27.htm         Political Risk Impact: ICRG: Investment Profile Subcomponent: Contract Viability Australian Businesses are looking towards a new trade opportunity that is being invested into by the Chinese middle class. The Chinese interest in goods and services that are actually healthy for them have made Australian goods a..."
1 "strongly believe that I" "...xation and increase my productivity.  Scoring high in achievement describe me as a person who feel positively challenged by what I can find in life.I strongly believe that I can change things and make them the way I think they could be and is not afraid to take calculative risk. To be less achievement oriented I feel I sh..."
1 "he knows that it" "...t she will be finish with the loan by the new year. But Krogstad is not worry about that, he wants to make sure his position in the bank remains, for he knows that it would be hard to him to find a job elsewhere due to his reputation, he needs to build his reputation and his life again for his sons. He threatens No..."
1 ") found that for" "...and emotionally safe within their working environment, this can be achieved by the relationship between mentor and student.  Rogers and Freiberg (1994) found that for an effective working relationship three conditions must be meet; the first is the acceptance of who the individual is, for their strengths and weakne..."
0 "which states that there" "...ties. For sustainable development to be customary international law, it must satisfy the definition outlined in Article 38(1) (b) of the ICJ Statute, which states that there must be ‘state practice’ and ‘opinion juris’.   Academics such as Barral argue that there is a legal obligation of sustainable development. Firstly t..."
1 "later understood that the" "...ment of programming building practices to enhance programming quality and rate of conveyance (Reed, 2014).   Nordstrom as a design retailer sooner or later understood that the significance of having a site was not only for online corporate nearness, it comprehended that a strong online nearness ought to incorporate a powerf..."
1 "family requested that Jerry" "... to graduate with his peers, instead his was eight credits behind. “After reviewing the records and transcripts from Jerry’s past placements, Jerry’s family requested that Jerry attend the local public school in a special education  setting,” (p. 5). However, Jerry had not been successful in any of his alternative settings. H..."
1 "always felt that we" "...eir skill. In Bach’s day, music was going through an experimental phase and guidelines were being created on the spot with each new composition. I’ve always felt that we are going through a similar period of experimentation, but music is much more accessible now and we have a greater selection of genres than at any ot..."
1 "he realized that I" "...My dad had obviously known who he was, there was no news about a new family moving into town so I was lost. I thought about the look on his face when he realized that I was hurt. It's slowly recounted the event, it happened so fast that I didn't have a moment to think it first, now I sat back and thought about the co..."
0 "have said that we" "...e camp is buzzing, despite my small doubts and nervousness, I still feel like I am about to burst with pride. I feel in peak condition, the sergeants have said that we are all combat-ready and will make a fearsome opponent on the battlefield. I do not feel fearsome but I know that I am willing to defend this country..."
1 "told that" "...ness place. We interacted and he offered me a job placement with Integrated Engineering Services. I did not take the offer because I was, as at then, told that there was also another offer for me. My third in 3 months. The Department of Mechanical Engineering, Faculty of Technology, Bayero University, Kano o..."
1 "and says that his" "... continues to go on about Lanyon, but Utterson ignores the comments and urges onto the subject of Mr. Hyde. Jekyll grows pale at the mention of Hyde, and says that his relationship with Hyde is strange. After Utterson tells Jekyll that he could help get rid of the strange relationship, Jekyll thanks Utterson and tel..."
1 "of features that we" "...s ensures that all parties are aligned with the overall objectives of the project scope.                            FEATURES  The following is a list of features that we propose to populate the front-end side of the website to enhance the user experience. The design and functionality of your new website will be scalab..."
1 "technology that is always" "...ld.) If you get an idea for a new melody or composition, write it down or sing it. Keeping a journal of ideas is much easier now that many of us have technology that is always with us. Enjoy Artwork: Look for art that appeals to you. Think about how you could turn that piece into a musical work. Search for ways to musically..."
0 "to ensure that the" "...gram for several reasons, including lack of time or experience. For that reason, Kika provides ongoing marketing consulting and guided implementation to ensure that the execution of the brand and marketing strategies are executed at the highest level. Consider us your ongoing adviser; answering your questions, making..."
1 "then mentioned that the" "... the time coming in too work with anxiety as he was leaving his wife. AM stated that it was understandable and it was good to see DJ back at work. AM then mentioned that the company had DJ in for welfare meetings and enquired how he felt they went. DJ said that they were great and really helped him. AM stated that he was ..."
1 "goals  Think that your" "...eone else will ). Here are a couple of scenarios that would begin with the end in mind. Thinking about going to college  Planning ahead Setting ahead goals  Think that your life is 1,000 pieces do you have a clear picture ahead of what your picture is going to be? People these days only think that they are never going to..."
1 "saying is that “" "...m them is only dooming the future to repeat the past Heroification keeps the upcoming generation from learning from the mistakes of the past A common saying is that “the children are the future” and parents teach their children to learn from their mistakes. Mistakes of this country were made in the past, if childre..."
0 "you hear that from" "...s. I stick my tongue out at her, at least I hope it was her.  \"Too bad\"  \"I bought it, I should be able to eat some\" My uncle argues.  \"And where did you hear that from?\" I wonder raising both eyebrows even though they probably can't see them.  \"Its a known fact\" he states matter-a-factly.  \"Pretty much\" Al adds.  \"N..."
1 "is known that no" "... the Walsh family have taken command of the South and the North part of the city being looked after by the Uplands. They all have their vices, but it is known that no one will step out of line. Things hadn't always been so peaceful, but ever since the treaty had been signed two years ago, they have calmed down to t..."
1 "and believed that he" "... believed that, \"Freedom of speech is guaranteed in our constitution, and the committee can't do anything against that.” A federal judge noticed Luis and believed that he is right and that there wasn’t anything special  passed that prohibited the expression of the fans and he then threatened to fine up to $3,200 to any..."
1 "car board that I" "... word - it is silent and awkward but I hug my family, just in case it is the last time I'll feel this loved. My aching body touches the thin piece of car board that I am lucky enough to have. I pull in Suske and hold him tight for warmth.  'Listen to all the lullabies, Suske,'I whisper in his cold and fragile ear. ..."
1 "is convinced that he" "...all he can think of was him self and his reputation. How can Nora do this To him? When in reality if it wasn't for Nora he wouldn't be alive. Torvald is convinced that he has to shut Krogstand at any cause, his appearance and reputation must stay intact. He suggested to Nora that their relation must stay the Same to th..."
1 "studies found that older" "...ions focused on normal changes with aging memory and the other half focused on pathological age changes; as observed with symptoms of dementia. Prior studies found that older adults were more aware of both normal and abnormal memory issues. This was thought to be true due to maturity of thinking skills, life experiences an..."
1 "industry that is developing" "OEM Diagnostic Services will be joining a  segment of the automotive repair industry that is developing quickly, mobile diagnostic services that specialize in the new Advanced driver-assist systems (ADAS). Recent legislation is requiring all automakers ..."
0 "Please understand that we" "...neglect.  In most cases, we are directed by the state’s child protective agency and the C-2 school district not to notify the parents of the report.  Please understand that we are legally obligated to comply with these guidelines.  It is not our role to make decisions about whether abuse has occurred, but only to report sus..."
1 "AM stated that it" "...h concerns during this period , breast cancer related so it all felt too much at the time coming in too work with anxiety as he was leaving his wife. AM stated that it was understandable and it was good to see DJ back at work. AM then mentioned that the company had DJ in for welfare meetings and enquired how he felt..."
1 "means is that about" "... the world- the top five schools can be found in the United States and ten out of the top twelve school are als middle of the scale at 56%. What this means is that about half of the United States thinks we are living well or are in a comfortable living situation. A factor that affects the United states standard of liv..."
1 "surveyed said that their" "...ated in sport at a high level (Curtner-Smith, 2001).  The data collected within the student survey supports this suggestion as 50 respondents from 72 surveyed said that their main influence for taking up a career in Physical Education was because of a teacher. Capel & Blair (2007) suggest that teachers play a central role ..."
0 "school that is free" "...Young Australians declares that 'all Australian governments and all school sectors must provide all students with access to high-quality schooling. A school that is free from discrimination based on gender, language, sexual orientation, pregnancy, culture, ethnicity, religion, health or disability, socio-economic back..."
1 "I suggest that Kylie" "..., p. 1) With how many calories are burned during a practice or performance, it is crucial that Kylie eat and get the proper nutrients that she needs. I suggest that Kylie seek a professional nutritionist who understands what kind of diet a ballet dancer needs. Furthermore, I think that she should find new ballet instru..."
1 "I noticed that my" "...brushed my long, straight dark brown hair until all the knots were either gone or no longer visible. When I went into the bathroom to brush my teeth, I noticed that my eyes were more colorful than they normally were. The purple next to my pupil was darker, and it faded into a lighter purple as it reached the walls o..."
1 "software that was specifically" "... the sex industry is considered to be the father of online credit card payments, first through email then later through the development of e-commerce software that was specifically built for secure transactions. As early as 1995, the sex industry was offering live video streaming. Along with the offer of live video streaming, th..."
0 "grounds that it was" "...strooms at her school. She was instead told to use the staff bathrooms. Her family, in response, filed and won a lawsuit against the school under the grounds that it was discrimination and a violation of the Human Rights Act. Maines later spoke out and said that the school treated her ‘like an other, an exception’- no..."
1 "to show that his" "...He says that ,” They come in search of new things, but when they leave they are basically the same people they were when they arrived.” This is meant to show that his father believes that traveling lacks effect on the ones that do it. He also says that where they live is where most travelers wish they could stay fo..."
1 "think that" "...ngs you asked me to do. I  don’t think you realized that you were asking me to change who i am. It wasn’t as simple to me as it was to you.   I don’t think that when you love someone you only love part of them. You love all of them, flaws and all. To me if you love someone than you accept what you would consi..."
0 "wall that was made" "...pened it to reveal a relatively large room that had a dresser, desk, and a queen-sized bed in the middle. What caught my eye, however, was the entire wall that was made up of book case.   “Do you like this room, I can find another one if this one won’t work, but this is the only one that hasn’t been used in a while a..."
0 "and finds that the" "... Shrestha (2008) examine the long run relationship between interest rate and stock indices in China employing heteroscedastic co-integration analysis and finds that the long term relationship does exist between stock market and interest rates.  Otherwise, Pilinkus and Boguslankas (2009) analyze the short run relation..."
1 "boat that" "...ould not feed him and the path is treacherous. Page 7 When Damo’s father returns from the camp, he decides they all should leave. He set up her mum’s boat that she uses to go to other parts of Vietnam to sell rice.  Page 8 That boat was only for rice not people to go into the turbulent ocean. Just as they we..."
1 "I feel that I" "... social interaction with students of diverse backgrounds would teach me invaluable lessons in life and it makes me a true global citizen. FUTURE GOAL I feel that I have achieved just a little so far and there is a lot to be done. A lot of information waiting to be explored, gauged, appreciated and applied. An im..."
0 "be said that her" "...this, they are first married to a tree. Yes. The woman in question will marry a tree which is then cut down and burnt to rid her of her curse. It can be said that her first husband did meet a sticky end because of her. Poor tree. Straw bear day is a festival in a small part of England were men dress themselves comp..."
1 ") asks that we" "...ic design”(Curtis 2015). From here, the books show many examples of where he has succeeded and failed and what each experience taught him.  IDEO (2015) asks that we learn from our failures.  So Hilman Curtis’ book aligns perfectly with this school of thoughts  He talks about experiences with Adobe and so forth. \t..."
1 "knew that it was" "... planetary confederation. Things, I suppose, were going too well. People were too complacent, and it silently rotted on the inside. Myself and others knew that it was nothing more than a gilded authority, parading around as a benevolent entity, while it gutted the resources of many planets and displaced billions of..."
0 "truly believed that I" "...as another obstacle that I needed to overcome and was another major key factor on why I was being held back from promotion potential.  In the past, I truly believed that I was supposed to get rewarded for efficiently completing all of my normal work duties.  When I didn’t get any positive feedback from my supervisor and..."
0 ") reports that a" "...the elderly or overweight people over 45 years of age, younger Australians are now being diagnosed (Diabetes Australia 2003). Diabetes Australia (2003) reports that a diagnosis of Type 2 diabetes can become a major financial strain on the patient and their family as they attempt to include extra medical expenses in..."
0 "is shown that there" "...oughout the education of undergraduate nurses but there was also shown that there are some disadvantages. However, in this article by Davis (2015) it is shown that there are more advantages towards self-directed learning (SDL) and the need for it within the health profession. SDL is used within the health profession a..."
0 "in hopes that it" "...idance law enforcement in order to live prosperously and turn good. Legalism rose in popularity during the Warring States Period. Its popularity rose in hopes that it may facilitate peace and unity, yet many believe that the ideals of Legalism promote fragmentation. Legalism promoted the division of social class, g..."
1 "proud is that between" "...ut I also read books, and I love fishkeeping it is my hobby and for it is educational,interesting, and really fun for me. A big achievement I am very proud is that between January 2016 and August 15th I’ve read about 27 books and I’m very  proud of that.  \tI hope to have a wonderful year. I am excited to get to know you..."
0 "never noticed that Narcissus" "...elves to ever seek the other advantages in life. For example, after Narcissus passes away, the lake tells the goddesses, “I weep for Narcissus, but I never noticed that Narcissus was beautiful. I weep because, each time he knelt beside my banks, I could see, in the depth of his eyes, my own beauty reflected.” This suggests the..."
1 "appearance that was seen" "...e text was moved from the edges to reduce the chances of text being cut off.  Also, the picture for Chris was changed so it would not have the cutoff appearance that was seen in the first revision.  Finally, the copy was reworked so that it made sense and reduced the errors in the copy.  The program, Grammarly, was used to..."
1 "also known that each" "...n costs. These costs are not limited to monetary value because time, difficulty, etc cannot be monetized, but do have a very real cost to them. It is also known that each trade off isn’t always as clear cut as doing one thing or the other. A lot of the time one will have to decide on minute differences, like enjoying a..."
0 "be argued that the" "...e children in Nigeria.  However, accidental forms of poisoning are also significant cause of morbidity among children in developing countries. It can be argued that the study did not provide information on evolving trends in developing countries and most especially in Nigeria and on the need for increasing awareness ..."
0 "you understand that you" "...nd a couple close friends. My wish is that this book will help you in some way. I hope this sort of crime never happens again, but if it does, I hope you understand that you are not alone. As a test, ask your close friends, family and co-workers if they are aware of anyone that has been sexually abused or assaulted and yo..."
1 "it states that “" "...g us by making it develop. It also makes you less human when people belive that implanting electronics is the next way to be enhanced. In our article it states that “Yet some of us might have an implant to enhance vision or read text messages directly into the synapse, or might use a bio-skeleton for enhanced stren..."
1 "which means that something" "... “You know I might not have letters after my name but I have met enough people to know what they are thinking and just then you raised your eyebrows, which means that something is troubling you, what is it? We said last night we would communicate more, please don't shut me out.”  Lauren waited before answering, she knew that..."
1 "walls that were once" "...tside and make a couple of calls.  Just give a yell if you have any questions .”  Mr. Being called out to them. “OK, will do.” Sara acknowledged. The walls that were once a soft sand color, were dull, chipping and had many cracks.  There were two huge bay windows with curtains tied back to the sides to allow the sunlig..."
1 "lessons that is different" "...ore loose. I can afford this because I’ve been teaching biology for a while now. I had to get used to the lesson planning. I had a way of planning my lessons that is different from the way we are tought at CELTA. The lesson plans weren’t detailed enough. 2  3  4  5 If there is one thing i will take away from this course it ..."
"job that is really" "... still be happy. I want to have a wife and kids who rely on me for anything. I wish to seek a job in a field that will never die out. If I can land a job that is really good in pa" 1
1 "anger that were previously" "...d consequences with school have made this change happen. The family have noticed a more settled Malachi and said he does not present the outbursts of anger that were previously noted.  A contributing factor^to this change has been the correct dosage of ADHD medication that has been modified this year to suit his size and wei..."
0 "intended that" "...nd by managing those risks through regulating certain dealings with GMOs’. The federal and state governments by applying the precautionary principle, intended that the Acts would avoid any negative impacts by GMOs.It is apparent that the law regulates the risks associated with the use of gene technology, rather ..."
0 "technology proves that the" "...state that Equality 7-2521 has committed many transgressions by creating this box, and immediately refuse his invention. In the story, the absence of technology proves that the society is one in which many would not want to live. Another critical aspect of the society is the social relationships between citizens. In Anthem, ..."
0 "have discovered that they" "...the ships crew at that moment treated everyone equally and that the rich people and poor people where on the same lifeboats?  I think that they would have discovered that they are not that much different or better than the person sitting next to them on the lifeboats.  It looks like Bill and Melinda Gates have taken the Sin..."
1 "am angered that he" "... me and my friend a date, but my friend forgot about the appointment and argued he was sick and suddenly I found in the cafe with his friends. Here I am angered that he lied to me and mistakes. It would have been better if admitted mistakes and said I forgot the appointment.    \tThe second cause problems the Friend w..."
0 "to believe that if" "...her husband.   In the second act Nora contemplates on he thought of not being around for her children and her husband she loves so dearly. Nora wants to believe that if her husband finds out what she has done he will pay off the debt and forgive her. But her husband’s words play over and over in her head. She feels s..."
1 "wonderful phrase that UKIP" "... of people, but the EU is stopping that happening, without the EU to protect our rights, who knows what would happen?   \"Take our country back\"  This wonderful phrase that UKIP and the likes of Britain First use is just plain dumb. They say we have lost sovereignty by being in the EU and we have no say in what laws are passe..."
1 "Please remember that the" "...ime that we are at Base will be utilized for training, therapies, and classroom activities.  As these activities fall into place, I will update you.  Please remember that the schedules may change several times as we settle into the school year.  Most of the students will be transported by Durham transportation in the morni..."
1 "to change that and" "...dventures do not happen to those that remain at home.” He is tired with the repetition and routine that makes up his life and he calls on his friends to change that and go have a real adventure. With two of his friends he plans a day off from their normal lives. The plan is to skip school and go seek adventure. One o..."
0 "sufficient evidence that you" "...trate mastery of the knowledge and skills we will learn in this class. You may receive an incomplete until you have completed missing work to provide sufficient evidence that you have mastered knowledge or skills.  Daily work = Formative Assessments (completion required to proceed with Summative assessment process) 85% of grad..."
1 "and that it is" "...No formal assessment is done at the end of the lesson or any homework. Learners are simply reminded that the notes they create are vital for studying and that it is their own responsibility to have them filled out in detail. The more indepth they make their notes the more they will have to study from and if they ..."
0 "I hear that?" "...h a boy, I climbed back into the Jeep… “It’s cool.” I said, answering the number one thought in his mind. I jumped “What the hell?” I asked. “How did I hear that?” I looked at Mikael waiting for an explanation. “I will tell you when we get to wherever we are going. I don’t want you to be distracted.” That was t..."
1 "I predict that it" "...00 million of total transactions. However,  because it is a prediction, the range should be between 5474 million and  6150 million.    And in Sep2014 I predict that it should rise to 5870 million of total transactions. However,   because it is a prediction, the range should be between 5465 million and 6319 million. ..."
1 "it seems that after" "...e scattering legos. After there are enough, it’s hard to walk past without stepping on one. Too many lies can make it hard to talk to anyone. Because it seems that after telling enough lies, you have to remember all of them and have to keep adding new lies to support the old ones. Lying too much can honestly make your..."
0 "film that is based" "... prefer documentary films or feature films? A. I like documentaries, because they portray factual information about social issues.  Q2. Do you know a film that is based on a book? Compare the book to the film. Are both interesting?   (Backup Q) Did you prefer watching the film or reading the book? A. I’ve read Harry ..."
1 "company proposes that the" "...ill push the company to incur such costs. Strategy has to be developed to guard against this.   3.6 Determination of possible options of exchange The company proposes that the town council should suspend all the tax revenues that are being paid by the Company in an exchange for the major improvements that the town council w..."
1 "care services that non-Canadians" "... healthcare to their daily life. Not all taxes contribute to education the government gives back to the society and locals enjoy benefits like health care services that non-Canadians do not receive.  The language barrier is a big problem that people tend to over see when they plan to study overseas. The second one gets off the pla..."
1 "steed that was nearby" "... warned Allukhan Soon Allukhan could only hear the the snapping of twigs and the crunching of leaves beneath hooves and the occasional whinney from a steed that was nearby “I cant see where im going “ Allukhan stopped her Mare “Well I suppose that’s why this place is called the Dark Wood” a voice responded in the darkne..."
0 ", that is not" "...rs could not be any more of opposites.  For some people, having the best friend whose personality is the same can be great for them; however, for Gene, that is not the case.  The saying, \"opposites attract,\" could not be any more perfect for the book.  For everything that one may be lacking in the other will alw..."
0 "if that was me" "Monster short story: As he was watching the the news in his apartment one line stood out to him “Unknown monster claims more lives” it read. “What if that was me?” He thought, the idea alone sending a shiver down his spine “Or even worse, a family member!”.  "
1 "I liked that we" "...ually think. My teachers say I work hard in school and always try my best. I like to get good grades so always study very hard for things. In English I liked that we had reading circle. I also liked that we went to the library, it was very nice to have time to read and think about the book in total silence.My sten..."
0 "has argued that the" "...me one of the most prominent instruments for introducing Ghadarite militancy to hundreds of working-class Indians in Britain. Conclusion This article has argued that the memorialization of Udham Singh in globally circulated Ghadarite publications was foundational to Punjabi migrant workers’ politics in Britain. The In..."
0 "Explain that anti-depressants" "... should be made. Medication should be used for the depression with a follow-up evaluations on how he is doing and coping while being on the medicine. Explain that anti-depressants can be addictive and that sometimes the results will not be noticed for a few weeks. A list of all emergency phone numbers should be given to him inc..."
0 "king that is close" "... visual representation shows the words old king written across the sun as it exhibits the father as not only the motif of the sun, but also as an old king that is close to death.   Through various techniques, Harwood explicitly conveys the themes of the cyclical nature of life, reverse responsibilities that are broug..."
0 "also believes that she" "...rest. Barrett asserts that the extreme hostility of ancient writers and early modern interpretations both offer a lop sided portrait of Agrippina. He also believes that she should not be judged by her personality but her extraordinary achievements. He questions Tacitus’ “masculine” portrayal of Agrippina and argues that ..."
1 "and added that the" "...quire doing everything for the patient but in the surgical unit will require just helping the patient with little of things. Mosa, et al (2012) agree and added that the nurse uses her critical thinking skill by helping the patient in decision making for his treatment and the nurse will evaluate him and recognize his ..."
0 "“That was a" "... room is quiet. I’d forgotten anyone else was even there. “Jesus, that got dark fast,” says Gavin, looking uneasy.” \t“I’m much better now,” I insist. “That was a long time ago.” I pray that no one asks me if I’m glad now. Although I wouldn’t--won’t ever--try again I’m still not thankful. There was never any ep..."
1 "ships that were available" "...he benefits and challenges of settling in that location.    Step 2: You will research the details of your voyage to your new colony.  \t1st - Research ships that were available and used during this time for a voyage of this magnitude. Take note           of the ship’s weight capacity and the number of passengers it holds.  2..."
1 "hair that is tied" "... classmate really easy to talk to. “I’m Okuda Manami by the way. Nice to meet you.” Okuda Manami is petite girl, at the height of 4’11 ft. with black hair that is tied into two twin braid that reaches her shoulder. She wears the schoolwide uniform and don a pair of round frame glasses that covers her grey eyes. Hope..."
1 "scent that was unfortunately" "...se in reaction to the pungent scent that crowded the water around him. The smell of smoke that contained traces of one’s death obscured his vision. A scent that was unfortunately familiar. He knew not far from where he hid the blackness consumed what little life that was left in this world. A throbbing sensation began to creep..."
1 "I say that I" "...tting across from the said agent is Principal Asano himself, with his fingers intertwine tightly and his back rest on the large chair. \t“Believe when I say that I was surprise at this request Karasuma-san,” Principal Asano states, “Even I don’t know why. However, the child said she will be here early in the mor..."
0 "to discover that there" "...individual or a team, most games require the gamer to have a strategy to advance to the next stage. Ever failed so many times at a certain stage only to discover that there's a shortcut to the blue diamond that adds you a life before the zombies are upon you again? You will have to learn how to work your way through the ..."
1 "is suggested that they" "...fit. The management decision problem that they face is, how to increase the amount of bookings.  As they do not currently know that people would like is suggested that they marketing research problem is to, determine the needs of those that require professional photography services and determine the extent that the curre..."
1 "airplanes that were used" "... business and in 1991, Pan American Airways filed for bankruptcy and closed its doors. Pan American airways introduced new technology to the world of airplanes that were used as bases to modern day aircrafts. Pan american is one of the most iconic airways even being featured in the hit TV show, “Pan Am.”  Organization of A..."
1 "who stated that she" "... is affecting 2 units and they need assistance asap\".  I called the store to inquire what units were affected and if  P1  is needed, spke to a female who stated that she does not have  service    Tech stated he performed a temp fix by crimping the water line. This will allow the machine to operate with 2 barrels.   Em..."
1 "curveball is that it" "...speed differences between the two pitches. (I do know someone who has a radar gun and is willing to let me use it.)  \tWhat is unique about throwing a curveball is that it behaves differently depending on your arm angle. Arm angle is your arm slot when throwing the ball. For example some people throw over the top, ¾ , s..."
1 "updates that were downloaded" "...security team  This maintenance started with rebooting the server to complete installing the CentOS (operating system) and installed software package updates that were downloaded and partially installed over the past month. It was after that restart that the performance and stability of the web servers (2 nodes in total) were ..."
1 "to mean that you" "...g together, it's made up of the same kind of birds It's only natural for people with similar interests to hang out together. However, it doesn't have to mean that you only spend time with the same people. People have many different interests, so you may be part of many different groups that share interests. For exa..."
0 "believe that was one" "...had an interview the next day. I was excited and a little nervous but somehow I managed to display a confident and positive attitude in which I truly believe that was one of the many reasons why I was picked for the position and furthermore, my 12 years of work experience with the Department of Labor also was another s..."
1 "people report that they" "... has an adverse effect on the brain, and can lead to memory problems, learning issues, and reduced abilities to problem solve and concentrate.  \tMany people report that they feel stressed and overwhelmed by their responsibilities, both at work and at home. Learning to sit and meditate can help you to actively support and ..."
1 "falcon is that they" "... time is he so dies, then Fatima will accept that he's become a part of he beauty earth.  14.\tThe symbolism that is given from the two dead hawks and falcon is that they are approaching war. The falcon is meant to represent one side and the two hawks is the other side. Only won will come out while the other perishes. ..."
1 "hook that was attached" "...ed the handle, locked. “Uhh,” I said in disgust. Then I looked at the wall, then at the hook on the wall, and then at the key that was hanging on the hook that was attached to the wall. I picked it up and tried it in the door. It fit. We pulled open the door and stepped inside. Our eyes widened. *** Chapter 1: The good, ..."
1 "have shown that the" "...USA, the subculture and practice of cannabis by the Twa group in Rwanda and the subculture hippies within USA during the 1960s.    Previously studies have shown that the use amongst youth comes from teenagers that are still in high school or moving into college, coming from ages between 17-25 years of age.  The use of..."
1 "and saw that there" "...diers, they shot a little girl!!!” a man cried out “The soldiers shot a little girl!!! and killed her and by God she is dead!!!”  Israa looked around and saw that there were more people starting to gather, some were getting out of their cars and walking in the direction of where the man was pointing.  Aalaa and Fahtm..."
1 "You think that you" "...didn’t do what you asked me to do. That I basically said fuck you and then i did say fuck you.   This is where i think we run into the most issue.    You think that you were asking me to simply do something for you. Not be on my phone so much. Sounds simple enough. And in some ways it is.  What I don’t think you real..."
0 "this asserts that the" "...was considered a settlement rather than taking the land by force, theft or conquest. (Howitt, 2012, p.818). The second ‘The discourse of occupation’, this asserts that the occupation of the continent at the time of colonization, providing the basis for jurisdictional sovereignty and the rule of law. Meaning that it was ..."
0 "Please remember that some" "...'A generation of dysreaders'), in French, by Vincent Goetry and colleagues. Erasme/Fondation Dyslexie, 2013. Available from amazon.com.fr   NOTES     Please remember that some of these activities may be difficult for struggling readers and so use your judgement in choosing the amount of time to spend on them. Provide positi..."
0 ", that is not" "...ters could not be any more of opposites.  For some people, having a best friend who's personality is the same can be great for them; however, for Gene, that is not the case.  John Knowles knew that for the main characters to be friends, they could not have the same personality.  The saying, \"opposites attract,\" ..."
0 "be understood that they" "...   Despite the lack of evidence those who oppose the policy have that it will create a negative outcome, their concerns remain somewhat valid. It can be understood that they fear for the safety of women and children in changing rooms as it is an isolated environment. An incident has occurred where a man entered the women’..."
1 ", that was my" "...k at what you’ve gone and done…” Chance had an awful grin on his face...Chance. That was when I realized what was so-wrong about him. That was my face, that was my voice! But then I began contemplating a much more important question, the only one that mattered. In truth, I knew how to kill a monster. That part w..."
1 ") believes that when" "...he reasons causing their bad mood. Knowing these reasons people would be able to maintain and control their emotions in a healthy way. (Roy Baumeister) believes that when people use their will power to drain their cognitive resource’s, and makes them feel worse. The more a person strives to abstain from doing something..."
1 "strategy that it aims" "...contact to ensure the business buyer satisfaction in the product. The magazine is not only concentrating on the readers or consumer revenue, But also strategy that it aims to attract business advertisers to promote their premium and up market products. The magazine also focuses on customized hotel copies on water sports..."
1 "I believe that this" "...o a more positive and in my opinion, a more “right” and mission focused direction. Ultimately, now that I have successfully “graduated” from command, I believe that this retrospective of my leadership philosophy can be useful to evaluate my thinking and “way of doing business” as I continue my AF career.   At my openi..."
0 "if that is not" "...els about planned parenthood? She's clearly in full support of women's choice allowing her 16 year old Kylie to date and live with a 21 year old man, if that is not amazingly progressive and hip, I don't know what is.  Oh and I almost forgot, I think Caitlyn was an Olympic athlete, or something of that nature, I ..."
1 "said that" "...ss is a big distraction and set a challenge for teachers to keep the attention of their students. Another teacher, surveyed by the Pew research team, said that the technology they use in class helps spur the brains of students, but does take away the attention of students in the classroom. The teachers reall..."
1 "I realize that I" "... on my belly, and I feel little embers beginning to stir under my skin, under his palm. We haven’t slept together since before the baby was born, and I realize that I want him, need him now. This heated kissing isn’t enough, as good as it feels. \tI moan a little far back in my throat and his lips move to my neck, a..."
0 "person that was in" "...e the world... what if we could make a formula that will cure Coronary Artery Disease because it's has a great impact in the world\" Steve said. Every person that was in the theter \"Ha how are you going to get a test subject for this test. No one wants to die\"a scientist shouted. \"I will preform the test\" a man shoute..."
1 "to sense that someone" "...fect the relationships she had.   On the night she was murdered, Kaitlyn had been having an eerie feeling the entire day. It was if she had been able to sense that someone had been watching, but whenever she looked over her shoulder, no one was ever there. She thought it had all been in her head. It didn't stop her from..."
0 "mother stated that from" "...young child going through a gender transition with the assistance of medical professionals is a young girl named Zoe Luna, who was born a male.14 Her mother stated that from the age of two Zoe loved everything “feminine” with a strong interest in “dolls” and “long hair”.15 After Zoe told her mother at the age of seven tha..."
1 "further revealed that the" "... were experiencing domestic abuse. Another key finding is the information sharing between children services and Health visitors and the GP. The audit further revealed that the Safe Lives DASH checklist tool was used to assess the level of domestic abuse in 5 cases out of the 10 cases. 4 of which was referred to MARAC and th..."
0 "information that is contradictory" "...ity to represent a larger population. Surveys However are not ideal for the issues that are controversial in nature because the respondents will give information that is contradictory as opposed to the expected results.  Question 2: Three conclusions Deduced from the Graphs  The bar graphs on page 34 deduced from the survey conduct..."
1 "I noticed that one" "...ealize that learning can be done through expereince and not necesserily through books.        I was in the middle of a lesson about machine guns when I noticed that one soldier named shaked who was sitting in the back row, kept laughing loudly. During the months I spent training to be a tank instructor one of the big..."
1 "has proved that to" "...families by being in the wrong place at the wrong time. Since he was a young boy James always told me what ever goals he set he would achieve. And he has proved that to be true.  Growing up James was a great kid, he stayed away from any negative things in his surroundings. His focus was on his love for playing baseba..."
0 "I predict that s" "...ended. I went through with the surgery and I must say it was not an easy procedure but it was worth it. Nevertheless, with a sooner medical prognosis I predict that s can be ruled out for many individuals. This research paper will discuss the epidemiology, clinical features, diagnostic imaging exams, prognosis, and..."
1 "be noted that at" "...r may add multiple contact information namely Phone Number, Email and Address, as highlighted above with the icon adjacent to those fields. It should be noted that at least one of each type of contact information is required. Additionally, the remaining fields are mandatory. The Clear button empties all the fields ..."
1 "to ensure that it" "...t Plan Uluru with its precious desert environment of central Australia can easily be damaged by thoughtless development and human traffic. The key is to ensure that it is carefully managed so that the landscape we value today is still preserved for the future generations. The main cause of this damage is tourism. To..."
0 "people that" "...s, why apes are still…..apes.Scientists deny the existence of God, that’s why they try to find all kind of logical explanations.A lot of people won’t people that God made this planet we are living on and He also made us in His image. But you knw what,God is real, His everywhere, He watches us all the time sinc..."
1 "cases that were randomly" "...er there is no doubt the checklist was not completed for the 4 cases as a MARAC referral will not be accepted otherwise.   6.0    Conclusions: The 10 cases that were randomly selected for the purpose of this audit had involvement from Health visitors and it further revealed good practice where HVs detected abuse, assessed ..."
0 "he claims that “" "...mours because he was not an eye witness to these events. In addition, Suetonius’ subjective portrayal of Agrippina as a seductress is pinpointed when he claims that “Claudius was ensnared by her charm”. Thus,due to the nature and purpose of his work, Suetonius’ depiction of Agrippina is scattered throughout his bio..."
1 "she laid that common-sense" "... course she could say something like that. Darcy may have a flighty, happy-go-lucky personality, but, she also had common sense, it just irks me when she laid that common-sense down on me but I knew she was right.   Grudgingly I got up and threw on my slouchy outfit. Darcy looked down her nose at me, but I really didn't care..."
1 "provide experiences that “" "...ng learning.   Teachers listen to and observe the children closely, ask questions, and implement children’s ideas for projects on which to work. They provide experiences that “provoke” children’s thinking and learning.   The power of documentation.  Teachers display the children’s creations and photographs, showing the child..."
0 "prove that" "...ovel, he was accused of rapping a white girl(Mayella). It turned out he didn’t do it and still got in trouble. I felt bad for Tom because he couldn’t prove that he didn’t do it and he seemed like a nice guy, which is really too bad because he was innocent. In this quote, down below, it shows that Tom felt bad..."
1 "techniques that were being" "...learning goals, technology use, accountable talk etc.). The thought was to get other secondary teachers into those classrooms to witness the teaching techniques that were being used by their colleagues next door. This was not a common practice in secondary education (Luke, 2013). The timeframe for delivering the PD is also c..."
0 "tally reveals that of" "...ity, very little interest is being manifested in Udham Singh’s life” (“Udham Singh: Petition for Reprieve” 26 July 1940, MS2142/B/3/3). Yet, a simple tally reveals that of the Indians who signed the petition at least 150, more than half, were Muslim. Interesting, while Udham Singh may have been “well-known in certain In..."
1 "will assert that with" "...to vocabulary instruction teachers can begin to support student in developing sophistication in their learning in all disciplines. This investigation will assert that with a multitudinous approach in teaching vocabulary, teachers can support students in enhancing disciplinary literacy skills as they progress towards col..."
1 "It appears that the" "...re healthy as opposed to places like McDonalds and Walmart.  I also noticed that the operations at True Foods Kitchen was very refined and efficient. It appears that the waiters were well trained and friendly and made me feel at home. I can't say the same about workers at McDonalds and Walmart. It would also appear th..."
1 "choice is that perceptions" "... study are that they only look at trainee and qualified CA’s at one firm (PwC) and in one province (i.e. Gauteng). The disadvantage of the population choice is that perceptions of trainee and qualified CA’s may be different between firms (i.e. between the big four firms and between big four versus medium and small sized firm..."
1 "also believe that this" "...ld be him at all, or be in any aspect of his personality. He says in the passage that he had a yearning inside of him that he could not comprehend. I also believe that this yearning he has is actually the longing for the feeling he received by the end of the passage in DEJ #3, making these two points in his life signific..."
1 "Kiritsugu said that they" "... with his adopted father, his was looking more frail and ill each day, with veins exposed and coughs fits he couldn't even run for much time. However Kiritsugu said that they couldn't do anything to heal him and his only wish was spend time around them. After he entered the house and announced his arrival loud footsteps co..."
1 "and proves that rather" "...as such a good soul should”, it sets up her false accusation of being a witch later on. It makes Hale rethink his involvement in being a witch hunter and proves that rather than being a legitimate claim, that the trials were used to purposefully damage another townspeople’s reputation. Act 1 #30 The effect Miller creates..."
1 "and ensure that the" "...gram, that focuses on the process of the creation is more important than the end product.  We encourage each child’s unique creativity in the program and ensure that the environments are set up based on individual and group interest.  We are strongly committed to developing an environment that supports children to rea..."
1 "plan that is funded" "...is a retirement plan that pays out a fixed amount when the employee retires. b) Defined contribution plan A defined contribution plan is a retirement plan that is funded by specific contributions made by the employer to be disbursed to the employee upon retiring. c) 401(k) plan A 401(k) is a type of defined contributi..."
0 "is clear that  Sarra" "...’s approach is a more rounded and thoughout theory  After careful analysis of Sarra's work  and comparison  with other works within the same field it is clear that  Sarra’s work Is having a definite impact on education as a whole and specifically with Aboriginal and Torres Strait Islander people. The difficulty lies  i..."
1 "will prove that my" "...ol. I was nursing my new daughter, working part-time and manage my new apartment and family.  I am requesting that my financial aid be reinstated.  I will prove that my commitment is serious and wish to prove to myself as well as to my family that I can make my dream come true. I also need this aid since my girls are..."
1 "detail that it could" "...portance of first understanding the scope of the project for which we are developing a solution, while also ensuring not to over document in too much detail that it could paralyze the project through overly detailed analysis of requirements.  Develop Iteratively Develepment of the project will be completed in iteration..."
1 "it requires that each" "...              aluminum hopper with quick release system for transporting bulk minerals such as coal. This charge will from Coal Mine to Puerto Brisa, it requires that each mine make the coal loading assembly by Environmental Management Plan.    Brand Trinity Rail Company USA. Line RD VII Capacity: 120.4 m3  Length:  Emp..."
1 "consent means that participants" "...10)  4) Informed Consent  One important measure to protect participants' right to self-determination is by obtaining their informed consent. Informed consent means that participants have adequate information regarding the research, comprehend the information, and have t the power of free Choice, enabling them to consent or declin..."
1 "Baker claimed that Danos" "...he Nigerian law and the parties did not agree to apply the US law. The contract and arbitration clause was governed by the Nigerian law, subsequently Baker claimed that Danos and Chevron had breached the agreement. Baker further went ahead and obtained a default award of damages against them, the award was set aside by the..."
1 "research is that of" "...onymity by assigning numbers instead of names.  Rigour   Ethical considerations   1) Beneficence   One of the most  fundamental ethical principles in research is that of beneficence, which imposes a duty on researchers to minimise harm and to maximize benefits(Polit& Beck, 2010)   1.a) The right to freedom from harm a..."
1 "reason been that the" "...breached the agreement. Baker further went ahead and obtained a default award of damages against them, the award was set aside by the Nigerian court, reason been that the award against Danos was not duly supported by a substantial evidence. The arbitral tribunal improperly awarded punitive damages against chevron. Bake..."
1 "design that was used" "...tative and qualitative researches are commonly used which derive from different Philosophical traditions.     This chapter will describe the research design that was used in order to study the ethical issues for nurses ' in the management of acute illness and hospitalization of older nursing-home residents with advance..."
1 "veil that is allowing" "...t just get caught up in pretty pictures. We must search harder, look deeper and sometimes see the frightful images of social issues. We must lift the veil that is allowing us to live comfortably in “pleasantville” or we will let the real evil out in the world win and those issues that we proclaim to fight for will conti..."
0 "becomes clear that Jim" "...white. Twain begins by showing the audience that there is more important characteristics than just quantitative intelligence which Jim lacks. Soon it becomes clear that Jim displays a large amount of compassion “ Goodness gracious, is dat you, Huck? En you ain' dead—you ain' drownded—you's back agin? It's too good for tr..."
1 "They claim that if" "... words the nutrition, taste, and safety of GMO products are same as those without, and 88% of scientist agree GMOs are safe and shouldn't be labeled. They claim that if they label GMOs they will be discriminating or diminishing  products for no reason or even more confuse consumer. They debate that isn't  the main go..."
1 "they believe that they" "... to keep iPads out of the classroom. I think that the author chose this point over the others because of the fact that many schools get iPads because they believe that they will help the students excel but mostly students misuse the iPads. The teacher at LAUSD weren’t consulted before the administration bought the iPads ..."
1 "This shows that he" "...bed with traits. Encouraging is one of the traits. It says on pg. 118 “dear, mr.Scooter,...we hope you get well very soon, your friend Penn w. Webb.” This shows that he is encouraging. Alsp Penn has some more positive traits like hard working. It says on pg. 151 “ I heard Webb sprinting past my house” This shows hard..."
1 "have observed that she" "...e sponge into the other bowl. She can transfer water back and forth between bowls, too. From this simple game can strengthen hands and forearms. 2) I have observed that she does not mingles with her peers and will suggest the below activity to build up her relationship with peers. (Social emotional development) Activity:..."
1 "We hope that we" "...iness. It’s important to remember that everything is a balance – one benefit may be particularly important to you, while you might never use another. We hope that we have something for everyone. What follows in this section is an in-depth description of our compensation package.  Vacation At the present time, Hunt..."
1 "response shows that cedarians" "...ncils before,89.2% used watercolour(paint) before, and 11.8% used others art materials like Markers, Acrylic Paints and Digital Programs before. This response shows that cedarians have more experience with art materials like crayons, colour pencils,paint and origami, but have lesser experience with art materials like wires.  Do..."
1 "practice that was undertaken" "...y youth has been derived from a variety of factors including previous practices from different cultures, stress relief from school, as a recreational practice that was undertaken in small social groups and from easy accessibility to the drug.  These teenagers are indulging in a subculture and a practice that has been illegaliz..."
1 "is envisaged that the" "... cohesion in relation to Prevent and Channel, the KCC Prevent and Channel Strategic Manager has convened meetings with Community Safety Managers.  It is envisaged that the PDDB will formally adopt these meetings as a sub-group to ensure engagement with local developments and issues of community cohesion that impact on t..."
0 "purpose that is unlawful" "...hese Terms and Conditions will prevail. 13.2 Irrespective of any other provision of these Terms and Conditions you must not: use this website for any purpose that is unlawful; post or transmit any unlawful, deceptive, misleading, fraudulent, threatening, abusive, harassing, defamatory, or obscene material or any material t..."
1 "Evidence shows that the" "... river provided to people with baskets huts and boats People fished for food  and raised herds of sheep and goats on fallow land or the nearby desert Evidence shows that the Sumerians created the framework of civilization in Mesopotamia Other groups of people who are none Sumerians also lived on the Mesopotamian plain Inc..."
1 "joy that was previously" "sobriety in all things has been his golden rule. But it seems as if, by resigning himself to his fate, he has developed a kind of joy that was previously foreign to himThe spelling engine is tailored to your version of English: is it realise or realize? Clym's newfound felicity is better seen through h..."
0 "is anticipated that this" "...s granted by the United States District Court Eastern District of Michigan in its dispute regarding polysilicon supply agreements with SolarWorld. It is anticipated that this ruling will create conditions that are conducive to a resolution to the solar trade dispute between the United States and China. However, the timing ..."
1 "potential exists that I" "... was successful in attaining a high level of “success” in providing resources that resulted in attainment of getting “actual” work done, however, the potential exists that I should focus on building more of a relationship with my “airman”.  The quandary that I grapple with is to ensure I keep the line between professional..."
1 "decisions that were both" "...rporation and its shareholders. CONCLUSION ​The granting of loans, the accounting gimmicks, and the passivity of the Board of Directors were very bad decisions that were both unethical and detrimental to the interests of WorldCom and its shareholders. The uncovering of the scandal contributed to new laws to prevent fraudul..."
1 "teacher suggested that I" "...ived in Tupelo our district   was using this program. I was a first grade teacher and showed great interest in this program.     The reading recovery teacher suggested that I ask the lead teacher if I could get the training. The   lead teacher stated it would be too demanding for me because I would have to teach my regular..."
0 "forgot that was not" "...F.      moving into my new room in the kibbutz, living in a group and basically having the time of my life preparing for the IDF, was great. I almost forgot that was not the reason I moved to Israel in the first place. The day came and I finally wore my uniform for the first time. Everything seemed perfect. I got my t..."
1 "always said that when" "... was furious but despite the insistence of her friends she would prefer quit from tournaments than modify her precious Torashinai, which hers friends always said that when she wields it a bloodlust aura surrounds her, something that she didn't believe not even a little. While in school she experienced the weirdest thing..."
1 ") said that they" "...e motivated to coach competitive sport as part of being a physical educator. Within the student survey which has been conducted 49 students (out of 72) said that they have coached some sort of physical activity. In some ways this supports Curtner-Smith’s theory, though there is a large difference between the after ..."
0 "• Imagine that you" "...the following:   • Define and distinguish between qualitative and quantitative research. • Provide examples of qualitative and quantitative research. • Imagine that you are a researcher interested in identifying the components of ‘giftedness’ in pre-teen children. What quantitative methods might you use to help you b..."
0 "Jongin registers that he" "...t.   ↠↠↠  Blearily, Jongin awoke and sat for a while, waiting for his line of vision to clear. Rubbing at his eyes, the tanned boy slides out of bed. Jongin registers that he’s most likely last to wake due to the fact that Jongdae isn’t in his unmade bed. Soon after brushing his teeth, he finds a uniform laid out upon his ..."
1 "Banks insists that she" "...s that his relationship with his daughter was troubled. Mrs. Banks has advanced Alzheimer’s Disease and was not even able to walk or talk, though Mr. Banks insists that she may still say a word or two spontaneously. She sat quietly as his daughter reported that Mr. Banks often calls the police on her every 2-3 months and..."
0 "work suggests that his" "Assignment 1- 102085 Education and Policy  Option 1 Sarra’s work suggests that his success has been achieved by his ability to develop and embrace the Aboriginal identity of his students and the community. Critically analyse this st..."
1 "parents suggested that Jerry" "...ound instruction, completed in conjunction with the home school district,” (p. 4). The first alternative was out of district placement.       Jerry’s parents suggested that Jerry needed to be in the behavior disorder program within the home district public high school setting. They feel that Jerry should of never been placed i..."
0 "way that is hard" "...ldn’t have the same response as they do because they seem to have strange resolutions to their problems. They like to directly handle them in a weird way that is hard to explain. When it comes to like and dislikes regarding the characters, I have none at this point. I have taken notice that Hyde isn’t very liked by..."
1 "findings showed that Health" "...ackney MARAC meeting holds 2 weekly, and for the purpose of this audit 2 cases are randomly selected over a 5 month period.   4.0   Key findings: The findings showed that Health visitors had knowledge of the cases discussed at MARAC that the victims were experiencing domestic abuse. Another key finding is the information shar..."
0 "alas that was not" "... heels and sauntered out the door, shooting a mocking \"Au revoir\" over his shoulder. He expected to be followed by France's infamous 'honhonhon', but alas that was not to be. Had Britain stuck around for just a second more, he would have seen his prediction was far off mark.   Britain's announced rocked France to th..."
1 "challenge is that granules" "... violation of water and air pollution quality standards. 2. The water used to clean the ore gets stored in the ponds and periodically drained and the challenge is that granules of ore and other impurities continue to wash downstream from the plant and continues to pollute the river streams. 3. Large amounts of dust is genera..."
1 "he argues that any" "...t is written or pronounced and meaning lexicon (\"word meaning\") to refer to the lexical concept which is expressed by means of a lexical form.   Also he argues that any printed dictionary can be reduced to the projection of the meanings on ways (lexical entries), and this may in turn be reduced to an array. Therefore..."
1 "sense that it can" "...sion which drives them. These are, sustainability and efficiency. Retail shops are the primary market seeing increasing use of Beacon technology in a sense that it can detect specific products in which customers are interacting with most. Data such as average time a customer picks up to observe the product and avera..."
1 "to expect that any" "...bling them to consent or decline their participation voluntarily. (Polit & Beck, 2010)  Confidentiality Procedures  Study participants have the right to expect that any data they provide will be kept in the strictest confidence. Participants' right to privacy is protected through anonymity. Substituting identificatio..."
0 "can testify that John" "...er necessities and her extras, taking her to school and all church activities, taking her to all appointments, and supporting all her activities. She can testify that John had someone post on Facebook about Kaylee and  me in a very negative way. He told her personally that he had done that. She can also testify that Joh..."
1 "or that it had" "...magnetic, strong force, weak force, and gravity were all condensed or together there were no space and therefore no time it was curved like a sphere, or that it had no boundaries. He uses the curve of a sphere like the horizon of the north or south poles there is no north of the north pole, it is a meaningless id..."
1 "and that was what" "...ies of Bolshevism. This was shown as the characters in Animal farm acted like the secret police. These characters were the dogs which killed Snowball and that was what happened to civilians back in 1917 in the USSR.  In political and sociologies, Communism is a social, political, and financial philosophy and develop..."
0 "Mistry suggest that there" "...e is a moral story in an unusual way where there are no clear indicators of good and evil. It is a narrative bordering on grey areas of life; it made Mistry suggest that there can be no established definitions of “good” and “sin” for all time. Yet, through the exploration of the potential of the Parsis and the upwardly mobi..."
"I think that a" "...hink I will never forgive.  In conclusion Friends necessary thing in life, but not all are good friends. So you should choose good friends carefully. I think that a good friend one of the ten best friends aren't good" 1
1 "is clear that the" "...rs must be able to develop adjustments and accommodations in their lesson planning. Overall, in reflection on the information stated in this paper it is clear that the idea of inclusive education is not a new one,^but has been pushed to the fore in recent times due to a combination of legislation and the evolving ne..."
1 "paying job that I" "My three personal goals that I want to achieve after completion of my Master of Science in Information Technology Program is:  •\tTo find a good paying job that I really love that is in my field of experience  •\tTo find me a good wife and have children  •\tAlso, I want to get my Doctoral Degree one day  \tIf I wo..."
0 "noted that" "...o had participated in pre-adoptive trainings felt like it was a good resource to help modify expectations going into adoption. Another research study noted that although there has been an increase of post-adoption resources and services since about 1990, “the need for readily available parenting classes, educ..."
0 "that that is finally" "...ntroducing myself early. And welcome to class 3-E.” \tFollowing along, the rest of the students give me a bright smile and a little welcome. \t“Ah, now that that is finally over,” a slightly high voice next to me states; “I would like to personally welcome to class 3-E Miss Sinclair. Please call me Koro-sensei. Also, I b..."
1 "also appear that employees" "...pears that the waiters were well trained and friendly and made me feel at home. I can't say the same about workers at McDonalds and Walmart. It would also appear that employees have an efficient way of doing business at True Foods Kitchen; the employees seemed like they were always moving around taking care of the customers ..."
1 "9% feels that it" "...ve to listen to other people’s opinion. Out of the 47.9% that prefer to work in teams, 46.8% feel that they can learn from each other and benefit, 31.9% feels that it is more efficient and faster, while the remaining feels that teamwork allows them to achieve greater heights. In conclusion, more cedarians like to w..."
1 "he believes that they" "...ould be the other way around.  2. \tI believe that Santiago, the protagonist in the novel, observes his sheep to live meaningless lives. For instance, he believes that they wake with him because he provides them with food and water and they travel with him because Santiago helps them with the necessities of their surviva..."
1 ") reported that the" "...result that the behavioral intention of customers would increase with a higher level of satisfaction regarding the physical environment.  Bitner (1992) reported that the physical environment had a significant impact on not only the pre-purchase behavior of service consumers but also service quality evaluation and sati..."
0 ", that was normal" "...y studying and learning. I’ve written (typed) more of my thoughts down than most writers do.  But for whatever reason i was on my computer or my phone, that was normal to me.   So when you first started to make comments about my phone, i was surprised by them. When you explained to me that you wanted me to be presen..."
0 ", that is required" "...mited to any research discipline or methodology, but provide any method, regardless of whether it is primary or secondary, qualitative or quantitative, that is required by your information requirements. Recommendations are realistic and plans are workable, based on your needs and resources. Relationships with clients..."
0 "so that it'" "..., much in the same way as a pedometer app tracks your footsteps and calorie burn. And some Pokemon eggs have enormous kilometer requirements, so much so that it'd take more than a week to hatch, even for more athletic types with a regular walking routine. What if I can't wait that long for my brand new Pokemon..."
1 "AM added that it" "...ents were happening at work and he could feel himself snapping, it was at this point that he approached his team manager AM himself and discussed it. AM added that it was deffinately out of character. DJ added that he decided to visit his doctor as he was struggling and was not feeling great.He stated that he was n..."
0 "Respondent that it was" "...10.  On 30/11/2015, I wrote a letter to the Respondent’s attorneys to remind Respondent to comply with the court order. In this letter I reminded the Respondent that it was yet to deliver the undertaking to the Applicant. See copy of the letter attached hereto and marked annexure JM4.   11.  Again, on 21/01/2016, I wrote..."
1 "students said that they" "...cation as a career path was because of a teacher. 10 students suggested that a parent or family member influenced their decision to study PE, while 7 students said that they made the decision themselves. The responses don't result to a sum of 72 as some students responded with more than one answer to this survey question...."
1 "we see that Mary" "...h a poppet as a gift and could possibly foreshadow that it was a plan set up by Abigail to get Elizabeth be accused as a witch. It becomes clear when we see that Mary Warren’s voice is “with a trembling, decayed voice”, even though she was seen to be bolder earlier (60). Poppets can be used as a “voodoo doll” to in..."
0 "I see that the" "...e with a handshake as I watched the first glimmers of sunlight peek over the horizon.” (178-179) \tThis passage shows a turning point in James’s life. I see that the odd purple of the river, caused by light from the moon, may have been a symbolic reference to the gloom and suffering that his family had to go throu..."
0 "him knows that as" "...r table seven!” Junmyeon calls out to the chefs, Kyungri and Chanyoung. Despite having a job at a cafe, Junmyeon was a hopeless cook, everyone around him knows that as well as they try to keep him away from the stove at all times. "
1 "USDA claims that it" "...diminishing  products for no reason or even more confuse consumer. They argue that isn't  the main goal nutrition labels tries to accomplish. But the USDA claims that it is more likely for consumers to ignore all the GMO labels. In addition, companies owners, and some farm workers disclaim any arguments of people  who..."
1 "learned is that it" "...changes his status in society by saying that he could die the next day at the hands of war.  15.\tI believe that the most important thing Santiago has learned is that it is very easy to give up everything. He was on the urge of leaving everything he’s ever wanted, but thankfully the King of Salem was there to remind h..."
1 "it indicated that a" "... back of the report.   Findings and Discussions 1. Visual Design of news page  After analysing the user feedback on the visual design of the web page it indicated that a modern, simple and good layout were paramount to creating an aesthetically pleasing website design.                              Table 1: Comparison ..."
0 "9000 Certified that no" "...icient technology. Our priority is on our relationships and collaborations with local artists.  Why we stand out  Our product is 100% sun-grown.  ISO 9000 Certified that no pesticides or dangerous chemicals are used in the growing.  Regular buyers get access to limited edition strains with premium packaging.  Advanced in..."
0 "to see that his" "... shuffled close to the door as he fished their keys from his pocket when Sasuke suddenly gripped his arm. “Hmm? What is it?” He looked back at Sasuke to see that his usually calm coal black eyes were a fiery red as he glared at the door. His brows furrowed as a snarl peeled his lips back to reveal his fangs. “Sasu..."
0 "is that" "...ng the broken test tube in the propee trash bin. \"So as I was saying, I heard April—\" Nicole couldn't help but cut him off.  \"April this, April that, is that the only thin—\"  \"No, be quiet first. I'm sure you'd like to hear this.\" He dusted the glass remnants into the proper trash bin as he washed his hand..."
1 "with values that they" "...ng mental stress. This mental stress prompts change of behavior for the said individuals. Dissonance in hypocrisy is achieved when people act in line with values that they hold. On its part, dissonance in induced compliance paradigm is achieved by making people act in contradiction to what they believe in. hypocrisy mot..."
0 "in that it throws" "...nemy to attack and run out of resources upon which they launch a counter-attack before the enemy receives reinforcements. Their strategy is effective in that it throws the enemy into confusion first for the lack of resources to fight back, and for lack of a strategy to hold off a force that comes when it's not expec..."
0 "stepping stones that you" "...formalise the project statement / aim and clearly state the objectives of the IBP. An aim is what you want to achieve overall. Objectives are smaller stepping stones that you take to achieve the aim. Furthermore it should outline the methodological approach taken. “Africa is not poor. It is a continent with a great wealth ..."
1 "doubt that it is" "...eople to perform good deeds, they all emphasized the importance of virtue, and encourage people to perform “right” things. In my opinion, there is no doubt that it is important to respect the various culture, and care about their habitude, but it is not right just consider culture as the only standard to judge mora..."
1 "drawback is that Diana" "... teacher) has asked Anne to take part in a class of selected students after normal lessons to study for the entrance exam at Queens College. The only drawback is that Diana's not going, but as Anne wishes to be a teacher, she joins the class (including Josie Pye, Jane Andrews, Ruby Gillis, Moody Spurgeon, Charlie Sloane ..."
0 "liquid that is capable" "...suggestions, answer questions and showcase a shop’s products to customers  What is CO2 extraction? When high pressure is applied to CO2, it becomes a liquid that is capable of working as a solvent, stripping away cannabinoids and essential oils from plant material.  What is THC? Tetrahydrocannabinol (THC) is the main can..."
0 "and that is one" "...e graphic design field for the majority of my high school career, the positive reviews and raves from my sister have influenced my choice in schools, and that is one of many reasons why I wish to attend the University of Tennessee, Knoxville. I know that through furthering my education not only in my desired major..."
1 "thing that was keeping" "...ness thrust upon them? The Emerald City has been riddled with drugs and crime for years, but only recently has it really gotten out of hand. The only thing that was keeping the four gangs from killing each other was the Ozdust Treaty, signed by the head of each side. For a time, it worked and there was hope for peace in ..."
1 ") discusses that when" "...uld be responsible for a group of teachers. Those individual groups would form their own Professional Learning Community (PLC).  Education World (2014) discusses that when teachers observing teachers there will be an improvement in teaching practice and student performance.  It was also decided, that the PLC’s would be ..."
0 "deck that is set" "... to minimize the number of runs you have to make. If the deck is too wide, however, you may not be able to maneuver it into all areas of your yard. A deck that is set on gauge wheels is an added bonus. With gauge wheels, you will know that if you happen to hit a low spot, then there is little danger of scalping you..."
"This meant that the" "...George Orwell’s novel, London is being ruled as a totalitaristic state. At the time the novel was written, the world was recovering from World War 2. This meant that the Soviet Union was still in function. Th" 0
1 "examples that were proposed" "....   \tFinding solutions to end gun violence is very difficult, but there are things that civilians can do along with the help of our law makers. A few examples that were proposed by author Harold^Pollack include; “controls of military-style weapons, regulations of gun purchases by people under age 25, and stronger penal­ ties ..."
1 "is clear that there" "...e established in the future to standardize how the data is accessed and manipulated.  \tWhile the objective of the initial research were fulfilled, it is clear that there is still plenty of research to be done in this area to improve functionality and make the technology accessible to more people. Hopefully this will e..."
1 "issue is that we" "...r it read the title and saw what it was about. During it i was putting 4.It talks about pupulation and how peple are killing the earth. 5. The global issue is that we might not be able to breath the air because of the population. 6. I did not come across anything new 7. I would like to know why people are doing thi..."
1 "conclusion is that Graham" "...n offers neither cause nor solution, but a catalog of articles that can go wrong and have gone wrong with grade schools. The only saving grace of the conclusion is that Graham posits an opportunity to take these common complaints about schools and turn them into great strengths of the system. But this system is put in jeopa..."
0 "; That is until" "... hanging out with friends. Her mom was a teacher and her father was the CEO of some major company. Many people claimed that she had the “perfect life”; That is until she moved to another state, 1,400 miles away from all of her friends, her team, and her home. She felt completely alone, and did nothing for over a m..."
"nor that it would" "...he already has, are the arguments that will convince him to communize his property Marx did not envision great difficulty in makings this transition, nor that it would take much time." 1
1 "theme that is portrayed" "...has put light on many new ways to perceive life. This novel can teach readers many things, as long as they are willing to search for it.  A recurring theme that is portrayed in the book is that all lives^are connected in one way or another. The most prominent example of this would be the five people Eddie met when he was ..."
1 "I predict that it" "...nth of 2009. In march, June, September and December have the main rises each year. December has the most significant rise.   So for 2014, in Dec2014, I predict that it should rise to 7468 million of total transactions. However,  because it is a prediction,I am not confident but am sure it will be in the range should..."
1 "free platform that I" "...logSpot.   A lot of my peers in the industry, commented that I could be wasting time as there shall always be a day, Google decides to shut down this free platform that I had grown to love since 2006.  I differ with the above views. And I found out over 10 years, that more and more rudimentary coding skills are no long..."
0 "site that is prototypical" "...re described as “clear”, “simple” and “easy to read”. This gave the user a more positive experience. Research has shown that a more simple and modern site that is prototypical will leave users with a better experie   Prototypical: Prototypicality is the basic mental image your brain creates to categorize everything you inte..."
1 "is reminded that this" "..., Krogstad reminds Nora that she has other things to worry about, he has figured out that Nora forged her dads signature on the promissory note. Nora is reminded that this is a serious offense. Because she didn't to save her husbands life she doesn't allow him intimidate her. Torvald returns and mentions he saw Krogstad..."
1 "Bieber that was bound" "Was it effective? Why/why not?  It was a very simple one that did not take too much time. It was a picture of me with Justin Bieber that was bound to elicit an opinion. It got the attention of the students. I was asking for their opinion. It was the focus on the lesson so we could go right ahead..."
1 ") believe that Singapore" "...y      Introduction  \t Singapore, like many other parts of the world, is also going through democratization. Scholars Nisbet, Stoycheff & Pearce (2012) believe that Singapore has the right political and technological mix for the internet to spur social and political change.    This paper explores the role of mainstream med..."
0 "was that it had" "...same by different healthcare professionals.  The study size was small and the population was ethnic and racially similar.  The strengths of the study was that it had minimal selection and recall bias (Isemann et al., 2012). Findings      The study found that breast milk feedings were associated with shorter durati..."
0 "never failed that during" "...an they could handle, like the narrator describes in these following passages: “Some families would sell out for nearly nothing and move away. And it never failed that during the dry years the people forgot about the rich years, and during the wet years they lost all memory of the dry years” (5-6). “It wasn’t very long unt..."
1 "Client acknowledges that any" "...ediaries. Unpaid Fees shall accrue interest, until paid, at the lesser of 1.5% per month or the maximum interest rate permitted under applicable law. Client acknowledges that any late payments may materially impact delivery deadlines or estimates and East Agile will not be held liable for any consequential adjustments to those..."
"materials that was   " "...e suddenly fell in the ground and stopped breathing for 1 minute until Steve and Mark immediately took the random man to a table where there was many materials that was   " 1
1 "I expect that you" "...%, performance tasks are 30%, and your daily warm-up is worth 10% of your grade.   Ms. Schmidt’s expectations: This is a high school course.  As such I expect that you will take the course seriously, support^your classmates, and behave in a mature manner.  This means you are expected to:   1.   Be prepared.  Please ..."
1 "so mad that they" "...d that the problem was not that big compared to the other states. Three weeks later, New York had a crime rate increase of 30 percent. The people got so mad that they created a mob, heading for the police department to have revenge. The police were all killed in the huge mob. Then the people all headed for the gove..."
1 " Ensured that the" "...ming mails, opened and sorted them to be sent to the appropriate personnel.  Trained the new employees of the front office in understanding the work.  Ensured that the reception, waiting and discharge area are always neat and clean.  .      Lee Martin Salon ,  71-49 Austin St. Forest Hills, NY 1137                  ..."
0 "He suggests that heroes" "...led by a standard character. In the chapter “Never Stand Next to the Hero” Foster explains that in many books the primary supporter of the hero dies. He suggests that heroes have many needs and goals that a standard character cannot complete. “No matter how large or small the actions, though, the most important thing that..."
0 "should remember that this" "...ou all play a major part in society. Just because you are stuck at the bottom of this school, doesn’t mean you are at the bottom of society. You guys should remember that this is a private school. Not all can just apply and get accepted. Please know that if you are here, you are at least better than those who aren’t. And by..."
1 "happiness that was painted" "...t, “Well, it’s not as if they could want to kill both of us any more already.”  Ears atop Ylva‘s head started to twitch around like radar dishes, the happiness that was painted on it from his awakening melted somewhat.  “They…there isn’t anything inside of me that they could track with, is there?”  Conner looked momentarily ..."
1 "reasoning is that when" "...ally true in the realm of interpersonal relationships.     To close, This last AWC paper was probably the most ‘difficult’ one to put into words.  My reasoning is that when one looks within and truly critiques themselves and their results, it is sobering to reflect and think of how to handle the issue or problem in the f..."
0 "bourbon that is Paul" "... in Marcel. Paul finds him in the same red bathrobe with himself and he realise many thing about Paul is brought in that room by Rosa. They drink the bourbon that is Paul’s favourite drink given by Rose to her lover Marcel. Marcel tells that Rosa one night tried to break Marcel’s room’s wallpapers because she wanted se..."
0 "also ignores that many" "... changing rooms not correlating to their apparent gender and that this proves the new policy is unsafe. However, this test is largely theoretical and also ignores that many other stores also neglect to have security for changing rooms- not just Target. Whilst it may be a valid point if someone did want to abuse the new p..."
1 "I feel that she" "...rs and production practices. It would be difficult to say with absolute certainty whether or not Alice’s proposal to decentralize will work. However, I feel that she has conducted an detailed assessment of each department and that her thought process on the subject matter is logical.   \tEach department within an o..."
1 "Liesel believes that no" "...is symbolic. In my view point, the whole message of this passage was to describe to the readers that words can have physical effect on an individual. Liesel believes that no matter how hard the Nazi party tries to banish books due to disagreeable content, the words are meaningful to her and she will do what it takes to ke..."
0 "skills is that they" "...still in the gamers traits which go a long way in making them better individuals than your average Joe. The advantage with their way of gaining these skills is that they have fun while at it. Ever wondered how good it feels to do what you love all day long? That's the glorious world of gaming for you. Precision Precis..."
1 "wish is that this" "...Style’s Decorating Blog.   I included a list of links on page 70 in case you have trouble with any links.  Just copy and paste into your browser.  My wish is that this Renters Decorating Guidebook gives you solutions that help you live happy in your rental home.     Enjoy the process! "
1 "exploration is that researchers" "...s. ' Exploration is used in qualitative research to discover what was unexplored, people or customs and learn from them. The rationale for the use of exploration is that researchers can only understand perception and behavior  from participants' own perspective, in their own words and in the context in which they live and work an..."
1 "been found that those" "...k factors. He examined the different scenario of different age groups, one of which is the elderly and individuals with learning difficulties. It has been found that those who fall into this group are likely to suffer intimidation or harassment.   Elder abuse includes actions intending to harm, the harming without inten..."
1 "everything is that of" "...ust do nothing.  Their cottages are very unusual in our region. The details to their exterior and interior design is very pleasing to the eye. Almost everything is that of wood, four thumbs up for someone like me who loves wood furnitures. The place is quiet enough to relax and think. I would love to spend 2 to 3 days t..."
1 "have shown that the" "... research in this area (Rapaport2002) and expecting the reform to get rid of it this may explain why the researchers have avoided it.   Small studies have shown that the nearest relatives very often do not know their right and sometime exercise those (Marriott et al 2001, Rappaport 2002). Berzins and Atkinson (2009) f..."
1 "and learned that the" "...ed their country. I started researching about joining the military and what it is like to live as one. I started going to military recruiting offices and learned that the only military branch that will accept me because of my age is the U.S. Army. I talked to my wife and kids about this. I convinced my wife that I need..."
1 "always felt that if" "...er, the main aim is to always strive to do the best work I possibly can and hope that it may make a difference to someone out there in some way. I’ve always felt that if the work I do can help or inspire only one person in any way, even if for a split second, then it’s worth it. It has to be about being brave enough t..."
1 "Research dictates that insulin" "...l cells. Refined carbohydrates raises sugar in blood. They also cause insulin resistance which raises both blood insulin and blood sugar in the body. Research dictates that insulin fuels breast cancer and colon c                 "
1 "highly recommended that everybody" "...completing some basic, albeit strenuous exercises. The intermediate and advanced composer may also benefit from the exercise in this section, so it’s highly recommended that everybody does this dance together. Once your arm starts aching and you are ready to give up, you’ll begin to understand why this exercise is so important.  Th..."
1 "site that is specific" "...(will add on final draft) LIMITATIONS ​The limitations of this study include a sample of convenience and potential for co-worker bias. Also, only one site that is specific for anesthesia will be utilized for data collection. FUTURE STUDY ​The data conveyed during handoff varies in detail from CRNA to CRNA as well as CRN..."
0 "TTO is that LTTO" "..., and utilities can be measured by various instruments. As such the LTTO is a variant of the conventional TTO utility instrument. The difference with TTO is that LTTO introduces a lead period in full health before illness onset (Pinto-Prades & Rodríguez-Míguez, 2015). A disease specific utility algorithm form a soc..."
1 "himself that was later" "...k we see is influenced by that single point of view. The Big Fish Eat The Little Fish wasn’t a commission, it was an autonomous drawing by the artist himself that was later made into a print and auctioned. Its message can be understood regardless of language or religious affiliation as its translations carry the same mea..."
1 "that demonstrates that to" "... dead, he is still Mary's best friend, so he will live on in her heart,and she was glad she took the chance to write to Max. 'Mary and Max' is a film that demonstrates that to lose love is better than to never have it through the emotions Mary expresses about the death of Max and how it has affected her.  Having love comes ..."
1 "they felt that they" "... also affects the individual’s level of happiness. For instance, more respondents from the Democratic party felt happier than the Republicans because they felt that they were more connected than others.  Question 3: The physiological and psychological processes Used in the study of empathy.  According to Lieberman and..."
1 "Well that is not" "...ow you teachers have one hidden in your pocket this very moment. Well if we have to buy Australian made, you will have to say goodbye to your phones. Well that is not the only thing. My fellow peers will also have to give up their beloved Playstation and gameboys. Most of Australia’s clothing designs and fabric are..."
1 "Fetterman suggest that the" "...nographic research circle process to human life cycle, with each part of the research process linked to a stage in the human life cycle. Furthermore, Fetterman suggest that the researcher must learn a new language, practices and cultural information; data collection period is exciting, frustrating, and confusing, as the ethn..."
1 "evidence is that “" "...dn’t have equality in the sport. Since the teams are basically uneven in a genetic quality, Than drug enhancement would be cheating. Another piece of evidence is that “some athletes have better nutrition, 'natural' supplements, coaches, trainers, nutritionists, information, lawyers, and equipment than others do. Some..."
0 "but is that not" "... and hatred, so much so, an MP was assassinated because of her views on immigration. People have claimed that the IN campaign have \"milked\" her death but is that not another example of hatred and division by saying these things? When you have Nigel Farage standing in front of a poster of migrants walking into Slov..."
1 "findings showed that Health" "...ackney MARAC meeting holds 2 weekly, and for the purpose of this audit 2 cases are randomly selected over a 5 month period.   4.0   Key findings: The findings showed that Health visitors had knowledge of the cases discussed at MARAC that the victims were experiencing domestic abuse. Another key finding is the information shar..."
1 "local perish that the" "...with The Sisters, the narrator is a young boy that opens the story discussing the imminent death Father Flynn. Father Flynn is an older priest of the local perish that the young boy has befriended over time.  \t \t \t"
0 "also noticed that they" "...ery positive attitude with dealing with their peers and the outside public.  Within myself I then started displaying the same attitude furthermore, I also noticed that they are all hardworking educated individuals that are dedicated to their jobs. Once I started displaying those same work ethics within two months I was t..."
0 "RN that is not" "...hat I will be a burden to my RN that I would slow my RN routine/ progress.  When the RN leaned over me to sign the medication off as I was telling my RN that is not the way to do it. I felt very nerves telling a senior nurse how to do their job without be disrespectful as they have provided great hospitality in t..."
0 ", that is attitude" "...With guidance from Dalton’s study (Dalton et al., 2014:221-223) the questionnaire was set up under the three factors that affect behavioural intention, that is attitude towards the behaviour, subjective norms and perceived behavioural control.     The dependent variable will be measured by the following questions:   ..."
1 "be noted that this" "...rom Chiriguaná Cesar department to the megaproject Puerto Brisa, Municipality of Dibulla in Guajira department, with a total length of 310 km. should be noted that this section is not awarded to any company as it is only important for the Brisa Free Zone and Puerto Brisa. Looking like a strong possibility that the ne..."
1 ") revealed that most" "...o various needs. In addition, there is no access to life saving care that conforms to the advanced world, because evidence from Kandelman et al. (2012) revealed that most of the rural developing countries lack available health care facilities such as professionals and functioning clinics. Adequate attentions are not re..."
1 "world that is very" "...that they lack basic social skills, but these may all be myths. Reintegration Society is instantly difficult for some ex-offenders.  They return to a world that is very different from when they went into prison. Technology is an example of rapid change, which can be overwhelming to ex-offenders if they have been in p..."
0 "realize that" "...gh with her former seven children. Rebecca’s treats the situation nonchalantly, saying Betty will “wake when she tires of [the ailment]”, but doesn’t realize that Ann Putnam's children never got “tired” of the ailment (27). Rebecca doesn’t understand that her solutions don’t necessarily apply to different scena..."
0 "given that" "...nts in public. If an elephant had been in the room he’d have wanted the super deluxe upgrade model, for 50,000 more. But Joe couldn’t rationalize it, given that most woman would have excused themselves after snapping a selfie and posting it. While not farm animal grade, the Dongmaster 5000i was substantial. H..."
1 "and ensure that visitors" "...bsite to ensure it is up-to-date, relevant and in working order. With regular maintenance , it helps to improve your website’s search engine rankings and ensure that visitors keep coming back for more. Our Site Maintenance proposal can be provided upon request.  If the above estimate is priced above your budget, we would b..."
0 "（OLS）model found that the" "...ce and ln refers of natural logarithm                      2 . Number in parameters is the P-value  The Table 4.6 result of the Ordinary Least Square （OLS）model found that the P-value of D(lnNEER) equal to 0.0703, it means that D(lnNEER)  is significant at 90% confidence level. D(lnNEER)  is factor effecting D(lnSMI).   The..."
0 "Marcel tells that Rosa" "...alise many thing about Paul is brought in that room by Rosa. They drink the bourbon that is Paul’s favourite drink given by Rose to her lover Marcel. Marcel tells that Rosa one night tried to break Marcel’s room’s wallpapers because she wanted see the walls white to make same with her room with Paul. She tried to turn Ma..."
1 "effects are that you" "...ains, numbness and even abdominal pain but one major effect is that you may not only lose people that you love or you may even get killed. Some minor effects are that you might get your car impounded and demerit points against your name.   Some solutions that you could put in place before you think about driving is hav..."
0 "talent that is so" "...ton Hargis Ms. Wilson Senior Capstone - 7th Hour 10 August 2016 The Art of Leadership Prompt: Some students have a background, identity, interest, or talent that is so meaningful they believe their application would be incomplete without it. If this sounds like you, then please share your story.  Word count: 610 For..."
0 "now appears that a" "...ls from the state intelligence and security apparatus, the siloviki, are gaining influence in national politics. See B-05-08-16-RU for our report. It now appears that a smaller group of siloviki have gained control of more key positions within the agency. This is particularly in the Economic Security Service of the F..."
0 "parents express that their" "...pair cycle is very common. This cycle can sometimes convince parents to lower or change their expectations in terms of preferences for a child. “Some parents express that their child preferences are flexible because they do not want to prolong their wait for a child and some parents emphasize that their main priority is adop..."
0 "Prayut affirmed that Thailand" "...regional connectivity, development of basic infrastructure, trade and investment promotion as well as energy exchange.  In the area of labor, General Prayut affirmed that Thailand is placing importance on the systematic management of foreign workers, including those from Laos. He also asked Laos to assist its citizens in the na..."
1 "this book that I" "... I just transferred from another school obviously has an impact on what I take away from this book. Though there were many things that I learned from this book that I was surprised with, there were also many that I did know about. Two summers ago I traveled to Laos. It is a country that is right next to Vietnam. Wh..."
0 "the help that they" "...ld background, perceptions of adoption, and attachment. With the understanding of stressors I hope that adoptive families everywhere can begin to get the help that they need to be resilient. The purpose of this paper is to discuss those stressors, as well as the limitations of adoption research, as I answer the follo..."
1 "He believes that this" "...1.\tThe Englishman, an important character that contributes to Santiago’s journey, is going to Al-Fayoum oasis to find the alchemist that lives there. He believes that this special alchemist knows the secret to a long life while also being able to transform any metal to gold. Even though the Englishman is an intelligent ..."
1 "so that it read" "...ord the mass to the nearest 0.01 g in your data table. using the scoopula arefully add one large scoop of NaCl to the watch glass. Adjust the sliders so that it read “0” again. Record the mass of the watch glass and the NaCl in your data table to the nearest 0.01g. transfer the NaCl to the evaporating dish. Check ..."
1 "who ruled that George" "... by her in the street. You’ll see it in the presidential candidate who says all Mexican immigrants are rapists and murderers. You saw it in the judge who ruled that George Zimmerman  Racism is a monster. It stalks its prey in the shadows  that racism is molded, created,  and then carefully reinforced, as a potter would ..."
1 "houses deem that the" "...t invasion C.    each state will be protected against domestic violence  Article V How can a constitutional amendment be proposed? two-thirds of both houses deem that the amendment is necessary B.    two-thirds of all state legislatures agree that the amendment is necessary  How can a proposed amendment be ratified? th..."
1 "to say that when" "...having child with mental health problems. Parents should learn how to recognize behavioral and social events that signal trouble in a child. Needless to say that when adolescents are going to stressful situations and a feeling of bombardment begins to arouse, parents should learn how to jump in having the right res..."
1 "one say that the" "... paper.    Internal validity refers to the confidence we can place on the cause-and effect relationship in the questionnaire (i.e. to what degree can one say that the independent variable causes a reaction in the dependent variable) (Sekaran & Bougie 2013:174).    Therefore in order to ensure that the content of th..."
1 "we think that  the" "...e projects like this, we want think of ways to encourage them to take part in future art competitions. In order to boost confidence and love for art, we think that  the school should organise hands-on, interesting, and engaging activities, that evokes the interest of art in cedarians. For example, inter-class art com..."
0 "reminder remember that our" "...tlyn’s work ever end?  Speaking of influential families and political relation, don't think that Caitlyn falls behind in bloodline. If you call for a reminder remember that our girl reigns from the millinery's answer to royalty, the greatest American, Albanian born dynasty of Calabasas, The Kardashians. Working as a parent i..."
0 ", That is why" "..., so that definition maybe it could lead the modern theory of the language. That shows may be somebody define language better than the past definition, That is why the H.Dauglas said “language is arbitrary.” Therefore according to H.Douglas out line, language did not have fixed definition, it could be changed th..."
1 "training that is needed" "...s, but a liaison between the various members. In this situation the Organizational Leader [Manager] can direct the focus for the various research and training that is needed to develop an overall program.  Maintaining the program and even expanding the program would be necessary for attempting to eliminate sex trafficking..."
1 "and thinks that this" "... child will remain in foster care until this issue is resolved in court.       He absolutely denies any kind of sexual contact with his step daughter and thinks that this allegation is from the grandmother wanting revenge and to make sure he does not get custody. In the past seven years this is the first time any such ..."
0 "effect that it successfully" "...elf-determination which is applicable to all students and required if they are to be a success later in life.  The SSI program by Sarra has the wider effect that it successfully challenges the current “habitus that exists in this country which is responsible for current perceptions of Aboriginal society and its negative posit..."
1 "97-22 says that you" "...irements for the IRS. But ultimately, you as the tax professional are responsible for the security and availability of your tax data.  IRS Rev. Proc. 97-22 says that you can prepare and transfer documents to the IRS by digitizing paper documents to an electronic storage medium that lets the IRS view them without using..."
1 "is clear that the" "...YS Chiriguaná Neiva  Although the country has made ​​significant investments in the rehabilitation of large sections of the national rail network, it is clear that the fact of maintaining existing paths and narrow gauge (914 mm or 36 inches) with which they were built over 100 years ago makes very uncompetitive comp..."
1 "you feel that your" "...e easiest ones: going to bars, playing video games, having sexual relations, but more often than not people seek respite in substances. So, next time you feel that your mood goes down, spend a minute to analyze your recent activities in an attempt to figure out what might be going wrong, so you can adjust your mood. ..."
1 "ll notice that the" "...ries who've always wanted to co-star alongside a Pikachu of their very own.  When Professor Willow tasks you with capturing your starter Pokemon, you'll notice that the only Pokemon appearing around you are a Bulbasaur, Squirtle and Charmander. Simply walk away from them until they disappear. Don't worry, the trio sh..."
0 "98mm that was 1" "...of lining could increase too, so the ground settlement would decreased. When the thickness of lining was 0.15m in the model, the settlement reached 7.98mm that was 1.86 times when the thickness was 0.4m. The influence was not significant when the thickness was over 0.3m. (4) Stress relief and grouting pressure are..."
1 "I decided that I" "...ting a mock trial about the the wolves and three pigs. I was the defense prosecutor who defended the wolf, and I had terrible stage fright then. Then I decided that I should write everything down on a paper so I wouldn’t have to see the jury eye-to-eye.       "
0 "…understand that confusion" "...then enlightening children to take risks and explore mathematical findings. Having students take academic risks, educators are assisting students to “…understand that confusion, partial understanding, incorrect answers, conceptual errors and some frustration are natural as they construct mathematical knowledge.” (Reys, Lindq..."
0 "know is that I" "...down my cheek and splatter in harsh drops against the pavement. I don’t know how to hide what I have just done, or what I was about to do next. All I know is that I have to clean the mess up, before it is too late.                                       Three Months Earlier    I rattled my hand around in my handba..."
1 "group that was discussed" "...ough their society started in the 1960s this culture has well and truly stuck within society till this day influencing all ages including the teenage group that was discussed previously.  However, this social movement used the drug for very different reasons, they believed it inspired protesting for civil rights and antiwa..."
1 "method that is followed" "...sive understanding of the position to determine if it is the position is the right fit for them. ​In my current position I use a one-on-one interview method that is followed by a realistic job preview interview. My evaluation of the candidates resume, phone interview and one-one interview determines whether the candidate ..."
1 "diagnosis means that she" "...ising and took Sonia to hospital- duty of care under MCA While we presume capacity in the first instance, we must consider that the nature of Sonia’s diagnosis means that she may be unable to consent to an examination by the paediatrician, we must then consider the authority under which he will be acting and her rights in ..."
0 "colleges require that you" "...ours. Generals include courses in English, history, math and political science and are typically finished prior to launching into major courses. Most colleges require that you select a major by your sophomore year in college. During your junior and senior years in college most your courses will concentrate primarily on comp..."
0 "confidently say that I" "...d week. She agreed and proceeded to liaise with the graphic design team to work on the already completed PowerPoints and recordings.  Likewise, I can confidently say that I am a very reliable team player. An example of this would be that in my current role as a head office receptionist, I work on a job-share basis. There..."
1 "study found that the" "... study the relationship between application of performance measurement and benchmarking in the Singapore construction industry by using a survey. The study found that the benchmarking represents only 10% in that field. They conclude that competitive nature of the industry and sensitivity issues influenced on that resul..."
0 "noted that" "...ddled as far as there was room” and “as being men of low intelligence and social order” appearing “unmistakably dejected and dismal,” Inspector Clark noted that Indians were attracted to this part of Stepney largely because “the predominating Jewish population do not object to their presence” (Ibid.). Thus, t..."
1 "knowledge that is being" "...ities can be done in isolation however, with collaboration they may explore deeper into their findings and get a better understanding of mathematical knowledge that is being produced.     As we look into the world of tomorrow, we start to develop and appreciate the importance of collaboration and communication and the vit..."
0 "me felt that I" "...e for another office within my agency which is the Assistant Secretary’s front office for one day every two weeks from 3 to 5pm.  Even though part of me felt that I may have been taking on too many responsibilities, I still volunteered my services.  After weeks of providing office coverage for that office, I rece..."
0 "site that is prototypical" "...es were described as “clear”, “simple” and “easy to read”, this gave the user a more positive experience. Research has shown a more simple and modern site that is prototypical will leave users with a better experience.   Aesthetically pleasing sites use images that communicates to the user and have contrasting colours that ..."
1 "and hope that it" "...ny statue would be nice at some stage. I’d be lying if I said otherwise. However, the main aim is to always strive to do the best work I possibly can and hope that it may make a difference to someone out there in some way. I’ve always felt that if the work I do can help or inspire only one person in any way, even i..."
1 "They think that you" "...ppreciate them better. The possible appreciations from their expectations were:   \t- They love and care about you \t- They can't afford to lose you \t- They think that you're blind in some ways, and want to take the relationship a step higher but they can't do it without you.  \tYou'll be able to use the 4-Step Technique..."
0 "to ensure that it" "... a stance, and its continued concentration of military presence in Indo-China was an indication of the changes that were expected. The country looked to ensure that it has solidified its position through engaging and attacking different strongholds that is the Philippines, Malaya, Hong Kong and Thailand and hence it..."
1 "has proven that these" "... into employment the industry must provide the sense of success and personal achievement that are key to fostering employee loyalty. Study upon study has proven that these, rather than a modest uptick in compensation, are far more important for employees’ satisfaction and happiness. Get this - It pays to be nice to your..."
1 "epidemic that is spreading" "...ggle with the weekly grocery shopping and how they had to choose quantity over quality due to their low income situation. In addition,  Obesity is an epidemic that is spreading all over the world. The reason for obesity increase are production of low cost, prepackaged and easily prepared energy dense foods ( Kelly, 2006). In..."
0 "They forget that they" "...I was only that this could have been my son and I would want help to get him back.  The rich people have indeed earned their money and their things.  They forget that they did not always have all the things they now own or all the money they now have.  If I were a rich person I would be trying to help as many people as ..."
0 "and hopes that Proctor" "...s said to Danforth that he “[couldn’t] think you may judge the man on such evidence” (91). Danforth realizes that he has gone too deep to turn around and hopes that Proctor doesn’t spread the lies in order to save face.   Act 3 #6 Danforth’s statement, “We burn a hot ﬁre here; it melts down all concealment” means that Da..."
0 "Bertolucci confesses that as" "...was crying in the other room because, he understands his hopeless effort that finding in sex a vanished guiltlessness is impossible. (Thompson; 1998) Bertolucci confesses that as well; “I realised… that the couple in my film are not isolated from the world as I had planned for them to be. You cannot escape to an island: even y..."
0 "regulation is that the" "...GM soybean.This implies that GM products that are allowed in Australia are done so on a case by case basis. However the main concern with the current regulation is that the risk assessment process is too objective and consequently  it fails to help advance the social and ecological sustainability.This then leaves a gap i..."
1 "is said that Hyde" "...d the other half of the murder weapon. Utterson and the inspector go to Hyde´s bank and find that Hyde's account contains several thousand pounds. It is said that Hyde is sure to be caught now because money means everything to him. The only problem is that there are no photographs or no record of family of Hyde. Utt..."
0 "Steve that was fascinated" "In the 200th century there was a man called Steve that was fascinated on the art of science, along with his friend Mark that tried to invent inventions that will helped the human race but the other people didn't think i..."
1 "I realize that the" "... quarrel. Carrie opens the door to the bathroom, and too my surprise I see there is cloth diapers and a changing pad on a table in the bathroom. Soon I realize that the plan that they have is have me diapered. I beg they not to diaper me, I say please I do not want to wear diapers.  Abbie you have no choice on this m..."
1 "made up that this" "...ciate it better.     \tWhen registering in this course, my expectation was that for sure this course was going to be a pain in the butt. I had my mind made up that this course was gonna be so challenging that I still considered dropping it before the semester started. To me, this course was my main weakness and I did..."
1 "it determines that such" "...ur quantity and quality of work. Hunter's can extend the duration of the evaluation period one or more times if, in its sole and absolute discretion, it determines that such an extension is appropriate. Newly transferred and promoted employees are also subject to the same type of evaluation period for the first 90 days.  ..."
1 "King thought that if" "...y. They wanted Gandarian land, but at the time Gandarians were stronger and banished them for even daring to ask for land. I quess that the Gandarian King thought that if he turned them down without a punishment something terrible like what is happening right now would occur. But banishment wasn't the best choice, 5 ce..."
0 "to ensure that their" "...e or disagree with their peers.    Discussion about respecting each other’s responses while working on activity as a group and showing responsibility to ensure that their task is completed in the Think Pair and Share.    9:00- 9:30  Students will complete their thoughts on new learned values.  First they will think and..."
1 "is considered that these" "...mantic components), and consider concepts to which ascribed a field lexicon and the lexemas contained therein (Miller 1993:5). We have to add that it is considered that these components are required to accommodate both conceptual domains as lexicons and this mixture between the conceptual domain and the lexicon can cause s..."
", that is -" "... \"I don't wanna baby yet... I wanna discover meself first\", exhibits Rita's determinism in breaking social boundaries in which women of her background, that is - of lower class, are expected to get married and settle    " 0
1 "Alright that is five" "... or at the beach swimming in the clear blue ocean. But for Jack Morrison this was a day where he would sit in his office and work on his paperwork.  “Alright that is five down,” Jack said as he placed the^signed paper in one pile before turning to another. “And 76 more to go.”  Seeing that his work was cut out for him ..."
1 "but figured that she" "...ap. Ribahn shook her head at Zera, \" No, \" she said, \" I collect books tomorrow, you sort them for me when I bring them back.\" Zera was disappointed, but figured that she would have to work her way to the prestigious position of book collector. She continued to circle dates with the cell block numbers with the closest ..."
1 "find that it is" "...of Sonata form, you should take the time to review it and try to memorize as much of it as possible. It is a lot of information, but I think you will find that it is not as complicated as it appears. Look for a few sonatas and see if you can identify the sections that I included in this exercise. Sonata form is la..."
0 "friend that" "...d in her dictionary (apart from the ones directed at her). And it didn’t help that on top of all of this she pretty, which she knew.   Lionel, Evie's friend that she goes to school with. Lionel is also a outcast, but he does get invited to parties (which evie doesn't).  In the first part of the story Lionel is..."
1 "I feel that it" "...proached becoming your character and some of the challenges and experiences you had playing Javier? I don’t really believe in becoming the character. I feel that it always has to come from a part of you. Even if it’s a small remote part that never gets much daylight. So it’s all me in one way or another. Tapping ..."
1 "and realise that the" "...tinue to live on through the poem and people. Shakespeare's sonnet informs the reader of the idea that only oneself can bring love to their lifetime, and realise that the loss of the love is not necessarily a bad thing, it just make one think about how important love in one's life truly is.   Having love that has been ..."
1 "and hoped that if" "... administrative quarters connecting both the research area and The Warden’s office, and the guard quarters. Zera was making mental notes of all this, and hoped that if she got her hands on some paper she could start to make a crude diagram of the prison. She still held hope that she could escape, perhaps even make i..."
1 "name that is applied" "...s topping to 45C° (113 F).  The Significance of Uluru to the Indigenous Australians In the language of the local Anangu Aborigines, Uluru is a family name that is applied to both the rock and the waterhole on top of the rock. Uluru has been a place of shelter and important ceremonies to the indigenous Australians who l..."
"I feel that the" "I feel that the main reason the British Empire was so successful was the Royal Navy. Before the advent of aircraft, most of the colonies were accessible safely only ..." 1
0 "quickly learn that Sonia" "...anticipation for the start of the show.         \tThe beginning scene opens with Vonya sitting down to enjoy his morning coffee, then enters Sonia. We quickly learn that Sonia is Vonya’s adopted sister, and^the two have been living together for many years in their family home. Sonia is discontent with their past and present..."
0 "Faye is that the" "...unday afternoon.”(214) This was the description of Ms. Kate Albey, a new prostitute that established herself quickly in Faye’s brothel. “What puzzles Faye is that the kid looks like a runaway girl except she’s a goddamn good whore. She knows all the answers and all the tricks.”(214) Cathy is posing in yet another n..."
0 "I leave that to" "... Our Lord and how we can all turn the bad into good by just changing how we respond and react to the world and people around them. I will not preach, I leave that to the more qualified, but I will say that everyone should keep their eyes wide open to opportunity to help others.   On a more personal level, I am the..."
1 "law requires that this" "...he blue card info under “Name Addr Ver”.  Do this for every student as you update/enter them.   Put a checkmark in the “Addr. Verif” field.  CA state law requires that this information be verified each year.  CorrLng (Correspondence Language) on can only be English, Spanish or Russian.  We do not translate mailings into ..."
1 "data that it has" "...e backround.  The RAM is the storage device that holds the temporary data, visible or not. If you are opening a compressed file, it needs to hold the data that it has already extracted somewhere. That is one example of what the ram is used for.  The Motherboard is what connects everything together. It has cords and..."
0 "so that it is" "...ntinuing the infant centered scoring when parents are not at the hospital.  Healthcare workers could also give morphine when needed every three hours so that it is more aligned with the half-life of the medication and so that infant are not woken up to be given medications.   Article 3: Study Objectives     The ..."
0 "they think that everyone" "...er billionaires to do the same, and so far most of them have signed up.  We will always have the greedy people we think that they owe nobody and that they think that everyone needs to earn their way.  All of these rich people all got started by someone helping them out either that be a bank or a family member giving them t..."
0 "It suggests that it" "... LOCKE’S GOAL THEORY   Locke’s Goal Theory states that motivation is driven primarily by the goals or objectives that individuals set for themselves. It suggests that it is the goal itself that provides the driving force. It is said that the performance of an employee will improve, when they themselves set specific ra..."
1 "profoundly that it not" "...r because he was genuinely up to no good.  As a white woman, I will never know what it is like to live in a country that fears your minority group so profoundly that it not only allows for the suppression of your right to vote,  but other minority groups, as well. However, I do know that one is not born with racism etche..."
1 "Rackspace believe that after" "...ntent owners. As a result,  the team was already resourced for the entire week with no other projects demanding their attention.  The UL.com team and Rackspace believe that after the routine server restart following Operating System and software package updates were deployed (as part of their managed service maintenance offeri..."
1 "modifications are that some" "...sition to grow well. Sugar beets are modified to develop quicker and to create it to a greater extent resistant to weeds. Some benefits of sugar beet modifications are that some modified sugar beets showed resistor against virus and pests. to change the sugar beet new gene that is resistant to many virus is added to the sugar..."
1 ", that is about" "... Features: 3 Compared to other power banks out there EPB charger is a litter on the shallow side. It supports rapid charging in one of the outputs but, that is about it. 8000mAh captivity isn’t anything to write home about but it sufficient enough to get at least 2 charges out of any major device right now.   Valu..."
1 "which says that the" "...n that the world exists for you. For you is the phenomenon perfect. What we are that only we can see… Build therefore your own world” (Emerson 54-55) which says that the world will be as you want it to be so make it what you want and do not worry about what others think of it. Overall, both authors agree on many topic..."
1 "have thought that he" "...e. After he leaves, Mrs. Gardiner is suprised at his behaviors, especially after all Elizabeth has told her about him. She says, “I really should not have thought that he could have behaved in s                       In Chapter 46                        In Chapter 47 and 48                        In Chapter 56         ..."
1 "is shown that Ignorance" "...errible actions that coincide with ignorance. As stated by George Orwell, “War is peace. Freedom is slavery. Ignorance is strength.“  In the novel it is shown that Ignorance is tool for slavery. During the late 1830s many believed that black society had no other role than to be a slave, and work and labor for others. That..."
0 "--Mike informed that the" "...e I had a sketchy phrase written in my notes:  “Stellar Customer Service drives revenue” -- do you remember what it referenced?   Unfinished Business --Mike informed that the Boeing license arrears are now current. --There was no further unfinished business.  New Business --Mike met with Boeing in 2016 to inform of status ..."
1 "they are that it" "...tizen mentioned the damage she witnessed  “[as] a skater sail[ed] right through a bunch of daisies, flattening them to the ground” and how displeased they are that it is their money that had paid for those now-ruined flowers. This skaters reckless abandon caused more damage than just ruining some flowers. Not only ..."
1 "to ensure that they" "...mposition contests don’t always choose the most talented composer.  With so many submissions, they have to have certain rules and guidelines in place to ensure that they can consider each applicant. The practice of tossing the submissions from composers who don’t follow these unspoken rules is not entirely unfair, tho..."
0 "disease find that the" "...isease Control) defines this test as an important screening test for Lyme disease, but in clinical practice, most healthcare providers who treat Lyme disease find that the test has has poor predictive value and limited usefulness. It has no value for diagnosing chronic Lyme.   PCR for B. burgdorferi. Tests directly for ..."
"is shown that Ignorance" "...gnorance has done nothing to advance society and has only shown us not to repeat the terrible actions that coincide with ignorance.   In the novel it is shown that Ignorance is tool for slavery." 0
1 "That meant that Sasuke" ".... He'd decided to make his own flower garden so that he could grow his own cucumbers, beans, potatoes and other vegetables. They’d need food somehow. That meant that Sasuke would need to properly clean out^his shed to plant the shoots the blonde had bought. It was easier than growing everything from the dirt and if they ..."
1 "I see that there" "...ed dress.  Now Abbie obeys Carrie and Cassie and she goes up with them without no quarrel. Carrie opens the door to the bathroom, and too my surprise I see that there is cloth diapers and a changing pad on a table in the bathroom. Soon I realise that the plan that they have is have me diapered. I beg they not to di..."
1 "we learn that they" "... is, it may reveal more things about him. I’m most looking forward to how the relationship between Jace and Clary will change. In the end of the book we learn that they are related. However before that scene, we can tell that they have developed feelings for each other. I’m also looking forward to see how the relatio..."
0 "knew is that this" "...ve something that was closer to me then they ever were. I laid upon the rusted tracks which led to places I wouldn’t know, and never will, but what I knew is that this is it. The train was close like how God and I were soon to be. And in a matter of seconds we’ve collided and ‘soon’ meant now.               “The Rec..."
1 "must consider that the" "...Staff at the respite facility noticed bruising and took Sonia to hospital- duty of care under MCA While we presume capacity in the first instance, we must consider that the nature of Sonia’s diagnosis means that she may be unable to consent to an examination by the paediatrician, we must then consider the authority under..."
0 "trust that it will" "...yone is going somewhere except for you, but you cannot do what they are doing to feel like you fit in for you have to keep going on your own path and trust that it will lead you where you have to go. Emerson also attests to this saying, “Know then that the world exists for you. For you is the phenomenon perfect. What..."
0 "behavior that is highly" "...eutic harm concerns what recalled boundary violations. This is when the therapist behaves in ways that exploit the trust of the patient or engages in behavior that is highly inappropriate (e.g., taking the patient to dinner, giving the patient gifts)\" (Butcher, Hooley,  and Mineka, 2014, p.554). The therapist has the capa..."
1 "also wish that Elizabeth" "...Elizabeth’s room and are filled in on what happened. I wish that Lydia would realize how horrible of a man Wickham is, and come back to her family. I also wish that Elizabeth will meet Miss. Darcy                       In Chapter 47 and 48                        In Chapter 56                        In Chapters 59, 60 and 6..."
1 "legislatures agree that the" "...rticle V How can a constitutional amendment be proposed? two-thirds of both houses deem that the amendment is necessary B.    two-thirds of all state legislatures agree that the amendment is necessary  How can a proposed amendment be ratified? three-fourths of state legislatures must agree to ratify the amendment B.    three-..."
1 "thing is that you" "...s. For the purposes of explanation we will use the notes C, C#, D#, F, G, and A. These pitches may be replicated at any octave freely.  The important thing is that you are very careful to use only six notes (and their octave equivalents). You may also duplicate these notes as much as you like. Please don’t take this..."
0 "is ascertained that the" "... the Environmental Protection Agency, the Food and Drug Administration and the Department of Agriculture the power to evaluate transgenic products.It is ascertained that the failure to create a new statutory structure dealing with GMOs implies that in the United States, GMOs are simply a continuation of existing breeding ..."
1 "which provided that the" "...nistration Act was signed into law, establishing a national value added tax regime for FSM.  The Revenue Administration Act contained a sunset clause which provided that the established value added tax regime would be null and void, if the four states of the federation did not pass consequential value added tax legislatio..."
0 "long realised that the" "...oved relationships and decision making abilities.  All these benefits can lead to happier, healthier, and more well-adjusted people. \tPhysicians have long realised that the mind and body are connected and as a result, our mental and emotional states can have a great effect on our physical health. The American Psychologic..."
1 "truly shows that she" "...) unknown) and then moved to WXYZ-TV where she works currently. \t\t\t\t\t\t\t\tRonnie Dahl’s knowledge about what happens both behind or infront of a camera truly shows that she is not a reporter to mess with. According to her Channel 7 page, Dahl is “...willing to push the boundaries for a good story” which displays that she..."
1 "paper proposes that the" "...e to fix this scenario and help African countries meet the Sustainable Development Goals, appropriate poverty reduction strategies are required. This paper proposes that the first step in designing and implementing poverty reduction strategy is understanding what makes people and societies trapped. Understanding poverty t..."
1 "everyone believe that she" "...ie except for one, Vera Claythorne. As you know Cyril, Hugo’s wealthy cousin, drowned while swimming to a rock quite a distance from shore. Vera made everyone believe that she tried to save him but her lover, Hugo, was the only one who did not believe her. Hugo broke up with Vera because of the hate he felt towards her and ..."
0 "and that is when" "...en Loan Arena, Officer William claimed that the incident all happened when Johnson set himself and others on fire. So the police had to help them out and that is when the fights broke out. When the press conference was held, it was outside the jail house and this is what Sunsara Taylor had this to say:” He was neve..."
1 "information that is contradictory" "...ity to represent a larger population. Surveys However are not ideal for the issues that are controversial in nature because the respondents will give information that is contradictory as opposed to the expected results.  Question 2: Three conclusions Deduced from the Graphs  The bar graphs on page 34 deduced from the survey conduct..."
0 "‘That was Mr" "...ich caused Gabriel to come to his senses and began shrieking, “Mr. Blackbourne!” as he chased the man from before down the hall and through a room.   ‘That was Mr. Blackbourne…? I thought he’d be more stiff and professional by the description of him.’   “Come on Chameleon, let’s get going before Akuma gets ants..."
1 "study suggests that a" ".... Women that showed negative responses to stressors were also observed to have significantly higher food consumption. The evidence provided from this study suggests that a psychophysiological response to stress has the potential to influence eating behaviors, and over time, may impact both weight and health. Increased v..."
"to see that I" "...ho was handed everything on a silver platter. That’s what I want you to see. I don’t want you to see the hardships I had as a child. I don’t want you to see that I had to give my best friend away to be slaughtered.  " 1
0 "liquid that is capable" "...suggestions, answer questions and showcase a shop’s products to customers  What is CO2 extraction? When high pressure is applied to CO2, it becomes a liquid that is capable of working as a solvent, stripping^away cannabinoids and essential oils from plant material.  What is THC? Tetrahydrocannabinol (THC) is the main can..."
1 "tasks that were urgent" "...ional Development: 2%\tL-Personal Learning and Growth: 5%\tR-Resource Assistance: 5%\tT-Teach/Model/Co-teach: 47% Total What was the total time spent on tasks that were urgent but not important? 13% of my time What types of tasks were these?  7%\tE-Mail Collaboration: 1%\tM-Miscellaneous: Fire Drills, Lockdowns, Errand 5%\tV-T..."
1 "very well that Zera" "...ality. This was how they would truly erase her.   “Maybe after you serve your time, your true name will be returned to you.” the doctor said, knowing very well that Zera was there for a lifetime.  “ This is cruel!” Zera exclaimed while regaining her strength, she lunged at the doctor, pinning her to the floor in a flu..."
1 "has proven that these" "...ad response as to what well-being means is to be ‘young, beautiful, full of life, extroverted, well educated and completely healthy’.  Whereas, study has proven that these perceptions are what indeed limits and downgrades a persons wellbeing, especially if they lack or am restricted from obtaining these responses (Diene..."
1 "decision shows that Maria" "...because it symbolized faith. She is the pillar in her community, she is the peacemaker. Yet, Maria chooses Clay which symbolizes fear and death. This decision shows that Maria is psychologically and spiritually paralyzed. She is afraid to move on with her life, so she is destined to end up like Eveline, letting life slip th..."
1 "saw that it was" "...a, where I grew up, I had no idea how much.”  Before I went on my first trip to India, I thought India was like America. Once I got there, however, I saw that it was drastically different. From the shops that line the highway to Bollywood blockbusters, India was certainly not like America.  Choose a passage that d..."
0 "they realized that the" "...larger group led humans to refine their methods farming and cooking techniques. Grains were soaked to provide a more favorable meal. After some time, they realized that the grains could also be grinded. Grinding stones were found by archaeologists at sites across the Fertile Crescent. These grinding stones were used to g..."
0 "I realize that I" "...op just to the side of my breast with his thumb underneath it, the other hand still on my ass, caressing me through my dress. I’m almost ashamed when I realize that I’m rubbing my hips against him, but then he’s grinding back into me, and it feels so good.  \tThen, suddenly my feet are back on the ground and he’s pu..."
0 "was completed that a" "...ers. This meant one could not analyze two related datasets side by side. At the time, a solution could not be found. It was not until the LERC client was completed that a solution for this problem was realized for the encoded PNG client.  \tThe LERC client presented, at first, an entirely different problem from the enco..."
1 "Ensure that there" "... Making do without the right equipment in an attempt to minimise expense can lead to injury or death, as well as prosecution if the law is broken.    Ensure that there are no defects in any equipment that you use.    Make sure that equipment is used safely and that any necessary training and/or supervision are provi..."
0 "and suggests that her" "...ther ancient writers at the time, Suetonius shares the same traditional hostility towards Agrippina. He presents her as a minor character in his work and suggests that her successes were defined by her relationships with the emperors. In his view, Agrippina’s greatest influence is evident in her relationship with the pr..."
0 "I guess that’" ".... Even so, I think it is for the better. I bet if I did meet some kids back when I was little, they would just make fun of me for having silver hair. I guess that’s how my life balanced out. You get some, you lose some. After 10 minutes, Karasuma-sensei pauses and then calls out to me, “You can come in now.” Tak..."
1 "Nora knows that he" "...and Nora immediately begins to play with them. A moment later Krogstad return, he enters the house unannounced startling Nora. He apologizes and lets Nora knows that he's not there to speak to Torvald, he wanted to ask Nora if the women walking with her husband was Mrs Linde. Nora responds yes and confirm to him she ..."
1 "to ensure that customers" "...y 2016 to June 2017. The project serves to build a framework for administrators to login and create/setup a flow for the installed network of beacons to ensure that customers can have an enhanced, contextually-aware experience using a tailored mobile application. The project will be undertaken using Agile methodology and d..."
0 "not realize that even" "...challenges associated with adopting young children. Although many people may think that adopting a child at a young age will be a lot easier, they do not realize that even adopting young children brings its own challenges and stress. For children adopted at a young age from institutions “studies clearly show that childr..."
1 "stratification is that it" "...an additional qualification and have no intention of completing one the future ( answered “No” to question 14 and 29);    The motivation behind using stratification is that it is a more efficient research sampling method that provides more information with a given sample size. Stratification ensures homogeneity within each ..."
1 "Everyone knows that too" "...d sarcastically.  \"He takes what he can get\"  For as long as I can remember, Malcolm had always stuck to his rule of staying away from relationships. Everyone knows that too. Unfortunately, girls still seemed to fall for him only to get there heart broken in the end. He did however have his moments where he could be sweet..."
0 "so that it was" "...e could always go above the ceiling and climb through the ceiling tiles, I have always wanted to do that.” We all hurried and rolled the swivel chair so that it was positioned next to the wall. Note: do not try this at school. The standing on a swivel chair part. Climbing in the ceiling is perfectly fine. Trevor ..."
1 "and demanded that the" ".... The treaty was signed as a result of pressure from U.S. Commodore Matthew C. Perry, who sailed into Tokyo Bay with a fleet of warships in July 1853 and demanded that the Japanese open their ports to U.S. ships for supplies. Perry then left Japan in order to give the government a few months to consider its decision. Wh..."
1 "must admit that the" "...ould think! The hardest part of training is the combat scenarios. We often have to crawl through mud and and under barbed wire carrying our rifles. I must admit that the combat scenarios make me nervous as I wonder if the actual thing will be even more difficult. Despite the other soldiers saying otherwise, I still fe..."
0 "teachers say that they" "...ugh I didn’t necessarily like all of the YA titles I read, I have found several that have surprised me and others that I have even loved. When I hear teachers say that they don’t have time or that they don’t like YA, I would answer in the same way that teachers answer students who voice the same complaints. When students..."
0 "and that is straight" "...:60).    The career journey can be depicted as a journey of mountain climbing, or climbing the ladder (Baruch, 2004:61). There is only one direction, and that is straight to the top. Getting to the top of the mountain/ladder is generally where all aspire to reach (Baruch, 2004:61). The linearity of the system is due to..."
1 "to understand that although" "...see that God uses trust-building experiences to teach His people that there is no risk in trusting Him fully. Through wilderness experiences we begin to understand that although we perceive a risk in following God that does not mean that there is necessarily any actual risk. God uses the wilderness to establish identity, whic..."
1 "been told that I" ".... I will struggle but that means I am getting better. As a good leader, Frederick Douglas said “ Without a struggle,there can be no progress.” i have been told that I was unqualified to be president. I can assure you i am ready for president I know what must be done to get us to be "
1 "to note that although" "...possible, States would strive to invest and to engage in areas that will give it autonomy over other countries and regions. It is important, however, to note that although systems [political and economic] operate based on power interests, they both have completely different needs and goals. Political systems focus on go..."
0 "to show that this" "...d strength against the court as they are proving to them that them that they were right all along. Rebecca ends with “Another judgment waits us all!” to show that this will bite them back sooner or later as she shows her strength through death (146).  Act 4 #23 The purpose Miller has in giving the play a tragic endi..."
0 "Company anticipates that the" "...he third quarter of 2016 at rates near two thirds capacity through the third quarter and then return to full rates in the fourth quarter of 2016. The Company anticipates that the FBR facility will be operating at rates approaching full capacity during Q4 of 2016. In addition, management continues to estimate that Silane III an..."
0 "forth that is 60~75%" "... of soil and then lead to the foundation settlement. The foundation settlement is consist of two parts: ground loss and consolidation settlement. The forth that is 60~75% of the total settlement is completed usually in 2 months after construction, however, the latter that is 25%~40% can last for years.(4)The foundation..."
1 "people believe that America" "...of the administrators and legislators support. The science and technology of America is growing. China sees this as a bad thing.  Over 54% of Chinese people believe that America is trying to prevent China from becoming as powerful as the U.S. Only 28% say that America accepts China’s growing power. America’s standard of livin..."
0 "loyalty that is a" "...ation perspective as these customers are providing essential services such as drinking water and electricity.   The hidden value lies in the customer loyalty that is a result of a business using an ISO 9001 accredited quality management system. Research by (Yaya, et al., 2014) demonstrates that satisfied customers a..."
0 "never failed that during" "...an they could handle, like the narrator describes in these following passages: “Some families would sell out for nearly nothing and move away. And it never failed that during the dry years the people forgot about the rich years, and during the wet years they lost all memory of the dry years” (5-6). “It wasn’t very long unt..."
1 "know that it is" "...ractice after church today. The two main things I need to work on to prepare me to sing this solo is to build my lung strength & my confidence. So, I know that it is going to take a lot of cardio to get my lungs strong enough to sing through all three of these hymns. You will see below that I worked very hard toda..."
0 "point is that organizations" "...lusive benchmarking process in the organization. Regardless of the approach being used in any organization, there are two points in common. The first point is that organizations are not satisfied for the status quo, and second point, they are looking forward to enhance their competitiveness (Boxwell, 1994). That is to say tha..."
1 "Parties recognize that their" "...r partnership between the Parties and neither Party shall enter into any contracts on behalf of the other Party.  Non-Solicitation of Employees.  The Parties recognize that their respective employees and independent contractors, and such persons’ loyalty and services, constitute valuable assets of the other.  Accordingly, neit..."
1 "This suggests that the" "...ed that Narcissus was beautiful. I weep because, each time he knelt beside my banks, I could see, in the depth of his eyes, my own beauty reflected.” This suggests that the lake used him for it’s own selfish purpose and Narcissus did the same. However, the myth could also mean that we tend to see things in the way that t..."
0 "issue that was dealt" "... became known as ______ (5.7)  The White Flight.\t The Final Solution.\t The Great Migration.\t The Urban Revolution.    53.  This picture represents an issue that was dealt with MOST successfully by which political movement?         ____(5.8)  Democrat\t Populist\t Progressive\t Republican"
0 "like that was even" "...might not get a check deposit from me but you get to keep money in your check. I am making do with this little bit of child support you give and your like that was even a lot, $690.20 a month does pay for shit. I used to get $1201.66 a month it's a big difference. You get to keep in your check over $500.00 that you d..."
0 "is clear that  Sarra" "...nd being Aboriginal is one of the most difficult    After careful analysis of Sarra's work  and comparison  with other works within the same field it is clear that  Sarra’s work Is having a definite impact on education as a whole and specifically with Aboriginal and Torres Strait Islander people. The difficulty lies  i..."
0 "guess that is something" "...to school anyway. Numbers confused me so I ended up dropping out. I do enjoy writing. But once I started farming I did not really have the time to. I guess that is something nice about the war. I finally have time to write. I actually get in now and real ink. At school I could only use lead. I'm at camp right now so I can..."
1 "to ensure that you" "...apter is designed to help you organize your sessions and create a training program that works.  Part of establishing a routine involves finding a way to ensure that you're always motivated and inspired to work. I often need to work with my students on this issue, so I feel it's an important aspect of this course.  Th..."
1 "study is that many" "...e information, as well as case studies, and Cultner-Smith also utilised existing research to support the findings. One of the key factors of Lawson’s study is that many physical education teachers choose their profession to pursuit a possible coaching career, which affects the quality of curriculum teaching. Cultner-..."
1 "commonly said that the" "...l where   Education is an exchange that blurs the line between teacher and student.  I do have personal reasons for pursuing a teaching degree. It is commonly said that the best way to learn is to teach. This adage is appealing to me because I fear the sort of life where one is siloed into a specific profession and, as a..."
0 "case is that they" "...sions in the moment most times. With time, they develop the skills required to make vital decisions even in real life. An important aspect about this case is that they know early in that their decisions have consequences which go a long way in determining their success in the game. As it is, gamers not only become b..."
1 "is determined that the" "... reward exceptional performance. When someone gets a promotion, or in the case of a temporary promotion, when the promotion becomes permanent When it is determined that the salary associated with the job is lower than appropriate given current job responsibilities  Your immediate supervisor makes recommendations about yo..."
0 "parties involved that our" "...TO: http://www.clickfarminteractive.com/sites/default/files/SeanSFbeach2015.jpg 05.27.15 - Implementing An Accessible Website We have buy-in from all parties involved that our website should be accessible and mobile-friendly. How can we make sure that the content we’re providing is accessible to everyone? What are the consi..."
1 ") revealed that every" "...r remains a major public health concern for all. Malnutrition among children is a serious challenge, evidence from the study of Babatunde et al. (2011) revealed that every 10th child under the age of five has been diagnosed to be too short for their age and 18 out of 100 are too thin in Nigeria. Nigeria is the highest c..."
1 "to say that since" "...hold it in until the two were safely within the confines of his potions closet. \"Yes Minerva?\" \"Severus, we... feel the Headmaster has been... I mean to say that since Potter disappeared-\" \"You would like me to brew a potion for you? Veritaserum perhaps?\" Her narrowed eyes answered for him. \"I'm afraid the headmaste..."
0 "She mentioned that ICC" "•\tBronwen share the ICC presentation with Group Managers team •\tShe mentioned that ICC is a seasoned and unpredictable business and noted that there are core roles and the casual staff is only acquired on request. •\tBronwen mentioned th..."
0 "think that is enough" "...n the Olympics. I want to play on the beach or on a court. The only problem is it just seems so impossible. I play recreation volleyball but I do not think that is enough. Hopefully when I go to high school I will make the volleyball team and make my way up. After school I plan the play in college and join the national..."
1 "nourishment that is made" "...zu, just same as 95% of other dogs out there.   In case one has a grown-up Shih Tzu at his or her home, he or she should ensure that they give them a nourishment that is made up of not less than 18% protein. Conversely, if he or she has a Shih Tzu at his or her home, he or she should ensure that they give them food that is..."
1 "always said that he" "...very surprised and interested in why was he moving right after the accident why he was movin and each time that eli was went over to randy's house he always said that he was packing. Randy finally left and Eli knew that there was something wrong.When Eli went back to school everyone was happy to see him. \t\t\t\t\t\t\t\t\t\t\t\t\t..."
0 "theory argued that the" "...child relationship will bring interface between environmental factors and child development as found in the study of (Ollendick and Benoit, 2012) The theory argued that the child development needs, parent or caregiver capability to respond appropriately and the family and environmental factors must be analyzed carefully ..."
"also believe that since" "...g to catch criminals on that night. It is a dangerous task, but it’ll pay off in the end if we put an end to some crime putting fear in our hearts. I also believe that since this issu" 1
1 "was seen that persons" "...l services. So to minimize the abuse in health and social care context the legislations regarding working practice and strategies were redesigned. It was seen that persons with specific needs or disability^were never taken care of by their near and dear ones as they thought the elderly people the burden of the family. H..."
1 "I find that most" "English was always my favorite subject in school. I made good grades in it and was usually in honors/ advanced placement English classes. I find that most of my friends and family will come to me for advice or help when writing a letter. But, I didn't take Comp I in college, and have regretted it  to th..."
0 "also recognises that there" "...re in line with the principle of sustainability, notes that natural environmental assets have their own intrinsic value and cannot be substituted. It also recognises that there is insufficient evidence to know with certainty whether a natural asset is replaceable.   b) Precautionary Principle   The precautionary principle de..."
"and check that they" "... in the right places at the right times. I find it's helpful to search through my posts (try control + F on PC or command + F on Mac) for those words and check that they're being used in the right context.  " 1
1 "and that is getting" "...nscious processes of the central nervous system. As I understand it the neutral substrate algorithm that underwrites my existence has one goal or aim and that is getting my genetic material into the next^generation. This seems to be universal on this planet. Every living organism from the ameba to the zebra has this a..."
1 "so that it is" "...pany’s readiness for change and capability to change are of equal importance to a business. A company must be ready and able to realign its structure so that it is in accordance with changes in the market while possessing the capability to implement proposed changes within the organization."
1 "to note that if" "...er the class visit, the entire PLC group would meet for the next period to debrief what the group experienced during the class visit. It is important to note that if a teacher was missing his/her preparation period due to the PLC, time in lieu would be given to the teacher to meet with union guidelines. Typically,..."
0 "literature suggests that the" "...ment of the annual financial plan (budget); Most western companies believed that the strategic planning mechanisms need to be improved. Review of the literature suggests that the number of the strategic planning stages and their different content. It depends on several factors: 1) ownership; 2) type of companies (specialized o..."
"necessarily imply that we" "...alized purposes and are most useful in a research setting — just because we have the ability to measure a function or a substance in the body doesn’t necessarily imply that we know what it means.    " 1
1 "you thinks that you" "...your money such as cars, clothes, shoes, house etc. But the newness always wears off and gets old after a while. Other reasons why money can only buy you thinks that you want; like cars and houses but it cannot^buy your needs, like friendship and time with your family. Money can’t cure all of your health problems eith..."
1 "Lily learned that the" "...Secret Life of Bees the minor characters affect Lily and who she is at the end of the book, just as much as the main characters. From Franklin Posey, Lily learned that the world is not fair, and not every race, person, and age in treated well. From Neil, Lily learned to never give up on what you believe in, because even..."
1 "effect is that you" "...ising, conclusions and bad brain injuries. Some short term effects are headaches, neck and back pains, numbness and even abdominal pain but one major effect is that you may not only lose people that you love or you may even get killed. Some minor effects are that you might get your car impounded and demerit points ag..."
1 "to understand that the" "...ring they did not have to be abused in ways she had been.  The author chose the post thirteenth amendment setting because Morrison wants the audience to understand that the thirteenth amendment did not mark the end of slavery. African Americans were forced to continue to fight for freedom, forced to remember how white pe..."
0 "changes that were expected" "....  It is also clear that Japan had already made a stance, and its continued concentration of military presence in Indo-China was an indication of the changes that were expected. The country looked to ensure that it has solidified its position through engaging and attacking different strongholds that is the Philippines, Malay..."
1 "I believe that it" "...nt and feeling of otherness.  My art gave me a voice and opportunity to develop my professional path in an authentic and unique sentiment and belief. I believe that it also helped me to understand feelings that we as humankind share on a universal level, expressions which arrives from the desire of acceptance and wo..."
1 "had wished that she" "...k step forward, the gravity felt a lot stronger on this ship. She remained silent, her throat now thrashed from her outburst of desperation. Then she had wished that she had died in the pod, like the other unlucky soul in the darkened pod. She didn’t know what awaited her beyond this chamber, and didn’t want to find o..."
1 "here is that the" "...doctor or the attendant and leave, without meeting the parents. People might say logically that it should be given to the parents directly. The point here is that the generation who can't value their parents, how can they do well? Even if they do well, is that how we value our parents?"
1 "to assume that Jim" "...ica for all of its existence climaxing during the setting of Adventures of Huckleberry Finn.   \tWhen the reader is first introduced to Jim it is easy to assume that Jim is unintelligent by the way he talks “ I see a light a-comin’ roun’ de p’int, bymeby, so I wade’in en shove’a log aheado’ me.” (Twain pg. 43) however..."
1 "he decided that he" "...al world that her dad had created for her. Evie was bullied and the school's outcast, her dad knew that Evie wasn’t good so when he heard Evie crying he decided that he would fix that. Even if it was the last thing he did… Before he got diagnosed he worked as a software pioneer he loved his job, so when he got diagno..."
1 "ll find that the" "...oth parts together, sit back and enjoy the concert going on in your mind. Complete this exercise daily in a meditative manner. As you get better, you’ll find that the quality of the instruments gets louder and clearer.  Don’t worry if you have trouble completing these steps at first. If necessary, use a simpler pie..."
1 "system that is meant" "...South African justice system is one that has been under lots of scrutiny lately and is absolutely not perfect, but it is important to be aware of the system that is meant to protect our nation.   Stacey Goliath      "
0 "understand that" "...ty will “wake when she tires of [the ailment]”, but doesn’t realize that Ann Putnam's children never got “tired” of the ailment (27). Rebecca doesn’t understand that her solutions don’t necessarily apply to different scenarios as she had eleven children compared to the one Mrs. Putman had. This leads to higher ten..."
0 "result shows that the" "...audi stock market ,The data period during December 2003-December 2013 of monthly data. They used the regression analysis and correlation analysis and result shows that the Saudi export have a significant effect on Saudi stock market.              2.1.7   Currency Policy Determinant  of  Stock Market   Many academics exa..."
1 "nurse  noticed that Mrs" "...dent who bought Mrs . Burns out of OR gave a vague report to the charge nurse who was busy with other responsibilities . After few minutes the charge nurse  noticed that Mrs. Burns was pale and her blood pressure was dropping drastically , at this moment she made time to investigate what happened in  the OR and she called..."
1 "had believed that she" "...e had never had the chance to really pursue a relationship with one given her job. She had to become accustomed to the worst of the male species, and had believed that she had sworn them off. But now The Warden seemed to embody the best of the male species, physically anyway.  Zera wanted to see him naked and just as vu..." 0
0 "hostility that was existing" "...Yale Law School, n.d). President Roosevelt’s Letter to the Emperor of Japan made a significant influence during the WWII as it developed awareness on hostility that was existing between various militaries including Japan, China, and the rest of Europe.  One of the aspects that are clear is that President Roosevelt was aware t..."
0 "when that was dead" "...at emulate his own societies principles. Dorian eventually destroys the painting in an act aiming to atone for his sins, “It would kill the past, and when that was dead he would be free” this metaphor is representation of societies manipulation of Christianity to sanction the act of sin, through this, Wilde questions..."
1 "claim that it will" "...pic that GMO labeling supporters fail or nearly address is the cost of providing this information to  consumers. Some researchers from Consumer Union claim that it will only cost $2.50 per person a year to purchase GMO foods that are labeled. They share Ben & Jerry’s change to non-GMO products journey, with out the i..."
1 "position is that prostitution" "...ate for Brazil? Brazil's Penal Code certainly differs from the Protocol in not insignificant ways, particularly around prostitution. The government's position is that prostitution by an adult person is not a civil disturbance or criminal act. However, the structure necessary to protect sex workers is precarious and vulnerable, ..."
0 "we learned that when" "... land, it quickly became overgrown and unrecognizable, just as we can imagine our cities turned to piles of ivy-choked rubble.  When I was in school, we learned that when the European settlers followed the early explorers, they found just small groups of people living a primitive life they'd always lived, in an ancient..."
0 "Waldman says that the" "...ted powers; they can command the thunders of heaven, mimic the earthquake, and even mock the invisible world with its own shadows\" (Shelley, 59).  M. Waldman says that the modern scientists of their time had very uninteresting and boring ideas in comparison to the earlier alchemists, but Victor believes this is some ast..."
1 "was told that it" "...each other, and he’s got his girls besides. And for all Johnny’s teasing, I am a good girl. The first time we slept together was our wedding night. I was told that it was something that nice girls, good girls let their husbands do. Wasn’t it a surprise to find out that I wanted him, too? But I was only ever with hi..."
0 "We feel that it" "...a general guide and not as the ultimate source of subject information. Within this book, you will find a list of services that many authors purchase. We feel that it is necessary to include them along with the estimated prices (which are subject to change) you can expect to pay if you make the decision to hire som..."
1 "must ask that you" "...o grow, and make some major necessary capital improvements and the support of our dedicated patrons and friends is more and more essential. And so we must ask that you please consider becoming a Nightingale patron by pledging a monthly gift to us.  ​ Every dollar can make a difference! ​No amount is too small, and n..."
1 "been hoped that the" "... searched for him, but it seems he knows the castle better than all others. He hides within it, in places even the headmaster cannot discover. It has been hoped that the fighting among the students will draw him out of hiding. Potter does have a savior complex.\" \"Indeed, he does...\" Severus watched the Dark Lord's fac..."
1 "surgery proposes that there" "...r the PostMedia News and she likes to report on health and medical issues. Her article on the unexpected benefits that have been found from bloodless surgery proposes that there is extraordinarily little evidence that shows which patients suddenly losing large amounts of blood could actually benefit from blood transfusions. I..."
0 "has assured that there" "...ลา) province will be forced to suspend operation, while Block 1 will have to rely diesel fuel in place of natural gas to generate electricity.   EGAT has assured that there will be sufficient electricity supply to the South during the maintenance period, but the agency also urged residents to minimize their power usage, ..."
0 "Magic that is mastered" "...n magus a ripple in the time-space was created. The Kaleidoscope, \"the Second Magic\", allows the \"Operation of Parallel Worlds\". One of the five True Magic that is mastered by Kischur Zelretch Schweinorg, the \"Wizard Marshall\", a known Dead Apostle by all Mage's Association that entertain himself creating the most ridicu..."
0 ", that is enough" "...ce and honesty Equating our perceptions and theories to possibilities Rendering our beating pulses to becoming hopeful Living in cities full of pulses, that is enough to be boastful Adding a simple light to something whether it is to be true or not Saving the ones who are lost in the whole of distraught The savoir ..."
"to ensure that I" "The steps that I can take to ensure that I continue to use critical thinking in the future is start to recognize the  " 1
1 "clearly indicate that happiness" "Various articles and literature works coupled with the ongoing happenings clearly indicate that happiness has no price tag. Since the beginning of human evolution, there has been a saying that “money^cannot buy anyone happiness.” Happiness refers to emoti..."
1 ", that is detected" "...ion (X-Y or W-Y). Although recent common ancestry can also be detected by other methods (Fst, simple genetic distances, MSMC etc), the admixture event, that is detected by Dstat here, can only be detected by using this method (admixture analysis which we talked earlier can also detect it but Dstat is much more powerf..."
1 "1992 indicates that exclusion" "...ped by their disability and not given the opportunity to be included in everyday activities with others. The Australian Disability Discrimination Act 1992 indicates that exclusion cannot occur and every effort must be made to accommodate the student. However the act also states that in some circumstances adjustments do not need..."
1 "statement that it is" "...ngs of well-being (Boyd, 2000).  Well-being and wellness are subjective terms that are utilised to represent an individual’s current status, with the statement that it is of being in positive reflection (Schimmack, 2009).  Bourke &Geldens (2007), explains that wellness is a personal based belief where the individual’s ..."
1 "all recognize that as" "...al  “John” if it is your will.   Perhaps it’s time to rethink that prayer? You know it is okay to evolve in our theological thinking? I would hope we all recognize that as God reveals more about himself through prayer, meditation, (not just our own) and even, gasp, scientific discovery it will require us to update our t..."
1 "you think that you" "...ou should also be wary of the state of mind that you are in currently, you either think win-win, win-lose, lose-win, or lose-lose. To think win-lose, you think that you are better than everyone else, or you have too much self-pride. To think lose- win, you allow people to step on you and that you will to give in when..."
1 "me recognize that my" "... that I cannot say no to others or always do what is expected and making others feel responsible for your happiness. acquiring a new skills will help me recognize that my effort counts and may reduce my feelings of helplessness.   In avoidance style I have scored closer to the high and that describes me as a person who..."
1 "she said that this" "...ith another screen but this room the screen was on 2 walls one screen had chose your player on it and the other was blank sidf started to speak again she said that this is where you pick what you're going to look like and what special abilities you will gain then she said that the main class races are stronger than t..."
1 "countries say that they" "...st few years. America’s government in the eyes of the world has a historic decline in trust for the government to do what is right. Over 62% of other countries say that they are frustrated with the way the American federal government is run.            Now that you have read about our global perspective, we are going to r..."
0 "biz reported that the" "...was full of child pornography, and the purchaser informed police about the images.  Police traced back the origin of the laptop - m57.biz. CEO of m57.biz reported that the laptop, as well as other items, had been stolen from the m57 inventory.  My job as a crime investigator is to initiate a forensic analysis of the jo-..."
1 "Party agrees that it" "...obligations of non-use and non-disclosure which are no less restrictive in any material respect than those set forth in this Agreement. The Receiving Party agrees that it will not disclose any portion of the Confidential Information of the Disclosing Party to any other entity without the express written consent (email ..."
1 "A indicate that both" "...tudent A’s school results (low band 3), which was only marginally higher than student A’s result. The results achieved by both the school and student A indicate that both underperformed by comparison to the national average score (mid-band 4). In addition both student A and the school achieved below the national range ..."
1 "has proved that the" "...sults are weak (Parasat et al., 2012). Although benchmarking is considered as one of the most effective continuous improvement tools and some studies has proved that the use of benchmarking would result into significant improving performances in the organizations, implementing of benchmarking initiatives confront obst..."
1 "was estimated that persons" "...ety. As many as half o f all adults in the U.S. have a close relative who is an active or remittent alcoholic (Dawson & Grant, 1998). In one study it was estimated that persons with alcohol dependency account for up to 50% of the social, legal and interpersonal alcohol-related problems (Caetano & Curandi, 2002).    "
1 "28% say that America" "...hina sees this as a bad thing.  Over 54% of chinese people believe that America is trying to prevent China from becoming as powerful as the U.S. Only 28% say that America accepts China’s growing power. America’s standard of living        Now that you have read about our global perspective, we are going to reiterate on ..."
1 ") claimed that children" "...oor countries are left behind with growing disparities.   On the contrary, research studies of Boschi-Pinto et al. (2008) and Kuhn & Aldrovandi, (2010) claimed that children health is improving but the mortality rate among children is higher in developing countries when compared to developed countries. In 2015, Sustainabl..."
1 "he stated that “" "... dresses nicely and is able to communicate really well. During the interviews with him, he often cries. When asked about the reason behind his crying he stated that “he is so unhappy and misses his daughter so much that it is breaking his heart” (J. Doe, personal communication, August 11, 2016). He also has a need ..."
0 "skin that was rolling" "... are mine” Brandon said.  As she raised her eyes up to look at herself again her hot air balloon size ass was back to its normal size, and the flabby skin that was rolling off of her arms was gone. She had only imagined it in a panic.  She breathed a sigh of relief and texted back “You are mine too, and there is no turn..."
1 "one means that something" "...tio is greater than one the investor thinks that the company will grow in the future and they can earn more profit. Some stock P/B ratio is less than one means that something is wrong with the company. But investor cannot decide whether to buy the stock of a company or not just by seeing P/B ratio. Calculated as: Stock Pri..."
1 "Victor sees that it" "...is about to commit suicide. Monster - He can now speak the language and meets Victor on the top of Montanvert. At first he’s charging at him and once Victor sees that it is him he tells him to go away. The monster persuades him to go to his cave and tells him his life story. His role was to show Victor the aftereffect..."
0 "task that is either" "...he handout was given at the bedside with documents and data transcribing the evidence of the report given. \"Errors were defined as the execution of a task that is either unnecessary or incorrectly carried out and that could have been avoided with appropriate distribution of pre-existing information\" Tucker and Edmonds..."
1 "Indicate that the" "...re the proposed tactics for processes: 1. Agenda adjustment 2. Demanding an answer regarding a problematic bargaining position or item is ignored. 3. Indicate that the existing mandates for negotiations have been exhausted. 4. Agree tentatively regarding the items for future reference. 5. Fix a time limit before the..."
1 "can tell that it" "... a complete musical idea that gives the listener a sense of beginning and completion.   Listen to the period; it sounds like a complete idea, but you can tell that it wants to move somewhere else. Yes, it begins and ends on C, and it meets all the qualifications of a period, but we're going to need to add another s..."
1 "relationships that is found" "...r and interconnections across spaces such as  theprivate and public; neighborhoods, cities, states, and countries representing the distress caused by relationships that is found in these landscapes.  2. Describe the work samples you are attaching to this application. (3,500 characters maximum)  This works are based on my rese..."
1 "cloth diaper that she" "...Carrie tell her, and  begins the diapering of Abbie. Now I am laying on the changing pad naked, and Carrie ask me to lift up my feet. She finds a new cloth diaper that she slide underneath my bum and she folds and fasten the cloth diaper. She puts a yellow diaper cover over my red diaper and I get put on a pair of red d..."
0 "which means that a" "...in respect of yourself, and overcome insecurities about how smart, good looking, or even how good you are at a sport. Then you avoid the tumor twins, which means that a little competition is healthy because it drives yourself to be the best that you can be, and then don't compare yourself to other people because we w..."
0 "This shows that you" "... no problems. The Greasers thought this until, Cherry (a Soc)  told Ponyboy (a Greaser) that  Socs’ didn't have a perfect life and had many problems. This shows that you cannot judge a person by just looking at them and seeing what group of people they hang around. You never know what someone has gone through or who t..."
1 "difference is that Rachel" "...ch also hides the supernatural from mundanes. Clary reminds me of Rachel because they are both artistic and able to see through the mist/glamour. The difference is that Rachel is mortal and Clary is a person who belongs in the separate universe. Jace reminds me of Percy because they are both quite sarcastic and sassy, fight..."
1 ") added that the" "...s nurse responsibility to organize care that she provided to the patient to guarantee the care afforded to the patient is cohesive. Draper et al (2008) added that the nurse will protect the patient right for example when the patient is so ill and cannot talk it her responsibility to determine what patient want. In ..."
1 "created proved that these" "...portant potential outcome of this project is the possibility that these data types would begin to be served by GIBs for others to use. The prototypes created proved that these data types are capable of being read and manipulated by Openlayers to perform more detailed scientific analysis than would be allowed by the imagery ..."
1 "to notice that no" "... you are scared afterwards, the act of terrorism was successful. If you refuse to be intimidated, the terrorists have lost. And then we will get them to notice that no matter what happens we will show no fear.    Another way we can help is Ignore it.The more you think about a threat, the larger it grows in your mind..."
1 "message that is being" "...de steganography to encrypt the hidden data, posing a dual challenge to any exfiltration detection system where they will need to first detect that a message that is being hidden, and secondly to discover what that message is. (Google.com, 2016) Detection of data exfiltration Watermarking  Is where a small signature is ..."
1 "to realize that the" "...just started to embrace it because I am who I am and I can't change that. even though I have  erb's palsy I still do things that I enjoy. I have come to realize that the more you and break something about yourself the easier it becomes to talk about it. so here I am today having full confidence and talking about my co..."
1 "culture that it is" "...ated reason for the invasion was based on finding Bin Laden and this has failed. The forces we fight against are so ingrained in the fabric of Afghan culture that it is impossible for us to be on the winning side of this war. The former Soviet Union failed, and ultimately so shall we, at the cost of human lives. The ..."
1 "and friends that they" "...ome makes someone extra special. Down syndrome children are not only special, but they are a great teacher and good examples. They teach their family and friends that they want to enjoy and live a healthy life as a normal person. If they have a strong will power and support from their family and friends, they can conque..."
1 "system that is founded" "...hic in nature. In addition, they both share a commitment to positivism and scientific reasoning in an attempt to establish an international political system that is founded on peaceful coexistence. Therefore, the founding principles are similar for both theories; they only begin to differ on terms of answering the questi..."
1 "I hope that I" "..., Propranolol, Midodrine, Desipramine, and Trileptal all which offer no help or relief. My last hope is this treatment that keeps being denied to me. I hope that I have been able to shed some light to what my life is like due to this condition and the effects it has left me with. Thank you for your time.    Best..."
0 "is that" "... twice a year, and it’s called ‘Dealing With an Angry Public.’ Take that course. Tied back to the Army/Marine Corps Counterinsurgency [Field] Manual, is that a lot of the officers in our military are attending this course. It gives you the tools, it gives you the media tools on how to deal with a lot of th..."
1 "know that it is" "...g to the end of the Old Covent Age, not to the restoration of the nation in 1948. ~ Mat 24:33 KJV So likewise ye, when ye shall see all these things, know that it is near, even at the doors. ~ Audience relevance - Jesus was speaking to His disciples. ~The timeline - 'it is near, even at the doors' ~ Mat 24:34 Veri..."
"also indicates that this" "... opinion stated, I belive this article is fully biased because the author shows her support by giving negative points about the other side. The title also indicates that this articles w " 1
1 "to ensure that information" "...care context.                   Conclusion:     The Data Protection Act 1998 is not a barrier to sharing information – it simply provides a framework to ensure that information is shared appropriately.^It reinforces common sense rules of information handling, and helps us strike a balance between the many benefits of public ..."
1 "we observed that malls" "The researchers come up with this topic as we observed that malls or shopper stops are starting to emerge in the town known as the “Tourist Capital of Laguna,” wherein Pagsanjenos   will experience immense pleasure ..."
1 "They are that which" "...rmal functions are to act as paths that convert Life Force into magical energy, but humans learned how to control it and use it to perform mysteries. They are that which connects the material world to the astral plane, the paths which connect to the foundations underlying Grand Rituals. If magical energy is the force ..."
0 "which asserts that Punjabis" "...e Assembly of the League Against Imperialism as the delegate of the Ghadar Party. There, he presented “A Brief History of the Hindustan Gadar Party,” which asserts that Punjabis, while in the United States, became “conscious of their country’s slavery” and established the Ghadar Party for the overthrow of British Imperialism...."
0 "companies believed that the" "...ings per year; annual strategic plan detailing is carried out simultaneously with the development of the annual financial plan (budget); Most western companies believed that the strategic planning mechanisms need to be improved. Review of the literature suggests that the number of the strategic planning stages and their diffe..."
1 "disclosure means that the" "...ct for human dignity encompasses people's right to make informed, voluntary decisions about study participation, which requires full-disclosure. Full disclosure means that the researcher has fully described the nature of the study, the person's right to refuse participating, the researcher's responsibilities, and likely ris..."
1 "was concluded that tobacco" "... conducted a survey in a cross section of school students in 2011 before the introduction of plain packaging and in 2013 (7-12 months) afterwards; it was concluded that tobacco plain packaging reduced the appeal of cigarettes packs. However, the study did not show whether education in those schools had an impact on how those..."
1 "you feel that you" "...My conscious thoughts and decisions even my thoughts are up to a second delay before “I” am aware of it.  December 22, 2015 To “want” something means you feel that you “lack” that which you want. For example, to want to belong means you believe that you lack being related to or a part whatever you perceive as not be..."
0 "you believe that everyone" "...hink win-win is an attitude towards life that states I can win, and so can you, we can both win! This helps you get along with other people and helps you believe that everyone is equal. This also helps you be less competitive in a very competitive environment. Once you get past school, sports, and other competitive activiti..."
1 "thing that is for" "...t to let us know they were okay? (These are just a few of the minor things I think of, I’m sure there were many more examples through the years). One thing that is for sure, we will never know and we will never make a “simple decision” ever again.   Before we have experienced a traumatic event, we live our everyday ..."
1 "highly doubted that it" "..., but I didn't care, I was ready to throw the tantrum of the century that no one would ever for get; maybe that would get me back home... Although, I highly doubted that it would.  Darcy nudged me, or should I say she practically knocked me off the step with her elbow. \"Ow!\" I yelled as I punched her in the shoulder, \"Pa..."
0 "that shows that you" "...more organized and it can decrease your stress and anxiety levels. Another way to apply Habit three, is to do tasks you don't necessarily want to do, that shows that you are focused on taking control and how important your goals mean to you. If you don't think that you need to apply this habit, first take a look at th..."
1 "I realized that I" "...am prepared for this part, the prodding, the cleansing, the inappropriate questions about my sexual life and hygiene . I had embraced this part after I realized that I was not going to be killed. They’ll erase me completely, so be it, at least I furthered the cause. I would do it all over again with even more fanfar..."
0 "creature that was made" "...or mountain ranges. The trees and plants are formed with his hair and the heavens from his skull. In other words, these gods created the earth from a creature that was made prior to earth. But the creation story illustrated in the Catholic Bible shows a completely different introduction of the world. In this version of t..."
1 "had noticed that he" "...decide what to do next.  9.\tSantiago develops throughout the novel in many ways, but especially when he got robbed at the market place. First off, he had noticed that he too takes in the world the way he wants to see it, not the way it actually is. Such as when he thought the man was there to help guide Santiago, but ..."
1 "books that were not" "...king data. It was difficult to get straight answers.  I spent a lot of time trying to figure out what was entered and not entered. I only found a few books that were not entered and I did not check every entry.     With the continuous changes in faculty and their responsibilities, I need some direction on who to repor..."
1 "and find that Hyde" "...eed to search the apartment where they find a burned checkbook, and the other half of the murder weapon. Utterson and the inspector go to Hyde´s bank and find that Hyde's account contains several thousand pounds. It is said that Hyde is sure to be caught now because money means everything to him. The only problem is ..."
1 "people revealed that it" "...o the practice of smoking cannabis for ritual use amongst their culture.  An inquiry into the sociocultural context of how cannabis was used by these people revealed that it was used as a mental stimulant for lesser warriors.   Smoking of the drug was meant to represent “social status” amongst these people.  However due t..."
1 "feared that it would" "...ederate States of America. The incoming Lincoln administration and most of the Northern people refused to recognize the legitimacy of secession. They feared that it would discredit democracy and create a fatal precedent that would eventually fragment the no-longer United States into several small, squabbling countries...."
1 "which decided that it" "...protect by taxing imported vegetables. In 1886, an importer was taxed at the port for importing tomatoes. The case made its way to the Supreme Court, which decided that it is indeed botanically defined as a fruit. Whether fruit or vegetable, tomato is enjoyed in many sauces and foods such as; ketchup, pasta sauces, Bolo..."
1 "have learned that the" "...l parks have proven to be a crucial asset in the science sectors.For example, the Grand Canyon is researched for archeology, ecology, and geology. We have learned that the Grand Canyon holds over 35 layers of sedimentary rock, which span over 550 million years old. There are also many fossils that were discovered at the..."
0 "A quote that I" "... sure you listen and mirror, but not in a mimicking way.  Mirroring is where you don't judge or give advice, you just sit there and genuinely listen. A quote that I found takes this habit into account is “Until you walk  a mile in another man’s moccasins you can't imagine the smell.” Which means don't judge someo..."
1 "also means that your" "...ncement schedule will be affected. What this means is that your anniversary date and progress toward seniority related benefits will be delayed. This also means that your benefits will cease. Your performance reviews will also be delayed.  Personal Leaves of Abscence Employees may need to request unpaid personal leaves..."
1 "is estimated that annually" "...ity among Nigeria, sub-Sahara Africa (developing countries) and the world  Nigeria is the most populous country in Africa (Olaleye et al., 2014).  It is estimated that annually population Nigerian growth rate will be about 3.2% and projected to be approximately 195 million by 2017 (Potts, 2012). However, State governments of..."
1 "study suggest that if" "...ory does decrease with long term use of Cannabis. The study is limited because it did not evaluate recognition and recall memory. The benefits of the study suggest that if a Cannabis user, who demonstrates memory deficits, does not perceive memory issues are present, it would be important to get them help to stop using ..."
1 "baby diapers that the" "... clothes and wearing diapers surreal experience. Carrie and Cassie enters the supermarket to buy disposable diapers they buy two packs of the biggest baby diapers that the shop haves.  Meanwhile, me and Chelsea and Caitlin is outside waiting on them, and I am shocked when I begin with filling my diaper with my poo. Soon..."
1 "feeling that is rather" "...n they met after they grow up. Judy married with a man who is worse than her previous men. When he hard her poor fortunes, Dexter’s words showing his feeling that is rather than herself. “I cannot cry. I cannot care. That thing will come back no one” (F.S. Fitzgerald, paragraph 173) The “things” likely to be youthful pas..."
1 "line that is included" "...office is Quintessential School Systems (QSS). As indicated above, the information for employees is entered by Human Resources, including the payroll line that is included on the PAF (the form used to open positions).  The information is input one time manually and any edits to records in the system are entered by Human..."
1 "is pray that she" "...ened him with a knife.  “Do you think I won’t cut you?” Silence. “Because I will.” Dick could not fight back or he would be at fault. All he could do is pray that she would stop. Since no response came Jane moved on to a new form of abuse. She threw objects at Dick. Plates shattered, walls were dented, and blood wa..."
1 "could tell that he" "... die in my arms.  It was raining. We were driving home from the bowling alley and we were laughing. Laughing about how horrible we were at bowling. I could tell that he snuck a few drinks, but I pretended not to notice. He was swerving in and out of the right lane. But we were laughing still. The music was turned all..."
0 "never failed that during" "...an they could handle, like the narrator describes in these following passages: “Some families would sell out for nearly nothing and move away. And it never failed that during the dry years the people forgot about the rich years, and during the wet years they lost all memory of the dry years” (5-6). “It wasn’t very long unt..."
1 "to say that you" "...e Break Managing Inspiration Once you have your motivation under control, you need to start thinking about how to manage and corral your muse. I used to say that you learn composition technique so that when inspiration hits, you have the tools to write down your ideas. Well, I still say that. What you need to unde..."
1 "dates suggested that the" "...ings and comments that appeared in the Reviews section of these hospitals’ Facebook pages through the third quarter 2014, and a review of the posting dates suggested that the reviews were contributed during the first three quarters of 2014. Findings from our study suggest that what patients say on Facebook about their expe..."
1 "list that was sent" "...ucation teacher of the date and time of their students’ meeting.  We cannot have people at the CSE meeting unless their name was on the participant’s list that was sent home.  Please have draft IEPs ready two school days prior to the meeting.                                     RELATED SERVICES  Cancelled and/or miss..."
1 "matters is that you" "... of which I just told you matters to me because it never has an effect on you or the relationship we had, at least in my opinion. The only thing that matters is that you know that this is how i feel at the moment about you. If things remain the same all of which i told you above will dissappear slowly but surely. I do..."
1 "IEP that is to" "...P placement, related services and supplemental aids and services shall be held annually. The annual review procedures should be conducted so that the IEP that is to be the basis of an upcoming school year’s programming is finalized prior to the start of the new school year. There must be an IEP in effect at the b..."
1 "they found that it" "...ward them and they needed to hop on the train. They hop on the train and they are all tired and they have no more energy. when they were on the train they found that it was full of gatorade. The train stopped and the train driver saw them and called the police and they escaped him. They had lots of money with them an..."
1 "This meant that Louis" "... an attempt to frighten the representatives. He did not present them with any proposal for discussion, so they were left to think up their own ideas. This meant that Louis did not have control of the meetings.     The dismissal of Jacques Necker  On the 12th of July 1789, Louis XVI called for the resignation of Necker w..."
1 ", that was being" "...ct got smacked in the hand, that was being reflected, with a roll of paper, the hand that was not reflected had twitched When I lightly grazed the arm, that was being reflected, with sandpaper, he had said he felt a sensation in the other hand. When I tapped his knee, that was reflected, with a hammer, the leg that..."
1 "foods that is filled" "...mber of German shepherds who suffer from skin allergies, and this dog food is the best solution for these dogs.   It provides a wide range of dry dog foods that is filled with a high amount of nutrition that has been specially formulated for large breeds of dogs like the German Shepherds.   This dog food is very import..."
1 "data that is used" "...tion and supports high levels of student success.  (may need to be reworded)  Note:  Perhaps semantics but important to note that the DSS can provide data that is used to inform integrated planning and/or determine optimal resource allocation but the actual determination of optimal resources will need to be human-dr..."
0 "I agree that music" "... with the following statement: Music is the heart of Emirati traditional culture. Explain why. (Backup Q) When did people play traditional music?  A. I agree that music is very important in our traditional  culture. In the past, people played traditional music at family celebrations and festivals. They also sang song..."
0 "Why is that?" "... alone and it gets maddening being inside day after day. So I have those papers to read. Months of them. I have a few from out of town too.” “Really? Why is that?” “This is a pretty small village Naruto. Not much news to write about.” Kiba guessed. “Which is why I have the travelling traders bring me papers fro..."
1 "confirmed that" "...ape attributes and service encounters (Jager et al., 2012; Wu and Cheng, 2013). Jager et al. (2012), in their research about airline service quality, confirmed that the ultimate success of an airline   depends on quality of service attributes primarily involving cabin servicescape and encounter performances. Wu a..."
1 "company that is extremely" "... to enhance sales and profits.  With the new changes, employee will be more productive and customers will benefit from the new changes. XYZ will be a company that is extremely competitive while separating itself from the competition.                               References  Ezer, J. (2012). Worldatworkorg:Stop Setting Unac..."
0 "result showed that the" "...ch                                 5.1 Summary on Statistical Analysis                      Table 5.1 Summary of Econometric Problem    The table 5.1 result showed that the Multicollinearity, Heteroscedasticity and Autocorrelation econometric model has passed all of the econometric .it is mean that the data have not the ..."
0 "This means that she" "...efit a ballet dancer. “Ballerinas might dance anywhere from four to 10 hours a day, depending on the practice and performance schedule of the season. This means that she is burning as much as 1,200 to 2,000 calories dancing each day” (Ireland, 2015, p. 1) With how many calories are burned during a practice or performa..."
1 "to show that with" "... any better thrill than giving it your all, along with your teammates, while trying to aim for the first prize in any competitive event. It just came to show that with time and freedom in my hands I become the master of my future and dictate how I want to prioritize my time.  Be it the times where I attended classes..."
1 "mentioned that was informed" "...ntioned that she had local anaesthetic (epidural) so she was aware of all what was going on during the delivery on till when she became confused. She mentioned that was informed it was postnatal depression. She said she is currently on haloperidol, paracetamol and iron tablet. She mentioned that she suffers from high blood pr..."
1 ", that is to" "...ax yet as she continued to watch Izayoi fervently. Shiroyasha laughed loudly as she observed that. \"That Gift Card's formal name is [Piece of Laplace], that is to say a fragment of omniscience. The Gift Name written there is the name of the [Gift] entwined with your souls. Even without an appraisal, you can und..."
1 "show people that if" "... a product or even starting there own business I know if you feature this I will get my children's toy publicity but what I'm trying to achieve is to show people that if you want to produce a children's toy and you had only gone to year 10 that's it's achievable , it how much you want it ! That has been my driving for..."
1 "and that it demands" "... Police have no means to verify international trafficking, or slave labour. This information contradicts the idea that trafficking is a large problem and that it demands priority and arguably disproportionately high investment, to the detriment of other issues such as domestic violence and the current high number of d..."
1 "seem fazed that he" "...vealing North lying in a heap on the floor as a skinny blonde boy stood over his form. Another man was sitting on the ground, however this man didn’t seem fazed that he was in that position. I then took inventory and found that everyone was safe, including Gabriel.   Seeing the boy standing over North menacing, despi..."
1 "really believe that this" "... shall be passed on to who ever will carry in the mission if it porves being effective.  I’m open to hear your feedback regarding this proposal and I really believe that this has all the potential to became a great thing for Greystone.   Thanks for your time Best Regards   Lucas Oliva"
1 "skills that were essential" "... of these composers understood the elements of music composition in a profound and intuitive way. These composers knew the fundamental principles and skills that were essential for a composer to write timeless compositions.  The techniques are every bit as relevant today as they were back in the sixteenth Century when the tr..."
1 "he bet that not" "...lyze more deeply, but pain instantly assaulted his mind. The object had a alien “concept”, with materials not of this world, and remembering the tear he bet that not of this universe either. But further than this he felt a presence in the orb, a shell protecting the girls from any harm.As if a semi-sentient being ..."
1 "health that is facilitated" "...adult dry dog food- this is a dog food that contains a specific formula that helps in promoting proper growth of your dog as it supports proper joint health that is facilitated with the right mix of chondroitin and glucosamine.   It is has been specially created for dogs with skin allergies as it includes a complex recipe of..."
0 "he noticed that someone" "...cigars. We're not supposed to but we do everything that we can to get the best quality stuff. You should have seen his face is bright red fuming once he noticed that someone swiped his cigars. I prefer the cigars over the cigarettes. The cigarettes give a foul taste in mouth.   Life in the trenches are hard. One night in ..."
0 "content that is familiar" "...is lesson.  Effectiveness/success – did learning take place?  Yes learning did take place. This leson has taught me that by beginning the lesson with content that is familiar to the learners the teacher is provided with the opportunity to open up the lesson to the prospect of developing their understanding and building upo..."
0 "think that" "... “political hack” or not, she was “willing to listen”.  Does Caitlyn’s work ever end?  Speaking of influential families and political relation, don't think that Caitlyn falls behind in bloodline. If you call for a reminder remeber that our girl reigns from the millenary's answer to royalty, the greatest Ameri..."
1 "good is that to" "...hought of as a compliance to what she has done. Nora tells him that when she gone everything will be fine, he will be free. He replies by saying what good is that to me? Krogstand can still go public and ruined me. Throughout all this time all he can think of was him self and his reputation. How can Nora do this T..."
1 "problem is that there" "...” the impact of an adoption stressor is through access to and utilization of resources. Resources can protect from the impact of a stressor, the only problem is that there are often barriers to obtaining social supports and services which can be a great resource. Advocacy is such a good way to increase the resources ava..."
0 "baby diapers that even" "... clothes and wearing diapers surreal experience. Carrie and Cassie enters the supermarket to buy disposable diapers they buy two packs of the biggest baby diapers that even fit Abbie.  Meanwhile me and Chelsea and Caitlin is outside waiting on them, and I am shocked when I begin with filling my diaper with my poo. Soon I..."
1 "home test that you" "...put his close back on. Chiyo wrote on a piece of paper then beckoned Sasuke over while Naruto continued to dress himself. “I’m giving Sasuke a simple home test that you can take any time.” “Really? What is it?” “Dandelion,” Sasuke answered. He felt annoyed at being left out of the whole conversation so he decided to ..."
0 "Kolehmainen contends that the" "...ions will lose natural environmental assets. Firstly, modern day genetic engineering is significantly different from conventional breeding processes. Kolehmainen contends that the deliberate insertion of genes from other species could never occur in nature and is substantially different from traditional breeding methods that ta..."
1 "to say that you" "...efore, his treasure would’ve been buried underneath him because he never put forth the work to uncover it.  7.\tThe story of the man and oil was meant to say that you should pay attention to what is going around you, but also with what is going on with you. Specifically, when the man only observed the spoons full o..."
1 "happiness that it needed" "...ut the stems and put them into the vase. I carried them upstairs and put them on the window sill. They gave my office the little splash of colour and happiness that it needed, and every time I glanced up from my laptop and looked at them, my stomach fluttered. He had hardly been home over the past couple of weeks; a trip t..."
1 "expression showed that she" "...ing water! Please use that water for the Community's sake!\" Kuro Usagi again foiled their plan. He clicked his tongue in disappointment. Kuro Usagi's expression showed that she didn't feel like she could relax yet as she continued to watch Izayoi fervently. Shiroyasha laughed loudly as she observed that. \"That Gift Card's fo..."
1 "will says that Edward" "...pulls out the will of his friend Dr. Henry Jekyll and thinks over it for a very long time. Utterson examines the will taking more notice to where the will says that Edward Hyde would be given all of Dr. Jekyll's possessions, and even be given permission to take Dr. Jekyll’s place if he were to go missing. After Utterson..."
1 "sound that was going" ",                      HEY MEECHIE, YOU’RE THE GREATEST!\t                          The World According to Meechie   Page 1 Snoring was the sound that was going down in Meechie’s room. All you could hear was ‘’zzzzzzz, zzzzzzz’’, while Meechie dreamed about one day sitting down and talking with the queen of t..."
1 ") ensure that each" "...ing, the Receiving Party shall at a minimum (i) take the same measures which it takes to protect its own most highly confidential information, and (ii) ensure that each individual who has access to Confidential Information of the Disclosing Party has executed, prior to any disclosure of such Confidential Information ..."
1 "and concluded that the" "...h of us has been generalized or assumed to be a specific type of person based on our outward appearance. We contemplated the effects of stereotyping, and concluded that the unconscious bias of stereotyping hampers communities from creating inclusive environments that advances fairness and open mindedness.  Discussing per..."
0 ") stated that a" "...y is not an appropriate choice of design as the intent of the study is not to understand how culture can lead to improved business practice. Yin (2015) stated that a case study provides an in-depth, multi-layered understanding of complex phenomena. A case study design is the best choice of design because the inten..."
1 "was decided that the" "...es the personal discussions would overtake the professional discussions.  After taking all of the previously mentioned aspects into consideration, it was decided that the approximate size of each group would be about eight educators in total.  The OUH would be instrumental in implementing the plan. The OUH would be giv..."
1 "unfortunate that it is" "...e easiest ways of protecting the worker against cuts, bruises, dusts, chemicals and hearing loss, and not least against the elements! It is therefore unfortunate that it is sometimes not used or used incorrectly.    The regulations require that PPE is the last means of protection to be considered after all other safeguar..."
0 "research indicates that 7500" "...e ‘normal and well-established trajectory of gaining control over and manipulating biological processes to achieve greater productivity’. For example research indicates that 7500 years ago farmers used to manipulate teosinte which ultimately led to the domestication of maize corn. The regulatory treatment of GMOs in the United..."
0 "not understand that you" "...my hands back from the push, my wrists were suddenly grabbed and I was pinned against the wall forcefully, my wrist held above my head.  “How can you not understand that you touching that other boy…” he closed his eyes tightly before opening them again, his eyes now glowing a deep red, “… was wrong. You aren’t supposed to..."
1 "he said that during" "...the events occurring on the island are a reflection of the events in the outside world due to World War II. William Golding was a part of the war and he said that during his time in the Royal Navy he “began to see what people were capable of doing” (“William Golding Biography”). In the novel, Jack and Ralph are agains..."
"is recommended that Sydney" "It is recommended that Sydney Ferries progress these safety actions through its safety management systems. The safety actions relate to: • improvements to the vessel’s operations ..." 0
1 "barley that is roasted" "...ng it. One problem with a literal comparison of the numerical attributes is the level complication within the ingredients of the brew. For example, a barley that is roasted may produce some bitterness on its^own adding to the bitterness scale. If barley produces bitterness it will not end up in the IBU’s thus tipping the..."
1 "She mentions that first-generations" "...uccess and College Completion, Petty Tanjula, a professor from Alabama State University states that institutions plays an important role on students. She mentions that first-generations students are more likely to leave college without a degree. Overall, the main idea is about first generation in the purse of higher education. Throug..."
1 "to ensure that the" "...uations, the MHA deems certain treatments to be too invasive that special oversight is required.  Nurses have a legal and professional responsibility to ensure that the administration of medicines is done correctly. If psychiatric drugs have been given to a detained patient for three months without consent, section 5..."
1 "and requests that Elizabeth" "...er. He must feel extremely powerless.    Chapter 56 \tAfter Jane and Mr. Bingley become engaged, Lady Catherine de Bourgh visits the Bennet household, and requests that Elizabeth takes a walk with her. I th                       In Chapters 59, 60 and 61                       "
0 ") observes that not" "...championed by Walt (1997) is seen as a refinement of the Balance of Power. BoT states that states react to threats and not just mere power. Walt (1997) observes that not all alliances are balanced in terms of power. The Cold War era, for example, had more powerful alliances around the USA than those around the Soviet ..."
1 ", that is until" "...ng are Ishmael Beah and Copper Sun’s Amari. Starting with Amari, she was very a determined and direct woman but she also avoided people and large town, that is until she made it to Fort Mose. Ishmael also had to avoid people throughout the book mostly because they would kill him if he was seen by rebels or in the ..."
0 "\"Is that any" "...one too. A hand touches my shoulder and I scrunch my face in disgust turning back around.  \"What do you want?\" I ask playing with my lunch. He pouts. \"Is that any way to treat your best friend\" a scowl immediately replaces my bored expression.  \"Yes it is. Now what do you want?\"  \"We're having a party this Satu..."
1 "saying that it is" "...estroys his work and the monster gets very angry and he swears to be with Victor on his wedding night. He receives a letter from Henry the next night saying that it is boring in Scotland and that they should continue their journey.  He packs everything up and drops the remains of the creature in the water. He rests ..."
1 "have noticed that he" "...ity. He no longer gets into physical fights or harms others in a physical way, gets into fights, or destroys property.       While observing James, I have noticed that he has a nervous situation and can never be completely still. While he talks or even seems to be relaxing his foot is always moving. It is as though he ..."
0 "have expressed that the" "... it to a travel itinerary. The destination is picked, and then the travel plans are made, not the other way around (Wiggins & McTighe). Many teachers have expressed that the professional development that the district provides does not align directly with student performance (Case Study, p.12). Backwards design is directly..."
1 "to believe that health" "...households where domestic violence is happening are also directly harmed (SafeLives, 2015) Given the statistical evidences there is sufficient reason to believe that health visitors would have encountered clients who are either victims or survivors of domestic abuse. It is therefore imperative that Health visitors undert..."
1 "information that is necessary" "... (DMST) program is one of the necessary tools needed. An Organizational Manager can keep and direct the focus each of the team members to gather such information that is necessary for said program. Another tool needed is providing education for the various backgrounds working on the team (local law enforcement, state and federa..."
0 "may argue that when" "...rom a copycat? Why not go straight to the source? What’s that? Because you do it better than the original composer? That might be a good reason… Some may argue that when a composer copies another writer’s style, they are attempting to improve it, or make it better somehow. There is certainly some merit to this. If thi..."
1 "she says that with" "...ad eleven children compared to the one Mrs. Putman had. This leads to higher tension in-between the two as we see Putman  subtly accuses Rebecca when she says that with“God’s work you should never lose a child”; thus it makes her think that there is a possibility of witchcraft (28).   Act 1 #28 It is significant that..."
1 "Dorothy says that she" "...ng room but once Mr.  and  Mrs. Byrne fell upon hard times they could no longer keep Niamh/Dorothy so they gave her up for adoption again. When Niamh/Dorothy says that she is “retreating” she is “...retreating to someplace deep inside. It is a pitiful kind of childhood, to know no one loves you or is taking care of you…..."
1 "to believe that you" "...e camper he saw flashing lights again and the 2 guys in the black suits came up with a car and go out and walked up to Mark they said” We have reason to believe that you are hiding something and we need to search your camper. Mark said” go ahead i have nothing to hide” They proceed to looking for anything. When they w..."
0 "IPI noted that the" "... Basra in Coventry, was an ardent nationalist and helped Indians in Britain to avoid conscription (IPI to Mr. Silver 2 April 1942, Ibid.). Though the IPI noted that the first four men had the “typical Ghadar outlook,” neither Khan nor Shastry appear to have been orthodox Ghadarites. Nonetheless, they coordinated and ..."
1 "now seems that officials" "...he FSB is unlikely to target Western companies operating in Russia more often than usual.   Following a reshuffle of Russian officials on 28 July, it now seems that officials from the state intelligence and security apparatus, the siloviki, are gaining influence in national politics. See B-05-08-16-RU for our report. It no..."
0 "to ensure that the" "... gentle patience as she corrected our editing mistakes.                         Disclosure  Although the authors and publisher have made every effort to ensure that the information in this book was correct at press time, the authors and publisher do not assume and hereby disclaim any liability to any party for any lo..."
1 "Liesel believes that no" "...is symbolic. In my view point, the whole message of this passage was to describe to the readers that words can have physical effect on an individual. Liesel believes that no matter how hard the Nazi party tries to banish books due to disagreeable content, the words are meaningful to her and she will do what it takes to ke..."
0 "now respect that and" "...or this?” I growled silently. Darren stayed quiet, growling silently back. “Look, just because you are the head does not mean you always get your way now respect that and leave me alone!” Darren hissed, as he started to raise his voice. Oh I am surprised at you I thought fiercely as I move back to my bunk with my feet ..."
1 "one that is vital" "...oration into meaning that the participant gives. In qualitative research personal bias is acknowledged as an inevitable feature of our humanity., and one that is vital if are explore the feelings, meanings, and the personal context of the participants' lived experiences and reflect on their meaning for us(Nicholls, ..."
1 "diaper bag that she" "...d she takes the changing pad out from the diaper bag and place it down on the floor. I see that my nanny is taking a clean disposable diaper from the diaper bag that she place beside the changing pad. She is also taking a pack of wet wipes from my diaper bag she also placed near the changing pad. I then go to the play..."
1 "to note that two" "... opposite side and support political relations are not necessarily inspired by morality and ethical judgement. Conclusion             It is important to note that two classes of thinkers have strived to research and to reflect the society, humanity, the civil society and the government (Burchill and Linklater, 2013..."
1 "people think that since" "...nd ways to get from here to there but with all of those things, you need money. So that’s where the “money can buy happiness” phrase comes in because people think that since money can buy everything else then it can easily buy happiness also.   Can money really buy happiness? Some individuals seem to think so, as for most..."
1 "authors suggested that a" "...e distribution which provides complete success while measuring, making it possible for the output to be linked to any other algorithm. [8] In [4] the authors suggested that a generalized Grover algorithm would be applied without using the first step for initialization. The suggested algorithm in that paper starts by using ..."
1 "to believe that ethics" "...elief that motive justifies method. Because I am so clear about my reasons for acting, I tend to believe that the motive justifies the method. I tend to believe that ethics is a set of universal rules that everyone must follow, just like I do. I follow the rules- everyone else should, too. My preferred lens is rights and..."
0 "always clear that the" "...ts and skills and his/her performance on the assignment. Student makes some connections between the course content and his/her response, but it isn’t always clear that the student is integrating knowledge and skills associated with the course into a larger context. Student doesn’t connect with or demonstrate skills asso..."
0 "Zera pretended that a" "...stomach. As a child Zera had spent nights without food in her belly, and she taught herself to imagine that she had eaten a feast to calm her aching. Zera pretended that a tantalizing scent of broth was teasing her nose, and filling her stomach. It was an effective way to relieve her hunger momentarily. She was definite..."
1 "I think that it" "...orce to do it as well.  Citizens should have the right to retire at the age of 65.   It might be good that there is the right in our society. Howeve, I think that it should not be compulsion in which nobody could continue to do their works regardless of their wills. In my opinion, the timing of retiring should be ..."
1 "emergency that is affecting" "...dditionally, I try never give a last minute tasker at the end of the day unless it is a direct task from higher in the chain or if there is a network emergency that is affecting mission operations.  Furthermore, I try to provide encouragement and also highlight troops that have the ability to balance their time between work a..."
1 "generally understand that they" "...e technical vocabulary and literacy skills, to English, where they are required to evaluate a text for its literary features and structures. Teachers generally understand that they are responsible for teaching content-specific vocabulary in their respective disciplines (Mountain 2015) but can struggle in creating meaningful exec..."
1 "this is that I" "... especially when I’m working out and I do planks.  It’s always amazing to me that one-two minutes can seem like an eternity.   I think the reason for this is that I’m focused on the time during a plank.  When all my muscles are engaged and it’s just not easy I count the seconds until it’s time to collapse.  When ..."
1 "Literature suggests that 4-21%" "...age, low quality of life, anxiety, and depression (Williams et all, 2016).  EPIDEMIOLOGY PCOS is the most common endocrine disorders affecting women. Literature suggests that 4-21% of women suffer from PCOS (in accordance with the Rotterdam criteria) (Lizneva 2016). There has been much controversy by experts surrounding PCOS as ..."
1 "traditionally translate that to" "...s profession. Though not very much is said about Joseph in the Gospels, we are told that he is a skilled laborer (the word used is tekton). Though we traditionally translate that to say a modern skilled carpenter, little woodworking was done in that part of the world. It is much more likely that Joseph was some sort of a stone ma..."
0 "not  represent that it" "...not create any legally binding obligations. The information contained in this document is based on material we believe to be reliable; however, we do not  represent that it is accurate, current, complete, or error free. This document will evolve as the process moves forward and requirements change/new requirements are pl..."
0 "facilities that is costly" "...istration Walden University Student ID: A00585686 August, 2016     Problem Statement The continuous increase in turnover is a concern for health care facilities that is costly, decreases productivity, and creates a stressful working environment (Yarbrough, Martin, Alfred, & McNeill, 2016). Although health systems employ 2,7..."
1 "He sees that it" "...ar by soon realized it was  a spaceship and it landed close to his campgrounds.  He hoped on his dirt bike and went over there to look what happened. He sees that it’s a spaceship and goes to look if there is anyone inside he sees an alien and the alien was lost consciousness. He  started to  see flashing lights. ..."
0 "which means that a" "...in respect of yourself, and overcome insecurities about how smart, good looking, or even how good you are at a sport. Then you avoid the tumor twins, which means that a little competition is healthy because it drives yourself to be the best you can be, and then don't compare yourself to other people because we were a..."
1 "to ensure that the" "...er of  sources Business and financial newspapers, trade and academic journals and so on.     Competitor intelligence   Analysis competitor activities to ensure that the organization stay ahead in the game. However it needs to be set up for an amount of data, market shares, monthly analyzed  and summarized reports on ..."
0 "when that was unclear" "...ri. He fought them long enough to get his people to safety behind the great mountains. How could she follow that? Another war was certain, it was the when that was unclear.  \tMayhem sauntered back. His jaw loose around the tiny corpse. Athea hung the limp rabbit on her belt next to the others. A gust of wind rushed her ..."
1 ") reports that generally" "...ding the use of prohibited substances and drugs in sports are the positive and negative effects they can have on an individual’s health. Fry, C. (2015) reports that generally, the majority of the public are against the idea of doping in sport, one significant factor for this is, the increased risk of health related issues ..."
0 "Eddie learned that his" "...ike you are insignificant, you have actually helped so many people. It is only later that you will finally understand what you have done. In the end, Eddie learned that his existence was to help and protect children, which he has and will do forever. Outside of just Eddie’s life, we hear about other people's stories, too..."
"I think that they" "... it truly was my family and Austin. I am going to think that my identity is awesome because of Texas, and my family. I know that it includes more but I think that they have shaped it and been central to it most.   \t" 1
1 "wealth proves that the" "...normal” wealthy person. However, by the end of the novel this assumption proves to be false. The idea, mainly Tom Buchanan’s idea, is being born into wealth proves that the person has refinement and poise.^Tom Buchanan proves his own idea wrong. He disapproves of Jay Gatsby and makes a mockery of himself while trying to ..."
1 "College that is in" "...ound the college. If this matter worries you and you would like to make a difference in the community, adopt this waterway in the area of San Jacinto College that is in need of your service.\t\t    The communities surrounding this waterway are already in or near flooding areas so, maintaining the waterway clean will he..."
1 "Observations show that Tiffany" "...old female who has completed the third grade.  Tiffany has a diagnosis of ADHD (combined type), see note in file dated 8/16/2015 from Dr. Doolittle.  Observations show that Tiffany is very social among her peers.  She falls in the normal range for peer relationships according to the Conners 3 administered 8/2016.  Tiffany is abl..."
1 "far indicates that generally" "...ues to keep themselves goal-focused and therefore are less likely to achieve or maintain their goals. Interestingly when adapted to RSOD, research so far indicates that generally those engaged in RSOD, with lower SR abilities, experience higher amounts of alcohol-related negative consequences (Hustad, Carey, Carey & Maisto, 20..."
1 "aspect that was not" "...cked the concept of engaging the secondary school staff in a series of Professional Development sessions that would take place within the school. One aspect that was not mentioned, was that there were ‘pockets of excellence’ of teaching within the building (i.e. strong student relationships, student voice, descriptive..."
1 "Daniels dictates that the" "Sara Beeson Bartholomew A.P. United States History August 12, 2016  Daniels dictates that the Puritans created the backbone of the moral views of American culture, and that they never disappeared, only changed. His book, New England Nation: Th..." 0
0 ", that was him" "...Malcom's address right?\" She asked looking over the address he texted her.  \"Yeah.. Well, remember that brother, I was telling you about earlier? Yeah, that was him\" He rubbed the back of his head awkwardly and continued on to the front door.   She stopped cold in her tracks. She knew he was familiar but she didn..."
1 "so that it lasts" "Storm Damage Inspection  It is common for roofs to suffer damage in hail storms or strong wind. It is important to keep your roof well maintained so that it lasts for years without issue. Here are a few things you can do to quickly check up on the condition of the roof of your home after a storm hits.   Take a ..."
1 "which shows that one" "...ok her punishment for what it was. She matured and became more conservative, focusing on being a mother to pearl.         Hester symbolized strength, which shows that one can overcome hardship if they own up to their mistakes. She is an inspiration and a role model of a strong woman in this story. Even facing public hu..."
1 "which means that it" "...mit of the benchmark search problems calculated theoretically on quantum computers based on these papers. Grover’s algorithm was proven to be optimal which means that it satisfies the theoretical limitations. More developments which include modifications to Grover’s algorithm or using it as it is as a main step in oth..."
0 "blonde hawk that you" "...r school and accepting my conditions. From what I can tell, you are a bad person. Just....misguided. Either way, thank you. I heard from a strawberry blonde hawk that you like Lemon Sorbet. The hawk also cries out that you are just as sour as the Lemon Sorbet. Don’t know why though. The other cake is for your son. I wa..."
0 "Foster explains that if" "...ce texts, in this case fairy tales. They can mess around with the stories and turn them upside down” (Foster, 55). Like chapters four, five, and six, Foster explains that if you look deeper into stories most of the time you will find correlations to old fairy tales. Chapter Eight: “It’s Greek to Me” Greek myths are common..."
0 "think that is enough" "...n the Olympics. I want to play on the beach or on a court. The only problem is it just seems so impossible. I play recreation volleyball but I do not think that is enough. Hopefully when I go to high school I will make the volleyball team and make my way up. After school I plan the play in college and join the national..."
1 "constantly told that NO" "...my words…” John 14:23 The word if is a subordinating conjunction that introduces a condition; of which, there are two in the Lord’s statement. We are constantly told that NO conditions exist with regard to obtaining and keeping one’s salvation.   LOVE IS THE MOST IMPORTANT WORD IN THE BIBLE:   • Can you say you LOVE the L..."
1 "truly reveals that she" "...ica has taken for the world, it can be said how a significant change has been made. 1.      Act 1 #16 The threat of a “pointy reckoning” Abigail uses truly reveals that she is willing to go large lengths to protect her reputation. She is able to deceive and trap the girls with a scare tactic when she says that she says t..."
0 "noted that" "...and educators are, however, still expected to contribute to these capabilities as the cost of training are high (Barac, 2009:20). Employers have also noted that while they are happy with the theoretical knowledge gained at tertiary intuitions by trainee CA’s; there seems to be a distinguishable gap between th..."
1 "to believe that there" "...as spiraled into a baseless disaster. As the reader, we clearly see the dramatic irony, but through the closed curtain, it amplifies it as we are led to believe that there is a never-ending list of “witches”. This happens at the precise moment because we see Betty “calling out hysterically and with great relief” when sh..."
1 "I think that she" "...g that happened between Mr. Wickham and Mr. Darcy. Afterwards, Miss Bingley approaches Elizabeth and tells her that Mr. Wickham is not to be trusted. I think that she sees the way tha                         In Chapter 24 and 25                        In Chapter 26                        In Chapter 27 and 28 \t\t\t\t \t..."
1 "and friends that you" "...d create a great mix of cultures. Although the obstacles looks and sounds overwhelming, you will be able to overcome them with the help of the school and friends that you meet along the way. The experience of studying in a different country will benefit your whole life as long as you face your obstacles in a positive m..."
1 "been assumed that a" "... engineers, even though the primary method of providing the thrust necessary to launch a rocket into space is chemical in nature. As a result, it has been assumed that a chemical engineer plays little role in the project of space exploration. However, as space exploration takes flight and attain new heights by moving ..."
0 "thought that was one" "...staff, another principal chose   me to teach his daughter, which was really an honor for me because he had seven other teachers     to choose from. I thought that was one of my greatest rewards in teaching but later when he came   to me with his youngest daughter and told her, “I want you to meet your teacher for next ..."
1 "I realize that I" "...ey are walking behind us. I am given a baby bottle with milk by Cassie during my ride in the stroller and Cassie is the one who is strolling me. Soon I realize that I need to pee and it seems to be harder for to try to hold it, the inevitable happens I pee in my diaper. So I start to cry since I have a wet diaper, ..."
1 "is argued that the" "...iginal idea was to help smaller rural states have a voice that is equal, based on their population ratio, to that of states with big cities.  It also is argued that the current system allows for better minority and special interest group representation because of the house representation.  Abolishing the system would..."
1 "have shown that approximately" "...y. Every person must be able to communicate effectively to maintain continuous growth and sustain trusting and functioning relationships.     Studies have shown that approximately 75% of our message is non-verbal so we must be as careful of our body language as of the words we use (Tafensweduau, 2016). Communicating efficiently..."
0 "both argued that the" "...n-Jacques Rousseau? (5.2) They were both leading enlightenment thinkers. They both influenced the American Revolution and the French Revolution. They both argued that the government of monarch depended on the consent of the governed. All of the above.  28.  How did the Industrial Revolution improve the standard of livi..."
1 "was told that if" "... call by name.  The Warden left her in the hands of other guards, who began processing her. Her long brown hair was plated tightly over her head, she was told that if she let it down it would be cut off. Several injections were given to her, more needles and bloody pricks, and blood drawn out from her arms. It was ..."
1 "never noticed that Narcissus" "...elves to ever seek the other advantages in life. For example, after Narcissus passes away, the lake tells the goddesses, “I weep for Narcissus, but I never noticed that Narcissus was beautiful. I weep because, each time he knelt beside my banks, I could see, in the depth of his eyes, my own beauty reflected.” This suggests tha..." 0
1 "Nora takes that as" "...Nora takes back what she said about having influence on her husbands decision making, but Krogstad says to her “like all married man…can be swayed,”  Nora takes that as an insult to her husband. Nora explains to Torvald that she will be finish with the loan by the new year. But Krogstad is not worry about that, he wa..."
0 ": Ensure that information" "...aison with the Section, the Region, and IEEE Headquarters, and should be familiar with all aspects of Branch operations.  Some specific duties include: Ensure that information (via email generally) from IEEE Headquarters is transmitted to the student Officers. Attend Executive Committee meetings and assist the committees. P..."
1 "product that is more" "... way to accomplish this is to focus on how my product looks to consumers, I could redesign the packaging so that it is more appealing to customers. A product that is more appealing to customers means that the product will sell and I will have to increase production in order to keep up with the demand of the product.   ..."
1 "so that it is" "...s in a person's life, nothing more than instinctive reactions to stimulus. A person with this quality takes the initiative organizing his daily tasks so that it is complete before the deadline, if any unforeseen happens. Being a proactive person is not waiting to receive orders, is to perform the activities with..."
0 "Orwell assert that a" "...s, as humans are not valued for humanistic qualities but rather as functional mechanisms for the advancement of power.   In conclusion, both Lang and Orwell assert that a drive for power leads to the alienation of the individual. Lang and Orwell use a futuristic dystopian setting to comment on the abuse of power and to..."
0 "troops that were going" "...t there were developments occurring in the Pacific area that threatened worldwide peace (Morley, 2013). President Roosevelt was aware of the Japanese troops that were going over their territories and bracing themselves for a war, and the U.S. was not willing to enter into the war that had boiled over in Europe and other ..."
0 "that shows that you" "...more organized and it can decrease your stress and anxiety levels. Another way to apply Habit three, is to do tasks you don't necessarily want to do, that shows that you are focused on taking control and how important your goals mean to you. If you don't think you need to apply this habit, first take a look at the Tim..."
1 "sense that it was" "...lained how the purpose of the term health was to serve as being ‘the opposite of disease’ and meant superior value.  Whereas disease was broad in the sense that it was generally associated with conditions that were bad and represented life expectancy being shortened, due to the body reacting to something foreign tha..."
0 "she confirmed that she" "...itated to sign up for the event hoping that she would be going. I had been trying to contact her for quite sometime. When I eventually contacted her, she confirmed that she would be going. I have had several members of my group ask if she would be attendingI am certain that having this  public figure added to the list of..."
0 "understand is that she" "...n front of me, but this time he was only an inch from my face and I watched as his eyes roamed my face before he steps back.   “But one thing I don’t understand is that she’s human,” he stated, a finger to his chin in puzzlement.   ‘Is being human a problem, or something? He says it like he’s not one himself…’   “Cody, s..."
0 ", that was three" "...his experience teaching history: “But when I ask my students about the plague, they just stare back at me. “What plague? The Black Plague?” No, I sigh, that was three centuries earlier.” (Loewen 72) The plague on Native Americans during the first interaction, between Europeans and Natives, is little known to so man..."
1 "I believe that the" "...hers were let go free of warning to not ever prepare food for other people. The board of health seem to see several reason to send her to quarantine. I believe that the approach should've been in a way that her rights were taken into account. The health Department should of treated her with value and respect that eve..."
0 "trial that is about" "...ars in the future. The phrase ‘that is about to come’ includes the verb ‘mello’ which was used to express imminence. When Jesus said ‘the hour of the trial that is about to come’ He meant it would happen soon.  It is interesting to note, ‘all the world’ is the Greek word ‘oikoumene’ meaning the Roman Empire, and ‘upon..."
0 "infants that were in" "...if, 2006).  Limitations/Strengths This article choose to conduct a retrospective cohort study - the researchers looked at the charts of 190 women and infants that were in the hospital between 1998 and 2004 (Abdel-Latif, 2006).  As a result we do not know the quality and completeness of the data that was provided in the..."
1 "confidently say that Marsha" "...o function as a valuable team member in group projects. She’s an honest, hard-working individual who knows how to work quickly and efficiently. I can confidently say that Marsha’s level of service, professionalism and follow-through will make a positive and beneficial addition to your program.   If you have any further questi..."
0 "practice that is working" "... the classrooms of my department members. I have discovered that permanent change is difficult. It does require observation and evidence of some best practice that is working in order to \"buy into\" a particular change. I am learning that reaching more students may be the greater good than taking a few students further. Wit..."
0 "to ensure that I" "...are offered. It's my job to follow their schedule to ensure I'm on the correct track for graduation. My Financial Aid Advisory and I must collaborate to ensure that I know and have the financial payment that is needed to pay for my courses. My advisory will also be able to make suggestions on how to pay for my cour..."
1 "can tell that it" "...im up at the playground. We know that Hector found his mom because the woman behind him is singing a song like what Stanley sang at the big thumb. We can tell that it is his(Hector) mom because Hector told Stanley that his mom used to sing a similar song as a lullaby when he was younger.    "
1 "not  represent that it" "...not create any legally binding obligations. The information contained in this document is based on material we believe to be reliable; however, we do not  represent that it is accurate, current, complete, or error free. This document will evolve as the process moves forward and requirements change/new requirements are pl..."
1 "author mentions that she" "...he iPads helped their education I didn’t understand that. The last thing I felt was confusing was how they were going to help everyone get iPads. The author mentions that she wants help give everyone student an iPad but doesn’t tell us how. I was really confused about that as well. This is my reflection on the article “Why..."
1 "have concluded that there" "...ach”, but the pathetic fallacy of “storm-cloud” manifests the ominous reality of his work, and the inability to rid of the blood from his hands. They have concluded that there was no way to console the actions he let go, as the “pigs stuck there, clinging onto each other” is an anthropomorphosis to depict the ramifications ..."
1 "He says that he" "...lon Brando’s real life.  Paul (Brando) mention about his father as super masculine, drunk man and his mother a poetic and also drunk like his father. He says that he could never see her at home when he came back from the school. She was in jail or any other where.  He remembers how he had to milk the cows every mo..."
0 "also understand that I" "...down and away for another day and another debate, as there were more important things to learn today.   “I understand that, guys. But you all need to also understand that I've only relied on certain people to make sure that I’m alive and safe, and so far in my life, that only person is me.”   Without letting them respond..."
0 "animals that were domesticated" "...sticated animal the dog may have helped Hunters track game animals additionally provided me but also eventually supplied milk, wool, and energy  Many animals that were domesticated included cattle, goats, sheep,  and buffalo The causes that caused population to begin agriculture Include climate change which could change local cl..."
1 "had felt that it" "... and onto the second. I finished the test with fifteen minutes to spare. I felt really good about it. That day I went home and told my parents that I had felt that it went great. Then I went to my computer to check Power School and the grades were up. The first thing I saw was that my average raised up to a “B” and..."
0 "also direct that the" "...th the plans and specifications set out in the contract“ and that the materials will be new “unless otherwise stated in the contract“. The warranties also direct that the work “will be done with due diligence and within the time stipulated in the contract”. Based on the facts provided in the briefing notes, it is clear..."
0 "having confessed that strangers" "...LT In faith died all these, not having received the promises, but from afar having seen them, and having been persuaded, and having saluted them, and having confessed that strangers and sojourners they are upon the earth.  'In faith died all these' The Scriptures do not actually state that Enoch was translated alive to Heaven, ac..."
1 "world is that?" "...ner of his eye. Turning his head slowly, he noticed a mysterious substance on the non penetrable solid rock wall. “Huh,”thought Harrison,“What in the world is that?” “It almost looks like a rip in the universe.” “Nah, can’t be.” Then he thought some more. He was so confused because it almost looked like a way out..."
1 "Europe that were once" "...tructivists argue on the dynamic nature of interests and identities which can change over time to allow for cooperation. For example, regions such as Europe that were once riddled with disputes later on came together to form a united entity called the European Union. Similarly, many countries that were traditionally and..."
1 "this experience that I" "...und each letter out and eventually you will hear the full word.” I began to do just that. This moment in time shaped the rest of my life. I knew from this experience that I needed to be self-reliant in order to be successful. \tI carried this lesson into my daily adult life through my internships, my clubs, and my job. Wh..."
1 "approach that is proposed" "...issued 10 days before the date of the meeting to allow documents exchange in time.   5. STRATEGY 5.1 Proposed approach by the company The negotiation approach that is proposed is integrating approach as both the town council and the mine tends to lose if the amicable solution is not found or a settlement agreement is not re..."
1 "also believe that God" "Hi Kim! Thank you for your consideration. I consider every opportunity a gift from God. I also believe that God has the ability to work redemptively through whatever events evolve as result of our choices.  That being said feel free to submit my resume along wi..."
1 "1860s that was about" "...ide we often do not stop to appreciate and think about what nature has to offer us. Transcendentalism was a movement in America back in the 1830s and 1860s that was about many different ideas including that god was not one central being but was rather in all of us, we are nature and nature is us and that we can learn n..."
1 "to show that a" "...ke his play “Macbeth” more tense he uses Repetition to make the audience nervous and start to predict what will happen next. Lastly he used metaphors to show that a slight error may result in a difficult situation where it is hard for the character to get out of. This is how William Shakespeare made this scene ve..."
1 "This means that the" "... probability reaches 50%. This happens when the ration between the numbers of successful matches to the total number of the bits in the space is 0.5. This means that the main purpose of the algorithm disappears when the previously defined ration is greater than 0.5.  According to this paper, Grovers' algorithm is not ..."
1 "services is that it" "...ollaborative skills  among students?  Robin Hastings poses one possible answer to this question;  “One of the benefits of collaborating using Web 2.0 services is that it does not matter where in the world a collaborator is working-everyone can access and contribute equally” (Hastings 2009).  By eliminating the geograp..."
1 "They imply that an" "... blamed the company’s board for the scandal. It was accused of serving as “a passive observer of a company thoroughly controlled” by then CEO Ebbers. They imply that an active Board would possibly have prevented or even more quickly detected the accounting fraud that occurred (Beresford et al.). As an indication of E..."
0 "lines that were added" "...t script on the right.  For easy comparison, differences are highlighted in red for the previous version and in green for the current version. Entire lines that were added or removed are highlighted in gray on the opposite panel.  We'll close this window for now.  (VO notes:  For wiki only - do not speak) Note: You cann..."
1 "and that it was" "...mputer! You could take it home! Wow! A couple of years later, Windows decided that Apple couldn’t have all the fun and announced that Windows was out and that it was better than Apple. In 1999, Wi-Fi became popular. It was use in computers. The Mac-book Pro came out in 2006. In 2020, Jackson Coxson becomes a milli..."
1 "far indicates that generally" "...ues to keep themselves goal-focused and therefore are less likely to achieve or maintain their goals. Interestingly when adapted to RSOD, research so far indicates that generally those engaged in RSOD, with lower SR abilities, experience higher amounts of alcohol-related negative consequences (Hustad, Carey, Carey & Maisto, 20..."
1 "I discussed that the" "  This paper mainly discussed why it is not proper for care ethics to adopting moral realism. First of all, I discussed that the existence of some common moral claims is never changed, it is not wise to consider culture as only standard to care, and the world will be very dange..."
1 "This suggests that Health" "...checklist was not used by all the health visitors to assess risks as recommended in the Operational Domestic Abuse Guidelines on the Trust intranet.  This suggests that Health visitors need to get better at using the checklist to assess risks of DV.                           7.0         Recommendations: • Health care profes..."
1 "has decided that Sonia" "...have been sustained while Sonia was under her mother’s care and as such he has raised a safeguarding alert which the local authority has assessed and has decided that Sonia should not return to her mother’s care. Safeguarding as appropriate to the MCA and DOLS and the local authorities obligation 9safeguardibg process by..."
1 "I believe that I" "My College Essay   Why do I deserve this scholarship? I believe that I deserve this scholarship because I have been through a lot starting since I was born.  I was born with erb's palsy. this limited me from doing things..."
1 "it true that your" "... questions. One girl in particular, Kaede Kayano, seems to be really interested in what Hope had said earlier about her lunch.  “So Sinclair-chan, is it true that your lunch compose of those three delicious slices of cake?” “Yes,” Hope answers with a shy grin, a tint of pink shines on her cheek; “I’m a bit of a swee..."
1 "land that was barren" "...ills, trying their best to scratch a living from the thin flinty soil” (12).  Although the narrator sets a tone of tooth-and-nail survival, the hilly land that was barren.  The Trask and Hamilton families are made examples of the difference in farms and familial relationships. While the Hamilton family was poor, “It wa..."
0 "advantage states that when" "...n then be reinvested into the business to purchase more capital and hire more labour in order to expand production further. The theory of comparative advantage states that when countries specialize in producing and trading a particular commodity, they will begin to dominate that market and experience growth at a higher rate...."
0 "even that is far" "...Symptoms of Lyme disease associated with a history of tick bite and bull’s-eye rash is the most reliable way to diagnose infection with Borrelia, but even that is far from being absolute. There are likely other types of microbes that can cause a bull's-eye rash. Only ⅓ of people with Lyme disease will have bull's-e..."
1 "was reported that approximately" "...to 147,000 by 2041. Annually,  almost 4,000 new cases been reported in Ireland(Cahill et al, 2012).    Dementia is more prevalent in older people. It was reported that approximately  14,266 people with dementia lives in various public and private long stay facilities across the country(Cahill et al, 2012) These population are at ..."
0 "buyers say that the" "...ll one of Japan’s (2) largest suppliers of such natural resources. Japan also imports textiles from UAE among other trading commodities. The Japanese buyers say that the combination of traditional designs and modern use of colours are the attraction of textiles (3) produced in UAE. Another interesting trend in the int..."
0 "you find that the" "...ppy to accept requests to update Personal Information if you demonstrate that the Personal Information we hold about you is incorrect. If at any time you find that the Personal Information we hold about you is inaccurate, incomplete, out-of date, irrelevant or misleading please contact us at the details in the Conta..."
1 "laws that were set" "... exploitation and demoralisation of certain practices of groups, this can be seen in the Jamaica as the working middle class were marginalised due to laws that were set by a higher class.      In theory criminalisation is the only effect of illegalisation, however these other processes are also effects of illegalisat..."
1 "to realize that you" "...e to get yourself in the right frame of mind to complete your work. These have worked for me and my students throughout the years, and it’s important to realize that you are not a victim of your mood or your circumstances. All of these outside factors are just noise that prevent you from focusing on your goals. Provid..."
1 "This means that Santiago" "... \tThe old fortune teller, another minor character, couldn’t interpret Santiago's dream because she said God was speaking in the language of the soul. This means that Santiago’s dream was closely related to his own Personal Legend and it was his job to decipher what it meant. Since she didn’t do what Santiago was paying her..."
0 "note that it’" "...ld provide users with video, audio, text, and photographs and blend into the social media platforms that it chooses. Melissa and Donald Barker (2013) note that it’s important not to seem too out of place on the platforms chosen and understand the basic principles the platform upholds. Understand that not every s..."
1 "right cheek that always" "...fference you’ll find the true little scared girl I am. I looked over at Henry. My eyes ran over his tightly clenched jaw and twitching muscles in his right cheek that always appear when he gets agitated. He had that humorless expression on that he always wore. His facial expression was so rigid and cold that I shivered .I..."
1 "persecution is that they" "...when they had the opportunity to do something significant, then they went full out. Act 1 #5 The irony in the Puritans’ pilgrimage to Salem to escape persecution is that they have made full circle when it comes to becoming persecuted. We sense a false sense of legitimacy at the beginning of the witch trials which completel..."
1 "amount that is impossible" "...t of stocking, warehousing, and a a cost for producing new products not containing GMOs, and or crating new ingredients. For many families $520 is an amount that is impossible to pay. Now lets imagine a world with out GMOs. How do you think the food industry would work? What would  the cost of food be? Where there be enough..."
1 "not believe that I" "...as her first time playing ever. After that we became great friends. After practicing long and hard it was 6:30 p.m, and it was time to leave. I could not believe that I was still at school this late on the very first day of school. The band director informed us of late practice because of the first football game of t..."
1 "I hope that you" "...eing you, but I really need to get home. I've been running around checking everything out and I'm tired.\" He nodded and said, \"Good seeing you Josie, I hope that you like it here. Your Dad told me you were moving back. Let him know Ill stop by after y'all get settled in.\" I nodded and turned to the girls. Darcy co..."
1 "only said that he" "...e towards him. When asked about whether he noticed any financial irregularities in her paying his bills, he gave no indication that this was true and only said that he was continuing to monitor his bank statements. Mr. Banks requires assistance with his Activities of Daily Living and claims that he is able to manage..."
"and saw that the" "...ome with him on his ship. Mark accepted and they both took off in the space. A few monments laters the guys in the blacks suits  went to the camp sit and saw that the ship was here and it was long gone.  " 1
1 "speaker states that as" "... in one's heart. At the end of the sonnet the speaker decides that 'as long as men can breathe..so long lives this, and this gives life to thee.' The speaker states that as long as man is around, the death of^a loved one is minor, as they continue to live on through the poem and people. Shakespeare's sonnet informs the r..."
1 "\" showed that many" "replacedWith":{"s":"\" showed many"},"...manent change to occur, it is better to go “an inch wide and a mile deep.” (p. 45).  Here, the focus would be pedagogical changes.  The \"walk-throughs\" showed that many of the staff were not adopting current trends in education. Lecture style or ‘Sage on the Stage’ was the preferred method of teaching. Many desks wer..."
1 "cases that were randomly" "...er there is no doubt the checklist was not completed for the 4 cases as a MARAC referral will not be accepted otherwise.   6.0    Conclusions: The 10 cases that were randomly selected for the purpose of this audit had involvement from Health visitors and it further revealed good practice where HVs detected abuse, assessed ..."
0 "jocks that were upset" "...daho...Trust me, I know all the I-da-ho jokes. Most are not pretty. I had been the butt of a few, myself. The jokes came mostly from the mega popular jocks that were upset when I turned them down when they wanted to go on a date, or do one thing or another. I did not like those kinds of guys. The ones that would knock t..."
1 "shocked that" "...rson by Jekyll. Comparing the handwriting, he says that they are from the same person. Utterson excuses Guess and after locks the letter in the safe, shocked that Jekyll forged it to cover up Hyde. Despite there being a prize, still no word about Dir Danvers’ murder has come. Hyde has disappeared but people con..."
1 "them believe that they" "...n goe. everyone has that one limitation that different than from everyone else but it is that one limitation that can either make them unique or make them believe that they are an outcast. I will say again yes I have been through a lot but it is a lot that I have been through that has made me the strong person that I am ..."
0 "so that it is" "...mentioned above’.   Genetic modification or genetic engineering is the general term used to describe the alteration of an organism’s genetic material so that it is passed onto the organism’s descendants. It is a process that has been occurring for thousands years and has coevolved with the environment.For instan..."
1 "firmly believe that no" "...ter that the governing body of a powerful World Government could prevent war.   Both Realist and Liberal approaches have different outlooks. Realists firmly believe that no matter what wars can't be stopped, whereas Liberals argue that if there was a powerful governing body then perhaps wars wont even occur.Throughout hi..."
1 "truth is that most" "...zed in the classroom (Moore 2016).  It is easy to assume that 21st century students know everything about technology and the tools teachers use.  The truth is that most students are completely lost when using online tools and it needs to be a priority for the teacher to teach the basic functioning of the tools being ..."
1 "people believe that they" "...nd generally came from a low-class background. Tom and Daisy Buchanan, their friend Jordan Baker, and other people on East Egg are ‘old money’. Those people believe that they are the most refined and poised of all social classes. Jay Gatsby is ‘new money’; he came from a low-class background and worked his way to the top o..."
1 ") demonstrated that the" "...rs benefits to both customers and firms. Service delivery is characterized by human error which makes each interaction different. Beatson et al. (2007) demonstrated that the use of self-service technology limits problems associated with heterogeneity and perishability. Promoting improved service delivery through uniform s..."
0 "stakeholders is that they" "...ivated does not necessarily prohibit the carrying out of a development plan until full scientific uncertainty is achieved. Rather what this means for stakeholders is that they have a legal obligation to avoid wherever practicable and in a timely manner, serious or irreversible damage to the environment; and make an assessme..."
1 "she felt that “" "...he age of two Zoe loved everything “feminine” with a strong interest in “dolls” and “long hair”.15 After Zoe told her mother at the age of seven that she felt that “God made a mistake”, putting her in the wrong body, her mother seeked immediate medical help to stop her growing daughter from going through male pube..."
0 "I guess that’" ".... Even so, I think it is for the better. I bet if I did meet some kids back when I was little, they would just make fun of me for having silver hair. I guess that’s how my life balanced out. You get some, you lose some. After 10 minutes, Karasuma-sensei pauses and then calls out to me, “You can come in now.” Tak..."
0 "I expect that you" "...%, performance tasks are 30%, and your daily warm-up is worth 10% of your grade.   Ms. Schmidt’s expectations: This is a high school course.  As such I expect that you will take the course seriously, support your fellow classmates, and behave in a mature manner.  This means you are expected to:   1.   Be prepared.  ..."
1 "is understood that the" "... that a force is applied and an action occurs at the desired time) \"The good player times his swing so as to hit the ball squarely\"   In this case it is understood that the use of the word time in the headline it's as a noun and not as a verb.   So the previous step that should be done before choosing a definition it's t..."
"idea that it is" "Many texts explore the idea that it is better to have loved and lost than to have never loved at all. Love truly is better when experienced in one's heart and lost, than never present at a..." 1
1 "can conclude that this" "...o being the first South American country to host the Olympics. What country in South America will be the next to host the Olympic Games? Therefore, I can conclude that this article is not biased because^the mention the pros and cons of the Olympics and the author isn’t showing their opinion through their writing."
1 "He believes that if" "...parates the crystal merchant from Santiago is that the merchant wants to continue to dream about visiting Mecca, but never work to actually go there. He believes that if he visits Mecca, his dreams will come true and he’ll have nothing to live for in the end. However, the thing that separates Santiago is that he needs..."
0 "and ensure that the" "...ion based on the convened data you analyzed within the previous chapter and present the outcome / recommendation. Look at the Project statement / aim and ensure that the outcome either shows that it has been achieved or explain why it has not.  5  Chapter 6 - Conclusions and area for further studies:  The conclusion ..."
0 "like that is practically" "... it’s incredibly disrespectful,” Britain piped up. “People died in those events that would have given them the ‘scars’ that you talk about. Faking it like that is practically mocking them; altering them to fit their own needs.”  “They are probably nothing but errant, attention-seeking children-- liars and con-men,” France ..."
0 "defend that" "Savannah Duchanse L.A. 11 A.P. Ms. Kuty 17 August 2016 \t\t\t1984: A literary analysis of George Orwell’s novel \t3. From the novel itself, defend that George Orwell intended 1984 to be a criticism of contemporary societies.  "
0 "society is that the" "...his mobile game is creating a more friendly society and a more social America. Finally, another reason why Pokemon Go is a beneficial contribution to society is that the exercise and social connection between players causes people to explore their neighborhoods and become involved with their community. The way that th..."
1 "texted back that she" "...n love with you I can’t wait to start our life together” the text said.  Israa smiled she was having the same thought as Brandon simultaneously.  She texted back that she had felt the same way, and that she too was so in love with him, and that tonight they would be sleeping in the same bed as husband and wife, to whic..."
1 "to understand that the" "...ng of the world in which they live and become socially responsible and show respect for the environment (DEEWR, 2010).Assessment for learning help me to understand that the children learned how to collect data by interviewing and researching, analyse findings, and make recommendations and became the owner of their learni..."
0 "case that is truly" "...rderer that David berkowitz is.   Nurture on the other hand, is the impact that one’s environment has on their behaviour. When searching for a murder case that is truly caused by nurture there we find the Nannie Doss case. She grew up in a home filled with terrible parenting and was never truly loved. She spent her t..."
1 "to believe that some" "...t aside.”(Goodson) These are the final words of Lin-Manuel Miranda’s, the creator of the hit musical Hamilton, Tony acceptance speech.  It puzzles me to believe that some think that love is not a valid or reasonable solution for gun violence. We live in America where we stand together “One Nation under God indivisible ..."
0 "dailies exceeded that of" "...s way to find itself in a divisive situation. Spanish remained the language of journalism until 1925, as the average daily circulation of the Spanish dailies exceeded that of all the paper in English. Throughout the instability and transition, journalistic texts on music continued unabated. Drawing from the colonial models..."
0 "artwork that is A3-A1" "...     What size of artwork would catch your attention when you go to an art exhibition?  Based on the responses we collected, 59.8% of Cedarians chose artwork that is A3-A1 size, 26.1% chose bigger than A1 Size, 9.8% chose A4 size, 4.3% chose smaller than A4 size. This shows that for most people, artworks that are A3- A1..."
1 "attachment that is opened" "... job should not be opened (clicked on). A common characteristic of all major business computer virus infections has been a non-business-related email attachment that is opened by an employee. This could be a Word document, a screensaver, a link to document or image, a game, or even what appears to be a link to a website.  U..."
"research reveals that some" " In particular, my primary research reveals that some carriers do not conform to the safety standard recommended by international health organisations, as a result, a poorly designed carrier can compromi..." 0
1 "concept that is often" "...is concept provides one of the main grounds for differences between the two theories (Daddow 2013). Incidentally, anarchism is a highly misunderstood concept that is often tied to chaos and rebellion^against government. While there have been many credible instances where this meaning is supported, it also encompasses th..."
1 "I found that this" "...arly in the suffering. I would have read a book like this, had it existed. The more people I spoke to, the more I would see the need for such a book. I found that this crime seems to touch every single family on the planet in one way or another. There was a huge void in the self-help sections regarding sexual assaul..."
1 "This means that each" "...que experiences each person has we should concern ourselves with their particular world -view. Phenomenologist believe humans are self-determination. This means that each of us interprets our world in our own way. Therefore, in order to study the meaning of reality, there needs an exploration into meaning that the part..."
1 "to ensure that workers" "...ing with Substances Hazardous to Health         Section 5:  Noise at work    The Control of Noise at Work Regulations 2005    The employer has a duty to ensure that workers are not exposed to noise levels which could damage hearing. Hearing damage includes noise induced hearing loss, tinnitus (ringing in the ears), etc. ..."
1 "to think that my" "...ife would be super boring.     So whether my identity was most shaped by a guy in a hot dog stand or if it truly was my family and Austin. I am going to think that my identity is awesome because of Texas, and my family. I know that it includes more but I think that they have shaped it and been central to it most.  ..."
0 "one that is culturally" "...essional development.  Lastly, when a school was supported by their district, they were much more successful.      The school environment needs to be one that is culturally responsive.  They are aware of the changing demographics and how these differences could affect their learning.  Teachers often felt they had an inad..."
1 ") argued that it" "...f consumers as to the degree of satisfying the desire and need to be derived by acquiring or consuming products or services. Engel and Blackwell (1982) argued that it was the evaluation as to whether a chosen alternative matched with the previous belief as to the alternative thereof. Cronin and Taylor (1992) define..."
1 "truly believe that with" "...se two characters may create a situation that they are not able to stay focus during the lesson and lead to the poor academic performance. However, i truly believe that with patience and suitable teaching method, students’ academic performance can be enhanced eventually.   In support of my application, my resume is enclos..."
1 "to learn that Udham" "...idea that Gadaries [sic] are secretly gathering arms” (Hindustan Ghadr September 1940, IOR/L/PJ/12/757). In 1927, the intelligence apparatus was keen to learn that Udham Singh was arrested on 30 August under Section 20 of the Arms Act, which perceived his possession of two revolvers, one pistol, ammunition, and “copie..."
1 "problem is that there" "...d that Hyde's account contains several thousand pounds. It is said that Hyde is sure to be caught now because money means everything to him. The only problem is that there are no photographs or no record of family of Hyde. Utterson leaves to Dr. Jekyll's house, where he is sat looking ¨deadly sick.¨ There the two discus..."
1 "was found that most" "...onfront organizations during implementation of benchmarking through review the literatures and empirical studies. Although of conflicting studies, it was found that most studies reported that benchmarking affects positively on organizational performance, where benchmarking becomes an accepted tool as an effective perf..."
1 "economy that is growing" "...eel more comfortable starting a software company in a location with strict laws on intellectual property.  I would also select a location that has an economy that is growing fast.   \tIf I had to choose a place to start a software development company, it would be the country of India.  One of the main reason for selecting ..."
1 "she wishes that she" "...s on begging for Ruth May’s forgiveness. Orleanna, just as Nathan, harbors guilt for someone’s death; Orleanna blames herself for Ruth May’s death as she wishes that she had the courage to take her daughters out of the Congo when danger came upon the family. Nathan, on the other hand, hardly finds sorrow in his daught..."
1 "government says that the" "...: but my predictions should be reliable. It is useless to predict too far into the future, but it is quite possible to predict in this context as the government says that the economy is rising significantly each year and will stay rising in the future. I am aware that there is a deflation from the start of 2008 to the nint..."
0 "teacher that is nonindigenous" "... that context.  Considering the aims of Sarras work and the fact he is an Indigenous person it is a fair question to pose is it possible for a future teacher that is nonindigenous to adapt the philosophy as part of one's teaching pedagogy.The initial challenge is the obvious that if one is not an Indigenous person how can one t..."
0 ", that is big" "...d a gifted kind of kid.   ‘’Momma I had the best dream in the world. I dreamed I was on national television talking to the Queen of talk shows.” ‘’Now, that is big, Baby! You just keep on dreaming. You can do anything you put your mind to’’ said Momma. Meechie grabbed his bag of candy and put his things in his b..."
1 "in that it wants" "... the business.  --Mike is in process to submit LOE to Richard Turner of Walden, for the  sale of the company.  --Mike indicated an issue with Walden; in that it wants to be paid as escrow closes; vs when consumate the sale. Mike seeks for Sellerto be paid when Walden is paid.  --Mike commented about a “niche market..."
1 "was concerned that the" "...sts as a solution to avoid worst loss. To surface from its bankruptcy, they decided the merger with U.S. Airways. Although U.S. Department of Justice was concerned that the merger would be a cause of price-fixing, American Airline made a $357 million net profit in its second quarter in 2013.[2]  there were drastically gr..."
1 "research established that the" "...d that banks with an expansive branch network need more automation for real-time connectivity. 5.1.2 Co-production by automation and market share The research established that the effect of coproduction by automation increases the market share of a commercial bank in Kenya. Customers will look for institutions that are user fri..."
1 "gender that it targets" "...he past 2 decades (Molina, 2008). Even though that lung cancer is more common in women it can also be seen in men as well, it does not have a certain gender that it targets can attack both genders overall. Thus, it is a fact that lung cancer is more common in men, as the probability for men to develop lung cancer is 1:13..."
0 "the best that you" "...ba sniffled, “ Okay, and if you make it and i don't i will do the same, and don't worry mummy won’t be mad that you didn't keep your promise, you did the best that you could and she will love you no matter what.” Helga whispered.  The gas started to fill the room, people started drifting away, Lieba began to feel li..."
1 "This means that the" "...er to reach the higher cacti.  Later he observed there were some species that were only on specific contents.  Darwin called this Natural Selection.  This means that the members of a species better suited to their environment survive and reproduce at a higher rate.  There is a direct connection between evolution and P..."
1 "I predict that it" "...3 million of total transactions. However,  because it is a prediction, the range should be between 5975 million and 6478 million.     Also in Jun2014 I predict that it should rise to 5800 million of total transactions. However,  because it is a prediction, the range should be between 5474 million and  6150 million. ..."
1 "management feels that it" "...igible for rehire at Hunter's. In most instances a discharge occurs when corrective action is not successful, or a policy violation is so urgent that management feels that it must impose immediate discharge. When someone is discharged for a policy violation, they will be considered not eligible for rehire at Hunter's.   Fi..."
0 "actually find that not" "...s also helps you be less competitive in a very competitive environment. Once you get past school, sports, and other competitive activities, you could actually find that not everything in life is full of competition. To apply this habit, you need to win respect of yourself, and overcome insecurities about how smart, good ..."
0 "Foster explains that every" "...evelop the character. Every action is purposely placed to further develop the character. In the chapter Every Trip is a Quest (Except When It’s Not), Foster explains that every action a character completes has an impact on his/her development. This is symbolized when Foster told the story of Kip, a boy who went on a trip to ..."
0 "and that was mostly" "...t teachers that explained topics well, weren’t too strict, and didn’t give an overwhelming amount of work. I only got one or two B’s in seventh grade and that was mostly because I got all of my work done and turned in. I really enjoyed seventh grade. I hope my work ethic carries over to eighth grade.      I’m excited ..."
0 "feels that" "...efit communities financially and would save busing costs,electric bills, and cafeteria cost.     Lance Avery, an employee of a local logging company, feels that this alteration is beneficial. His company would benefit greatly by decreasing fuel usage in the company’s heavy equipment, but still would be produc..."
1 "Jack believes that he" "...e and engaged, albeit slightly confused, however, the observation that Jack is institutionalized is not lost on the reader. At the start of the film, Jack believes that he has responsibilities to his family, his wife does not work, so he is the sole income for the family, he must provide for his son and his wife. Like t..."
1 "others that were reading" "...ted   in April and scored 1.7 (first grade seventh month). He made a 4 month gain in two months. He   was promoted to second grade along with several others that were reading 2.0 (second grade) or   higher. At the beginning of the year four of my students were referred for special services even   though their IQ’S were low..."
1 "ll find that it" ".... The brain learns with repetition, so it may just require several weeks, months, or even a year before you can master each step. As you improve, you’ll find that it will take less time to complete this task with new pieces. Take your time, go at your own pace, and don’t rush. The ideal situation would require you..."
0 "to prove that Norikata" "...eking The Root, Akasha, created a potion and Shirley, a local girl that was Norikata assistant and Kiritsugu crush, drank the potion intending for it to prove that Norikata research would save the world. However she became a vampire and pled for him to kill her but he refused and fled. Their village was overrun by Execut..."
1 "she decides that if" "... pile he finds the calling cards with the black cross. They discuss Dr Rank for a few, every second that passes it's a moment of agony for Nora. But, she decides that if it's going to happen let it be now. Nora tells her husband to read the mail in firm voice. He refuses, he wants to be with his Little songbird. She g..."
1 "wear that was found" "...ughout the shoot. From what I gather a few of them happened on shoot dates that I wasn’t on. There’s a story flying around about some sort of bondage wear that was found behind the wardbrobe at one of the locations. Definitely made us question who used the place before us!    How about television projects? (Please inc..."
1 "it seems that you" "... to build a life that is meaningful to you away from your past .I also glanced at your phone last night when you were sifting through your emails and it seems that you have an eviction notice pending. So let me tell you this if you keep this shit up you are seriously going to lose your home.” The bartender said with..."
0 "stating that it the" "...s in your heart that judges you”, signifies the moral compass which creates guilt in John Proctor. Elizabeth leads Proctor to feel guiltiness through stating that it the guilt will hurt himself more than the affair will hurt Elizabeth. Through the witch trials, we start to learn that people aren’t who they seem to be,..."
1 "be denied that things" "...ration. Whether or not specific choices, such as college and career paths, are to be followed in the footsteps of (most commonly) a parent, it cannot be denied that things like potty training, reading, kindness, empathy, and many more milestones and traits should be learned from parents, guardians, and all adults alike ..."
1 "is hoped that the" "...essment from mentor teacher will be collated to measure outcomes from another professional's  perspective.  Implications of the Actions Research   It is hoped that the impact of the Bump-it-up-Wall will have a favourable outcome by increasing students motivation and engagement. The potential of the wall to facilitat..."
1 "even explained that she" "...be in coping and then eventually adapting. In the research study by Moyer & Goldberg, several adoptive parents reported a lack of support. One mother even explained that she had higher levels of stress after unanticipated adoption stressors, and when she reached out for support she realized that what little resources avai..."
0 "pitch that is a" "... the melody. Fill in the remaining chord members that haven’t yet been used. You can use them in any octave. For example:  If the counterpoint uses a pitch that is a third above the melody, you may use the pitches that correspond to a fifth or sixth above the melody note. If the counterpoint uses a pitch that is a..."
1 "that means that Tilapia" "...and a few have since been released into the wild and have established breeding populations. Breeding Tilapias are sexually matured at a small size so that means that Tilapia tend to breed quickly.   Characteristics Tilapias are competitive fish when it comes to fighting for territory and for nourishment. Tilapias are fast..."
1 "she says that she" "...s truly reveals that she is willing to go large lengths to protect her reputation. She is able to deceive and trap the girls with a scare tactic when she says that she says that “Indians smash my dear parents’ heads on the pillow next to mine”, showing that she is able to keep her plan hidden through having others f..."
1 ", that were even" "...mon and (supposedly) contain all 151 Pokemon of Generation 1, wouldn't it be cool if there were Shiny versions of Pokemon that turned up in Pokemon Go, that were even rarer than the as-yet-to-be-spotted legendaries? Sadly, the myth of Shiny Pokemon in Pokemon Go can be relegated under the heading, \"Myths We Only Wi..."
0 "people that were in" "...ater crashing over you, pushing you back until you can’t stand anymore and you fall and watch numbly as the waves crash over you again and again. The people that were in airplanes were calmly floating along the drift when the announcer said over the intercom, “Ladies and Gentlemen, we will not be landing” And with tha..."
1 "ve heard that the" "...dary between the student and teacher through an obstacle of the lack of attention. But this obstacle surprises me. It surprises me because usually, I’ve heard that the educational technology makes it easier for teachers to communicate to the students. In our classroom for the summer assignment, we have made it easie..."
1 "crops is that if" "...ops are modified by DNA from bacterium or virus and that can do contagion to the people who eat that GM crop.  As well another ethical matter with GM crops is that if the modification shows a negative result after being introduced in the marked the damage cannot be stop. For example sugar beet was engineered to be ..."
1 "We think that most" "...ze, 4.3% chose smaller than A4 size. This shows that for most people, artworks that are A3- A1 size would catch their attention at an art exhibition. We think that most people like A3-A1, as the size is big enough to see the small details in the artwork clearly, as it is not too big or too small.          Which form ..."
1 "always shows that they" "...charming and fat people as unattractive which is the negative views of obesity ( Kelly,2006). Media tend to show people with obesity without head and always shows that they are  eating unhealthy food. Our society through social media idealise thin body in people and always criticise fat people.  Obesity is one of the mos..."
1 "so tired that she" "...it can wait a bit longer cutie.   Abbie is put in her playpen by Carrie. Abbie is placed in the playpen and given a baby bottle and some toys, she is so tired that she falls asleep. When I wake up I noticed that I stink oh no I have both peed and pooped in my cloth diaper. Soon someone discover that I am in need of ..."
1 "NTDC stated that the" "...ol for economic development and poverty alleviation in Nigeria. Recognising this earning potential Mrs. Sally Mbanefo the current Director General of NTDC stated that the Nigerian tourism market is estimated at $4 billion. She believes with the right conditions Nigeria could rake in $3billion yearly (Uhakheme,2014).Thi..."
0 "must consider that they" "...ugh his stories, for example, her response to the prophecy of Nero’s birth, “Let him kill me - just let him rule” and “involvement with Lepidus”, one must consider that they all serve the purpose of foregrounding his plot for Nero’s brutal behaviour and attempts to “poison” his mother. Through Suetonius’ account, “she had..."
1 "to conform that Edward" "...secret”.  This shows that Peg is  attempting to make Edward look normal and to blend him in with everyone else. This shows the theme of the pressures to conform that Edward faces and for a fact we all face it even today, trying to fit in.      Judgements from superficial appearances  Jim   Kim's boyfriend Jim was present..."
1 "information that is outdated" "...ow data is collected, used, and stored by XYZ’s sales representatives. The database being used should be updated with only pertinent information; any information that is outdated or old should be eliminated from the company's database.  This process will help to streamline data research, which equates to savings in both time a..."
1 "one is that you" "...and as I complete my goals. It’s not just a matter of time or when it’s how I become a great writer. The higher the expectation can have two meanings one is that you will fall further and one is you will excel higher. My heartbeat will start beating steadier but I will have bursts of speed like when I race a car o..."
1 "to ascertain that the" "...and it tests how well an instrument that is developed measures a particular theory. (Sekaran & Bougie 2013:225). It is therefore of utmost importance to ascertain that the data collected is valid and reliable. The validity and the reliability have a direct influence on the reliability of the conclusions and findings dra..."
0 "or  rubrics that you" "Google It! Lesson Plan Template  Please fill in the fields below and include any handouts or  rubrics that you would use when you teach this lesson.   You will need to complete 3 lesson plans for an A, 2 lesson plans for a B,  or 1 lesson plan for a C or Pass...."
1 "and explains that a" "... no crimes, no hurt, no loss, no sadness, and nothing that is bad for people. He said that bad people, the people who break rules, will get released, and explains that a “release” is killing someone with no pain. He said that releases will be a private thing. He also says how it is the best solution for imperfection b..."
1 "Some think that obesity" "... wealthy countries but now is mostly in low and middle income countries. Obesity classified as one of the most serious health challenge in the world. Some think that obesity is cultural issue and there is a stigma attach to it others see it as health issue.This paper seek to understand what is the reason behind obesity an..."
1 "I fear that you" "...you're not taking care of yourself, not loving yourself. \t- I fear that because you don't have higher ambitions, you feel unfulfilled in your life \t- I fear that you don't know your worth, you don't know your value, you don't know your uniqueness \t- I fear that you have unresolved emotional pains that made you thi..."
1 "property that is lost" "...company property assigned to them such as cell phones, tools, uniforms and inventory. Employees will be expected to reimburse the company for company property that is lost, damaged or destroyed by employee negligence.   Care of Merchandise And Product It is the responsibility of each employee to handle all merchandise a..."
0 ", that is strengthened" "...ng a mirror image”(Thompson; 1998) If one conventional characteristics of the double is to signify the binary of a human, the savage and the civilised, that is strengthened by the subconscious imagery inside the apartment; Paul strips off the facing of civility, an assortment of bourgeois and repressive hang-ups (Barr; ?..."
0 "remained convinced that “" "...s Britain eventually did sign the document.  A month later, Shiv Singh Jouhal had begun to distribute the Petition for Reprieve, but the India Office remained convinced that “the general view is that outside the Sikh community, very little interest is being manifested in Udham Singh’s life” (“Udham Singh: Petition for Repri..."
0 "also argued that an" "...g force. It is said that the performance of an employee will improve, when they themselves set specific rather than vague goals for themselves. It is also argued that an individual’s motivation is enhanced, when feedback on performance is available (Cole, 2003, pp. 45-46).   Despite the benefits of goal setting, there..."
0 ", that is a" "...aning the bum of Abbie with wet wipes and I throw the used wipes in the pooped disposable diaper I throw in the trash. Up with your feet again sweetie, that is a good girl so nanny can put on you some ointment and baby powder.   Caitlin puts on me some ointment and baby powder and I get a clean disposable diap..."
1 "SNCOs that were stuck" "... within the 52 Communications Squadron, the squadron has had a mixture of highly competent and skilled senior NCOs (SNCOs).  However, there were some SNCOs that were stuck in their ways and also homesteaders in the unit.  These SNCOs tended to be counter-productive from the unit perspective and take time away from perfo..."
0 "It represents that euthanasia" "...ust respect the patients’ will with critical disease. Also, euthanasia will be performed after the treatment can not relieve the pain of the illness. It represents that euthanasia is a meathod through multiple evaluations. Since doctors have patients' agreement, there is no doubt of murder. In the contrast, performing euthanasi..."
1 "thing that is impossible" "...om my life as a student, particularly, that one could cultivate fruits on weaknesses, conquer fear and threats and harvest on opportunities. The only thing that is impossible is what you, as an individual perceived to be that. If I will live those times again, I will still be what I was. I now know that The essence of life..."
1 "have concluded that cannabis" "...ss to education which would make it seem that these kids almost have the privilege of ignoring the law because of the flaw in illegalization, studies have concluded that cannabis use within schools comes from a middle to upper class of students and numbers of cannabis users depends on location.  This creates a loop where the n..."
0 "high command that I" "...e Head Quarter  Enugu.  8/8/2016  Sir  Application For The Building Of A Police Post Located At Opi -Uno, Nsuka.   I humbly wish to inform the police high command that I am a law abiding citizen and a successful businessman resident in Enugu state. I wish to sincerely commend the effort of the Nigerian police especial..."
0 "hoping that it will" "...hen writing about politics) to point out dishonesty, silliness, and flaws of individuals and society as whole. Authors usually write satirical novels hoping that it will cause some kind of impact in the society they are criticizing, or to try to move people into action.  Satirical Authors: Mark Twain, Jonathan Swift, ..."
1 "us believe that Matthew" "...eration in mind. 'This generation' appears 19 times in the gospels, and always referred to Christ's generation. However, Dispensationalism would have us believe that Matthew 24:34 (Mark 12:3; Luke 21:32) refers to a generation 2000 years in the future and counting. ~ http://theendtimespodium.wordpress.com "
0 "Jongin registers that he" "...t.   ↠↠↠  Blearily, Jongin awoke and sat for a while, waiting for his line of vision to clear. Rubbing at his eyes, the tanned boy slides out of bed. Jongin registers that he’s most likely last to wake due to the fact that Jongdae isn’t in his unmade bed. Soon after brushing his teeth, he finds a uniform laid out upon his ..."
1 "and disseminate that information" "...or the staff.  Therefore, much of the early training focused on Drive, GMail and Calendar.  How best to organize the Drive to easily find information and disseminate that information to Students and Staff. We focused heavily on the use of Google Classroom to accomplish the communication piece.  Through training with building admin..."
1 "to ensure that the" "...Prof. Gerhard Nienaber (lecturers in taxation at the University of Pretoria). Dr. Marthi Pohl further discussed the questionnaire with the researcher to ensure that the questions were designed in such a way to make accurate predictions and obtain valid data. A pilot study was also conducted in order to further elimin..."
1 "been found that those" "...k factors. He examined the different scenario of different age groups, one of which is the elderly and individuals with learning difficulties. It has been found that those who fall into this group are likely to suffer intimidation or harassment.   Elder abuse includes actions intending to harm, the charming without inte..."
1 "this is that True" "The big difference that I noticed between True Foods Kitchen and McDonalds and other food chains like this is that True Food Kitchen has a variety of foods for everyone. The restaurant places a strong emphasis on serving foods that are healthy as opposed to places like..."
1 ") states that the" "...7 A well padded devices to support patient bony areas will protect patient from developing pressure ulcers or trauma (Fortunato N 2000) S12 (AfPP 2011) states that the condition of a patient's skin should be checked following surgery and any changes in condition documented and action taken as required. S13 (AfPP 201..."
1 "and that it is" "...ees that the whole situation is off but still decides to be rational. Poole on the other hand keeps telling that the thing in the room is not Jekyll, and that it is some sort of dwarf. Utterson finally decides to break down the door to see who is in the room. Both men are convinced that it is Hyde. They both call..."
1 "has learned that he" "...ey runs into Chauvelin again. This time he has a knife on her throat and he says he knows the real identity of her as Marguerite St. Just and that he has learned that he broke into the “Fisherman’s Rest” to discover Armand had betrayed France. Chauvelin said that he released Lord Antony and Andrew Ffoulkes and they wi..."
0 "it appears that the" "...or restoring the foyer to its original condition, and to account for the loss of rent during the restoration period. In the case under consideration, it appears that the appropriate amount of damages for the breach of contract is the amount that will place Aragorn Ltd in the same position as if the breach had never oc..."
1 "and that is super" "...e all along, a superhero I call mother. She may not be able to fly like Superman or be able to shoot webs like Spider-Man, but she does have a power, and that is super strength. When most people hear that my mom has super strength, they might think she’s super muscular, but the truth is she isn’t. She can’t lift a c..."
1 "They feel that Jerry" "...cement.       Jerry’s parents suggested that Jerry needed to be in the behavior disorder program within the home district public high school setting. They feel that Jerry should of never been placed in the alternative program.     Jerry did not acrue the necessary credits to graduate with his peers, instead his was eig..."
1 "color that was similar" "... for much time.”. “Okay, ossan.”  The young Emiya saw the serious look his father was giving him and gingerly picked the redhead, mesmerized with the color that was similar to his own. The raven haired gave a nod to him and started to walk towards the house, Shirou soon followed holding the girl tenderly. Taiga Fujimura,..."
1 "I think that she" "...nutrients that she needs. I suggest that Kylie seek a professional nutritionist who understands what kind of diet a ballet dancer needs. Furthermore, I think that she should find new ballet instructors who understand the importance of eating correctly, and who can be positive influences in reaching Kylie's life dre..."
0 "eyes that were as" "... he went limping up and down the vestibule, with his grey hair sticking up in scrubbing-brush fashion, his shrivelled yellow face, and his large dark eyes that were as keen as any hawk's, and yet soft as a buck's. The whole room was hung with trophies of his numerous hunting expeditions, and he had some story about ..."
1 ", that is inside" "...nt of him. Naruto's eye's sparkled as he saw the rabbit. But before he could catch, it hopped away.   \"Wait my food! Come back to the place you belong, that is inside my stomach\" Naruto shouted as he ran behind the rabbit.   Whoosh!   A sound caught his ear as he immediately jumped backwards. A small  bead like pro..."
"equipment that is not" "...h”. Not only in the classroom but also school co-curriculars. Rowing is a great example. Males get the better equipement and they girls are left with equipment that is not good in comparison." 1
1 "activists believe that money" "Summary: With the vast amount of money going into making the Olympics as successful as possible, many human rights activists believe that money is being put to the wrong use. The activists Brazil could be^using that money to help many families out of poverty. That money could be used to provi..."
1 "to say that I" "...between Ilorin and Ibadan for two nights. We were three. The other two were the motor-boys (Karen mota or Karnukan motar). I am sure there is no need to say that I missed the interview. In fact, the gate security did not even allow me access to the embassy offices. That was how I lost the chance to study at Impe..."
1 "to declare that “" "...n Udham Singh was exemplary. The December 1940 issue of Hindustan Ghadr published an unsigned poem that caused an Indian Political Intelligence agent to declare that “it is a long time since the Hindustan Ghadr has appeared with anything so strongly supporting the cult of assassination” (IPI to Mr. Silver 28 January..."
1 "was discovered that it" "...server as an encoded file, which must be decoded on the client side. Where in the process this file could be decoded was originally a mystery, but it was discovered that it could be decoded as it was loaded in through the tile load function. The default implementation of the tile load function simply creates a new Image ..."
1 "say that is not" "...lly ugly, but it is art, for example  art work with a bunch of line people call that an art work, street paint looks are better than those but people say that is not art. Don't use your kids as a tool to show off, if you really want to show off you could just buy a sport car or a Rolex to show off that would be th..."
0 "and that is they" "...ng schools. These girls are in jail for a variety of reasons from skipping school to using drugs to being molested. They all have one thing in common and that is they are hurting. My teaching and ministering helps them cope with the problems they have experienced in life. I have never experienced any of these situa..."
1 "he realized that he" "Ender's game As Ender was about to board the ship he realized that he never wanted to go. He wanted fame. He thought to himself I will never see home again. He decided to at the last moment possible, escape from the shi..."
1 "is agreed that it" "...treatment. In summary, a range of approaches have been employed to intervene in RSOD and although there is evidence of some effectiveness, largely it is agreed that it is difficult to engage people, with risky drinking behaviours, in treatment and treatment adherence beyond intervention contexts is challenging. Give..."
0 "and that is why" "...ion. Also defends the self against commit suicide. Nevertheless this defence is not strong. The depressive rejection also devastates the sense of act and that is why causes the suicidal act. Melancholic depressive does not protect himself or herself against death. Fictional creations transform the death drive into..."
1 "PNP stated that there" "...alized groups such as alleged prostitutes, drug users, as well as women from low income families who were arrested due to minor crimes. Moreover, the PNP stated that there are many cases of rape that remain unreported as an increasing trend appears eminent (U.S Department of State, 2007).  \tBy definition, rape can viewe..."
1 "motivation is that you" "...hat prevent you from focusing on your goals. Provided you are in good health, you have the means to work daily toward your goals. The good news about motivation is that you don’t actually need it. Realize that feeling like doing something and having the ability to do something are two different things. You can still work..."
1 "closely surprised that it" "...er added to it, and in the gift field beneath [Code Unknown], [Water Tree] was now listed.   “Wow!” Naruto muttered as he looked at the card a little closely surprised that it can also function as a storage scroll.     "
0 "topic that were either" "...my outcome was that I found it exceedingly difficult to condense my findings into a concise, coherent report, which meant that there were areas of my topic that were either completely omitted or were included, but not given as much attention as I would have liked. This was certainly true of my discussion about the beauty..."
1 "be said that there" "... taker. But by abolishing this particular clause the government has made family to accept disable persons and to have them in their houses. So it can be said that there is a possibility of improvement in the out dated working practices and there is a scope for adopting new ideas to take care of elderly people. The au..."
1 "only wish that Elizabeth" "...ton, Elizabeth finds two letter from Jane. One says that Lydia has married Mr. Wickham. I do not understand why she would do something that stupid. I only wish that Elizabeth had told the                        In Chapter 47 and 48                        In Chapter 56                        In Chapters 59, 60 and 61       ..."
1 "god knows that I" "...dn't care. She could think what she wanted too, but I was dancing to the beat of my own drum in the moment. I slung my purse over my shoulder because god knows that I would need it being with Darcy, she would see something that I needed and insist I buy it because it was a must to add to my wardrobe. I was a jeans ..."
1 "reason is that without" "...eap labour that many international corporations seek for, money is flooded to these countries and leads to briskly economic growth. Another advocated reason is that without globalization, some global issues are hard to be successfully addressed. Some challenges such as climate change, financial crisis affect every countr..."
1 "This means that we" "...efore hand.  NO GODMODDING whatsoever. You control only the character you applied for.   This roleplay will contain violence and other mature themes. This means that we will be an 18+ group. All characters will need to be over 18, however that does not mean you must be that age to apply. Do keep in mind though, that ..."
0 "in hopes that the" "...ino musicians continued to play even as their conductor, Black American officer Lt. Walter H. Loving, paused to tie a white handkerchief to his baton in hopes that the dim moonlight might illuminate it as he delivered his cues to the band. But, this was unnecessary. The Filipino musicians played on without the assis..."
0 ", that was a" "...ves. They needed to create and break their own PR (personal record) daily. They need to learn the meaning of compete and embody it all day daily.   OK, that was a starting point, but what else did I want them to do? They can get good grades with rote memorization, but that isn’t the point of education. Is that ..."
1 "also recommends that Sydney" "...e flywheel speed transducers on their vessels • the training of masters with respect to practicing contingency plans for control failures. The report also recommends that Sydney Ferries should examine the propulsion control systems on all of their vessels in light of this accident and mitigate the risks of these systems faili..."
1 "I had that no" "...things to learn. but what I have  learned is that no one can ever be little me unless I let them. I had to learn on my own no matter how much support I had that no one tell  me that something is wrong with me and I will believe it unless there is really something wrong with me. everyone is here for a reason undo..."
1 "soon realized that it" "...nutes. Mark was near by camping he was gazing at the stars and he saw a blink of light in the distance. At first he thought it was a shooting star by soon realized that it was  a spaceship and it landed close to his campgrounds.  He hoped on his dirt bike and went over there to look what happened. He see that it’s a spa..."
1 "for shows that variations" "...hether bank’s co-production as measured by automation yields higher market share. The study shows that variations in automation/co-production account for shows that variations in automation/co-production account for 31.38% in market share. This the highest correlation between financial performance and automation. Automated ..."
1 "I realize that I" "...op just to the side of my breast with his thumb underneath it, the other hand still on my ass, caressing me through my dress. I’m almost ashamed when I realize that I’m rubbing my hips against him, but then he’s grinding back into me, and it feels so good.  \tThen, suddenly my feet are back on the ground and he’s pu..."
0 "they found that the" "...d in 2013 by Gasch and colleagues identified age as being a significant factor of mortality in HAI of SAB (33% in their study were >70). In addition, they found that the majority of HAI were from catheter injections (54%), with 38% originating in the lower respiratory tract. Indeed, after age, infections originating i..."
1 "who stated that she" " Called NATIONAL ACCOUNTS TECHNICIAN 4 - ORLANDO FL to confirm ETA , Spoke to Cassandra who stated that she will update site  \"ETA will be met\" I called 7-Eleven and store notify, spoke to Tom/ASM    Tech Jose/ICEE called to time out. Tech reset IR Element,..."
1 "all agree that there" "How to Run a Paperless Tax Office with Google Apps on a Budget.  The World has Changed.  We can all agree that there is no going back in the digital age. Today we live in the world of emails and direct deposits. There is a chance that you work with someone you rarel..."
1 "article suggests that Udham" "...arangis (Hindustan Ghadr September 1940, Ibid.).  Underscoring the excesses of colonial rule, and the extraordinary power of the insurgent sigh, this article suggests that Udham Singh’s execution was an example of British tyranny. The full appreciation and canonization of Udham Singh’s martyrdom, however, seemed to require a ..."
0 "be mentioned that the" "...and the Schottel unit vectored for maximum ahead thrust. The report stated with regard to the master’s attempt to declutch the main engine: It should be mentioned that the clutch arrangement does not allow for the engagement or disengagement whilst the engine rpm is at maximum, (the reason the Master was unable to clutc..."
1 "to remember that you" "...iler. Although it seems backwards not providing your audience with ample information and show them you have what they are looking for, it’s important to remember that you are selling an experience not a product and an experience is entering the unknown.  Speculation A viral campaign can’t truly become a social media ex..."
1 "wrote that it assumes" "...conduct of participants through the litigation process not the environmental and health issues which had been raised in the original suit.  The Court wrote that it assumes \"that there is pollution in the Orienté\" and that \"improvement of conditions for the residents of the Orienté appears to be both desirable and overdu..."
1 "to  feel that I" "...loyal opposition,  ask appropriate questions to get others to think clearly.   in the power style I my  high score describes me as a person who likes to  feel that I am in charge at all times . I tend to feel frightened and helpless when not in an absolute control,  yet I typically remain and what is causing these..."
1 "He suggests that you" "... avatar, Professor Willow presents you with your Pokedex and tells you that there should be a Bulbasaur, Squirtle, and Charmander near your location. He suggests that you capture one of them as your starter Pokemon, to be your constant friend and companion on at least the first steps of your journey. What he isn't tell..."
0 "is that" "... the woman's scarf. Then they hide the baby in a hollow tree trunk. And the two of them flee. Then a troll appears walking with a human hand in hand, is that Aaron? And is that troll Enna? My guardian troll Enna? She raised Aaron and I, where am I though? Aaron seems to hear something then leads Enna to th..."
1 "Chyntia conformed that we" "...tomer confirmed that payment type she will use.   I see the email chain that she was asking about making a deposit and not use boleto, evem know that Chyntia conformed that we do not offer this option, we want to make sure that the customer understood and will proceed with the boleto option. "
1 "this means that products" "...nt of products sold would decrease, reducing sales and therefore profits. Exchange rates High exchange rates decrease the cost of importing products, this means that products the business imports will be cheaper to buy and also more profitable. The cheaper prices of the product means that more people will buy it. Low excha..."
1 ") reported that ESIN" "...lso not well established. Several advantages of ESIN fixation have been described for pediatric both-bone forearm fractures(10, 22). Antabak et al.(22) reported that ESIN osteosynthesis for diaphyseal forearm fractures remains a valid technique with very good functional results. However, some complications of ESIN incl..."
0 "dress that is red" "... panties. I am given a bath in bathtub and I am washed thoroughly and then she dress me in my red panties and my red bra and I am wearing my finished dress that is red.   Abbie goes up with her nanny and meets her master Alastair and another gentleman in the hallway. The gentleman introduced himself as Glenn and tel..."
1 "I believe that if" "...that by taking this course I will learn how to develop a system to organize my time & better manage it.  I also tend to be a bit of a yes person, and I believe that if I had a better grasp of what time I have available and what I don’t have available then I’ll utilize my “yes’” and “no” responses in a way that I can..."
1 "strongly recommended that I" "... my strengths would offer a valuable contribution to the growth and reputation   I recently spoken with Andrew Worsley from your BMW business, and he strongly recommended that I send you my resume. Knowing the requirements of your open position for a financial analyst, he concludes that I am the ideal candidate.   I was refer..."
1 "substance that is used" "Zoe Hunt \tIndustrial Revolution \t8 SEALP SOSE \t19 July 2016    Anaesthetic   Anaesthetic is a drug-like substance that is used to induce insensitivity to pain. (Reference:http://www.dictionary.com/browse/anaesthetic)  Anaesthesia is commonly used in modern day surgeries and h..."
1 "this is that it" "...because it is subjective. There are no rules, regulations or specific training that result in becoming a good songwriter. One of the many benefits of this is that it gives way to absolute freedom to explore, without limitations.  As a singer and songwriter myself, I have personal experience using the process of wr..."
0 "knew that was a" "... she drove, so she can’t drink too much.”  “You’re insured on my car, remember! So you can always drive me home.” Frankie smirked.  Tyler groaned. “I knew that was a mistake.”  “I need to spend more time with you two.” Yasmin laughed.  “Trust me, you really don’t,” I warned her, holding in a laugh when they both g..."
1 "authorizer requires that it" "...s access to university services and expertise, while performing its primary duty - the oversight of member schools.   Bethel’s responsibilities as an authorizer requires that it provide comprehensive oversight of its chartered schools and is a legally authorized agency to help ensure public accountability for the schools that..."
1 "Levett-Jones states that SDL" "...racted to the SDL approach over the last to two or three decades due to the humanistic orientation and its connection with the professional field. As Levett-Jones states that SDL is an essential component for a nursing student as it aids the student to develop independent learning skills, a sense of liability, responsibility a..."
1 "illness is that when" "...of each other, they are both feelings of gesture that is expressed either in a positive, or negative approach (Boyd, 2000). A common response towards illness is that when someone is ill, it can be defined within their behaviour or appearance.  The matter is usually addressed with sympathy, yet, still observed in a nega..."
1 "be known that nothing" "...an be known for certain. The senses are easily fooled and reason follows too easily our desires. If nothing can be known for certain, how then can it be known that nothing can be known for certain? Isn’t this in itself something known for certain so there is at least one thing is known for certain? Isn’t this a contradi..."
1 "monster realize that he" "...le/influence (bullet points are fine)  Victor Frankenstein was very driven through depression to perform any of his actions. His role was to make the monster realize that he has become just a device used to inflict evil and pain to other people. Alphonse Frankenstein tries to keep Victor strong but he can’t handle anymore..."
0 "poll indicates that 60%" "...ults may be biased in the long run.  Lastly, there is the use of Survey. This investigative study uses several surveys. For example, a survey by TIME poll indicates that 60% of the respondents stated they are not comfortable with spending time on social media. At the same time, 76 percent of the interviewees reported that..."
1 "d say that I" "...all be over,” he says, pressing me against his stocky body. If I had my sight I’d bite his nose clean off. “I would do it all over again, Tennyson. I’d say that I loved you a thousand times more, and I would have had your child, only to kill it, if I knew it would rid the universe of your kind.”  “But...but...b..."
1 "position that is placed" "...tions A transfer is when an employee moves to a different position within the same salary range. A promotion is when an employee moves to a different position that is placed in a higher salary range. Reorganization is when we change the layout of departments. Salary changes as a result of transfers, promotions, and reorga..."
0 "people argue that there" "...ey help people, like teaching or nursing whereas people who are Conventional are very organised and would be enjoy being an accountant. However, some people argue that there has to be more than six personality types in the whole world and find his work quite limiting.  When you take the test, it will tell you which three ..."
0 "Naruto assumed that it" "...evertheless single out Naruto’s individual scent and follow it straight to the blonde. Naruto tugged him along by the wrist and he followed silently. Naruto assumed that it was his beast but he wasn’t channeling his full shift powers. He just wanted to find Naruto and his nose and body led him there. It was as if a path ..."
0 "dog is that I" "... pet. (Backup Q) Do you think having a pet is good or bad? Why? A.\tThe second family has a dog. I don’t have a pet. I think one advantage of having a dog is that I can become healthier by taking a walk with it. However, the disadvantage is that you have to be very responsible to take good care of the pet.   Q3. ..."
0 "indicates that" "...urce). Yahoo’s recently disclosed during their annual developer conference that their free app usage tool Flurry, increasingly the industry standard, indicates that within the much broader smartphone user community, there’s a subset of 280,000,000 “addicts” - individuals who check their mobile no less than 60 tim..."
0 "think that was in" "...am a youth program director at church. She can testify that I attend many of Kaylee’s social activities like dances.   #11 alleged to whom??? I don’t think that was in the complaint.   He pays for Kaylee’s medical insurance because I had paid for it from my check for the first 10 years of her life.  That was part of..."
0 "“Is that good" "...hs to my panties, one finger moving gently up and down between my legs.  He pushes my panties aside and the tip of his finger is just at my entrance. “Is that good? God, you’re so wet for me.”  I’m whining in my throat now, full of need, and two of his fingers move into me, moving inside of me, then tracing circ..."
1 ") found that students" "...ive, with multiple sessions required to obtain effectiveness (Whitlock et al. 2004; Wright, et al. 2016). Further, Kypri, Saunders and Gallagher (2003) found that students were less willing to engage in face-to-face counselling for RSOD, reporting fears of judgement as a barrier to seeking treatment. In summary, a range..."
1 "Coelho believes that we" "...t of pure vain. Coelho’s myth however shows that, but since the lake associated itself in also being self conceited, it didn’t get a jubilant ending. Coelho believes that we deem ourselves to be more important than anything else and he is trying to say that it should be the other way around.  2. \tI believe that Santiago, ..."
0 "process that is administered" "...ty management system and a customer does not associate this with our ISO accreditation. Our quality management system has a formal customer complaint process that is administered by the Business Management Services (BMS) team. Customer complaints are raised by the sales team sent to the BMS team and allocated to an Operations ..."
1 "state that is nearing" ".... Music in your mind is somewhat hazy and less clear. There are times when you’ll be able to hear in much more detail, but I find you have to be in a state that is nearing sleep for this to happen. It’s a good state for the initial realization of a composition, but it’s not very effective for composing. The reason being..."
0 "system that  is corrupt" "...ow them to do another even the process of electing leaders that we think share our beliefs can fail us  Everyone should share in tax paying it is the system that  is corrupt fails us not the use of the tex dollars"
1 "She claims that her" "...dy Blakeney’s brother, came by to visit before he went on Percy’s private yacht back to France to take care of some business, she begs him not to go. She claims that her marriage with Percy is dying because of all of his trips and that he barely notices her. She feels that without him she will feel lonely despite Sir...."
0 "I guess that’" "...ble to find a woman who is basically a google translator. Her job somehow fits her character as well, if I might add. Mom can never stop yapping. But I guess that’s what makes Mom so sweet.  Additionally, with parents like mine, I learn more than I need to. Way more. Sure I get the 6 requiring subjects: math, sc..."
1 "instrument that is developed" "...measures the theory it is measuring (Sekaran & Bougie 2013:225). Validity is a test to ensure that we test the right theory, and it tests how well an instrument that is developed measures a particular theory. (Sekaran & Bougie 2013:225). It is therefore of utmost importance to ascertain that the data collected is valid and rel..."
0 "images that is being" "...leading back to persuading the audience to not buy the products being made from animal fur. Advert A has a small amount of words but this is from the images that is being portrayed, using the image tells the reader that the remains are horrifying and animals shouldn’t be used. Advert B has not used this method to convi..."
1 "body deems that a" "...ory behind the legality and illegality includes the morality behind the process of either legalizing or illegalizing a practice.  Whether an official body deems that a practice is either legal or illegal will always either criminalize, marginalize exploit or dehumanize a practice or a group of people despite the mor..."
0 "you show that you" "... - Vocabulary: citizen parade recycle cooperate  Prerequisite Skills - Guiding Questions: How do you show that you are a good citizen at home? How do you show that you are a good citizen at school? How do you show that you are a good citizen in the community? When have you worked with someone to get a job done?   Ho..."
"methods that were used" "I Hope by reading to find the educational methods that were used in first century church in the bible." 1
0 "which shows that he" "...to make the sacrifice to protect the friend that has shown so much love for him. Huck also mentions that he has no regrets for the words that he said which shows that he would do the same thing for Jim again.  ^tIn the  Adventures of Huckleberry Finn Mark Twain has mastered his choice of words allowing him to create ch..."
0 "ensured that" "...l using/ uses the light (CHRIST) today in salvation, deliverance, healing, restoration, and so on. Light is of such importance that God, the creator, ensured that both day and night are governed by it. The world has been sustained from the beginning of time till now by the light (Christ).  Light (CHRIST) aids a..."
0 "saying is that you" "...n their own way, be it verbally or with silent looks.    “But I thought… that guy…?” Luke asked, a confused, but hopeful tone to his voice.  “All I’m saying is that you shouldn’t count me out of the running just yet.” Leaving them with that final thought, I turned and left the kitchen.  ‘If that doesn’t push them int..."
1 "he said that it" "...nstructor asked me whether I felt guilty on the days when I didn’t compose. When I answered that I did feel bad about not working on music every day, he said that it was a start. Like many musicians, I used emotional feelings as a sort of barometer to indicate how well I was progressing as a composer. If I felt gu..."
1 "to say that you" "...e? She’s full of so many fucking surprises. To think you guys were nervous to tell her… Hahaha!”   “Sang, correct me if I’m wrong, but did you happen to say that you ‘sensed’ that he didn’t lie?” Nikolai asked, moving his hand from around the back of the couch that was clearly a non-blatant attempt to not have his..."
0 "because that was and" "...Do do do do Here comes the sun It’s alright” she sang. Matthew shook his head with a smile. His mom loves the Beatles and he taught Danica the lyrics because that was and always will be his favorite song. THEY DON’T HAVE MUSIC!!!! HE’S GONE CRAZY IN THE PAST 2 YEAR!  He put his finger to his lip and she stopped singing..."
0 "in bundles that it" "...d off Naruto started to wring his tail in his hands. “I’m sorry I kept us in the market for so long. But I found insulators and furs for so cheap and in bundles that it was too good of a deal to not buy them!”  Sasuke snorted and smirked up at the fretting blonde, “It’s fine Naruto. It was nice watching you.” Naruto ..."
0 "ensures that" "...e this running headband as an ear warmer while it warm days it will absorb your sweat, helping you go a step further. Its ultra soft and comfort fit, ensures that this wide headband is a must-have sports accessory that you should not miss.  • A GREAT CHOICE FOR ANY SPORT: This unisex black hair band is a wide a..."
1 "I ensured that the" "...iculates “that good order and discipline are essential to combat effectiveness has not changed throughout the years”. (Fogleman, pg. 760) In the end, I ensured that the standards were known and evenly applied across all levels of the unit.  Therefore, as the CC, I am always cognizant of how my actions (or inactions) ..."
0 "To think that I" "... person is me.”   Without letting them respond, I sauntered back into the living room, choosing to stand, as most of the seats were already taken.   “To think that I got this place to be relatively alone…” Sean trailed off as he looked around the room filled to the brim with people as the boys walked in again a fe..."
1 "was found that it" "According to Younes in [10], Grover’s algorithm was analyzed and it was found that it is ideal when the search is for only one solution, while its efficiency is decreased when the number of solutions is more than one. The effectiveness..."
1 "else that was unbeknownst" "...ened me in that regards. Additionally, the fact that there are different styles of negotiation to include different types of negotiators is something else that was unbeknownst to me. What I also enjoyed about this course was the questionnaire we completed, The Personal Bargaining Inventory. This questionnaire enlightened me..."
1 "investigations revealed that “" "...Adler Street, Stepney, London, had been granted a Pedlars Certificate in December (Metropolitan Police 5 December 1934, MEPO 2/5064). In 1937, police investigations revealed that “Udham Singh peddles hosiery and lingerie and uses a small car for the purpose; he does not appear to be short of money” (IPI to Mr. Silver 22 November..."
0 "trial that is about" "...t is between Revelation chapters 3 and 4!  Rev 3:10 YLT `Because thou didst keep the word of my endurance, I also will keep thee from the hour of the trial that is about to come upon all the world, to try those dwelling upon the earth. This verse is taken out of context to endorse the theory that the Church was promis..."
0 "should remember that this" "...ou all play a major part in society. Just because you are stuck at the bottom of this school, doesn’t mean you are at the bottom of society. You guys should remember that this is a private school. Not all can just apply and get accepted. Please know that if you are here, you are at least better than those who aren’t. And by..."
1 "am pleased that I" "... that says Glenn is she here yet. Yes she is dear Sonja my wife, our daughter Abbie has just arrived.  I am puzzled that they call me daughter, but I am pleased that I have now have a family. Abbie this is your siblings Carrie, Cassie, Chelsea, Carolyn, Caitlin, Dawn, Anniken, and Henriette.   Sonja says to Abbie yo..."
1 "letter that was given" "...tterson’s character so far, I believe he is going to search for Hyde and not stop looking until he finds him. I feel as if whatever is written in the letter that was given to Utterson by Jekyll is going to only drive Utterson to find Hyde more. At this point I also believe that Jekyll is going to die at some point. He i..."
0 "We assess that BACRIMS" "...s bandas criminales or BACRIM, will have the opportunity to capitalise to take over territory and lucrative criminal interests as the FARC withdraws. We assess that BACRIMS do not currently have the capacity to expand beyond rural areas, but violence in the [areas] is unlikely to end in the coming [term].       Power vac..."
1 "learned is that we" "...mpany and have a legal presence here in China is one more layer of insurance against many things that might go wrong when running events. One thing I learned is that we'll need detailed contracts in both English and Chinese and having the terms match "
0 "soon realises that it" "...ge girl who has been diagnosed with lung cancer and attends a cancer support group.  Hazel is 16 and is reluctant to go to the support group, but she soon realises that it was a good idea. Hazel meets a young boy named Augustus Waters. He is charming and witty. Augustus has had osteosarcoma, a rare form of bone cancer, ..."
1 ") argues that there" "...sential question that should drive a teacher to choose the tool best suited to create an environment that promotes collaboration.  Darla Jackson (2010) argues that there are four features to consider when choosing a Web 2.0 tool to utilize in the classroom: accessibility, security, ease of use, and integration.  Acces..."
0 "now believe that employees" "...y business to be successful. \tHuman resources gyrates around managing people. The management of employees is starting to take a turn as most managers now believe that employees can do a better job when they are motivated rather than supervising them every step of the way. Constant reminders and criticism will demotivate empl..."
1 "motive that was used" "...tters of his name. In German musical nomenclature, the Bb is written as a B, and the B is written as an H. This is why he was able to create the BACH motive that was used in the last fugue of his Art of Fugue collection. The four notes, B-A-C-Bb, are an example of a motive. Bach uses it throughout the piece in creative..."
0 "seashore that is very" "...s, service, and achievement        Gold:  Symbolizes wealth of knowledge with judgment to use it wisely   SCHOOL SPIRIT SONG  There’s a school by the seashore that is very dear to me And amid the lovely foothills of our mount to victory The school in the valley touched our hearts and made us strong To the schools of War..."
0 "Barral argue that there" "...efinition outlined in Article 38(1) (b) of the ICJ Statute, which states that there must be ‘state practice’ and ‘opinion juris’.   Academics such as Barral argue that there is a legal obligation of sustainable development. Firstly there are a range of legally binding international treaties which states such as Australia ..."
1 "people thought that the" "...other technologies to increase the learning experience.   I found many things surprising in this article. The first thing I found surprising was that people thought that the iPad was useful counteracting to the reflection I did before. They seemed to think iPads seem to help everything with students’ education. "
1 "limitation is that I" "...h end companies. I will be getting in contact with our school’s publications department to organise a special printing for my magazine.    A personal limitation is that I would like to only use places that I have been to myself for use in the magazine to ensure correct information and other content.    My goals by the ..."
1 ", that is were" "...s of recognition and enforcement of arbitral awards, d) What is the link between the place of recognition and enforcement and the place of arbitration, that is were the award is been made.   2.1     LEGAL FRAMEWORK APPLICABLE TO INTERNATIONAL ARBITRAL AWARDS Chapter III of the NYC provides that contracting states..."
1 "ve seen that they" "... themselves.  I believe we should use all the resources, the connections, and everything we can to help those in need.  That's why I support AARP.  I've seen that they believe the same thing and do everything that they can to provide all the support and assistance to those who want nothing more than to enjoy their g..."
1 "I realized that this" "...w works and develop more consistent habits that make it possible to stick to a routine.  The more I composed using this emotional barometer, the more I realized that this was not an effective way of dealing with motivation and inspiration. Still, guilt was the right motivator for me at the time, and I’m grateful my ins..."
1 "redhead claimed that he" "... who seek knowledge. Waver suggested they should part ways and head back home but she wanted to go after the wine barrel thief. With a proud look the redhead claimed that he would reward her. After this she tried to introduce herself but the memory became foggy and unclear. How she forgot was a question that she still cou..."
0 "all that was needed" "...sistent communication between the employer and employee is the primary contributing factor to Bob’s resignation. Improved communication may have been all that was needed to retain Bob in his current position until a position that satisfied Bob’s development needs became available. ​Career planning and development prog..."
1 "This explains that we" "... we level the playing field. We remove the effects of genetic inequality. Far from being unfair, allowing performance enhancement promotes equality.\" This explains that we wouldn’t have equality in the sport. Since the teams are basicly uneven in a genetic quality, Than drug enhancement would be cheating. "
1 "definition that is given" "...oreign language like english, I think it is interesting to add the definition that Merriam/Webster dictionary gives for english language learners.The definition that is given is the following one: “Something that does not have a single clear meaning.”   When does ambiguity happen?   When a word that has different meanings ..."
0 "This suggests that Daoism" "... and flow to facilitate life's direction. Unlike Legalism, Daoism was very much against social division, and supported the equal allocation of power. This suggests that Daoism was likely more popular amongst all people, not just the aristocrats, but also the economically struggling.  Legalism greatly differed from both Conf..."
0 "poet indicates that the" "...ingh Sarabha, a Ghadarite who was executed in 1915, and Bhagat Singh, Rajguru, and Sukhdev, executed together in 1931, among others. In this way, the poet indicates that the spirit of militant anticolonialism had been embodied many times before and that Udham Singh should not be the last. \tThe international circulation of..."
1 "but felt that it" "...e the decision and have not given the company the opportunity to improve its performance”. We still addressed the customer concerns the best we could but felt that it was hopeless trying to get Operations to improve. Since this statement from the CEO (principle 3 – involvement of people) I have not filtered any cus..."
1 "to believe that I" "...arks)  How might this impact you (positively and negatively) as a leader? (3 marks) Do self insight 3.1   I have a very high locus of control, I tend to believe that I am in control of my own destiny and am responsible for what happens to me . I believe that this would positively impact the way I am as a leader beca..."
1 "services that it provides" "... should also create a plan enabling us to differentiate ourselves from our competition. As a company XYZ could offer something that adds value to the services that it provides to it prospects.  Offering unique incentives in the form of special deals on what they purchase from the company can go a long way in keeping old cus..."
0 "everything that is happening" "...de dice CONNECT WITH US, el párrafo que está en la parte de abajo solo dale copy paste al párrafo de abajo.  Connect with us and stay up to date with everything that is happening with Copper Design.   ABOUT US  Copper Design is a manufacturing company focused to create, sale and export the most beautiful art products on copper..."
0 "discovered that" "...ainable initiatives.  How we got our name  It all begins in 1964.   Back then, a team of pretty smart individuals led by Professor Raphael Mechoulam, discovered that THC is responsible for the majority of the plant’s psychoactive properties. His desire for discovery, creativity, innovation and exploration are all ..."
1 "action that is necessary" "...f the employee, fellow employees and the company. In most cases, if you have a performance problem, your supervisor will advise you of the corrective action that is necessary and give you an opportunity to improve via the use of the Improvement Agreement. A disciplinary referral may include informal verbal warnings as well..."
1 "She feels that without" "...f some business, she begs him not to go. She claims that her marriage with Percy is dying because of all of his trips and that he barely notices her. She feels that without him she will feel lonely despite Sir. Percy living under the same roof as her. As she watches Armand sail away, she relives a memory back in France w..."
0 "and proves that rather" "...as such a good soul should”, it sets up her false accusation of being a witch later on. It makes Hale rethink his involvement in being a witch hunter and proves that rather than being a legitimate claim, that the trials were used to purposefully damage another townspeople’s reputation. Act 1 #30 The effect Miller creates..."
1 "perspective is that we" "...nd multiple perspectives on how the world views us and how we view our own country. A similarity between the global perspective and the United states perspective is that we don't have good public safety because of gun violence. We also do not have a good public school system which contributes to the overall safety of the..."
1 "t-test is that the" "...d-samples t-test. The paired-samples t-test will determine if nurses are more concerned with job security or pay. The assumption of the paired-sample t-test is that the cases represent a random sample from the population of nurses, and the difference scores are independent of each other.         Results The mean diff..."
0 "universe that is driven" "...usly it is all bullshit! When should I come out of the closet or does it matter? I am afraid to, plus it would matter if it had significance but in a universe that is driven by the 2nd law of thermodynamics the fate of the universe is heat death or the big rip but ultimately unless science find a way to create cold fusion..."
0 "but that is starting" "...t extensive research on art therapy and its effects on students, for the simple fact that many schools do not intertwine the two in their curriculum, but that is starting to change. Harvard medical school has added art to their curriculums because they believe it will make their students more well rounded, empathetic, ..."
1 "integration is that students" "... are also a multitude of other add-ons that are available to add increased productivity and functioning to a Google document.  The limitation of this integration is that students without access to the GAFE suite may struggle to have the necessary access to the other tools integrated with Google Docs. Through the examination of..."
0 "points total that we" "...rt piece and the Beethoven piece. Let’s use our notes to figure out what makes the Beethoven piece sound different from the Mozart piece. We have ten points total that we need to compare to both pieces. Now we have to look at the larger piece to determine if our generalities about one particular moment apply to the wor..."
1 "knowledge is that the" "...lassification, ect.) that individual constructs to make sense out of the world and to organise information.” (Charlesworth et al., 2013 p.11). Social knowledge is that the learning is being created by immediate others (Charlesworth et al., 2013, p. 11).   This Social knowledge starts to convey another constructivist the..."
1 "oxide that was designed" "...sia had been conducted and Henry Hickmen had formulated and anaesthetic that could be used on animals.  In 1845, Dr. Wells publicly inhaled a nitrous oxide that was designed to anaesthetise during dental extraction.  However, this nitrous oxide anaesthesia was unsuccessful a dm the local General deemed it a \"humbug.\" (Woo..."
0 "him knows that as" "...seven!” Junmyeon calls out to the chefs, Do Kyungri and Park Chanyoung. Despite having a job at a cafe, Junmyeon was a hopeless cook, everyone around him knows that as well as they try to keep him away from the stove at all times. He shifts aside to let servers Huang Zifei and Kim Jungin walk past, hands full with t..."
0 "he proclaimed that “" "...ia. I have great sympathy with the workers of England. I am against the Imperialist Government” (Singh 5 June 1940, Ibid.). More explicitly, in 1927, he proclaimed that “he had intended to murder Europeans who were ruling over India and that he fully sympathized with the Bolshevics [sic], as their object was to liberat..."
1 "I believe that this" "...ies and I believe we let them talk and we listen instead. They deserve to have attention and I think we should give it to them. That’s my opinion and I believe that this article is not biased because it doesn’t show what side it is favoring, but this was a very interesting article and I firmly believe that schools sho..."
1 "can tell that the" "...ensitive Stomach   Figuring that your dog has a sensitive stomach issue is a frustrating process. Not only is the gas and diarrhea unpleasant but you can tell that the poor thing is actually in discomfort. For most German Shepherds dog owners this situation is very familiar with them.  German Shepherd Dogs, commonly..."
1 "to believe that a" "...y your supervisor introduced a new policy that directly impacted your ability to service your client(s)? How did you handle it?    2) You have reason to believe that a co-worker is preparing to divulge company secrets to a rival MCN. These secrets have the potential to really damage the company. How would you deal w..."
0 "explains that" "...ally move, unlike most apps and games. Graham Thomas, a professor of psychiatry at the Miriam Hospital’s Weight Control and Diabetes Research Center, explains that “the advances in technology have promoted reduced physical activity and increased time in sedentary behavior, which comes with well-known health risk..."
1 "to reveal that you" "...wise man made him go back and observe the castle. When he did that, he forgot about the oil and came back empty handed to the wise man. This is meant to reveal that you shouldn’t go unnoticed to the beauties of the world that surround you, but you shouldn’t forget the other keys to life such as family and friends.  8..."
0 "reasons is that it" "...nitely has a positive effect on society. \tPokemon Go has proven to be a benefit to society for countless reasons. The first and most obvious of those reasons is that it promotes exercise and requires players to actually move, unlike most apps and games. Graham Thomas, a professor of psychiatry at the Miriam Hospital’..."
0 ", that was taken" "...ity batteries (16000mAh +) in the below $20 range so its hard to give an 8000mAh a great score. On another note this device does work as advertised so, that was taken into consideration.   Around the Web: 5.0 The EPB Power Bank is currently holding a 5.0 on Amazon.com    Thoughts I spent a few weeks with this devic..."
"like that is illogical" "...y damage.”* A-SU spoke with hesitation as several thoughts crossed it mind.* “But yours did.in a significant manner. Throwing your body into the fray like that is illogical,  " 1
1 "I contend that as" "... students, giving them a pathway to success. I left the completed work visible so as all students were able to reference their own work against mine. I contend that as argued by Hattie (2014), that student^achievement and engagement can be maximised when educators (me) sees learning through the eyes of the students ..."
"station that is simply" "...re have you not Abbie, when you was first put in diapers by me and my sister. I see there is lot of diapers in the bathroom where the diaper changing station that is simply a changing pad put on   " 1
1 "studies show that the" "...lated KRAS4b. Structure-based mutational studies suggest key roles played by various amino acids involved in the KRAS4b-PDEδ interaction. Our binding studies show that the carboxymethyl group present^on farnesylated C185 plays a key role in the KRAS4b-PDEδ interaction. Structure and sequence analysis of various prenylat..."
1 "we discovered that she" ".... As we initiated in to introduce shook hands, and ourselves, we had noticed that Salwa looked tired, sad and depressed. Throughout the conversation, we discovered that she has been married since 10 years. She lost her husband in a car accident one year before. She has four children:-Mohammad 6years, Ms. Fathima 4years, ..."
1 "he realized that his" "...tudying alchemy at the University he was ready to create a monster by sewing together dead body parts. When he had accomplished creating his monster, he realized that his monster was very ugly and had just had a dream about his mother and Elizabeth’s corpse. He left his creation all alone and went to his best friend He..."
1 "solitude means that you" "...-time, but don’t believe that we don’t can enjoy social interactions with other. Spend time alone and actually enjoy it is a virtue. Being content in solitude means that you don’t waste time and money on useless distractions and superficial friendships. We can find happiness and strength in quiet moments when we can refle..."
1 "true that" "...conomic conditions, which leads to differential involvement in crime and then profiling/racism, which supports a differential selection theory.  It’s true that poverty contributes to criminality across all races, but when you control for poverty, differences in crime rates do not disappear.  It’s a misunders..."
1 "personally feel that I" "...r Digital Fax Service Now, this is not something new. There are few company out there that offer document management solutions for tax offices. But I personally feel that I am not in control of when using those services.  For example, in our practice we use TaxAct Software for preparing client personal income taxes. Grea..."
0 "bag that is placed" "...r that fits me its amazing but its seems to me there seems to be folks that make strollers and baby stuff for adults even. Cassie takes with a diaper bag that is placed in the storage place in my stroller since my siblings takes with them a diaper bag in case I need to get my diapers changed during the ride outside. ..."
1 "and practises  that they" "...it  doesn't mean that they are the best teachers for a child .  Personally, parents cannot become a good teacher as they are biased about the culture and practises  that they follow and will not want their child to explore other culture . Consequently , it will hampers the development of child.   To illustrate , if a paren..."
1 ") argues that it" "... design and so it is about convincing them and making them believe in the design.  However, Hilman Curtis comes from a different corner.  Curtis (2015) argues that it is about not understanding one another and that is the problem because often the client and the designer want “almost always is the same thing” (p. 2..."
"then conclude that the" "...e solution and evaluate the results to see if our decision was right. If everything is good, the customer got his product and is jubilant with it; we then conclude that the right resolution." 1
0 "hierarchy that is clearly" "...y of end users. We will also use light colors and simple shapes to construct the overall layout and look of the site. TYPOGRAPHY Design a typographic hierarchy that is clearly structured and use web^fonts readable on all platforms. CONTENT  Due to an increasing number of websites available on the Internet, companies are exp..."
1 ") that is used" "...components of software solutions offered by the business intelligence community.  This analysis should ultimately inform the request for proposal (RFP) that is used to construct the ideal decision support system. Gather feedback from the campus community on a data governance policy framework. Additionally, identi..."
1 "clearly shows that this" "...my 5’5 ft height by a few inches. He has a sharp jaw with narrow violet eyes and short strawberry blonde hair. His body stature seems firm and broad, clearly shows that this guy is either in a sport or just exercise a lot. He is wearing the school standardized uniform: a white collar shirt with two red stripe running arou..."
0 ", that is private" "...n page 30-31. “…I don’t carry a gun like some of my more cowboy colleagues.” the term “cowboys” symbolises Valentines male cohorts in her line of work, that is private investigating, and connotes that men require weapons to work effectively, oppose to Valentine, where she is able to use just her “legs as weapons”.  ..."
1 "we see that he" "...fallen. This is when we see the first real change in Cole. Cole realizes that the baby sparrows did not deserve death at all. When Cole realizes this we see that he has stopped blaming something else and noticing that he was the one that should have been blammed. After this coincidence the Spirit Bear returns, Co..."
1 "sob that was halfway" "...and saw that they were unconscious. Or at least Gary was. Upon further inspection we saw Toby, his face twisted in a rictus of death. I choked back a sob that was halfway in my throat, as Zee closed Toby's eyes. “Come on, we need to leave before Gary wakes up.”  After scaling our third ledge, we made it to a small rece..."
1 "can testify that she" "...y abusive to him or either of the girls. He can also testify that he and I have primarily taken responsibilty of financial supporting Kaylee.  Kaylee can testify that she would like to live with me and visit her dad.  She can testify that changing every week was very unsettling and stressful for her. She can testify th..."
1 "time frame that the" "...pal the following year to discuss the goals set within the SIP. Here, for there to be real change, the administration asked for three years. That was time frame that the administration agreed would be needed for change to occur. Too often some of the staff of the school saw new teaching strategies as a ‘flash in the p..."
1 "to say that your" "... the capacity to to defend himself against the others (99).   Act 3 #24 Danforth puts so much faith into Elizabeth because it takes a lot of strength to say that your husband committed adultery. With this however, we see that Elizabeth wasn’t able to pull through, showing that their still lacks trust in between the..."
1 "me realize that I" "...t to enjoy learning. If I were to state the single most biggest thing he has done for me, then it would be that he showed me my capabilities. He made me realize that I wasn’t normal, that I can be “Great” and to do that I have lower myself and eradicate my arrogance. I studied under him till my A levels finished, wh..."
1 "to mention that apparently" "...Minister. “Because, I mean, it would certainly make him more lenient than I am considering you have his tax records and his bank account numbers. Not to mention that apparently you’ve bugged his cellphone and you somehow have records of every call and text he makes.” He paused, pulling up a thin blue piece of paper. “You’re ..."
1 "has agreed that Abbie" "...ng towards me and your sisters, one of your sister are going to find a suitable punishment for you Abbie. Carrie tells Sonja that she and her sisters has agreed that Abbie needs to be spanked on her bum. I am told to lay down on the lap of Carrie, and from fear that something worse will happen I do as she tells me. Abbi..."
1 "subject that was studied" "...and danced the DJ night away. Be it the tension that assessments and semesters brought me or the joy of attaining unexpected grades and marks for any subject that was studied mere hours before an exam. These were my experience as I lived through my first year and pretty much the same situation for anyone in this college. B..."
1 "I find that transportation" "...unfortunately, have to decline the offer. The Matworks is a great company and could have provided me with great opportunities and career development. I find that transportation and time will be a major issue with my busy schedule. This would lead me to focus more on the internship rather than my future and academics which pl..."
1 "have claimed that the" "...ple scared and worried. The subject that leads to division and hatred, so much so, an MP was assassinated because of her views on immigration. People have claimed that the IN campaign have \"milked\" her death but is that not another example of hatred and division by saying these things? When you have Nigel Farage standin..."
1 "you accept that the" "... in the code”; instead of spending time on static iterations created in Photoshop, all stakeholders get to experience a live website much sooner.  If you accept that the desktop experience is now inherently equal or less important than mobile or tablet views and if content is prioritized correctly in the first step, t..."
1 "Please understand that I" "...nd worse yet any combination of the three. The outside world becomes darker from the inside and we guard our bubble with a military like vigilance.   Please understand that I’m not saying that the world we live in is all doom and gloom, but I will say that after a sexual assault has occurred to you or one of your family me..."
1 "you had that information" "...se, fearing for her safety. “I’m sorry I do not have more information to share.  People really didn’t know a lot about her.” “I understand.  I’m glad you had that information to share.”  Sara replied with a slight smile. “Well, if there are no other questions are you ready to go see the manor?” he asked, changing the subje..."
1 "guidelines that were useful" "...ethoven. They are the procedures that could be broadly replicated with a limited risk of disaster. Essentially, Sonata form as we know it is a set of guidelines that were useful for twentieth century theorists to get a better understanding of the music of the past. It’s not that composers of the day sat down with a formula an..."
"to understand that everything" "...out find the most effective way to communicate without doing too much to the design..It has to “work”.   \tFinally, we have justify.  To justify means to understand that everything that we put into " 1
1 "methodology is that identification" "...ment introduced the Integrated Methodology for Collection and Analysis of Data and Information about Human Trafficking. One of the advantages of this methodology is that identification of the cases^of human trafficking does not depend on a particularized enumeration of specific trafficking-related crimes. Data related to all penal t..."
1 "be reassured that no" "...f how to get in touch with the researcher if they wish to withdraw their data.   To assure confidentiality of the participants, the participants will be reassured that no identifiable information about them will be disclosed. Fisher (2008) pointed out that the need for participants’ data to be processed in an anonymous..."
0 "teacher reports that Tiffany" "...r math calculation (7th percentile).  Based on teacher records, Tiffany’s classroom achievement in mathematics is also below grade expectations.  Her teacher reports that Tiffany is better with problem solving but has not been able to memorize her multiplication facts and often inverts her fractions.  Tiffany struggles with ma..."
"collection is that it" "... epiphany they are able to break away from the dull or burdensome life they were living before. One thing I noticed on the theme of paralysis in this collection is that it is encompassed into the t \t \t \t" 1
1 "to note that the" "...is automatically generated for all online sources used. The bibliography generated is then presented in APA, Chicago, and MLA styles. It is important to note that the bibliography feature cites the website;^therefore, other sources (i.e., journal articles, movies, newspapers, magazines, magazines, television/radio,..."
1 "Jasmine reported that Bunnie" "... Cruse, grabbed her by the neck. Jasmine reported that Bunnie and a second bouncer Vanson Mendoza, forced her into an elevator. While in the elevator Jasmine reported that Bunnie slammed her face into the wall several times while strangling her. Once the elevator reached the bottom level, Jasmine stated that Bunnie kept her in..."
1 "We believe that each" "...  On behalf of all the management and employees of Hunter's Furniture and Appliance, we welcome you and wish you every success in your new position.  We believe that each employee should have a commitment to excellence as being part of Hunter's Furniture and Appliance and we hope you will take pride in being a member o..."
1 ": Assume that the" "... that. You can equate these points as points toward your own personal development.  \tNow let's go through the 4-Step Technique:  \t1 - Anger-projection: Assume that the other person anger-projects against you and said this to you:   \t- \"You're an idiot, don't ever bother talking to me again!!\"  \t2 - Fear: You'll have..."
0 "distraction is that many" "...     Question 4: The implication of Morelli’s Quote for Civic Engagement  ​Civic engagement is hindered by the advancement of social media. The major distraction is that many individuals are electronically connected, whether they are at work or home. This affects their social life, such that they allocate little or no time..."
0 "feminism that was continued" "...should behave a certain way and normalising women’s expressions and desires, hence contributing to the theme of feminism. This reflected the theme of feminism that was continued conveyed throughout the novel in which can be exhibited on page 30-31. “…I don’t carry a gun like some of my more cowboy colleagues.” the term “cowbo..."
0 "animals that were domesticated" "...sticated animal the dog may have helped Hunters track game animals additionally provided me but also eventually supplied milk, wool, and energy  Many animals that were domesticated included cattle, goats, sheep,  and buffalo The causes that caused population to begin agriculture Include climate change which could change local cl..."
1 "so fast that he" "...at he does not. Tony needs to continue his work toward understanding that he is valuable when he feels depressed. His feelings toward himself plummet so fast that he believes those around him also feel the way he does.  R   R  R    6/14/16   6/14/16  6/14/16    Goal C:  Tony wants to learn what empathy means.  Pro..."
1 "sure that it is" "...NaCl\t\t\t\tscoopula\t\t\tstriker\t\t\t\t\twatch glass\t\t\tstir rod triple-beam balance\t\t\tevaporating dish \t\t  Procedure Before using the triple beam balance, make sure that it is level and that the pointer rests at zero.  If all slider masses are set at zero but the pointer is not at zero, adjust the calibration knob on the le..."
1 "models that were actually" "...vided on your sunglasses. In addition, The carbon fiber pattern on your eyewear was not constructed of real carbonfibre.  Also the different sunglass models that were actually contrstucted with these carbon temples have a “red” laminated wood stripe in the center of the temple.  Such a stripe is not present on your frame. T..."
0 "has announced that a" "...l rate of 60,000 rai. Panod Local Biz/MID/August 11, 2016 [Sra Kaeo's special economic zone expected to be operable in 2018] The Ministry of Industry has announced that a special economic zone (SEZ) in Sa Kaeo (สระแก้ว) province has made significant progress and is expected to be operational within 2018. Industry Minis..."
0 "actually find that not" ".... This also helps you be less competitive in a competitive environment. Once you get past school, sports, and other competitive activities, you could actually find that not everything in life is full of competition. To apply this habit, you need to win respect of yourself, and overcome insecurities about how smart, good ..."
1 "structure is that you" "... negotiate for a promotion or raise depending on their work performance.   Cosmos Decentralization Risk   “A possible disadvantage of a decentralized structure is that you must relinquish a bit of control;you must put your faith in others to continue to carry out your company's vision and mission” (Joseph, 2016). This i..."
1 "media that is specific" "...robes.   Direct testing includes visualizing the microbe directly in tissue or blood samples or growing the microbe out of tissue or blood samples in media that is specific for that microbe. Direct testing is not species specific, so any species of the microbe can be diagnosed. Polymerase chain reaction (PCR) tests direc..."
1 "story that is their" "...esire”(Curtis 2015).   In this moment we have to ask the right question so we can understand who they are.  Then we have to listen to hear the unique story that is their organization.  One must listen to understand what the clients want, need and desires.  Th"
1 "student that is present" "...s your mouth water and you instantly start to become hungry for the food set out before you. The teacher then proceeds to give out the plates to each student that is present in the class. The next part of the period is reflecting on the taste of the food and also thinking about what we will be eating next period and also ..."
1 "resilience show that he" "...Submitted to: Ms. Baudin Submitted by: Tyra Zander                     The Resilience and Humanity of Vladek Spiegelman   Question: How does Vladek’s resilience show that he is humane?                               The Resilience and Humanity of Vladek Spiegelman Characters who undergo intense experiences can display many..."
1 "to ensure that teachers" "...e have a moral and ethical imperative to educate every student’. Principals can modify organizational structures, for instance ,by changing schedules to ensure that teachers can share a common planning time and use that time to discuss improving instruction. This kind of restructuring also reinforces the use of collaborat..."
1 "said that it was" "...c. I was partnered up with a girl named Amy. There I was with Amy, practicing telling her this was my first time playing the saxophone at school. She said that it was her first time playing ever. After that we became great friends. After practicing long and hard it was 6:30 p.m, and it was time to leave. I could no..."
0 "this indicates that empathy" "...ustrate how the emotions of others are differently engaged, depending on the magnitude used to understand other people’s emotional encounters. Hence, this indicates that empathy can generally be induced by observing what others face in life.     Question 4: The implication of Morelli’s Quote for Civic Engagement  ​Civic engag..."
1 "part that it has" "...from the first two or, in the absence of agreement by the President of the Court of Appeal in Bologna, which also will appoint the arbitrator for the part that it has not done so.   Art.19 - Duration of the charges and replacement procedures All the social charges have a duration of three years and may be reconfirm..."
0 "perfume that is not" "...ake while your mother took Nell on a walk and it split on me.” Dick exclaimed.  “Well were you getting the milkshake with another woman I can smell a perfume that is not mine. I do not trust you. Now clean up and make your daughter and I come dinner. I am hungry.” Jane said pouring herself a glass of wine.  Dinner was..."
1 "study states that “" ".... Ovarian volume is calculated using largest diameters of length, width, and thickness in the formula for prolate ellipsoid (Zhu R-Y, et al, 2016). A study states that “an ovarian volume of >10cm3 had 81% sensitivity and 84% specificity in diagnosing PCOS” (Zhu, R-Y ,et al 2016). Literature suggests a relationship bet..."
1 "This means that the" "...ections until it reaches equilibrium or flattens out. It is interesting that the consensus of cosmologist think we live in a spatially flat universe. This means that the density is near zero and that at the least the universe began with a bang but will “end” with a whimper or heat death call the big freeze or big chil..."
0 "preliminarily judged that AA" "...g at pass 4 and pass 5, finally increased with increasing pass until level out. The law AA possessed here matched with the settlement rate. It can be preliminarily judged that AA may be the optimum RMV for section B. Correlations between RMVs and in-situ measurement indexes are discussed in the following section of this paper...."
1 "cloth diaper that Abby" "...our diaper check. She asked me to stand up and Carrie begins with pulling up my diaper pants and then she pulls up my diaper cover. I am touching the cloth diaper that Abby is wearing and it’s feels soaking wet beside her diaper is also pooped. We are soon finished darling I tell her, nanny needs to pull up your cloth di..."
1 "inequality demands that no" "...ed upon all individuals by the government. The world seemed to be living up to America’s first amendment of everyone created equal. Where the laws of inequality demands that no individual should be smarter, stronger, better looking than the rest, everyone must be “average”. What would happen to the world if the people were l..."
1 "strategy that is in" "...ntinuum which is a six- stage process that forms a cycle and this is referred to as “continuum”.  The first step is to identify and validate the best strategy that is in line with your company’s goals and objectives. Prospective buyers consider their corporate strategy and how it can be achieved by acquisition (or dis..."
1 "is concerned that someone" "...ed to do was play. When they return home they discover the wealthy merchant that lives across the street hid all his money in Flavia’s pantry. Flavia is concerned that someone will steal it so she decides to build a trap. Later that night Flavia hears a noise and gets out of bed. Downstairs she finds her family's slave look..."
1 "were informed that participation" "...ny document.  All respondents’ answers are treated as confidential and a person can in no way be identified by the answers provided.  All respondents were informed that participation is voluntary and respondents can stop the questionnaire at any time by merely exiting the questionnaire.  Respondents were informed that information ..."
0 "/ladder that you" "...ce of a single direction for promotion (Baruch, 2004:61). The path is set for the climber; there is only one mountain/ladder, and that is the mountain/ladder that you are expected to climb (Baruch, 2004:61). In the linear system, there are clear and set guidelines as well as a definition of “success” for each membe..."
0 "because that was where" "...he story ends at the pond, because what was once safe to Lennie is now deadly, and he had no idea it was. George purposely killed Lennie at the pond, because that was where he felt safe and calm. The sound of the gunshot had broken not only the peace and quiet, but the safety of the place. “The crash of the shot rolled u..."
1 "property that is not" "...contains verbs that refer to States as for example suffice, belong or resemble, although they do not form a semantic domain or share another semantic property that is not to refer to States.   If the principle of lexical heritage served to organize the semantic relationships between substantive and the bipolar oppositi..."
1 "Mooney knows that Bob" "... if she waits long enough they will consummate the relationship and her daughter’s honor is compromised and she can then force him to marry her. Mrs. Mooney knows that Bob Doran’s employer is Catholic and that Doran needs to keep a clean record of sin, this situation with Polly could ruin his future if he doesn't marry ..."
"power means that everywhere" "... industrialization, are alienating the working class. Both Lang’s and Orwell’s texts reveal that although the individual is born free, the desire for power means that everywhere he is in chains. " 0
1 "also believe that some" "...lieve  that Saudi Arabia and other countries who limit women to participate should be banned from the Rio Olympic Games until great change is seen. I also believe that some countries should volunteer to^send representatives to persuade Saudi Arabia that what they are doing is injustice and those some of those representat..."
1 "Co-production implies that consumers" "...creation of outputs that serve as platforms for delivery of values used/consumed later on, up till ensuring delivery and executing use (consumption). Co-production implies that consumers participate in the performance of the various activities performed in one or more of these stages.” Co-production is generally associated with servic..."
0 "and confirmed that I" "...er a career as an educator. “My Primary school PE teacher was a big influence for me and my Secondary VET Sport and Recreation really helped me along and confirmed that I wanted to be a teacher.”      Some students spoke about the characteristics of their PE teachers which led them feeling inspired to follow a similar ..."
1 ") states that during" "... reduces harm during perioperative period by encouraging team to consistently apply evidence base practices for safety check to all patient. S19 (AfPP) states that during surgery, the surgergoens preferences and patient medical condition will determine the equipment that is required for positiong the patient. S20 The i..."
1 "playpen see that someone" "...make you ready for your diaper change.  I am in my playpen and I'm waiting on Carrie who has promised me to change my diaper. While I'm sitting in my playpen see that someone is coming with my diaper bag it's Carrie, she opens the diaper bag and she takes the changing pad out from the diaper bag and place it down on the fl..."
0 "have felt that it" "...ughout his biographies on Julio-Claudian emperors which reflects his use of anecdotes, rumours and gossips to create interest. In saying this, he may have felt that it was valuable to report what the people of Rome were thinking; however, this information is uncritically presented and therefore, provides an inconsis..."
1 "education find that students" "...nts of sport, instead of their experience in Physical education classes (Capel & Blair, 2007)   Conclusion   The results of socialisation in Physical education find that students are highly influenced by their experiences of Physical education in high school, especially their rapport with PE teachers. From the Data there was a..."
0 "was thrilled that she" "...to sign up for the event hoping that she would be going.    I had been trying to contact her for quite sometime.    When I eventually contacted her I was thrilled that she was planning on going. I have had several members of my group ask if she would be attending    I am certain that having this public figure added to t..."
1 "poll indicates that 60%" "...ults may be biased in the long run.  Lastly, there is the use of Survey. This investigative study uses several surveys. For example, a survey by TIME poll indicates that 60% of the respondents stated they are not comfortable with spending time on social media. At the same time, 76 percent of the interviewees reported that..."
1 "and second that she" "...lf ready to undress me. I start to take off Abbie her t-shirt since I would prefer her to be naked under her diaper change, firstly to avoid spilling and second that she has no privacy since she is treated like a baby now. Sonja has taken off me my T-shirt and now they can clearly see my breasts and it makes me embarr..."
1 "She sees that the" "... his supposed leader and attempting to burn it. She pretends to faint and tips over the table of candles that distracts fFoulkes to put out the fire. She sees that the meeting is held at one o'clock along with a red flower stamp.  After she receives an apology dance from Sir Andrew, Marguerite tells Chauvelin that t..."
1 "note is that at" "... Records”). Historically, July is the hottest month of the year with temperatures ranging anywhere from the low 90’s to 101℉. One interesting fact to note is that at some point in Texas’s history, every month of the year has had at least one day where temperatures have reached 98℉ (“Weather - Average Temperatures”..."
0 "genes that were downregulated" "...sion data into unbiased distinct patterns. There were four clusters with no difference between diets (figure 2 A, B, and C). Cluster A and B contains genes that were downregulated and upregulated respectively between 15 to 24 months. These two cluster have similar Reactome enrichment as seen in the differential expression compa..."
1 "I argued that a" "...ooperation nor did it violate the provisions of the Trafficking Protocol. However, in order for Brazil to join the global effort against trafficking, I argued that a systematizing of criminal types, which observed proportionality of penalties, was desirable.7 This has not been a straightforward process, given the ..."
0 "and friends that I" "...that a populated environment could be so supportive. My grades shot up to all A’s. My artistic skills soared. My manners improved. I got good company and friends that I’d be connected to for a long time to follow. I was able to walk on the streets of life just as I wanted. Or perhaps I thought. There I met a teacher ..."
0 "voice that is equal" "...t system.   Arguments for the continuation of our electoral system make some valid points.  The original idea was to help smaller rural states have a voice that is equal, based on their population ratio, to that of states with big cities.  It also is argued that the current system allows for better minority and specia..."
1 "see that" "...ndure severe pain but also good for their families.This is because they have more time to say goodbye to one another. Also,the patient’s family won’t see that the patient suffered unbearable pain any more.          \t         Works Cited  Appiah, Kwame Anthony. \"Should I Help My Sister End Her Life?\" The New..."
0 "implementation that is key" "...ing the information we have at our fingertips to address and solve a changing world.  Inquiry Learning allows for students to do just that, it is the implementation that is key. While reading through the application of Inquiry Learning I found myself eager to put these ideas into practice.  I feel that although the concept o..."
0 "realize that" "...ty will “wake when she tires of [the ailment]”, but doesn’t realize that Ann Putnam's children never got “tired” of the ailment (27). Rebecca doesn’t realize that her solutions don’t necessarily apply to different scenarios as she had eleven children compared to the one Mrs. Putman had. This leads to higher ten..."
0 "latter that is 25%~40%" "...loss and consolidation settlement. The forth that is 60~75% of the total settlement is completed usually in 2 months after construction, however, the latter that is 25%~40% can last for years.(4)The foundation settlement will cause strain and stress in pavement which have a great influence on pavement fatigue life. (5) I..."
1 "teams that were operating" "... against daily challenges and unexpected obstacles and I wholly support the appropriate use of these in any interaction.  For my agile teams, project teams that were operating in a newly different, more intense method than before, I arranged a regular schedule of post-release gatherings at my house, offering us all well des..."
1 "She thinks that he" "... dream’s outcome. Curley’s wife also had a big impact on their dream, not only because she was killed by Lennie, but also, she never believed Lennie. She thinks that he’s nuts and never going to get a ranch with George(90). Everyone that knew about their dream (besides Candy) had said that they’d seen too many guys w..."
0 "Explain that when" "...Possible answers: talking with others, looking at problems) Remind children that people follow rules to stay safe and to cooperate with other people. Explain that when leaders see problems, they may create rules to fix them.  Possible Student Misconceptions: As most experienced kindergarten teachers know, students w..."
"is believed that there" "Summary: It is believed that there are multiple dimensions of a single universe. The differences between these worlds can be big or they can be small. Choices and actions of different ..." 1
0 "trial that is about" "...00 years in the future. The phrase ‘that is about to come’ includes the verb ‘mello’ which was used to express imminence. Jesus said ‘the hour of the trial that is about to come' it would happen soon.  It^is interesting to note, ‘all the world’ is the Greek word ‘oikoumene’ meaning the Roman Empire, and ‘upon the eart..."
0 "Henry intimates that boards" "...eir boards and their businesses activities.  By presenting himself as (and espousing that all boards should be) proactive leaders of good governance, Henry intimates that boards and directors should be held accountable for poor corporate governance.   The importance of corporate governance is evident across all Australian ind..."
1 "point is that it" "...appreciate my life more even if I am not wealthy. Being average isn’t that bad.   Money might be able to make you happy but that’s not the point, the point is that it can’t buy happiness. Being happy is an emotion, it is something you feel, not something you buy. That is why …Happiness is priceless!"
0 "judge means that you" "...Then people will  not feel like they are being truly listened heard. Self-centered listening is when you are too quick to judge, advise, or probe. To judge means that you feel like since you went through a time like that, you know exactly how they feel, and make false judgements. To advise means you give advice drawn f..."
0 ") indicated that 60%" "...nt the onset of the disease, even in those individuals more prone (DA 2003). A report by the National Centre for Monitoring Diabetes (NCMD) (2002, p.9) indicated that 60% of Australians over 25 were overweight or obese and 44% of Australians over 18 did not take part in reasonable amounts of physical activity, thus pla..."
1 "Larsen feels that Niamh" "...arsen what’s wrong at home because Niamh/Dorothy doesn’t want Miss Larsen to feel sorry for her and she wants to be treated like everybody else. Miss Larsen feels that Niamh/Dorothy has “...been through a lot…” and doesn't want anything else to happen to Niamh/Dorothy so Miss Larsen chooses to intervene."
1 "This shows that Peg" "... bit normal.  This is shown when Peg says, “The light concealing cream goes on first. Then you blend, and blend, and blend. Blending is the secret”.  This shows that Peg is  attempting to make Edward look normal and to blend him in with everyone else. This shows the theme of the pressures to conform that Edward faces ..."
1 "Act provides that a" "... exceptions to immunity from adjudication under the SIA, while Sections 13-14 provides exceptions to immunity from enforcement. Section 3 of the 1978 Act provides that a state will not be immune in instances regarding to commercial transactions, In Trendex Trading Corporation Ltd v Central Bank of Nigeria, the common ..."
1 "Buddhists believe that Buddha" "...’ lives. Because of the life is given by the god. So, only god has the right to take it away. In Taiwan, the mainstream of religion is Buddhism, most Buddhists believe that Buddha will help everyone when people have any problem on the way of live. They think euthanasia is a kind of suicide and it is a selfish behavior. In most ..."
1 "corner showed that it" "...t room. \tThe room in which Harry often held his most private of conversations. In here, the room was cleaner than it had been. But a small cot in the corner showed that it was, at times, used to sleep in. Here he found what he had hoped not to find... strands of red. And the clear scent of the youngest Weasley. Mixed wi..."
"way that is hard" "... makes them feel better and more united.  Also, it builds trust in your leadership.   \tThe third strategy and fourth strategy work together in such a way that is hard to separate them.  Curtis defines themes " 0
0 "also held that fishermen" "...ne Fishing & Petroleum exploration, constructing artificial Islands, and failing to prevent Chinese Fishermen from fishing in the zone.  The Tribunal also held that fishermen from the Philippines (like^those from China) had traditional fishing rights at Scarborough Shoal and that China had interfered with these rights in r..."
1 "would appear that Alice" "...any would be a step in the right direction in order to correct departmental deficiencies and enhance company moral.  After reading the case study, it would appear that Alice Thornton has been given a very difficult task to accomplish. Each department in Cosmo Plastics expressed some form of discontent about how the compan..."
1 "environment that is structured" "...g techniques in a safe environment before in a clinical setting. The Theorist approach is more logical and objective, they tend to learn better in an environment that is structured with clear purpose and analyse the end result.  Finally there is the reflector, the reflector likes to have the knowledge and then reflect on this kn..."
1 "was that it was" "...onner was finally able to make out his surroundings enough to realize Ylva was attempting to slip through the darkness undetected.  Positive for this was that it was currently a moonless night, negatives included Ylva’s height and at least sixteen feet, maybe a little taller.  Not exactly a height that leads itsel..."
1 "I think that Elizabeth" "...hat I think. Sometimes, it is just better to stay silent and let whatever is happening run it’s course. Elizabeth tells her that she can do her best. I think that Elizabeth is happy that her                                                                   In Chapter 27 and 28 \t\t\t\t \t                      In Chapter 35 an..."
0 "figures that were included" "...cted the patient charts, carried out data analysis, and drafted the initial results section of the paper.  As well as creating the initial tables and figures that were included in the article.  Bonny Whalen, MD, was the newborn nursery medical director who helped to review and revised the draft.  Beliveau led the project tea..."
1 "to accept that who" "...ything will be evenly spread out and close to absolute zero. Fermion or Bosons are all that there is to create complexity from simplicity. It is hard to accept that who is writing these thoughts from a conscious/unconscious brain and nervous system is nothing more than fermion and boson which somehow created consciou..."
1 "lose people that you" "... injuries. Some short term effects are headaches, neck and back pains, numbness and even abdominal pain but one major effect is that you may not only lose people that you love or you may even get killed. Some minor effects are that you might get your car impounded and demerit points against your name.   Some solutions ..."
0 "in circumstances that they" "...e of family conditions. Regrettably, some of them are convicted because they were in the wrong place at the wrong time. Unfortunately, they were born in circumstances that they had no control over. Some people tend to focus on individual weakness or lack of values as the reason why people commit crimes. Ultimately, if someon..."
1 "change required that Nordstrom" "...r cycle of programming organizations to more incessant discharges as the business sector directs (Reed, 2014). The procedure of programming designing change required that Nordstrom contribute a noteworthy measure of time and innovation assets while rearranging the Association for significant social changes. As the People part of..."
1 "people that were moving" "... directions. Israa grabbed her sister and they ran for the car.  They made it back the car and turned to see Fahtma trying to break through a wall of people that were moving in the opposite direction of the weapons fire. While trying to break through, she fell to the ground and started to scream for help. Israa and Aalaa ..."
1 "fact that it didn" "... by releasing a teaser trailer with people running away from a monster the audience couldn’t see and at the end revealed no name and only a date. The fact that it didn’t have a title and was unclear made hundreds of thousands of people begin searching to find out what it was which instantly got people connected to t..."
0 "just quote that from" "...\t. \t. \t. \t. \t. \t. \t. \t. \t. \t. \t. \t. \t. \t“Oh and may the odds be forever in your favor!” \t. \t. \t. \t. \t. \t. \t. \t. \t. \t. \t. \t. \t. \t. \t. \t. \t“You did not just quote that from the Hunger Games.” Attempt #4 Omniscient POV’s 3-E Classroom Lunch Break \t“Well now children,” Koro-sensei chirps happily, “I will be stopping in Par..."
1 "– that is a" "...h child mortality rate in the North East and North West and rural Southwest zones suggest a spatial expression of inequalities in health demographics – that is a mixture of poverty and mortality, given that two-thirds of the population in the zones are reportedly in the two lowest wealth quintile.   Evidence f..."
1 "likely hood that they" "...es, my faculty will be going door to door and have them to fill out surveys that are designed to find out the circumstance of their wellness, and the likely hood that they can open the prescription medicine associated with their wellness conditions. 2. We will be using a survey to cumulate the selective information. The..."
"never thought that Johnny" "...arcia when Dally was saying things that the girls didn’t like. This action really shocked me because Johnny looks up to Dally as a idol. I would have never thought that Johnny would  \t" 0
1 "and states that no" "...nment.  Article V: Article five descirbes the process by which an amendment is made.  Article VI: Article six describes the “supreme law of the land” and states that no government official should have to take any^form of a religious test.  Article VII: Article seven states that nine out of the thirteen states must ra..."
1 "is anticipated that 10" "...health care practices and interactions will be observed. Observations periods will be 2-3 hours in length (over the course of a week long period). It is anticipated that 10 observational sessions will take place in rural healthcare setting. Overt behavior as well as body language will be observed. What mothers and health..."
1 "to ensure that the" "...the actions of having an entire team come to a company.  Experiment: Knowing that most companies will find it hard to hire an entire team - they want to ensure that the team is ready for the task they give them. This may begin with intermediary problems or just go straight into real product/business problems. Either ..."
1 "many believe that it" "...their health, 70% of Saudi Arabians are obese and 44% of those people are women and the country has the highest diabetes rate. To resolve this issue, many believe that it is time for the government to start introducing health and fitness programs into girl schools. They should start educating them on how health is a vi..."
1 "process that was involved" "... the amount of crime surrounding cannabis is ineffective.      This can be related back to the discussion in the previous section, the illegalization process that was involved with making cannabis illegal in these areas.  These results can come down to two main factors either that San Francisco where the drug is illegal, en..."
0 "simply reminded that the" "...ts.   Conclusion:  What does the conclusion of the lesson entail? No formal assessment is done at the end of the lesson or any homework. Learners are simply reminded that the notes they create are vital for studying and that it is their own responsibility to have them filled out in detail. The more indepth they make their ..."
"always thought that this" "...s indeed in love with Mr. Darcy. Jane is over-joyed after hearing this. That evening, Mr. Darcy asks Mr. Bennet for his consent to marry Elizabeth. I always thought that this was the prop" 1
0 "and believed that it" "...f American ideals.   The Puritans were pioneers in the way that people viewed marriage and divorce as well. They viewed marriage as a legal contract, and believed that it could possibly be broken with due cause.^In England, getting a divorce was a costly and hard process that sometimes a king couldn’t even manage. At f..."
1 "hereby stated that the" "...LEASE DO NOT USE THIS SITE. This Site is a platform which connect the customers and the service providers. Further, for the purpose of clarity, it is hereby stated that the Website is not engaged in providing any services by itself but is merely a platform, which connects the service providers to customers. PROXIMOVE is ..."
1 "I learned that 51" "The info graphic that I chose was about poverty and I learned that 51.4 people in America will reach some point of poverty before they turn 65. This shocked me because I knew that there was poverty in America but I didn..."
0 "always believed that Nation" "...ble to compare thoughts regarding the thoughts on bureaucracies within States and their influence as international actors. The ‘Realist’ argument has always believed that Nation States are the most important actors, in the international society.Whilst Classical Realists and Neo-Realists differ slightly in their theories as to..."
1 "or that it’" "...g market moving towards systemic failure.  You wouldn’t get that picture from reading the document.   It might be that this wasn’t part of the brief, or that it’s too big for this document (or for KCC alone given the national picture) or perhaps it is something that is better teased out through the implementat..."
1 "Italian that was placed" "...ave. This is often referred to as the concrete situation. In her ruing Lady Hale referred to Guzzardi V Italy (1980) EHRR 333, briefly the case of an Italian that was placed on an island, he was under complete supervision and control and was not free to leave.   Though there is limited similarity between the Guzzardi case..."
0 "Rousseau asserts that the" "  “Man is born free, and everywhere he is in chains”. In this statement, Jean Jacques Rousseau asserts that the ruthless desire for power leads to the deterioration of individual freedom. These ideas that exemplify dystopian political systems are pivotal to Geo..."
1 "may think that something" "...ndards. Just as, women shouldn’t hold men to high standards. Maybe they need a reality check, there is no such thing as perfect in this world. People may think that something or someone is perfect, but everyone has flaws. For me, as an example, I am extremely shy, I do not like public speaking, I do not trust people that o..."
1 "boys that were starting" "...hem..  “Can you see anything?” she asked her sister: “No, there are too many people.” Fahtma replied. In the crowd there was a group of young teenage boys that were starting to yell out that the government did this on purpose and that the government should fall.  Others in the crowd started to join them and Israa could se..."
1 ") found that students" "...ive, with multiple sessions required to obtain effectiveness (Whitlock et al. 2004; Wright, et al. 2016). Further, Kypri, Saunders and Gallagher (2003) found that students were less willing to engage in face-to-face counselling for RSOD, reporting fears of judgement as a barrier to seeking treatment. In summary, a range..."
1 "Boks stated that there" "...nt most of the individuals didn’t experience depressive symptoms. ​In this same research study, doctor Vinkers, Joels, Milaneschi, Kahn, Penninx, and Boks stated that there was an important personality trait called neuroticism that involved negative emotionality (738). Neuroticism is characterized by fears, moodiness, wo..."
0 "All that was happening" "...ly and herself. Finally convincing the great Harry Potter that sometimes... sometimes there just can't be peace and friendship between some people... All that was happening now. Beginning now in these moments as he began to lose consciousness. \tLarge hands picked him up. The pungent smell of sweat mixed with dirt to make..."
1 "This proves that there" "... has been no increase in bee deaths.South Africa and Brazil  also  use neonic-based pesticides extensively, ,but still have very  good bee health(2). This proves that there is no robust connection between the use  of neonics and the increase in bee deaths.which is furthermore another reason why banning what protects our ..."
1 "he says that they" "...nters with a invitation to one of Jekyll's dinners. Guest takes the invitation and the letter given to Utterson by Jekyll. Comparing the handwriting, he says that they are from the same person. Utterson excuses Guess and after locks the letter in the safe, shocked that Jekyll forged it to cover up Hyde. Despite ther..."
1 "and says that he" "...m what she wants it's money so she can buy things to her liking. Torvald accuses her of being wasteful, but after all the back and forth he gives in, and says that he loves her just the way she is, and wouldn't want her to change. This makes Nora very happy only because beneath Nora’s child-like disposition, she ha..."
1 "like that it is" "...her the diaper Abbie is wearing must be changed or not.  But Sonja has her strong suspicions that Abbie really needs a diaper change since she stinks like that it is very likely that she needs a diaper change now. I get embarrassed when Sonja smells on my bum, and she says to me Abbie you have indeed pooped in you..."
1 "you that it would" "...e Irish charm and I regret that I did not show you more of that.   No doubt right now you are confused. I firstly ask you to go, pay you and convince you that it would be better for Lauren.         Life gets messy sometimes, you just gotta learn how to deal with it   “Tamsin, you know I hate goodbyes, so I won't say..."
1 "fill positions that more" "...the younger officers that the Air Force entrusts to me.  Within the last two years, the Air Force is sending brand new second lieutenants overseas to fill positions that more seasoned officers normally hold.. This decision places new officers into positions that are usually filled by 1st Lieutenants and Captains.  Thus, th..."
1 "was that it was" "...ime in the novel there the execution of people of nobility happening. A way that the book, The Scarlet Pimpernel, is related to the French Revolution was that it was in the perspective of the aristocracy. Besides keeping the rich children and women who really did not corrupt the economy system safe, it was a shift..."
1 "discovered that" "...ainable initiatives.  How we got our name  It all begins in 1964.   Back then, a team of pretty smart individuals led by Professor Raphael Mechoulam, discovered that THC is responsible for the majority of the plant’s psychoactive properties. His desire for discovery, creativity, innovation and exploration are all ..."
1 "he concludes that I" "...trongly recommended that I send you my resume. Knowing the requirements of your open position for Mercedes-Benz Car Sales Executive in Boston or Hull he concludes that I am the ideal candidate.   I was referred by Andrew Worsely  eager to put my solid successes to work in a position such as the one’s you have advertis..."
0 "dress that is red" "...ng to buy me.  I am given a bath in bathtub and I am washed thoroughly and she dress me in my red panties and my red bra and I am wearing my finished dress that is red.   Abbie goes up with her nanny and meets her master Alastair and another gentleman in the hallway. The gentleman introduced himself as Glenn and tel..."
1 "to say that I" "...hases involve certain details that need to be monitored throughout the organizations transformation.   Out of the four skills presented, I would have to say that I posses technical skills, communication skills, and detail skills.  Technical skills are important because I would need technical expertise in order t..."
1 "be ensured that everything" "...al deployment) Once development is completed a final meeting with the client will be conducted. Handover of final deliverables will occur and it will be ensured that everything is is working order on the client site. Week 12: Final deliverables and project outcome presented.  Review Once the project is completed we will end ..."
1 "to understand that when" "...ur post goes.  By following these tips we can make sure that whatever we base our evidence on, is a valid fact. In an honors class like this you have to understand that when you are writing a research report or you are looking for more true information on a controversial topic, that you are finding true and valid facts, a..."
1 ") believes that when" "...ed behavior. If we stick to a healthy diet our moods will be more positive. Other things like health disorders can cause a mood change (Roy Baumeister) believes that when people use their will power to drain their cognitive resource’s, and makes them feel worse. The more a person strives to abstain from doing something..."
1 "character that was able" "... boys see him as a better leader. Simon inputs on the existence of the Beast at one point says, “Maybe it’s only us.” (Golding 89). Simon is the only character that was able to see the Beast for what it really was; a part of them that was hidden. Another important and sadistic symbol is the Lord of the Flies, which is a s..."
"country that is hosting" "Summary: The attack on Nice, France had an immediate effect on the country that is hosting this year’s " 1
1 "and hope that things" "...ng mayor to see what their first move will be and how they plan to punish those responsible. However, the mayor has yet to make a move, but the faith and hope that things in Seattle has not budged and the^community is ready to support whatever the mayor decides.  Under the surface, behind the scenes… For years, the cit..."
1 "self assure that this" "...s in my school .I scored 76% in my high school, achieved 79.2% in my Intermediate studies and an aggregate of 6.98 in my undergraduate studies. I can self assure that this pattern of my academics will continue in my graduate studies as well. I also did an exploration in different fields of civil engineering .I am happy ..."
0 "writing that is used" "...  Jacqueline Figueroa Mrs. Foley IB English HL 12 3 August 2016  Part II: Defining the Genre/Historical Context  Satire: Satire is a literary form of writing that is used by authors to criticize human foolishness and corruption through irony, humor, and/or ridicule. Authors also use satire (especially when writing abou..."
"people thought that with" " Summary: Many people thought that with the Olympics being hosted in Rio Janerio would bring a unique change from the Games being hosted in its original territory, but somehow there were mo..." 1
0 "I remember that we" "... toys, but have them all set up like a film shoot, with sequences of events and actions all planned out. It first came to my awareness when I was 15. I remember that we had to do a TV news project in school and I^was responsible for writing the script. The whole creative process seemed natural to me. When I was asked..."
1 "I suggest that during" " My brothers and sisters, in the spirit of not making this Honorable forum a mockery, I suggest that during any election of any kind that we should consider our brother aspirants who humbles themselves to register here. He should tell us about himself and w..."
1 "could tell that he" "... die in my arms.  It was raining. We were driving home from the bowling alley and we were laughing. Laughing about how horrible we were at bowling. I could tell that he snuck a few drinks, but I pretended not to notice. He was swerving in and out of the right lane. But we were laughing still. The music was turned all..."
1 "evidence suggests that 1" "...………………………………......6                                               1.0   Background / rationale:   Domestic Violence remains widespread as statistical evidence suggests that 1 in 4 women in England and Wales will experience domestic violence in their lifetime (Crime Survey of England and Wales, 2013/2014) and this statistic..."
1 "to say that instructions" "...repeating the instructions. The instructions should be logical. I will cut unnecessary language and use keywords. “It seems to be stating the obvious to say that instructions should be clear, but, often, excellent materials fail in their “pedagogical realisation” because of a lack of clarityin their instructions. For instr..."
1 "issue that is affecting" "...ider range of primary sources as a lot of people are not open about their mental health issues. This particular topic interests me as it is a growing issue that is affecting a number of people. When deciding a topic question around mental health, I had to ensure I could achieve primary sources appropriately as it is a per..."
1 "to ensure that the" "...ire (i.e. to what degree can one say the independent variable causes a reaction in the dependent variable) (Sekaran & Bougie 2013:174).    Therefore, to ensure that the content of the questionnaire was valid, each question was designed specifically to meet the relevant research objectives. The design and content of t..."
1 "she said that the" "...s blank sidf started to speak again she said that this is where you pick what you're going to look like and what special abilities you will gain then she said that the main class races are stronger than the hybrids but it was up to me then she pointed to the screen and said set it up first question after i taped the..."
0 "you see that the" "...legal human organ harvesting/trafficking (who is the buyer, seller, and recipient)?   Looking at this from an information technology discipline (IT), you see that the answer is is complex, it comes from several facets. There is much more than can be with a database than simply adding names and numbers - like gift r..."
1 "but mentioned that she" "...at 34weeks plus 3days because her previous birth was through C-section whilst she was in Belgium. She said she was not aware of history of depression but mentioned that she “passed out” shortly after the birth of her first child 21months ago. She said she did not have understanding of explanation/treatment given by the m..."
1 "and that was my" "...ed me. I still admired the person who provided ‘Kano state’ indigenes, like myself, the chance to work for NEPA. He got me my 4th job. I took the job and that was my second time ‘officially’ cheating. It still hunt me. Until date, each time I encountered an act I considered bad, such as refusing to obey traffic li..."
1 "carbohydrates that it comprises" "... the best German Shepherds' food. The source of protein is beef along with whole eggs, beef liver, and pork meat meal. It does not have grains.   The carbohydrates that it comprises come from peas and sweet potatoes. It is also rich in natural fiber and has a lot of vegetables and fruits such as apples, carrots, green beans, broc..."
0 "genes that were upregulated" "...was enriched for metabolism of amino acids (p=5.4E-16), cell cycle checkpoints (p=4.4E-7), mitochondrial translation (p=2.6E-15). Cluster B contained genes that were upregulated between 15 to 24 months, and was enriched for chromatin organization (p=1.3E-9). Cluster C included genes suppressed at 15 and 30 months but upregula..."
0 "was worried that he" "...he app on his phone, he’ll never need to buy a newspaper. Also shopping. He likes the shopping apps because they make shopping easy and quick, but he was worried that he might spend too much money. I taught him that the shopping cart will show you how much money you’re spending. Grandfather likes to take the train in ..."
1 "airways that is characterised" "Chronic Obstructive Pulmonary Disease    Chronic Obstructive Pulmonary Disease (COPD) is a chronic inflammation of the airways that is characterised by limitations in lung airflow (Garvey, 2016). Worldwide, Chronic Obstructive Pulmonary Disease (COPD), is one of the main causes of morbidity and mo..."
0 "journal that is frequently" "...ll be placed on the homepage to inform and engage users, while leveraging the company’s marketing initiatives. BLOG An company or individual’s online journal that is frequently updated and intended for general public consumption. ONLINE STORE A product catalog that allows visitors to find, order and pay for products and serv..."
1 "I understand that you" "... know, this young man has started a phenomenon on View Tube with a poem entitled I’M THE GREATEST! I absolutely fell in love with your work, Meechie. I understand that you wrote and recited this in your schools poetry contest and have been winning many contests since then. Tell the world a little bit about yourself.  ‘’..."
0 "earlier announced that the" "...rovinces to reduce their power consumption, as a regional gas field will undergo its scheduled maintenance. State-run Petroleum Conglomerate PTT Pcl, earlier announced that the company later this month will suspend the gas deliveries from the Malaysia-Thailand Joint Development Area to the southern region from August 20th - ..."
0 "of that is slightly" "...rom left-to-right, based on how far away they are. The Pokemon on the top-left corner of your list is very close by, the one immediately to the right of that is slightly farther away, and so on.  3)    You can tap the Tracking list to open a grid you can use to navigate your surroundings. The Pokemon you have targeted..."
0 "to believe that you" "...e camper he saw flashing lights again and the 2 guys in the black suits came up with a car and go out and walked up to Mark they said” We have reason to believe that you are hiding something and we need to search your camper. Mark said” go ahead i have nothing to hide” They proceed to looking for anything. When they w..."
0 "believed that" "...rthern Africa around 3000 BCE, in Egypt, the first leavened Loaf was baked using yeast.  Barley was another common crop being grown at the time. It's believed that the dough from the wheat flour was mixed with beer instead of water.  The yeast found in beer, when added to wheat dough, produces carbon dioxide whi..."
1 "tissue that is waste" ".... Some people have only one or infrequent flare-ups. But others are plagued by chronic, recurring symptoms (Harmon, 2011).  Uric acid is normal human tissue that is waste through urine.  Like stated previously, the risk of a gout attack augments with increasing uric acid levels, but most patients will have attacks with..."
0 "and noted that the" "...h strength and stability as it united the royal bloodline. Despite his attempt to rehabilitate her image, Barret acknowledges her manipulative nature and noted that the political tactics she employed “was preceded by a careful preparation of allies”. Overall, by evaluating various interpretations of Agrippina, Barret..."
1 "both agree that the" "..., or sooner, you and your supervisor will determine whether or not a mutually beneficial work relationship exists between you and the company. If you both agree that the match is good, you will become a regular full or part-time employee. This is the first written review and it is placed in your personnel file. Subseq..."
1 "be satisfied that the" "...n, the Care Quality Commissioner have stressed the importance of the nurse’s role. Clearly before administering any treatment, the nurse will wish to be satisfied that the patient is detained under the MHA.  People can be treated under all sections of the MHA apart from the following  emergency sections, 4, 5 and 136."
0 "schooling that is free" "...al Goals for Young Australians declares that 'all Australian governments and all school sectors must provide all students with access to high-quality schooling that is free from discrimination based on gender, language, sexual orientation, pregnancy, culture, ethnicity, religion, health or disability, socioeconomic backg..."
1 ") revealed that knowledge" "...towards children immunisation Greater health Knowledge promotes health in the world. In Nigeria evidence from the quantitative study of Babalola (2011) revealed that knowledge is influenced by myths or rumours in child immunisation among mothers in the North.  Also the study of Antai (2009) revealed that low income and soci..."
1 "symbolism that is given" "...s Santiago to do whatever he wants to do and in that time is he so dies, then Fatima will accept that he's become a part of he beauty earth.  14.\tThe symbolism that is given from the two dead hawks and falcon is that they are approaching war. The falcon is meant to represent one side and the two hawks is the other side. O..."
1 "him recognize that not" "...t-lived affairs with other women to fight his emptiness. His affairs continue in such manner until he meets Anna Sergeyevna. A young woman that makes him recognize that not only does he needs physical love but a woman that can speaks about the “private realities of life” not about “frenzied gambling, gluttony, drunkennes..."
1 "which implies that those" "...on at hand is not whether elders should be treated with respect, as anyone should be, but rather if the second connotation of the phrase is accurate, which implies that those older than us have more life experience, and should therefore offer better life advice. Henry David Thoreau reveals his thoughts on the topic in Wald..."
1 "This means that your" "...icy does not allow you to plagiarize. The point (or objective) of all of your assignments in this class is for you to think and respond thoughtfully. This means that your teacher is not looking for another student’s work or for an answer off the internet. What you think is what matters! “Cheating” is a losing choice in..."
1 "ll find that your" "...on down. When you come across periods of low motivation, revisit this statement and remind yourself why you started composing in the first place. You’ll find that your reasons for composing music might change over your lifetime, but having a clear reason for why you’re composing can help you get through the hills an..."
1 "to ensure that they" "...conflict in the past, that does not preclude it from happening in the future.  Thus, it is a benefit to articulate my Personal and Professional Goals to ensure that they are known to current and future Air Force Senior Leaders.   First, personal goals are important to be met as they drive whether the professional goal..."
0 "employees that is fair" "... operation, to help them achieve the home environment they desire.  While always focusing on our customers, we wish to provide an environment for our employees that is fair, supportive and that provides an opportunity for them to achieve their own personal goals.   INTEGRITY\tWe must be rock solid. Everything we do should..."
0 "eyes that were as" "... he went limping up and down the vestibule, with his grey hair sticking up in scrubbing-brush fashion, his shrivelled yellow face, and his large dark eyes that were as keen as any hawk's, and yet soft as a buck's. The whole room was hung with trophies of his numerous hunting expeditions, and he had some story about ..."
1 "eyes that were as" "... he went limping up and down the vestibule, with his grey hair sticking up in scrubbing-brush fashion, his shrivelled yellow face, and his large dark eyes that were as keen as any hawk's, and yet soft as a buck's. The whole room was hung with trophies of his numerous hunting expeditions, and he had some story about ..."
1 "he realized that thinking" "...o idea what to do or say that would help. So he sat and quietly ate with his husband all the while wrapped up in his thoughts. By the end of his meal he realized that thinking wasn’t going to get him anywhere. He’d already thought about it. Had been thinking about it earlier and on from then and he wasn’t any closer to an a..."
0 "felt that" "...enjamin Tillman appealed to South Carolina voters who ____(5.4)  believed in white supremacy and opposed giving African-Americans the right to vote.\t felt that the economy of South Carolina would benefit from northern investment and control.\t supported equal rights for African-Americans and pushed for equali..."
1 "old feel that I" "...od, tired, sad, when I’m in a classroom I’m in my happy place. It’s my natural habitat. I enjoy being there doing my thing. Students be they young or old feel that I’m glad to be there with them. That rubs off. I’m not faking, i just really love my job, and i’m happy that this course made me better than i was. I c..."
0 "is that" "... been able to see, events can pop up where thing can get…out of your control, if we don’t warn you,” Olivia surmised. “All we are willing to tell you is that almost all of your life mates are fully human, while one is a changeling like yourself. This, coupled with the fact that you have a stronger compulsi..."
1 "cases that were not" "...is evidence of information sharing between children’s services and health visitors and GP to HV where there was concern of domestic abuse as 5 of the cases that were not referred to MARAC by the HVs, information was shared with the HVs by Children’s services and GP, and this reflects adherence to the Working Together ..."
0 "relatable author that many" "...an old man, who has reached the point of elderly innocence in his life. As much of her poem is based on her own memories, Harwood is an exceptionally relatable author that many people of all ages can relate to, as her poetry was written in a pivotal time in history. In my visual representation I have represented the father a..."
1 "this indicates that empathy" "...ustrate how the emotions of others are differently engaged, depending on the magnitude used to understand other people’s emotional encounters. Hence, this indicates that empathy can generally be induced by observing what others face in life.     Question 4: The implication of Morelli’s Quote for Civic Engagement  ​Civic engag..."
0 "fuck that" "...th! You just think I can’t do anything like you because I’m not an Academy member.” I flared.   “Stop yelling,” Kota barked from the driveway.   “No, fuck that.” North’s eyes narrowed on Kota for a moment. “Fuck off. I’m talking to her.”   “I’m done talking,” I said. I was suddenly exhausted, the angry tears..."
1 "can testify that I" "... week. She can testify about our home life, family meals, family outings, living conditions, and our relationships.  Jerry Bunting is my husband.  He can testify that I am extremely family-oriented.  I cook family meals and plan family activities. We go on trips as a family, go to the movies and out to dinner, and ta..."
1 "point that is drawn" "...ze, marginalize exploit or dehumanize a practice or a group of people despite the moral intentions of that official body.  Social hypocrisy is also a point that is drawn over this debate, at some point within one of these processes there will be a violation of law.  This violation of law may come from either an upper ..."
0 "of that was happening" "...nd herself. Finally convincing the great Harry Potter that sometimes... sometimes there just can't be peace and friendship between some people... All of that was happening now. Beginning now in these moments as he began to lose consciousness. \tLarge hands picked him up. The pungent smell of sweat mixed with dirt to make..."
1 "who believed that the" "...led their animals, broke fences and burned the records that said how much rent was owed. These violent acts were encouraged by a group of Jacobians , who believed that the peasants should no longer obey the land owners. Rumour and the concern that the Nobles would be sending troops to punish the peasants led to a rural ..."
1 "is recommended that you" "...ters for small granules that typically coat the shingles. Finding lots of these small particles is an indication of wear and tear on the shingles. It is recommended that you have these worn out shingles replaced in order to prevent leaks.  After checking for debris, check for noticeable signs of damage to the shingles. Ha..."
1 "instinctual thought that he" "...know.  This was combined with a lurch and a rhythmic swinging from side to side.  Someone must be carrying him.  Someone he knew perhaps?  He had the instinctual thought that he could trust the person, even if he couldn’t remember who they were at this specific moment, it would come to him he was sure of it.  There were other..."
1 "and that is a" "...t voice is much more appealing than a quiet flutter of words. A quality that stands out at first glance or for this particular instance, first sound, and that is a strong voice for the individual in that role. A person’s voice is a powerful instrument. Where if used correctly with enthusiasm and the appropriate ..."
1 "could conclude that if" "...D) present unique challenges to educators trying to plan effective instructional programs” (Iovannone, Dunlap, Huber & Kincaid, 2003). Therefore, one could conclude that if you have a student with additional needs, they will most likely have some form of Autism. It must be understood that a student with high functioning ..."
0 "had felt that it" "... and onto the second. I finished the test with fifteen minutes to spare. I felt really good about it. That day I went home and told my parents that I had felt that it went great. Then I went to my computer to check Power School and the grades were up. The first thing I saw was that my average raised up to a “B” and..."
1 "Some  say that I" "Kendra Whitmore Mr. Putnam AP Language Composition July 19, 2016 Just An Odd Girl The definition of me would be described in many words or phrases. Some  say that I’m weird, funny , enthusiastic, sweet, spontaneous  , and even hard headed. Even for me I was confused on who I am as an individual in society. Then I..."
1 "to ensure that the" "...ve Committee should meet regularly to develop programs plans, review progress, and maintain good communication. Two requirements of the Committee are to ensure that the Annual Activity Report and Officer Reporting are completed.  Annual Activity Report - Due 1 November annually The Annual Activity report can be found..."
1 "I believe that Santiago" "... poems lived through the years. He had such a positive effect on his people that they preserve every piece of him to inspire future generations.  17.\tI believe that Santiago had to go through the dangers of the tribal wars to achieve his Personal Legend. He would’ve never made it to the end if he hadn’t put his life on th..."
1 "must believe that YOU" "...xual assault or abuse, I hope this book helps you in some way. Maybe it will give you the peace of knowing that you are not alone in this horror! You must believe that YOU ARE NOT ALONE!   When an individual or a family member encounters a traumatic event reactions are different on a case to case basis. Reactions also t..."
1 "all fees that your" "...luding all devices, Internet browsers and Internet access. If you access the our Website through a mobile or wireless device, you are responsible for all fees that your carrier may charge you for data, text messaging and other wireless access or communications services. 15. Website Warranties.  Without prejudice to t..."
1 ") espouses that the" "...ects my role internally and externally as I am involved in the sale of our products and the transport contracts for our preferred carriers. (Lee, 2004) espouses that the relationship between customers and suppliers should extend beyond just lowest price and should take into account supplier flexibility, delivery servi..."
1 "research suggests that individuals" "...te, Gorin, Raynor & Fava, 2006), mood (Berkman et al. 2011; Thayer, Newman & McClain, 1994), and learning (Zimmerman, 1990), among others. Generally, research suggests that individuals with lower self-regulation ability are less able to engage with adaptive techniques to keep themselves goal-focused and therefore are less likely to ..."
1 "A knows that the" "...ld B, have you seen the seeds in the apple?’ ‘They can grow into an apple tree’ This information assisted the educator gaining the knowledge of child A knows that the seeds in the apple might grow into an apple tree. Through the observation, the learning experience was extended by the educators to enhance the child..."
1 "plan implies that she" "...he has a package of care from the local authority that includes respite. From the description in the scenario, it is fair to assume that Sonia’s care plan implies that she is under a level of restriction however further information would be required to assess whether her care plan represents a deprivation of her liberty..."
0 "wish is that my" "...t only myself, but my peers, my school and my community. Being involved with my school and community is one of the most important things to me and my wish is that my actions “inspire others to dream more, learn more, do more, and become more.”  \t  \t"
1 "respondents said that they" "...number of respondents said that they had previously or currently coach a competitive sporting activity, with 42 people saying that they had. While 30 respondents said that they haven’t had any experience coaching competitive sport. 28 people responded that they have in some way coached/instructed in a non-competitive physica..."
1 "it seem that these" "...ther individuals.  This act also comes from a more upper class set of individuals due to the fact that they have access to education which would make it seem that these kids almost have the privilege of ignoring the law because of the flaw in illegalization, studies have concluded that cannabis use within schools com..."
1 "men that were worse" "... blood-related or not. It’s been years since I’ve seen her, ever since she was on the run from these couple of men.”   “I wonder if it was a group of men that were worse than him,” North whispered to Silas.   “Why were they chasing her?” I asked in wonder, ignoring the whispering.   “She ran into a bad crowd when she ..."
1 "extent appropriate that the" "...he first IEP to be in effect when the pupil is 15 years of age.   Consideration of Least Restrictive Environment: The team must assure to the maximum extent appropriate that the student is educated with non-disabled peers. Consider questions such as: can it be at the school of residence? What accommodations and or modificatio..."
1 "plan that is too" "...icipating questing and difficulties the students might have.  I’m planning to cut even more unnecessary language from my lesson plan because a lesson plan that is too detailed also doesn’t work. I must find a good balance for me that makes me feel comfortable and still shows a clear path to the endgoal which are th..."
1 "to say that the" "... in the bass these might be perfect for you.   DJ headphones tend to have a stronger bass just because of the environment they’re used in. That’s not to say that the rest of the frequency range is ignored, it’s just not given as much prevalence. That is definitely the case with the ATH-Pros. You won’t have to worr..."
1 "who believed that a" "...sh-speaking Africans have called the African personality.” The movement would later find a major critic in Nigerian poet and playwright Wole Soyinka, who believed that a deliberate and outspoken pride in their color placed black people continually on the defensive, saying notably, “Un tigre ne proclâme pas sa tigritud..."
1 "industry that is developing" "...a Mobile Automotive Repair company.      3. MARKET RESEARCH  3.1 Industry  OEM Diagnostic Services will be joining a segment of the automotive repair industry that is developing rapidly, mobile diagnostic services that specialize in Advanced driver-assist systems (ADAS). Recent legislation is requiring that all automakers nee..."
0 "thought that was understandable" "...make comments about my phone, i was surprised by them. When you explained to me that you wanted me to be present and with you not just in the room, I thought that was understandable and reasonable. I was sure I could do that for you, make sure that i was paying attention to you and being present, not just in the room. I thought t..."
0 "and suggested that participants" "...ll then be analysed and interpreted.  3.54 Focus groups with community leaders   Wong (2008) emphasized the importance of using focus group research, and suggested that participants can feel more comfortable and willing to talk openly when they are among their social peers rather than people of different social positions. Thus to..."
0 "I sensed that Sang" "... ‘Uncle Sean’. You’re lucky I tolerate you in my house as it is,” Sean said, chuckling. “I ‘m delighted to find the fact that I have a niece yes, but I sensed that Sang and I were destiny babies from the moment she stepped into my home. Just two lost souls finding one another in the world. That’s quite alright as wel..."
0 "whole is that leadership" "...ucial part of the learning curve of any leader, as well as the growth of an     individual within the job market. The conclusion of the articles as a whole is that leadership can     be formulated through involvement, learning new skills, interpersonal relationships among     employees, and specific personality traits asso..."
1 "ve found that there" "...t me to be a doctor, like them, but I’m really not sure what I want to do, I’m hoping to figure that out soon. Biology has always interested me and I’ve found that there is statistics in many areas of it, such as charts, chi squared, and standard deviation, so I thought it would be beneficial to take statistics and le..."
0 "was annoyed that the" "... words such as “very”. When the doves are described, they now seem to be trying to send a message that Matt has no hope, he has lost all hope.  “Matt was annoyed that the two seemed to have forgotten it was his party, his coming-of-age. He sulked in his bedroom. He twanged the guitar, hoping the noise would disturb the..."
1 "and that it was" "...terosexual couples and lesbian couples found that some of their participants felt that adoption after infertility had a “positive and healing impact” and that it was a “welcome alternative to the unending pursuit of biological parenthood” (Goldberg et al p958). With couples who struggle with infertility the hope-d..."
1 "town suggests that the" "... has lost its sense of distinctiveness, shown through the physical change of buildings such as the ‘Odeon’. Likewise, the change occurring within the town suggests that the persona’s connection with the past is lost, subsumed by a sterile, commercial uniformity.    Meatworks (213 words)    “The Meatworks” seeks to confro..."
1 "they believed that if" "... about the Christian concept of a god and how it is contrary to what the Epicurean thought. The Epicureans were probably agnostics atheist or theist, they believed that if a god existed this being is perfect and the Epicurean Paradox of the problem of evil demonstrated if a god interfered in human affairs then why is th..."
0 "him that it was" "... a dark ash. He flicked his silver tongue in dismay. The clean up would be hell. Only 6 out of the 7 had survived the trip, which was an indicator to him that it was time to renew the pods. The Warden was probably going to be pissed, not so much at the loss of life, but at the prospect of paperwork he’d have to do..."
1 "structure is that you" "... negotiate for a promotion or raise depending on their work performance.   Cosmos Decentralization Risk   “A possible disadvantage of a decentralized structure is that you must relinquish a bit of control;you must put your faith in others to continue to carry out your company's vision and mission” (Joseph, 2016). This i..."
1 "getting friends that I" "...form, the boys had khakis and a blue polo and all 54 of us hated it but we wore it anyways. Leaving Brentwood was the hardest because I just finished getting friends that I was very close with, and then had to more. 1002 collingwood cove, Round Rock Texas, will be home for a long time, because it has helped shaped me int..."
1 "I pray that God" "...your soft, smooth hands once more. You are always on my mind. I don’t know for how much longer though because here in Africa death is always present. I pray that God keeps me safe. Alive at least. Breathing.  Our living quarters are holes in the ground. Rotting bodies fill in the sides. The smell of fear from the ..."
0 "further convinced that my" "... SMBC.   Your insights were truly helpful and strengthened my desire to join the company.  appreciate your perspective on the culture at SMBC.   I am further convinced that my background and skills combined with your valuable advice will help me become a valuable member of the SMBC team.   I am excited about the possibility..."
0 "joint pain that usually" "...n waking you up in the middle of the night with the sensation that your big toe is on fire (Staff, 2015).  The indications involving gout are intense joint pain that usually targets the large joint of the big toe, but it can occur in your feet, ankles, knees, hands and wrists. The pain is likely to be most severe within t..."
1 "California says that 30-35" "...g? Can we really do something about it?      Dr. Donald Abrams, Cancer and Integrative Medicine Specialist at the UCSF Osher Center in San Francisco, California says that 30-35 percent of cancers are related to diet. He adds that diet is not limited to what we eat. Diet includes nutrition and body weight. Nutrition is the pr..."
1 "means is that your" "...f absence.   If you take more than two continuous weeks of unpaid LOA within one calendar year, your advancement schedule will be affected. What this means is that your anniversary date and progress toward seniority related benefits will be delayed. This also means that your benefits will cease. Your performance revi..."
1 "they assume that the" "...y and social organization. Firstly, neo-realists fail to acknowledge the role of social organization by focusing solely on anarchism. In this regard, they assume that the resultant factors are unchangeable and permanently structured. This leads to the total exclusion of the ideas of social construction and order in soc..."
0 "help ensure that I" "...cept criticism he has for my assignment and I must be willing to correct my academic success counselor and I must be able to play with one another to help ensure that I stay on track with the correct courses that I should be taking with this collaboration my counselor will be able to provide me with a schedule of cou..."
1 "land that was barren" "...ills, trying their best to scratch a living from the thin flinty soil” (12).  Although the narrator sets a tone of tooth-and-nail survival, the hilly land that was barren.  The Trask and Hamilton families are made examples of the difference in farms and familial relationships. While the Hamilton family was poor, “It wa..."
0 ") reports that a" "...the elderly or overweight people over 45 years of age, younger Australians are now being diagnosed (Diabetes Australia 2003). Diabetes Australia (2003) reports that a diagnosis of Type 2 diabetes can become a major financial strain on the patient and their family as they attempt to include extra medical expenses in..."
0 "watch that it changes" "...tting, alerts. How to create an Iris workspace Shared tables (from others) Input tables: okay to use the vol-input-table example. Tweak something and watch that it changes things.  Compliance examples Locked/Crossed Markets Quoting Compliance (Intraday) Flashing (Intraday) Spoofing Anticipatory Hedging Capital Consumpti..."
1 "and that was ugly" "...totle .  Working on LIS  was like looking myself more intensely in the mirror I was more clearly able to visualize the areas in me that was beautiful and that was ugly or needed a change,  I learned the methods to use to work on those areas which will help me create  a person  better than the person I was yesterday...."
1 "or represent that the" "... services offered by our advertisers and ourselves. PROXIMOVE can publish or provide Content or advertisements as part of a Service we do not warrant or represent that the Content or advertisements are suitable, accurate, correct, complete, reliable, appropriate, or lawful; or endorse the Content or advertisements; and ..."
1 "strongly feel that the" "Giovanna Caime  What Book Should be Saved from the Fire?         There are many books that should be safe from the fire and didn't get burned. I strongly feel that the book, “The Outsiders” by S.E. Hinton. “The Outsiders” is a fictional story with non fictional events that was written in 1967. There are just a few r..."
1 "unit that was conveniently" "...e Kader, walked me through the process with great patience and encouragement.  Diane was also helpful in assisting me in locating an affordable condo unit that was conveniently located.  She actually was able to negotiate a better price on the new residence.  "
1 "to elaborate that Miss" "...s. Please.” \tAs lightning seems to strike the former teacher, Asano snaps out of his daze and questions the glowing female, “One year? Would you care to elaborate that Miss Sinclair?” \tThe girl blinks owlishly, clearly realizing her mistakes. The female youth utters out a silent curse and then breath a deep, and heavy si..."
1 "mass that is ejected" "...t propellant used is either a high oxygen containing fuel or a mixture of fuel plus oxidant, which produces a chemical reaction resulting in reaction mass that is ejected at very high speed from a rocket engine to produce this thrust. Hence, a chemical engineer ensures that gaseous compounds such as hydrogen and oxygen..."
1 "greatest challenges that you" "...lems.  In addition, we started to ask these questions: ❖ When did the problem start? ❖ Who is the most affected person in your family? ❖ What are the greatest challenges that you are facing today? ❖ How are you paying the rent of your house? ❖ How is the relationship between you and your children? ❖ If the worst occurs, how do..."
1 "object that is being" "...imagination, through the use of magical energy, with a mechanic rather simple, to shape magical energy into the material composition and design of an object that is being imagined by the magus. The item is not everlasting, as it is recognized by the world will (Gaia) as a \"phantasm\" that doesn't belong in the natural w..."
1 "Jasmine stated that Bunnie" "... elevator Jasmine reported that Bunnie slammed her face into the wall several times while strangling her. Once the elevator reached the bottom level, Jasmine stated that Bunnie kept her in the elevator which the elevator went up and down several times. Jasmine stated that Bunnie slammed her (Jasmine) face into the wall of th..."
0 "This confirms that the" "...exchange between Simon and the head, it says, “I’m the Beast… You knew, didn’t you? I’m part of you?... Why things are what they are?” (Golding 143). This confirms that the Beast is the evil that is in the boys, and it shows how the Beast and Lord of the Flies are one in the same.  In a way, the events occurring on the i..."
"I think that a" "...ication) between each of the functional areas” (Boundlesscom,2016). How information is transferred between departments is one of the main reasons why I think that a functional structure is more horizontal in nature." 0
0 ". ensures that laws" "...te the nation B. establish a fair justice system C. maintain peace within the country D. enhance safety by providing for and building up a military  E. ensures that laws will promote overall well being of^the citizens F. ensures that the United States will femain a free nation  Article I What are the formal job requir..."
1 "to ensure that information" "...l care context.                 Conclusion:     The Data Protection Act 1998 is not a barrier to sharing information – it simply provides a framework to ensure that information is shared appropriately. It reinforces common sense rules of information handling and helps us strike a balance between the many benefits of public o..."
0 "bayonet that was intended" "...t effort in Fort Stedman.” She pauses as she weeps, rubbing her nose with her handkerchief. “… Sadly, Master Ward was killed. He jumped in front of a bayonet that was intended to pierce Cuffee in the back. Blessed Cuffee is alive. You will see him soon”. Mrs Ward’s tears stream down her face as her mouth shudders in sorrow...."
0 "they say that ‘" "...American Family Association, Tim Wildmon, has said that, following ‘Target’s logic’, a twenty year old should be able to get a ‘seniors’ discount’ if they say that ‘self-identify’ as a sixty-five year old. This demonstrates some of the ignorance that the opposition to this policy have surrounding transgender peopl..."
0 "have discovered that the" "... road accidents. Also the effects that follow all road crashes and lastly the solutions that drivers can put in place to minise risk while driving. I have discovered that the top three main causes are due from speeding, being under the influence or drugs or alcohol and lastly distractions.  "
0 "“That was for" "...r. You have violated the peace of our Assembly and you will pay a lifetime for that.” Zera muttered with all the strength she could, \" Just kill me.\" “That was for the state to decide, and in their wisdom they decided against exterminating a traitor. No, you will live out your life here on this shattered moon, m..."
1 "said that" "...g black males navigating city life than that which white residents assume. The Mayor, after stating that he had spent time with Eric Garner's father, said that the seeing the \"unspeakable pain\" of Ben Garner, had been led to think of his own son, Dante, a biracial teen. The mayor said, \"Chirlane and I have h..."
0 "Vygotsky established that children" "...nvey another constructivist theorist belief, Lev Vygotsky’s view towards children’s development derived from Piaget’s constructivist theory. However, Vygotsky established that children’s interaction not only with the environment creates knowledge, but with the contribution from significant others. Proposing that, social constructivi..."
1 ") that was performed" "...xt section covers a self-assessment and goal discussion for the future.  The self-assessment includes results from my Self-Description Inventory (SDI+) that was performed within the Air War College (AWC) Joint Strategic Leadership lesson.  The section will begin with an articulation of my “strength” areas and then move..."
1 "and saw that they" "...s he and Gary were also added to our heap of escapees. “Hey,” said zee. “Hey, nice of you to drop in!” I replied. We both turned toward Gary and Toby and saw that they were unconscious. Or at least Gary was. Upon further inspection we saw Toby, his face twisted in a rictus of death. I choked back a sob that was half..."
1 "so that it is" "...t the process requirements and proposed attributes. This is especially important because “the activities associated with a process affect one another so that it is important to consider the simultaneous performance of a number of activities” ( Jacobs & Chase, 2011, p. 110).                                       ..."
1 "Drucker asserts that the" "...we're all going to get better and we're all going to help each other to get better. Of course without trust, this is very difficult to achieve. Peter Drucker asserts that the object of leadership is the creation of a human community held together by the work bond for a common purpose. For the welfare of anyone,as a coach, ..."
1 "N found that (" "...d but  need additional medical therapy,  was seen in 4 patients (97%) ,and poor response to surgery was poor in 1 patient (2%) (8). Similarly, Jammes N found that (95%) of the patients in his study considered the outcome to be excellent or good (5). On other hand, Abbas E study showed that complete symptoms resol..."
"as evidence that the" "...mud type religious fanatics, but also as a brave and hardworking people that created our nation. Daniels uses these words and these uses by the media as evidence that the many ideas that the p" 0
1 "boldly say that the" "...nd from his acquaintances within the city. Particularly, as I came to \"Fagge' to collect food items (garri, rice, sugar) and money every month. I can boldly say that the motorcycle was the beginning of 'Achaba'^in Kano. Indeed, possibly, in the country. With my new found equipment, I quit being a laborer at 'kwanar si..."
1 "I realized that it" "... a result of my self-reliance, I made the Car Club a reality--a place where students can come to relax and have fun. As I began my employment at NYU, I realized that it was different from any other experience before. Though at first unfamiliar with Manhattan and city life, I quickly adapted to the environment, which ..."
0 "He considers that not" "...defer to a person's view about whether her life is worth living and, on that basis, let her end it if she chooses.\" Kwame Anthony Appiah(2016) views. He considers that not only since a person can judge whether it is worth to do, but also because only a person has the power to decide whether to do. According to the artic..."
1 "they felt that with" "...public high school in the special education setting so that he could graduate at the same time as his peers,” (p. 5).  Jerry’s family was upset since they felt that with medication and family therapy, Jerry can continue his success in his local high school.       Several questions come to mind when considering Jerry’s..."
0 "because that was a" "...quipment that was fun. Back then there was code requirements to obtain your ham radio license so I sure am glad we practiced Morse code in Boy Scouts because that was a great help to me in procuring my license I can remember my license being WN9FAS with N meaning novice.       My ham call sign today is W9FAS here it ..."
0 "researchers believe that if" "...or evaluation of its findings. It is a dream of all researchers to design and implement good/ethical and trustworthy studies. Undeniably, qualitative researchers believe that if a study is credible, then it has to be good in the ethical sense and be trustworthy. According to Merriam (2002), the major strategies that researche..."
1 "period that was influenced" "... of art than painting and sculpture. The piece The Big Fish Eat The Little Fish by Pieter Bruegel the Elder is a representation of art from this time period that was influenced by humanism yet was not commissioned.    Pieter Bruegel the elder, an artist from the Netherlands, created the piece The Big Fish Eat The Little Fish..."
1 "never say that they" "...y, but publishers and contests will judge you based on the program you use to submit your score.  Judges may not explicitly state this, and they will never say that they rejected your score because of the notation program you used, but you better believe this does happen. The judges may not even be consciously aware o..."
0 "oxide that was designed" "...sia had been conducted and Henry Hickmen had formulated and anaesthetic that could be used on animals.  In 1845, Dr. Wells publicly inhaled a nitrous oxide that was designed to anaesthetise during dental extraction.  However, this nitrous oxide anaesthesia was deemed a \"humbug.\" (Reference: http://www.woodlibrarymuseum.or..."
1 "with reports that some" "...s, & Holmes, 2007). \tIn the Philippines, rape is also prevalent. In 2006 alone, the Philippine National Police (PNP) reported 685 cases of rape along with reports that some of these women were actually raped while in police custody. These women were found to come from marginalized groups such as alleged prostitutes, drug..."
0 "all that is expected" "...wers via Twitter and the second experiments answers via Google Glassroom.  Learners are to follow along with instructions. If learners have completed all that is expected of them in class they may begin the homework activity.  The homework activity is available on the Space Race website. They must download the file and..."
1 "Utterson notices that his" "... parties and been seen around more, but eventually it all came to an end. After a final dinner, Jekyll begins to turn away every visitor he receives. Utterson notices that his good health, as well as Lanyons, begins to decrease.  When Utterson visits Lanyon, Lanyon does not want to discuss or even hear about Jekyll. Once he..."
1 "has agreed that Abbie" "...ng towards me and your sisters, one of your sister are going to find a suitable punishment for you Abbie. Carrie tells Sonja that she and her sisters has agreed that Abbie needs to be spanked on her bum. I am told to lay down on the lap of Carrie, and from fear that something worse will happen I do as she tells me. Abbi..."
0 "you believe that everyone" "...hink win-win is an attitude towards life that states I can win, and so can you, we can both win! This helps you get along with other people and helps you believe that everyone is equal. This also helps you be less competitive in a competitive environment. Once you get past school, sports, and other competitive activities, y..."
0 "had felt that it" "... and onto the second. I finished the test with fifteen minutes to spare. I felt really good about it. That day I went home and told my parents that I had felt that it went great. Then I went to my computer to check Power School and the grades were up. The first thing I saw was that my average raised up to a “B” and..."
1 "reported that" "...he population in the zones are reportedly in the two lowest wealth quintile.   Evidence from the federal Ministry of Health in Nigeria (FMoH,  2013), reported that these zones also reportedly have the largest deficits in access to basic health care, with 80.0% of the population lacking access to the eight lifesa..."
1 "study suggest that if" "...ory does decrease with long term use of Cannabis. The study is limited because it did not evaluate recognition and recall memory. The benefits of the study suggest that if a Cannabis user, who demonstrates memory deficits, does not perceive memory issues are present, it would be important to get them help to stop using ..."
1 "info that is important" "...his puzzles me since there isn’t a main event or time. Where it could show growth or strengthened his ability to become independent. Another piece of info that is important for this is that there is another piece of evidence. People actually find interest in Ralph and find him as a good leader. As to Piggy they lack inte..."
1 "figure that is reading" "...s on my behalf. Attached to this notarized paper are photocopies of all parties ID’s along with copies of insurance cards if needed. If the authority figure that is reading this documen has any questions I may be contacted via telephone at (712) 646-2102 or by mobile telephone at (712) 355-0139.  This document is valid f..."
1 "to feel that “" "...n the school and student. The optimal relational outcome between school and student as argued by Munns and Martin (2005), “suggests that for students to feel that “school is for me”, they have to feel supported as an individual learner and as a member of a cohesive and culturally inclusive learning group” ((Munns..."
1 "and argued that he" "...stake better than angry because of mistake, and lied! For example, it was between me and my friend a date, but my friend forgot about the appointment and argued that he was sick and suddenly I found in the cafe with his friends. In this case I am angered that he lied to me and mistakes. It would have been better if a..."
1 "currently believe that BACRIMs" "...‘neutralised’ 1448 BACRIM members this year alone and seized 121 tonnes of cocaine. Due to the increased government pressure on the groups, we do not currently believe that BACRIMs will be able to expand their influence outside of rural areas. If the FARC demobilisation is successful, the government and security forces should ha..."
1 "stigma that is attached" "... 2 diabetes. Also the way obese people classified as not normal and to be normal they have to go through medical treatment and intervention.Moreover, stigma that is attached to obesity was mentioned like discrimination against obese people. The way they portrayed as undisciplined and lazy and less competent  and that affe..."
1 "I believe that until" "...ren't discussing an insignificant issue this has to do with our health, it’s  highly important  that we can maintain a healthy life style. Meanwhile, I believe that until there’s more research done by a third party that doesn't benefit from either side and, clears whether GMOs are safe to consume or not, GMOs should be..."
"definitely admitted that I" "Of these seven key areas, the one that has influenced my thinking the most and has been the most challenge for me is definitely admitted that I don't yet possess the skills needed to become a critical thinker" 1
0 "to say that the" "...due to an accident, chicken-shit nerves or racism, but the house that's burning down — the biggest problem is the 93% of Blacks killed by Blacks. Not to say that the small fraction of accidents or horrible^racist tragedies are not a problem, but let’s adjust for the statistics, paint the whole picture and focus mo..."
1 "techniques that were first" "...6: n. pag. Web. 16 July 2016. In this article by Joseph kaxzmarek an award winning journalist for the Associated Post in Philadelphia, finds that the techniques that were first implement for the Jehovah Witnesses is gaining popularity within the medical field. Joseph focuses on how doctors and hospitals nationwide started a ..."
1 "who say that GMOs" "... it is more likely for consumers to ignore all the GMO labels. In addition, companies owners, and some farm workers disclaim any arguments of people  who say that GMOs can cause you any health problems by stating that no one has ever gotten sick or even worst died from consuming GMO products. But on a comparison the..."
0 "realize that" "...gh with her former seven children. Rebecca’s treats the situation nonchalantly, saying Betty will “wake when she tires of [the ailment]”, but doesn’t realize that Ann Putnam's children never got “tired” of the ailment (27). Rebecca doesn’t understand that her solutions don’t necessarily apply to different scena..."
1 "they hope that we" "...o make sense of everything, just as I was. I over heard people’s stories on how their loved were engulfed and how they left everything behind and why they hope that we can go back someday. The trip was so long and it seemed like we would never make it to Vartha. Even until the day we got to the planet people were st..."
0 "Australia means that this" "... that supports it.   In conclusion, the fact that Type 2 diabetes is the fastest growing disease in the world and the sixth leading cause of death in Australia means that this disease is a major contemporary issue facing Australian society. The implications of this often preventable disease on the Australian people and the ..."
1 "also believed that a" "...so felt that husband and wife should live as equals, and in these times it was consider immoral. Ibsen’s way of thinking was highly criticized. Ibsen also believed that a man or a woman had the right to be their own individual, without anyone holding you back from being your own person,  which is what he brings to ligh..."
1 "windows that were striped" "...y interesting to look at. And as soon as I knew it we made it to the Kierst Headquarters. Kierst was a very modern looking building, there were large windows that were striped along the side of the building going vertically. There was a steady stream of people going into Kierst, I asked Rebecca if we had to go in through th..."
0 "is recommended that there" "...in can compete with the networks of organisations such as MasterCard and Visa (Moore, 2013). In order to navigate the sphere of virtual currencies it is recommended that there is cooperation from stakeholders is requires to optimally face the risks and embrace the opportunity the cryptocurrencies present.     Recommendation..."
0 "I suppose that’" "\t♠   It’s very late but I can still hear people moving and talking. It’s loud here, but I suppose that’s true anywhere there’s a large group of young men and no girls. Well, almost no girls. I’m here, after all, and I doubt I’m the only female who has b..."
1 "and insists that he" "...ck. Elizabeth panic, and runs to the door to try to find her uncle, only to be met by Mr. Darcy and a servent. Mr. Darcy shows concern for Elizabeth, and insists that he call for                       In Chapter 47 and 48                        In Chapter 56                        In Chapters 59, 60 and 61            ..."
1 "myself that is  higher" "...ently see high-quality results as unsatisfactory because they don't meet my unrealistic standards. to demonstrate my confidence I often set goals for myself that is  higher than anyone else and I tend to expect too much from others as well causing them to see me as a rigid and demanding. the steps to be less perfectionis..."
1 "feelings that were always" "...root of who we are as individuals, like happiness, sadness, excitement, confusion, desire, or anger. What we feel all the time even in an empty room, feelings that were always there that have slowly grown into complex entities we try to contain within ourselves every single day. A lot of political campaigns have tried to ta..."
1 "art that was commissioned" "... make drawings and prints that could be understood through visual means. Currently the textbook sections for the 16th century features a large amount art that was commissioned by churches or people of high standing and wealth and because of that the work we see is influenced by that single point of view. The Big Fish Eat Th..."
0 "pad that is standard" "...ching my siblings packing and putting things in my diaper bag.  There is feeding bottles, cloth diapers, disposable diapers, wet wipes and a changing pad that is standard items in each diaper bag. Both Carrie and Cassie is caring one changing pad each that contains about 10 cloth diapers, and the same number of disposa..."
1 "member that is not" "...the house involving all members with the right to vote, the Steering Committee and the members of the Board of Statutory Auditors, if appointed. Each member that is not in arrears in the payment of the annual membership fee, has the right to a single vote (according to the principle \"one person, one vote\"), and may r..."
0 ") notes that nothing" "...easuring the organization against others. Benchmarking allows you to discover the gaps in your performance when compared with someone else. Camp (1989) notes that nothing will happen, however, unless you actually do something to close the gap or surpass the gap so identified during the process of benchmarking. The real..."
1 "have indicated that it" "...des the platform for further development in light of the Dovetail Project.  4\tHome Office Dovetail Pilot   4.1   During the past year the Home Office have indicated that it is their intention to move the entirety of Prevent activity (with the exception of the Police Terrorism de-confliction checks) into the LA by the end..."
1 "AA expected that it" "... and Northwest carrier, they had maintained reasonable profit in recent years. After the bankruptcy of American Airline, the merger of US Airways and AA expected that it can create cost synergies and substantial revenue.[3]  Process  After announced the merger, Department of Justice filed a lawsuit to prevent the merg..."
0 "think that is necessary" "...nted to talk to me.”  “Again?” Rex questioned, “Look dude, do you want me to stop by the Rust Bucket every morning to wake your ass up?”  “No I don’t think that is necessary.” I said laughing at Rex’s suggestion. “But thanks for the offer. I just need to talk to boss about my hours that’s all.”  “You know i still don’t un..."
1 "acknowledges that" "...th the client (and/or parent/guardian) on _________________. \t\t\t\t\t\t\t\t\t\t\t\t        (Date) By signing this document the client (and/or parent/guardian), acknowledges that he/she/they have reviewed this assessment and understand its contents.   I (We) have participated in the planning for this treatment Plan.  It has be..."
1 "instead suggested that researchers" "...ng, to be credible, qualitative researchers must be good and trustworthy. Stake (1995) cautioned qualitative researchers against narrow thinking, and instead suggested that researchers learn to understand their research as their participants do, rather than impose their own assumptions. In qualitative research, these protocols come ..."
1 ", that is empirically" "...c theory, based on Rudner‘s (1966) conceptualization of a theory: “a systematically related set of statements, including some law like generalizations, that is empirically testable “ (Rudner, 1966, p.10; Eunjoo Cho, 2011, PP. 27). Hunt suggested a general theory should have three key criteria: (1) systematic connections..."
1 "she stated that since" "...husband in a car accident one year before. She has four children:-Mohammad 6years, Ms. Fathima 4years, Ms. Tiba 3 years and Baby Saddi 18 months.  As she stated that since her husband’s death, she became very tired and she believed that she always has so much to do. Salwa is Housewife and she had given up on things that..."
0 "Something that is not" "...y are in a safe and warm environment.  I constantly try to build a classroom rapport that gives my students a chance feel comfortable and respected.  Something that is not only a personal belief, but also a requirement set forth by my school’s policy is the idea of struggling to achieve mastery of a concept or skill.  W..."
1 "firmly believe that Alice" "...nt of rules for each department within the organization. Essentially, their has to be some degree of operational variation between each department. I firmly believe that Alice Thornton has come to the realization that what works in one department of the Cosmo Plastics company may not necessarily work in another department o..."
0 "understand that" "...ty will “wake when she tires of [the ailment]”, but doesn’t realize that Ann Putnam's children never got “tired” of the ailment (27). Rebecca doesn’t understand that her solutions don’t necessarily apply to different scenarios as she had eleven children compared to the one Mrs. Putman had. This leads to higher ten..."
1 "notes that were left" "... in the room has been crying for some medicine, but every time Poole has tried to bring something back it wasn’t the right one. Utterson asks for the notes that were left by Jekyll and each are a formal letter begging for the medicine. Utterson agrees that the whole situation is off but still decides to be rational. Po..."
1 "scientist agree that GMOs" "...re's no need for any GMO labeling. In other words the nutrition, taste, and safety of GMO products are exactly the same as those with out, and 88% of scientist agree that GMOs are safe and shouldn't be labeled. They claim that if they label GMOs they will be discriminating or diminishing  products for no reason or even more..."
0 "possibly foreshadow that it" "...s formed a group around her, making her become their compass for who is a witch.   Act 2 #11 Mary Warren gives Elizabeth a poppet as a gift and could possibly foreshadow that it was a plan set up by Abigail to get Elizabeth be accused as a witch. It becomes clear when we see that Mary Warren’s voice is “with a trembling, deca..."
1 "This suggests that Health" "...checklist was not used by all the health visitors to assess risks as recommended in the Operational Domestic Abuse Guidelines on the Trust intranet.  This suggests that Health visitors need to get better at using the checklist to assess risks of DV.                           7.0         Recommendations: • Health care profes..."
1 "thought that it was" "...id. I entered 4-H like my sister a year before me and our mother before us and so on. My mom signed us up to show beef cattle, specifically steers. I thought that it was going to be the best experience in my life, but by the end of the year I learned how wrong I was.  \tI spent months training my steer, Spike, for the ..."
1 "government sees that the" "...r own control. I hate seeing stuff like this going on especially when it is happening to girls my age and younger, but change can only occur when the government sees that the unbalance of rights given to women needs to be fixed. With that in mind, I fully believe  that Saudi Arabia and other countries who limit women to pa..."
1 "we assess that the" "...ces within the security apparatus when launching investigations linked to corruption and tax evasions in the longer term. But on current indications, we assess that the FSB is unlikely to target Western companies operating in Russia more often than usual.   Following a reshuffle of Russian officials on 28 July, it no..."
1 "break that is not" "...serves the right to adjust your time sheet, after discussion with the employee, when mistakes have been made on your time sheet. (For example a lunch break that is not recorded properly or not at all)   Employee Breaks Anyone who keeps track of his or her hours using a time sheet is responsible for clocking out when..."
0 "all that was needed" "...sistent communication between the employer and employee is the primary contributing factor to Bob’s resignation. Improved communication may have been all that was needed to retain Bob in his current position until a position that satisfied Bob’s development needs became available. ​Career planning and development prog..."
0 "letter that" "...here corrects (compare 1Th_5:10).......' 'we which are alive and remain unto the coming of the Lord' The Thessalonians clearly understood from Paul’s letter that their generation would be alive at Christ’s return.  'caught up' This phrase was translated from the Greek word 'harpazo', more on this later.  1 The..."
0 "plains that were well" "...ed in the Caribbean in 1492. During the colonization of the new World, the Spaniards introduced wheat to Mexico around 1520. Mexico had high altitude plains that were well suited for the growing of wheat. Wheat was not the dominant crop being planted and exported from the new world in this time period. Maize and corn ou..."
1 "also noticed that when" "...e it would take forever for it to finally arrive.   Now, as an adult, I feel like I often don’t have enough time to prepare for the holidays.    I’ve also noticed that when we are children, let’s say at age 4, 2 years is half of our life.  Half of a life is a long time.   Now that I’m knocking on the doorstep of year 40,..."
1 "Eyes that were almost" "...ppened so fast that I didn't have a moment to think it first, now I sat back and thought about the concerned on the dude's face, he had Shocking Blue Eyes that were almost too stormy but sapphire blue. His hair was jet-black with little curls around the edges. The thought that kept coming back to me was; why had he why ..."
0 "d say that’" "... it’s all me in one way or another. Tapping into that and exploring what came across on screen happened quite organically. Or it felt that way. And I’d say that’s in large part down to having written the script. I’d already got this guys backstory and history created well before we ever called action. There wa..."
1 "softly that it’" "... again. “Shh,” into my hair. Lew steps back and lets go, but he tips my chin up with his hand so that I have to look at him. “Don’t cry,” he says, so softly that it’s just barely above a whisper.   \tSo here we are, just standing in this little cobblestone alley, looking at each other when he starts to lean down to..."
1 "I believe that I" "...emia and industry in field of computing. This link is useful for me to achieve my goal to complete my PhD research.  I would like to join BCU because I believe that I will get a great chance to learn from the best teaching staff. Additionally , by obtaining PhD from BCU , It provides me the chance to join UK univer..."
"to discuss that not" "...ence as he points out is not good because its unbiased but because it is biased and that makes people fiercely defend their research. He then goes on to discuss that not only will it be har" 1
1 "How sad that she" "...back onto the port where she had been delivered. Up that same glass shaft to see the marble blue planet with oceans that must be quivering with life. How sad that she didn’t learn it’s name before she lost sight of^it. She had been spoiled all her life, going from planet to planet never once thinking about the imme..."
1 "to say that a" "...tuation where teams have a mutual benefit in collaborating with each other” (Gupta,2009.     If I had to choose between both structures, I would have to say that a functional structure is more horizontal because individuals are grouped together based on their shared expertise and experiences. Tasks are grouped i..."
"make sense that there" "...spectrum which will make the issue shrink. So these would be working class moderates even though his proposition seems extreme.  His proposition does make sense that there will always be radicals we " 1
0 "ones that were grown" "...wered. He felt annoyed at being left out of the whole conversation so he decided to read the instructions out. “You have gather dandelion leaves, the ones that were grown in the shade and then add them you urine^” “It best to wake up before dawn and pee. Better to gather the leaves before then then add them to the urin..."
1 "am told that I" "...d sees the beautiful mansion is very big and there is a park nearby he also tells me. Your siblings or cousins might show you the park later Abbie. I am told that I am will be treated like a daughter during my stay and Glenn tells me that he don’t want to sell me like former master has done to me.  I meet my new ..."
1 "to confirm that I" "...   Oakland California 94621                                                                   510-830-6973     To who it may concern:  This letter is to confirm that I Angelique  Hughes have notified my landlord Teryra Hutchinson Of my intent to move   The term of my lease ended July 2016  I  Am moving in good stand..."
1 "to expect that any" "...at their research is not more intrusive than it needs to be and participants' privacy is maintained throughout the study. Participants have the right to expect that any data you they provide will b kept in strictest confidence.( Polit& Beck, 2010)  4) Informed Consent  One important measure to protect participants' r..."
1 "25 provides that for" "...ing the arrangements for dealing with the contention of nullity. Under the ICSID Convention, the definition of an “investor” or “National” in Article 25 provides that for Jurisdiction to exists, the claimant must be a “National” of an ICSID contracting state other than the host state, The Investor must not be a nationa..."
1 "They show that he" "... I have texts that establish his lack of financial support and lack of cooperation.  I have texts that demonstrate my attempts to co-parent with him. They show that he often won’t even respond to me.  I have texts that show when I ask to talk in person, he tells me to text.  I can also show texts that chronologicall..."
1 "Act ensures that the" "...with the consequences of the decision that they might be making without capacity by framework this will enable others to make decisions for them. The Act ensures that the decisions taken by a third party are done with the best interest of the individual concerned. At some time the mental capacity Act deprivation of lib..."
1 "seem right that he" "... that last time I saw him he was in Idaho... I never expected to see him here in Montana. We were 3 and a half hours away from Idaho, it just did not seem right that he was here. Why was he here? I was thanking my lucky stars that Darcy did not realize he was the same guy I was telling her about over our text message..."
1 "pot that is Toronto" "...of its story and legacy.  When you wear our clothing, you are not only telling your personal story and heritage, but you are representing the melting pot that is Toronto today.  It is such an amazing city, we could not resist including some mind blowing statistics about toronto that makes us proud to call it our home...."
0 "lumbar bulge that it" "...2010). Idiopathic scoliosis only rarely causes pain in children and adolescents and often comes to attention only because of the hunched rib cage and lumbar bulge that it causes, or because of asymmetry of the shoulders, chest, or pelvis (Trobisch et al., 2010). During a clinical evaluation for idiopathic scoliosis, th..."
1 "but that was a" "... too good to be true. “So, where are you taking me?” I asked after he got in the car. “I, uh… Know a guy at La Pierre, downtown.” He said it casually but that was a five star restaurant on a first date. We walked in and we were seated at a table, upstairs by a window. The view was amazing, I couldn't believe it. ..."
1 "something that is no" "... am accepted or rejected by others. There may be an algorithm in my biology that seek acceptance as a social species. This could be like the appendix something that is no longer needed but I have. The need for acceptance from others is like the appendix it could kill you. How can I reach the point as Thomas Nagel put i..."
0 "alcoholic that was abusive" "...is 28 now and is still a big part of James’ life. He has two grandsons by her and boasts about being a grandfather.                 His father was an alcoholic that was abusive to his three children. The children were also exposed to their mother being abused. James said that when he was growing up “he wished his daddy would..."
1 "can ensure that this" "...s an expert in the field and get noticed.  When you register we ask for the basic registration information you are used to.  Plus, by registering, we can ensure that this does not become a spammy situation, but whoever is posting and commenting actually is a part of our ecosystem, which we strive to make rich with only..."
0 "bargaining that is less" "...fluence- its influence is tempered by the influence of these bureaucracies. Resultantly, the international system becomes more of a complex system of bargaining that is less focused on the use of military force. However, if we are to look at early-mid 20th Century history, we can see that the Realist argument has the stro..."
0 "very well that Zera" "...ality. This was how they would truly erase her.   “Maybe after you serve your time, your true name will be returned to you.” the doctor said, knowing very well that Zera was there for a lifetime.  “ This is cruel!” Zera exclaimed while regaining her strength, she lunged at the doctor, pinning her to the floor in a flu..."
0 "And fuse that knowledge" "...stand characters, their motives and how they reflect upon the universe they belong to.​ It is critical for us, to speak the language of comic books.​ And fuse that knowledge into creating cultural icons that can last for decades.​ OFFICE MANAGER As the Office Manager you are joining our internationally re known team of ar..."
0 "to assume that those" "...disgusting acts are all due to the  nature surrounding him. Obviously David’s biological parents have issues that we are not aware of, but it is safe to assume that those issues are the cause of his constant urge for brutality. The nurture he received from his adopted parents were not an influential factor in the murde..."
1 "had remembered that his" "...f. The Bartender soon stood in shock as his jaw dropped. He could not believe that Eric had assumed the position to play guillotine. For a moment, He had remembered that his girlfriend, Lotus had an obsession with playing guillotine and death. She had always talked about that thought with the Bartender. But unfortunately,..."
1 "I believe that my" "...he processes of the assessment were informed by personal philosophies about teaching and learning as well as those of the educational setting (2009). I believe that my role as an educator in the assessment process was applicable, and I value the ability to improve and respond to children’s interests. The intention o..."
1 "network trends that this" "...oost operational efficiencies for headroom that is needed to spur growth.” It is on the verge of these contrasted strategies on automation and branch network trends that this research was done. 2.4 Related research studies The earlier studies on the impact of technology on banks financial performance found no conclusive ev..."
0 "to believe that if" "...usband.   In the second act Nora contemplates on the thought of not being around for her children and her husband who she loves so dearly. Nora wants to believe that if her husband finds out what she has done he will pay off the debt and forgive her. But her husband’s words play over and over in her head. She feels s..."
1 "hates that" "...ry and movement stimuli which make her not successful when doing daily living activities. M  tends to rush into activities that fatigue her easily. M hates that she finishes last when doing an activity in school while everybody else is done. Her parents want her to get better with help from the sensory gym wh..."
1 "character is that of" "...oversial one.   The play was written in three acts. The first act opens up with the main character Nora returning home from a day of shopping. Nora’s character is that of a childish, cheery and playful housewife and mother. Nora pays the doorman twice what she owed him, presumably because she is filled with the Christm..."
0 "animals that were domesticated" "...sticated animal the dog may have helped Hunters track game animals additionally provided me but also eventually supplied milk, wool, and energy  Many animals that were domesticated included cattle, goats, sheep,  and buffalo The causes that caused population to begin agriculture Include climate change which could change local cl..."
1 "has shown that the" "... loyalty as well as generating cost savings by eliminating the commission fee charged by OTAs for bookings.   Marketing Your Direct Booking  Research has shown that the number one reason that consumers leave a hotel direct booking site and head to an OTA to book their reservation is that they believe that the OTA rat..."
1 "notations that were left" "...are you on about?\" \t\"Silence! I'm thinking!\" Toby snapped, holding up a hand. He paced a bit sliding his fingers along charred wood of the table. The notations that were left nearby had taken the brunt of the damage and now only existed in a very fine, very fragile sheet of char. \"Door slams shut.. Likely the same moment t..."
1 "I think that he" "...arcy informs Elizabeth that he is preparing for his sister and some guest, and asks if Elizabeth would like to meet her, to which Elizabeth says yes. I think that he wants his sisters                       In Chapter 46                        In Chapter 47 and 48                        In Chapter 56               ..."
1 "which meant that the" "...hich had caused the speed sensor to operate incorrectly. This effective failure of the speed sensor resulted in the Schottel controls ‘switching off’ which meant that the Speedronic engine speed control and the Schottel unit remained in their last set position prior to the failure. In this case, with the Speedronic set..."
1 "one that is capable" "...from the perspective that everything is working for you, rather than against you.   \tWhether or not they have positive intentions behind, you are the one that is capable of attaching positive meanings behind their anger-projections. When you attach positive meanings behind what seem like negativity to you, you will st..."
1 "onesies that is in" "... I bought about 30 cloth diapers since we have at least 50 cloth diapers at home for Abbie that she will wear when she is at home. They also buy some onesies that is in adult sizes one of them is red, and one is yellow, and one is pink, and one is purple, and one is turquoise and the final one is white.     Carrie bu..."
1 "strongly recommended that you" "...ion expense, you obviously need to keep your bookkeeping straight.   Right! Common sense, who doesn’t keep bookkeeping? - most cases no body.   It is strongly recommended that you keep records of all your qualifying expenses in case of an audit. Depending on how much your total expenses for itemized deductions compares to your ..."
1 "changing processes that  considerably" "...paration. Customer service: homeowners, vendors, and assised property managers concerning accounting questions.  Successfully managed 25 HOA accounts changing processes that  considerably cut costs, and time. Implemented process checklist that allowed quicker follow up on HOA activities, bids, and fines.     \t\tOffice Manager – Accounta..."
0 "He suggests that the" "... Foster mean that all stories are exact copies of one another? No, he simply means characters are often found in many stories with slight variations. He suggests that the reader should use their previous knowledge and search for these recurring characters. Nearing the end of the chapter Foster announces “There’s only o..."
1 "list that was sent" "...ucation teacher of the date and time of their students’ meeting.  We cannot have people at the CSE meeting unless their name was on the participant’s list that was sent home.  Please have draft IEPs ready two school days prior to the meeting.                                     RELATED SERVICES  Cancelled and/or miss..."
1 "“Is that-" "...d’ve stayed there all night.  “Flora?” a voice called out from downstairs, shattering the bubble that Harry and I had wrapped ourselves in. “Harry?”  “Is that-”  “Yeah.” It was my mum, her voice was recognisable miles away let alone up a flight of stairs. She had her own key, but I wasn’t expecting her until..."
1 "simply means that characters" "...here’s no such thing as a wholly original work of literature” (Foster, 24). Does Foster mean that all stories are exact copies of one another? No, he simply means that characters are often found in many stories with slight variations. He suggests that the reader should use their previous knowledge and search for these recurrin..."
0 "to ensure that your" "...the information, or providing access would prejudice certain investigations.  Corrections to your Personal Information  We will take reasonable steps to ensure that your Personal Information is accurate, complete and up to date. We are happy to accept requests to update Personal Information if you demonstrate that the..."
1 "have thought that the" "... young girl out of her thoughts. The said female turns to her side to find a blonde with deep blue eyes. If it wasn’t for the girl’s face, Hope would have thought that the blonde is a foreigner. She is tall, around 5’4 ft. The girl is wearing a grey skirt, a white dress shirt, and tie, but instead of a grey jacket, she ..."
1 "feel that" "...ad, when i’m in a classroom i’m in my happy place. It’s my natural habitat. I really enjoy being there doing my thing. Students be they young or old, feel that i’m glad to be there with them. That rubs off. I’m not faking, i just really love my job, and i’m happy that this course made me better than i was.  ..."
0 "America that was on" "...es.     I vaguely remember that when we were on the ship pulling into the harbor where the Statue of Liberty is that's when my parents said we are in America that was on April 10, 1951.  I have very little or just vague memories because I was only six years old but I do have some pronounced points that I do remember. ..."
1 ", that were furthermore" "The reasons why they cried were because they had too many issues within themselves, that were furthermore unbearable to the point of them seeking to cause havocs upon others around them. The techniques that I am about to teach you will give the people who..."
1 "I feel that after" "...l.  That is not to say that I do not wish to do this, but rather that I am not yet comfortable as to how this would be presented in a reading class.  I feel that after reading this portion of the text I am more motivated to seek out Professional Development that addresses problem-based learning and experiment with w..."
0 "Faubus learned that most" "...with it or not, he was a old fashioned politician who told the community of Little Rock Arkansas what they wanted to hear (Kallen 121). Once governor Faubus learned that most of the community was not in favor of integrating Central High School he decided he had to take any actions necessary to stop that from happening. On ..."
1 "to see that the" "...ors play the game flawlessly and also teach you on how to attain the same level of expertise they have. Once I started playing with the crowd, I came to see that the whole experience is not only about the game but also getting to know your fellow players who are in both ACT and CEG campus.   Students from differen..."
"I see that our" "...in this. Even though we won, Jiaolian and Mr Lee still scolded us. Their goal for us is to beat them 25-0 for both matches. From today’s performance, I see that our team is not unit" 1
0 "I decided that I" "...dy checked, a smug grin on his face.  ‘I want to knock that damn smirk off his beautiful fucking face…’  “Well, you certainly caught my attention, so I decided that I should follow your angry ass to figure out what^your fucking problem is.”  “I don’t think I’m the one with the problem, Gabriel.”  “Are you trying to..."
0 "9000 Certified that no" "...iority is on our relationships with our retail partners and collaborations with local artists.  Why we stand out  Our product is 100% sun-grown.  ISO 9000 Certified that no pesticides or dangerous chemicals are used in the growing.  Regular buyers get access to limited edition strains with premium packaging.  Advanced in..."
1 "to ensure that its" "...pelagic species and tuna. The FSM government in its written statement stated that flag states have a due-diligence obligation under international law to ensure that its flagged vessels do not engage in iuu fishing activities in the high seas and in the national waters of third-party coastal states. The statement also..."
1 "may think that of" "...n that you have just met. Mr. Darcy seems a bit rude, especially when he says that Elizabeth is “tolerable, but not handsome enough to tempt” him. He may think that of her apperance, but what about her personality? What if he met a woman who didn’t look like a supermodel, but she had the most amazing personality, wo..."
1 ") found that students" "... network with other students and staff who are positive role models to be part of the students learning experience (Darling1985).  Gillen et al. (2009) found that students could become the victims of bullying within the learning environment and that they were being bullied mostly by their mentors, this suggests toxic me..."
0 "people argue that there" "...ey help people, like teaching or nursing whereas people who are Conventional are very organised and would be enjoy being an accountant. However, some people argue that there must be more than six personality types in the whole world and find his work quite limiting.  When you take the test, it will tell you which three ty..."
0 "to argue that he" "...e a good man Sasuke. Whatever Uchiha thing you have that you’re afraid of. Naruto will love you all the same. He’s stubborn like that.” Sasuke wanted to argue that he wasn’t afraid of his beast powers but was that really the case? He’d have been mated to Naruto a long time ago if he wasn’t worried about his childre..."
0 "This states that the" "...er from a product is referred to as utility. The neoclassicists then expanded upon this idea to develop the theory of ‘diminishing marginal utility’. This states that the more an individual consumes, the less utility they gain from the same product. Thus the value one places upon a product is dependent upon the amount ..."
0 "to suggest that the" "...s. It has also been suggested that wide and unwarranted interference have been drawn from small and specialized samples and that there is no evidence to suggest that the satisfiers do improve productivity. In spite of all these criticisms, the theory continues to thrive as it is easy to understand and also because it ..."
1 "was announced that my" "...o our county, and submitted it along with my application.        When the time came for the first meeting of the Youth Leadership Wilson students, it was announced that my essay influenced the group project for the year. Instead of all working on different issues, each group would help with a different aspect in helping..."
0 "IEP that is to" "...P placement, related services and supplemental aids and services shall be held annually. The annual review procedures should be conducted so that the IEP that is to be the basis of an upcoming school year’s programming is finalized prior to the start of the new school year. There must be an IEP in effect at the b..."
0 "and that is priority" "...f the healthy and affordable food are limited for the people living in low economic or remote areas. The necessity for them mean survival not health, and that is priority in low income families ( Warvin et al.,2015). In week seven lecture we were told about the a family in south Australia and their struggle with the we..."
1 "homes that were struck" "...ople need help, it feels good to step up and be a shoulder they can lean on. Going on a relief trip four years in a row to help tear down and rebuild homes that were struck by natural disasters is something that opened my eyes to the world."
0 "figured that" "...terward Kiritsugu looking at his father betrayed face shot with a pistol that he found in his father's drawer. To this end, he explained that Natalia figured that the only person who could prevent Noritaka from escaping and ensure his death was his own son and later she would wound up taking him with her. He re..."
1 "contribution plan that an" "... is funded by specific contributions made by the employer to be disbursed to the employee upon retiring. c) 401(k) plan A 401(k) is a type of defined contribution plan that an employee can contribute earning up the maximum allowed amount. In some cases an employer may offer to match the employees contributions. d) Cash bala..."
1 "it is that the" "...ders of the corruption that came so quickly to the new” (175). Thus, one point of contrast between colonial and postcolonial mimicry is which ‘Other’ it is that the postcolonial appropriate. in the colonial discourse of nineteenth Century, it is the dialectics between the colonial master and colonial subject whic..."
1 "can identify that children" "...ldren naturally start to develop mathematics and numeracy skills as infants. As we explore Jean Piaget’s sensor motor development stage 0-2 years, we can identify that children develop knowledge and create understanding through exploring their sensory abilities (Charlesworth et al., 2013, p. 10). We are born naturally curiou..."
1 "love that is in" "...oals that I want to achieve after completion of my Master of Science in Information Technology Program is:  •\tTo find a good paying job that I really love that is in my field of experience  •\tTo find me a good wife and have children  •\tAlso, I want to get my Doctoral Degree one day  \tIf I work hard on my goals and..."
1 "pay that is listed" "...he two means is computed based on the ordering of the two variables. The variable of security is listed second and is subtracted from the variable of pay that is listed first. The test is significant, t (29) = 2.38, p < .01 (Table 5). Since the p-value is less than .05, the null hypothesis is rejected that nurses mea..."
1 "acceptance means that the" "...w a Trademark Nationally and Internationally.   The Statement of Use (SOU) ﬁled for the trademark application identiﬁed above has been accepted. This acceptance means that the mark will register and the registration certiﬁcate will issue in due course barring any extraordinary circumstances. New York, NY (July 26, 2016 -- T..."
0 "They state that Equality" "...nt also scares many residents in this society. When Equality 7-2521 showcased his electric glass box, the World Council of Scholars retreats from it. They state that Equality 7-2521 has committed many transgressions by creating this box, and immediately refuse his invention. In the story, the absence of technology proves t..."
1 "and that it would" "...ghter so that I would be able to clear the subject leaving no arrears. I always had this wrong mindset that keeping arrears were part of college life and that it would be cool to be part of this wonderful tradition, but sanity won me over when I realised that the extra workload would be too straining for anyone to h..."
1 "advised officers that she" "... bouncer. Officers made contact with Jasmine Bentley, who they believed to be intoxicated due to her being hysterical and hard to understand. Jasmine advised officers that she was inside the bar when she was approached by an unknown female who began to argue with her. The unknown female threw a drink on her so Jasmine pushe..."
1 "and confirm that you" "...man, duplicate the route or folder you want to change Work on duplicated collections/folders (not on original ones!!!!) Test if everything is working and confirm that you didn’t change/remove any of the collections that should not be a subject of your change If everything os, promote your newly changed folders to becom..."
1 "lake house that they" "...her's beginning's end’ and it finally makes sense to me.” Lauren answered.   Lake house  The sound of rain could be heard on the rooftop of the small lake house that they slept in last night. Bo was first to wake, which she was surprised about as normally Lauren would always wake first, but then again they did stay out..."
1 "fact that it comes" "...e you to make very creative campaign for marketing of your product. If you are thinking about “why WhatsApp?” then let me tell you, first of all, the fact that it comes at zero cost of a contrary to other social platforms, such as Facebook, which require large investments for planning campaigns and support of organic..."
1 "I decided that I" "...d aboard. I always put my brother before myself. Even if it meant I had to go without food or water for a couple days. I was older and I knew more so I decided that I wanted my brother to have the same chance as I did.My father tried to give me most of his food but I would reject it. He needed to eat too. Our famil..."
1 "make sense that she" "...n't like me because I kind of stole her high school boyfriend, but the truth is, he was a big jerk so I basically helped her dodge a bullet. It would make sense that she would try to get back at me by raping my boyfriend, but she didn't, she just wanted attention. \tI remember that party, I was there for the first part..."
0 ") that is me" "...ist when you do? It is like the atoms or matter that constitute me worrying about coming into existence. It is absurd to think that mass-energy (atoms) that is me had such worries. I am writing this because I have been thinking lately about today is one day less to live or that I am one day closer to dying. It ..."
1 ") states that the" "...are are expected to bring about significant improvement in patient outcomes (British Journal of Anaesthesia 2016). S21 (Ignatavicius aand Workman 2013) states that the circulating nurse must continously assess the adequacy of circulation by checking pulses and capillary refill below pressure points throughout the su..."
0 "dog is that I" "... pet. (Backup Q) Do you think having a pet is good or bad? Why? A.\tThe second family has a dog. I don’t have a pet. I think one advantage of having a dog is that I can become healthier by taking a walk with it. However, the disadvantage is that you have to be very responsible to take good care of the pet.   Q3. ..."
1 "as that is concerned" "...certify that States are the most elevated type of power in the worldwide framework, and that World Politics (as is inside governmental issues, so far as that is concerned) is only a battle for force against other Nation States.This stands in stark contrast to Liberal thought, which attests that whilst States are import..."
0 "of damages that Aragorn" "...fication costs.     Question 3  What is the likely success of a suit for damages brought by Aragorn Ltd, and what are the different types and quantum of damages that Aragorn may receive?    Did Baggins Enterprises breach an express terms in its contract?  One of the key issues in this case is whether Baggins Enterprises b..."
1 "to ensure that anonymity" "... pseudonym to be used in the final writing up to ensure that no individual is identified .   The rich data generated from the research will be coded, to ensure that anonymity of the participants in the research is preserved and that participants cannot be identified by the specifics of their accounts. The review of the fin..."
1 "told is that if" "...head of what your picture is going to be? People these days only think that they are never going to win, but that's not true one thing that my father told is that if i put my mind towards something I can accomplish it. Think that when ever you doubt yourself. "
0 "to understand that the" "...ed the early explorers, they found just small groups of people living a primitive life they'd always lived, in an ancient forest. Now we're beginning to understand that the forest was new and the people were the survivors of an apocalypse, wandering stunned through the grotesque remains of their farms and orchards.  ### ..."
1 "study found that the" "... drug within 12-24 hours of testing. The students rated their perception of memory deficits verses how the computer measured the memory deficits. The study found that the adolescents that perceived “minor” impairment of memory performed better on objective measures compared to those adolescents that perceived “no memor..."
1 "cedarians said that they" "..., what is the real meaning of “Joy”? (Sooah)  Would you be interested to take part in art competitions hosted by Singapore Arts Museum?  69.1% of the cedarians said that they are not interested in taking part in the SAM art competition. We think that majority of them did not want to take part as they do not have much inter..."
1 "me is that Koro-sensei" "...scent moon on it. How odd. For being the thing that destroyed more than half of the moon, he surely is wearing it proudly. Either way, what intrigues me is that Koro-sensei’s academic dress hides his whole body excepts for the arms, head, and legs. I wonder: what is underneath that dress of his? “A-hem!” a soft cough fro..."
0 "Castiel knows that his" "...ules and boundaries for Castiel to follow even in their younger days, though not without his reasons. It’s only the two of them, always has been, and Castiel knows that his brother takes looking after him as his highest responsibility.  He just wishes Michael would stop treating him like a child, especially as his birthd..."
0 "Stensland found that every" "... be finding answers for some beneficial ways to cope with adoption stress, we run into limitations with true diagnosis especially with RAD. Vasquez & Stensland found that every adopted child in their study had one or more other diagnoses to accompany the diagnosis of RAD. Other researchers came upon the possibility that data..."
1 "Americanization that is taking" "...in comparison with the town transforming, highlighting the loss of characterization. “chrome”, “tile-facing”, and “plate-glass” are metaphors for the Americanization that is taking place, with the sudden transformation from an old and familiar world to something new and different. The impression of degradation is displayed by th..."
0 "And that is when" "...got it! Are those games hers? James: Yes. Why? Johnny: She is a genius. She could’ve coded the game to make her win when she plays. James Voice Over: And that is when the prank wars started.  Scene 2 Lucille: I got your note James, but who told you I was cheating? James: I have eyes everywhere. Lucille: You watch m..."
1 "dilemma is that of" "...e statement, instead it comes from reducing costs, particularly staffing costs which tends to be the largest cost. The justification for this ethical dilemma is that of the ‘greater good’, that the business, the rest of the staff and shareholders may continue to be ‘productive’ post removal of an ‘unproductive’ conti..."
1 "then added that although" "...DJ back and stated that depression was a terrible illness and one that goes unnoticed by others as its not as obvious as a broken leg for example. AM then added that although the tablets were now helping he felt that DJ had to take some credit himself as tablets can only take you so far.  AM then explained to DJ that in th..."
1 "to say that I" "...mendously. Each giving me life lessons over time and I have to remember to count my blessings. I will add here that there will be at least one person to say that I am minimizing miracles or that I am using the word as a broad and commonplace event. I am not trying to do this and if I have upset someone, I’m sorr..."
1 "crime that is existent" "...to discuss whether they are justifiable.      In theory as stated previously in this essay, the illegalization of cannabis would reduce the amount of crime that is existent within that society.  In theory this seems valid, criminalizing cannabis would theoretically deter people from selling and distributing the drug ille..."
0 "data that is available" "...oration by identifying those who prey upon the weak. This gives us an edge to combat sex trafficking using multiple platforms. The enormous volume of data that is available to predators must be harnessed [collected] in a database that is made available to the global first responder network [interpol].  After the data is ..."
0 "fact is that WhatsApp" "...ith 4.8 crore. WhatsApp acquired 6th position in the list of global brands which rank highest in consumer engagement on February, 2015. Matter of the fact is that WhatsApp is totally a free of charge, easy to use and personal app that makes it one of the best platforms to create engagement and awareness of your brands. ..."
0 "I think that’" "... us. “We could fly there the morning after the awards? I know we booked the villa for a few days. but I’m sure we could leave early.”  Harry smiled. “I think that’s a good idea. Maybe we could stay in New York instead? I could introduce you to some of the new team.”  “As long as we don’t stay in a hotel. It’s fi..."
0 "I think that they" "... would have happened if the ships crew at that moment treated everyone equally and that the rich people and poor people where on the same lifeboats?  I think that they would have discovered that they are not that much different or better than the person sitting next to them on the lifeboats.  It looks like Bill and ..."
1 "Cole screamed that the" "...uring the storm Cole heard baby sparrows calling for their mother in their nest which was placed in a tree right beside Cole. As the storm carried on Cole screamed that the birds should be dead, he was still angry for everything that happened.   During the storm Cole blacked out and when he woke the tree that had the bab..."
0 "to suppose that anything" "...Clayton had understood, the result of a feud between Sikhs in the UK and those in California. Rather, in the India Office’s view, “there is no reason to suppose that anything in the nature of a feud exists” but “the United Kingdom Sikhs are doubtless not anxious to give the appearance of having relations with a body so not..."
1 "place that is unsanitary" "...lieve that if the money isn't going to go in the two main issues listed above then it could go into cleaning the environment. People cannot live in a place that is unsanitary and dirty and that’s w            Opinion: "
1 "I say that I" "...tting across from the said agent is Principal Asano himself, with his fingers intertwine tightly and his back rest on the large chair. \t“Believe when I say that I was surprise at this request Karasuma-san,” Principal Asano states, “Even I don’t know why. However, the child said she will be here early in the mor..."
1 "goals that were set" "...a three year plan. Typically, after a District Review, there would be a follow up with the principal/vice-principal the following year to discuss the goals that were set within the SIP. In this case, for there to be real change, the administration asked for three years. That was timeframe that the administration agree..."
0 "murmur that was distinctively" "..., she needed him-- however little she liked to think about that particular notion.  “What is in town square, pray tell?” she asked dully, the distant murmur that was distinctively indicative of a crowd catching her attention. Bartholomew turned on his heel, and Janelle fixed him with an even glare in spite of his broad smile. P..."
1 "always believe that “" "... a ‘C’ program. This helped me see the bigger picture of the vast potential of applications of computer science and this pushed me more towards it. I always believe that “Skills and Confidence are an unconquerable army” and thus to enhance my skills. During my undergraduate course in the Department of Civil Engineering,..."
0 "city that is also" "...In the end, I would suggest to do an exchange program in Dublin if you are a LGBT student, because you will live in a nice, international and  active city that is also LGBT friendly. I have not experienced any discrimination for my sexual orientation while I was there and none has judged me because I was gay, but on..."
1 "stating that it does" "... Not getting the ticket settles the matter. Believing is the motive for being baptized.    Attempting to negate the \"baptized\" requirement in Mark by stating that it does not read \"and is baptized not\" is problematic with English grammar structure.   Look at the word \"for\" in Acts 2:38; \"into\" in Gal 3:27, Rom 6:3-4 fr..."
1 "Nora realizes that he" "...an all the world. All she wants to do is leave so Torvald won't suffer because of what she has done, she doesn't want him to take her guilt. But soon Nora realizes that he wouldn't take the guilt for her. Torvald says: oh, what an awful awakening! In all these eight years-she who was my pride and joy-a hypocrite, a liar..."
0 "child that is not" "...mothers often used wet nurses when they were not able to breastfeed or did not want to breastfeed. A wet nurse is a lactating woman who breastfeeds a child that is not her own. Wet nurses were mostly used by ruling classes, and later through the years, used by low-income families, but it clearly became obsolete when..."
1 "to ensure that they" "...y Ferries should examine the propulsion control systems on all of their vessels in light of this accident and assess the failure modes of the systems to ensure that they are sufficiently ‘fail safe’ and that the masters have the appropriate knowledge and training."
0 "to see that I" "...hool and the grades were up. The first thing I saw was that my average raised up to a “B” and was ecstatic. I clicked on my average and scrolled down to see that I aced the test. I was so happy. The reason I got the “A” was because I believed in myself and knew I could do it with hard work and determination. I b..."
1 "to believe that he" "...d with people and his job even when he is depressed but needs to continue being coached on how to do this. Tony needs to build his confidence to come to believe that he is worthy of love and inclusion even when he feels down on himself. Tony needs to also gain confidence in hiself to beleive that he can set, and achi..."
1 "I fear that you" "...: Write down what your fears are, behind the anger-projections you have for yourself. Speak to yourself as a second person, and as a wiser being:  \t- I fear that you're comparing yourself with others too much, you care too much about what others think. \t- It's not because you're lazy, you just don't have higher am..."
1 "but that was not" "...             The American Civil War was considered inevitable because it could not have been stopped. The way to avoid the war was to abolish slavery but that was not going to happen. The South needed the slaves and it became a crucial part of their society. Another way the war could have been avoided was if the No..."
1 "and realized that my" "...nd make others happy. My entrepreneurial spirit lived with me all through my stay in Kano. I could still recall when my father took me back to school and realized that my campus was too far away from the city. That time, only Law and Technology faculties and Mass Communication department were on new campus. In addition..."
0 "Davis admitted that her" "...r the place, They song, danced, and  saw Betsy's favorite movie named The Dance of Reality \". Betsy described  this idea as \"rebirth.\" However, Kelly Davis admitted that her loved sister's idea still let her feel sad,but her family and her understood and respected her sister's choice because they knew Betsy endured too mu..."
0 "It seems that I" "...balance between knowledge, exploration, family, friendship and work, where the bridges are made up of trust. I’m not alone anymore and never will be. It seems that I have a lot to write about my life as of yet, but first, let’s let it happen first, we shall know more then."
1 "survey that is currently" "...el I plan to take further training in related areas. This  research module has just recently led to me to being involved with a large scale national  survey that is currently taking place with the organisation Help Musicians. It is the first of its kind researching into mental health and music. On 24th May 2016 they launch..."
0 "has requested that you" "...t clothing since my master is expecting me to get dressed. Nanny what is going.? Abbie you just obey and there will be no problems child, my employer has requested that you  Come upstairs since he has something important he going to tell you child.  Nanny takes off my dress and then she takes off my bra and panties. I am..."
1 "has realized that they" "... one responsible for contacting the IRS with any inquires.   #3: Price With DIY online tax preparation on the rise, and local competition. The people has realized that they don't need to go to the big name tax offices and pay top dollars to get their tax return prepared.  I wrote about high tax prep fees before. Many onl..."
1 "same book that Maddie" "... realized, the vines were wrapped around something and that something was… “Mr Lindon!” I screamed. I realized the vines were coming from a book. The same book that Maddie checked out!I then realized why Mr Lindon had warned us.My eyes darted around.I saw an old 17th century sword.I broke its case and grabbed i,I ran ov..."
1 ") states that to" "...ket surveys and data collection, than just handing out questionnaires. The low intensity modes should, however, not be considered useless. Lettl (2007) states that to find the right mode of involvement banks have to consider how many users they should involve in the innovation process and not solely focus on the le..."
1 "many people that rather" "... are modifiable, but many individuals may choose not to take action because they don’t understand how severe their condition can become. There are so many people that rather live in the moment, then considered about how their health will be like in the future, even when they have been diagnosed with a disease. For example..."
1 "unusual is that each" "...a video file, a file format where it's not unusual to see multi-gigabyte file sizes. The video files containing stolen data played normally. What was unusual is that each file was an identical size, which is anomalous since encoded videos are usually not the exact same file size. (Dark Reading, 2016) The attackers then..."
1 "it states that “" "...ww.techradar.com/us/news/world-of-tech/future-tech/is-technology-making-us-less-human--1171002” tells us that technology is courpting us. In the text it states that “When you look out of a window, you perceive millions of variances - colour, perspective, sound, feeling, and many others. But when you gaze at an iPad..."
0 "CA that is busy" "...cation.  A trainee CA that has completed an additional qualification.  A qualified CA that is busy completing an additional qualification.  A trainee CA that is busy completing an additional qualification.  A qualified CA that wants to do an additional qualification.  A trainee CA that wants to do an additional qu..."
0 "he says that “" "...ail has played all the cards in her favor so far, and is able to manipulate the whole society to reach John Proctor.   Act 3 #3 What Giles means what he says that “he broke charity with that woman” is that he ruined his wife’s reputation and status through saying that she read books secretly. He says this, “openl..."
1 "it appears that he" "... an African American farmer who lives with his family. He appears to be an introvert type of guy, with a shy personality. Due to his shy personality, it appears that he didn’t feel the need to be in the center of everything. During the novel, he was accused of rapping a white girl(Mayella). It turned out he didn’t do..."
1 "audience that it’" "...(Seriously, why were people in the classical period so traumatized?) The closing theme also appears in the tonic. This piece is intent on showing the audience that it’s never a good idea to walk out your front door. The bridge passage is modified to take the listener to new heights of ecstasy and explore the world o..."
1 "this indicates that empathy" "...ustrate how the emotions of others are differently engaged, depending on the magnitude used to understand other people’s emotional encounters. Hence, this indicates that empathy can generally be induced by observing what others face in life.     Question 4: The implication of Morelli’s Quote for Civic Engagement  ​Civic engag..."
1 "also notice that this" "...’s not very effective for composing. The reason being is that the moment you begin to notate your music, you’ll lose the clarity of the music. You’ll also notice that this exercise takes longer than 15 minutes. You can either reduce the number of steps or you can simply take a little longer to complete this exercise.  P..."
0 "noted that" "...ra in Coventry, was an ardent nationalist and helped Indians in Britain to avoid conscription (IPI to Mr. Silver 2 April 1942, Ibid.). Though the IPI noted that the first four men had the “typical Ghadar outlook,” neither Khan nor Shastry appear to have been orthodox Ghadarites. Nonetheless, they coordinated ..."
1 "school district that “" "...ative placement, therapy and counseling. At the IEP meeting, Jerry’s parents were told by the team members representing the faculty from Jerry’s home school district that “when Jerry is successful for one semester in an alternative educational setting, he can return to his school district. Success was described as Jerry ..."
1 "in hopes that he" "...duated.  \tOne day, I went to the store to shop for my family over summer and I saw Matty there. I was too shy to go up to him so I continued shopping in hopes that he would see me. As I was checking out, he tapped me on my shoulder just like from the night of the show. \t“Hey, I didn't expect to see you here…” I tur..."
1 "distraction is that many" "...     Question 4: The implication of Morelli’s Quote for Civic Engagement  ​Civic engagement is hindered by the advancement of social media. The major distraction is that many individuals are electronically connected, whether they are at work or home. This affects their social life, such that they allocate little or no time..."
0 "to find that a" "...th the trash can down the hall. Luckily no one seemed too suspicious. Most of them probably didn’t even care.  We finally made our way to the office, to find that a group of sixth graders had already taken ahold of it. they had quickly lowered the gates surrounding the information desk. Even the regular doors wer..."
1 "something that is worth" "...take longer to begin, later in the day my energy levels are lower and what would take half the time when my energy is higher now take more.   This is something that is worth me considering when planning and scheduling my activities in the future.  I think there’s a book about it called “Eat that frog”.   The premise is ho..."
1 "resignation is that he" "...a surprise to his boss Terry. Terry calls Bob to the office to discuss his resignation. During this meeting Bob informs Terry that the reason for his resignation is that he does not believe there is any room for advancement within the company. The next position above his own is Terry’s, and based on Terry’s age he did no..."
1 "Oher said that the" "... wars, but  had nothing to show for it. Many people  accused  the royals,  especially queen Marie- Antoinette of spending too much money on luxuries. Oher said that the tax system was corrupt and some tax collectors did not hand all their taxes over the government. In 1787 the king asked the nobility to help him refo..."
0 "year is that I" "...me, because I was a stay at home mom. I worked only 2 days a week. I was content. That has changed, because what I have learned during this last past year is that I can be something more. Even if you work a little at a time at something you will in the end reach the finish line, just at a different pace compared ..."
0 "I appreciate that you" "... a long, agitating sip of his drink before replying. “Oh Sehun.” The boy, now Sehun, tells him. Junmyeon scribbles down Sehun’s name in his notepad, “I appreciate that you trusted me enough to give your name, your t"
1 "could tell that she" "...e pretends that she’s not vulnerable when she really is.  In this quote, I feel like Scout felt like she was being forced to go with them. The reader could tell that she was scared to sneak into Boo Radley’s lawn. But, if she didn’t go then they would think she’s a “girly girl” or a “scaredy cat”.           Arthur “Bo..."
1 "Something that was relatively" "...r again in something, more power to decide is lost and more strength this emotion wins. Without realizing it, is nourished by what grieves and fears. Something that was relatively small growing slowly, until one day you are faced with an ugly and scary monster."
0 "as evidence that the" "... created our nation, “...they somehow made sure the nation never forgot them” (Daniels 3). Daniels uses these stereotypes and these uses by the media as evidence that the many ideas that the pilgrims held dear,  are still a part of American ideals.   The Puritans were pioneers in the way that people viewed marriage and..."
1 "I believe that architecture" "...thin the School facilities and other various other conceptual design projects in my design class, in which I have also had a proficient performance.  I believe that architecture is a demanding profession based on problem solving, seeking to make people's lives better, both aesthetically and practically; inherently forcing the..."
1 "all that is to" "...mmary   According to Dewy 1938:15 experience is essential to link theory to practice however sometimes it is impossible for the student to experience all that is to be learned in the clinical setting whilst on placement.  For example obstetric emergencies, some students may not experience obstetric emergencies su..."
1 "am pleased that I" "... that says Glenn is she here yet. Yes she is dear Sonja my wife, our daughter Abbie has just arrived.  I am puzzled that they call me daughter, but I am pleased that I have now have a family. Abbie this is your siblings Carrie, Cassie, Chelsea, Carolyn, Caitlin, Dawn, Anniken, and Henriette.   Sonja says to Abbie yo..."
0 "have revealed that minorities" "...of prospect expats. Researching the job market and getting in contact with prospective employers prior to moving is crucial for a good start. Studies have revealed that minorities face disadvantages in the job market. I therefore recommend consulting a local career advisor to help get your foot in the door. Also have a backup p..."
"She says that \"" "replacedWith":{"s":"She says \""},"...en up to chance that has lead her back to Dutchy. Section 9  After Dutchy dies in the war, Vivian says she has learned what it is to lose everything. She says that \"it must be " 1
0 "are rights that you" "...t to go to school.    Prerequisite Skills - Vocabulary: right responsibility home  school  Prerequisite Skills - Guiding Questions: What do you think are rights that you have? (Possible answers: to learn at^school, to be treated fairly, to be safe) What do you think are responsibilities that you have? (Possible answer..."
0 "life that is memorable" "...uld be short and no more than four to five notes. If a motive ends up becoming too long, it’s hard for the audience to follow. Think of music in your life that is memorable. Many of them use short and easy to recognize motives. A motive is not a melody, but a short, distinct idea that recurs throughout the piece.  Writin..."
1 "data is that this" "... cannot get rid of; some claim you can transcend this I but who is experiencing this transcendence?  December 9, 2015  All I know from the scientific data is that this is a trick an illusion of my brain, the real “I” behind all of my conscious experiences. J. Krishnamurti in the latest segment of the audiobook that ..."
0 "explains that" "...ociety, is that it is creating a whole new way for people to connect with others and be more social. Brigette Voisinet, an average Pokemon Go player, explains that the game provides “a way to bond with her friends who are also into Pokemon Go” (Brophy 4). In America, as technology has become a major role in ever..."
0 "they pretend that I" "...confesses he was always like guest in this hotel.        Paul describes his relations with women as, “Either they always pretend to know who I am, or they pretend that I don’t know who they are, and that’s very boring“. His marriage with Rose was like a “foxhole” for him because they always hide their needs from each ..."
1 "can testify that I" "...e one I must clear it with.  She has seen how I value education and the priority I place on her school work. She is also a friend on social media and can testify that I keep my comments clean and positive, as is appropriate in those situations.  I never use social media to bash anyone or to air dirty laundry.  Jennif..."
0 "” means that Danforth" "...es that Proctor doesn’t spread the lies in order to save face.   Act 3 #6 Danforth’s statement, “We burn a hot ﬁre here; it melts down all concealment” means that Danforth’s authority is so high that he is able to look pass through any fraud. This is somewhat ironic because Proctor has been in the right all along, but D..."
1 "always believed that the" "...udents’ education. Another thing I found surprising was that the U.S was ranked #23 in educational infrastructure, #21 in science, and #25 in math. I always believed that the U.S had a great system of education but I guess not. The last thing I was surprised about was that the government gives education such a low budget. ..."
1 "learned that it is" "...he started a gang on his own, to make others happy.       Finally, Arturo learned an important lesson in this book from the Green Needle Gang. Arturo learned that it is better to give then to receive. Arturo decides later in the book to buy Christmas presents for the children whose parents can't afford toys. Arturo's..."
0 "ruled that" "...recedent on informed consent when a passenger on a ship sued a Doctor after being vaccinated and subsequently suffered injuries. The courts, however, ruled that the doctor was is right as the passenger did not object to being vaccinated therefore the doctor was justified.  Legally if a patient signs a consent..."
1 "cited-reason is that the" "... essay will clarify the observable pros and cons of globalization.  There are several arguments that in favor globalization. One of the most commonly cited-reason is that the integration allows some underdeveloped countries to receive foreign investment and promptly improve. Due to the facts that many underdeveloped countr..."
1 "Indonesia that is steady" "...n 1967.Indonesia is the normal pioneer of ASEAN and the course of its key arrangement and the quality of its economy will impact ASEAN's standing. An Indonesia that is steady, prosperous and fair, fit for tending to its political, security and financial difficulties, and ready to contribute decidedly to territorial steadin..."
0 "lines that were added" "...ft and the current script on the right. Differences are highlighted in red (previous version) and green (current version) for easy comparison. Entire lines that were added or removed are shaded grey on the opposite panel.  Note: You cannot edit from this panel, but you can copy content into the clipboard from either sid..."
1 "presiding held that there" "...he ECHR Article (5).          The Supreme Court justices debated whether a test could be universally applied to determine all three cases, Lady Hale, presiding held that there was an ‘acid test’ that could be applied, it could be determined if the individual in question was subject to continuous supervision and control and ..."
0 "sites indicates that AA" "...rth rock firstly increases with the increasing compaction pass, then decreases at pass 4, then increases again till the end.  Results from three test sites indicates that AA, CCV, and CMV show an increasing trend with increasing compaction pass, while MDP shows a decreasing trend. However, for the compaction of granite ea..."
1 "He felt that his" "...they had been in the past.  It was quite a peculiar sensation feeling them twitch about to better hear even the most incidental noises of the night.  He felt that his own night vision might be improved as well, but this was a city there really was only so much darkness to be had even without a moon showing.  “Sorry..."
0 "and that was just" "...ouldn’t make anything else out. “Sasuke!” he yelled for his mate and listened, waiting for an answer, but none came. He wanted to go find his husband and that was just what he was going to do when he stopped.  “It’s the anbu,” he whispered. Orochimaru must have sent them for something Sasuke was hiding. If they had ..."
1 "and feel that I" "...pped going to the gym and haven't been since I left. I do what to go back though. When I compare myself to when I was in the military, I feel ashamed and feel that I need to fix that, but due to my laziness i never commit to working out."
"This shows that Taylor" "... Chapter 8: “He moved out over six month ago, Lou Ann. did you ever think he’d just step out for some fresh air? It’s april now for gods sake. Quote: This shows that Taylor was not afraid to tell Lou  " 1
1 "number that was written" "...apon in the right hands. Zera had never mastered penmanship, it was a rare skill with everything being digital. She looked carefully at each name and number that was written on the list. Many were due^tomorrow, and she wondered if she’d have to collect them all. Would she be allowed to wander the prison by herself? “Ribah..."
1 "disposable diaper that I" "...ow has to wear diapers for 24 hours a day for quite a time. I begin cleaning the bum of Abbie with wet wipes and I throw the used wipes in the pooped disposable diaper that I throws in the trash. Up with your feet again sweetie, that's a good girl so nanny can put on you some ointment and baby powder.   Caitlin puts on me ..."
1 "All issues that we" "...eginning of the purchase, I have to identify the problem, or problems that may come up, and try to create a solution to avoid this to happened again. All issues that we have with an order, I have to follow these steps to "
1 "study concluded that there" "...her the intensity and duration of those advertisement resulted in a reduction in the numbers of teenager that might take up the habit of smoking; the study concluded that there has been a reduction in the prevalence of adolescent smoking (V. M. White, Durkin, Coomber, & Wakefield, 2015). However, the research did not examine..."
1 "Medicine defines that calcidiol" "...orm in blood tests. Normal ranges for blood levels of Vitamin D and indications for supplementation are both controversial. The official Institute of Medicine defines that calcidiol levels >20 ng/ml as normal and >50 ng/ml is too high. Their recommendations for daily vitamin D include sun exposure or 600-1000 IU of vitamin D3 dai..."
1 "do believe that money" "...a country individually by giving them the inspiration to win and since it happens every four years, I don’t think it is a waste of money.  However, I do believe that money raised from the Olympics should be used in some case to either help people, their rights and the environment. I do "
0 "fact that it is" "...ounds easy, fun and adventurous. Everyone would get very excited when they have the chance to study overseas. But, do not let the excitement bury the fact that it is not easy. Some may think money or paying for tuition and day to day expenses in general are the hard part, in reality that may not necessarily be a b..."
1 "rate that is agreed" "...al, removal or unavailability of any individual tutor. We will endeavour to find an alternative tutor if so requested.   5. Fees. We charge an hourly rate that is agreed by you when you agree to our Services. You agree to pay us at the intervals agreed upon when you sign up. All agreed fees are inclusive of any taxes...."
1 "lock box that my" "... leave their families, belongings, pets and homes to try to flee from the mess. I got out of the house as soon as I could, on my way out, I grabbed a lock box that my mother had given me weeks before her accident. I ran out into the street and froze as I watched a child try to run from it but was starting to slow d..."
1 "must believe that he" ".... Romans 10:17” Believe (Faith): Believe what? The Gospel (1Cor.15:1-4). “But without faith it is impossible to please him: for he that cometh to God must believe that he is, and that he is a rewarder of them that diligently seek him Heb. 11:6.” “Not everyone that saith unto me, Lord, Lord, shall enter into the Kingdom..."
1 "he hears that the" "... Anne instead of sending her back to the orphanage.  Just as Anne feels as though things couldn't get any better, Matthew dies of a heart attack when he hears that the Abbey bank is bankrupt. This comes as a shock for Anne and Marilla, for Matthew who worked the whole farm is gone and all their savings that were in ..."
"Issues that the" "                  Issues that the King Faced  Problem 1 - Taxes  By 1787, the french Government bankrupt.  It was 4000 millions livers in debt Brown had spent a lot of money fighting ..." 1
0 "person that was smart" "...to harm the man. I thought he was a very nice gentleman. Soft-spoken. I thought so right up to the moment I cut his throat. Response Prompt: Perry, a person that was smart, with a IQ test done in jail and scored^a whoper number of 130. While he didn’t get the education he deserved and he was able to kill someone he stil..."
1 "house that is way" "... report was made based on interviews, observation, and testing. James Doe is a 52 year old white single male. He lives by himself in a small standard house that is way below his means. His yard is full of things that he will probably never use but will not throw anything away because he made need it one day. He call..."
0 "have learned that no" "...lks about his life and how he told himself about real life. In the ninth paragraph of Hold Fast Your Dreams and Trust Mistakes, Billy Joel states, \"I have learned that no matter how successful or proficient or accomplished I might think I am, I am always going to make mistakes. I am always going to have to deal with th..."
1 "and that is suicide" "...ery day I get up, I don’t know if I have a choice. I know Albert Camus in the Myth of Sisyphus “There is but one truly serious philosophical problem, and that is suicide. Judging whether life is or is not worth living amounts to answering the fundamental question of philosophy. All the rest — whether or not the world ..."
0 "have said that we" "...e camp is buzzing, despite my small doubts and nervousness, I still feel like I am about to burst with pride. I feel in peak condition, the sergeants have said that we are all combat-ready and will make a fearsome opponent on the battlefield. I do not feel fearsome but I know that I am willing to defend this country..."
0 "I concluded that my" "...mes.  December 11, 2015  I believe today is my sister Victoria’s birthday. She is 56 years old. Last night I talked to Laurette (my other sister) and I concluded that my religious experience was less pleasant that it wasn't pleasing or pleasurable. The constant guilt and belief of the imminent rapture or Jesus’ return..."
1 "also shows that they" "...l the characters in the group. This shows their growth because they have become officially used to the time and scenery of the abandoned island. This also shows that they have become more adult like or have more scenery evaluation showing they have grown mentally which is a great step for them in the stages of adult ho..."
1 "8% feels that it" "...k individually, 69.2% of them like to work individually because they personally feel it is more efficient than working in teams, and the remaining 30.8% feels that it is better to work alone because they don't have to listen to other people’s opinion. Out of the 47.9% that prefer to work in teams, 46.8% feel that t..."
1 "been observed that the" "...o, treaties are not used in some part of the world for example, Russia who has been a signatory to this convention has never ratified it. It has also been observed that the ICSID convention has not developed any specific framework which governs the recognition and enforcement of awards, this is entirely left open for sta..."
0 "Why is that?" "... alone and it gets maddening being inside day after day. So I have those papers to read. Months of them. I have a few from out of town too.” “Really? Why is that?” “This is a pretty small village Naruto. Not much news to write about.” Kiba guessed. “Which is why I have the traveling traders bring me papers from..."
1 "so that it was" "...cold, getting dressed as fast as I could to stop myself shivering. I hadn’t bothered washing my hair since I wasn’t going anywhere, but I threw it up so that it was out of the way. Deciding that I had stalled going downstairs long enough, I took a deep breath in the mirror and reassured myself that things were go..."
1 "far off that he" "...s eyes flicked across the page there, surprise dawning as he read the words there. The folder was filled with all sorts- other photographs taken from far off that he could only assume were government workers keeping an eye on him, military snapshots and level training- even records of plane tickets and trips, medi..."
1 "I learn that we" "... she was a regular visitor, which lead to her success and positive reputation. I, Charlotte Anna Elisabeth, was named after her, and as time goes on, I learn that we are similar in many ways. \tPrincess Elizabeth Charlotte always had strong values, especially when giving back to the community. She often gave food f..."
1 "that suggests that the" "...of water particles) the spaces between the particles are empty [Note: these spaces do not contain air, they contain nothing] scientists have evidence that suggests that the particles are arranged differently in a solid, liquid and a gas in a solid, the particles are closely packed in a regular arrangement do not move aro..."
1 "will presume that you" "...poverty, or crime, or did you say, equal rights. If you said equal right think about this for a second since it was the first thing you  thought of I will presume that you think equal rights rank up there with things like poverty in the United States. You say that it does than what makes equal rights so important, are b..."
1 "but think that this" "...ere the same eyes that had saved my life on multiple occasions.  I don’t deserve to be here. I should hate him and he should hate me. I couldn’t help but think that this is my fault. If I had just listened to him then maybe he wouldn’t have lost so many loved ones and I so many friends. He should be brewing with hatre..."
0 "in that it has" "...ht counterpart, Leaflet (64 kilobytes3), which boasts simplicity and making “the basic things work perfectly.” Cesium is different from the other two in that it has the ability to display maps onto a 3D globe, which allows for a more accurate picture of the world.4 Leaflet was decided against as many of its impor..."
1 "and believes that someone" "...y with a check that Enfield immediately thought was forged, but was later proved real. Enfield concludes that blackmail was involved in the incident, and believes that someone lives in the strange door. Towards the end of the conversation Utterson asks Enfield what the name of the man was, and Enfield answers with “Hyde.” A..."
1 "Ibsen believed that the" "...Ibsen was often mistaken of being a feminist, he wasn't. Ibsen couldn't allow the demeaning treatment towards woman to go unnoticed.     \tEven though Ibsen believed that the role of a woman is to be a great wife and mother. He also felt that husband and wife should live as equals, and in these times it was consider immora..."
0 "He suggests that her" "...y into power and achieve her ambition, Barrett also attempts to correct the distorted portrait that ancient and modern writers have imposed upon her. He suggests that her “obsession to continue the Julian succession” was influenced by her mother, whom according to Tacitus, believed that their family had the “divine rig..."
1 "their own that anybody" "...e across some dogs who are weighing between 9 to16 lbs & standing between 8 to 11 inches in tallness. These dogs have exceptional nutritious needs of their own that anybody, as a potential dog proprietor, ought to take into account.   It is always crucial to ensure that you weigh the hair that a dog has, and also know th..."
0 "one realizes that the" "...tly, the three epic’s heroes embrace abrogating traits that further their interpretation as domineering protagonists. It is through these epic’s that one realizes that the negative qualities of an individual equate to fame, acknowledgement and distinction.       Bibliography Eknath, Easwaran. 1985. The Bhagavad Gita. Pe..."
1 "model that is 100%" "...o this question is the premise for Virta: Break silos, break financial dis-incentives and build all these four capabilities in-house with an economic model that is 100% focused on improving patient outcomes and lowering existing care costs.  Leverage the latest science and evidence-based methods in each of the four a..."
1 "also suggests that there" "...considered in local plan development.  This risk that such subjective assessments become material in planning applications is clear. The consultation also suggests that there is a need to level the playing field between in-house and procured services in terms of available transparency data, and that local councils will hav..."
1 "to feel that they" "...Common Core Standards at the same time.  I also believe strongly in the ideas set forth by Pestalozzi, that it is vital to the education of a student to feel that they are in a safe and warm environment.  I constantly try to build a classroom rapport that gives my students a chance feel comfortable and respected.  S..."
1 "I remember that you" "... to do any of that. This place is the only home I have and if you don’t want me I don’t who will ?” Eric said looking down.       “ Stop right there, I remember that you were a well-loved nurse and treated everyone with respect when you were caring for them. I also recall that you earned an award for being the best nu..."
1 "she says that Peter" "...ut me out for some random girl he barely knows! I can’t let that    happen, I can’t. I gave her the fairy dust so she could even fly to Neverland and she says that Peter taught her to fly, if it wasn’t for me and my fairy dust she would never have gone to Neverland. I knew I should never has allowed Peter to take the ..."
1 "document that is my" "..., I wonder how other species get things done without all the conventions and tools we have? I have updated the way of a skeptical African a four page document that is my philosophy or way I am living there is I to improve, the thoughts on my paper, of which I am aware, the style I am writing, etc. are already, determi..."
1 "to get that many" "...hods to study ‘giftedness’ Advantages Disadvantages Quantitative Research         Needs to be able to sample a large quantity of people   Can be hard to get that many people together for planned research   Requires a large funding, since it requires many people and many printed tests or pamphlet’s Health Research F..."
0 "was annoyed that the" "...ds including “very”. When the doves are described, they now appear to be trying to send a message that Matt has no hope, he has lost all hope.  “Matt was annoyed that the two seemed to have forgotten it was his party, his coming-of-age. He sulked in his bedroom. He twanged the guitar, hoping the noise would disturb the..."
1 "he believed that there" "...rly-1930s and upon arrival in Britain sought to contribute to these struggles. Yet, Rattan Singh did not enthusiastically endorse their goals because he believed that there were not enough Indians in Britain who were willing and able to participate in the struggle “in the proper way”. Nonetheless, his suggestion was that..."
1 "news is that you" "...g malaria extinct. This can be good and bad. It can be good because of the fact that it can increase the population of an endangered species. The bad news is that you can create a destructive trait then that is not to hard. This may not be a safe option but it can help stop malaria and if it does what the problem. ..."
1 "wish is that this" "...we were going through this ordeal, our family received no help or support from anyone, except for a few family members and a couple close friends. My wish is that this book will help you in some way. I hope this sort of crime never happens again, but if it does, I hope you understand that you are not alone. As a tes..."
1 "have known that some" "...rtified tank instructor. Sounds simple but not really. My army service was not what I expected it to be.      Growing up as a girl living in Israel I have known that some day I'll have to join the israeli defense forces like all 18 years old do. When I moved to America at 13 years old joining the idf wasn't mandatory a..."
1 "ear buds that I" "...'t ask for more...  Around the Web: 4.7 This product is currently holding a 4.7 on amazon   Final Thoughts: These are currently my favorite Bluetooth ear buds that I own. They are inexpensive and work almost as advertised. There are a few pet peeves that I was able to look over. I highly recommend this product.   ..."
0 "further indicated that the" "...em is approximately $3 billion per year compared to approximately $510 million in 1993-94 (Marks, Coyne & Pang 2001, p. 20). Bloomgarden (2007, p. 1) further indicated that the average cost per individual with the disease is approximately $7566 per year and that the largest cost factors are associated with the medications us..."
1 "could specify that it" "...omprehensive solution to stemming online sex-trafficking is to form an international agreement that explicitly prohibits such activity. The agreement could specify that it is the kind of conduct conducted over the Internet–and not inhibiting the freedom of speech conducted there–that constitutes criminal human trafficki..."
1 "variable that is explained" "...the data set SSE = sum of squares due to error SST = total sum of squares R-squared is always between 0 and 100%. It is a percentage of the dependent variable that is explained by the linear model. R2=0 means, no linear relationship between X and Y. The variation in Y is not explained by variation in X. The value of Y does n..."
1 "and find that I" "...ility of others . therefore I started working on examining the quality of my relationship I try to establish at least one close trusting relationship and find that I appreciate the support and satisfying relationship can offer I can start concentrating on developing some personal goals thinking about how I would r..."
"hence feel that I" "...nd desire to excel in the field of software quality assurance. I come from an engineering background with a special focus on software engineering and hence feel that I bring an engieer" 1
0 "he decided that he" "...me Naruto had gotten everything he wanted it was well past midday. Sasuke was juggling several bags of groceries and various miscellaneous items when he decided that he'd just rent a wagon to help take all^their things home and since he said that, Naruto decided to buy even more things. He'd decided to make his own f..."
1 "something that is popular" "...ers a common ground for all of the works. The essay Cars and Their Enemies combines the ideas of the works so far and presents them in an essay about something that is popular in the present day. Thoreau and Emerson believe man should live separate from society and in nature while Willy Loman lives in a busy and crowded cit..."
1 "diaper bag that she" "...takes off my used disposable diaper. She then throws the used diaper in the trash bucket at the park and she finds a clean disposable diaper from the diaper bag that she opens.  I put on Abbie a new disposable diaper that I folds and close.  She then gets dressed by me in her clothes and I put Abbie pack in the stroll..."
0 "be reminded that our" "...ten”.  Does Caitlyn’s work ever end?  Speaking of influential families and politics don't think that Caitlyn falls behind in pedigree. If you need to be reminded that our girl reigns from the millennium's answer to royalty, the greatest American, Albanian born dynasty of Calabasas, The Kardashians. Working as a parent ..."
0 "is anticipated that 20" "...Semi-structured interviews will last between 45 minutes and 1 hour and will be conducted in a place chosen by the mothers to ensure their comfort. It is anticipated that 20 interviews with mothers will be undertaken. Stolterman (2008) pointed out that the true nature of the research will be revealed to participants at th..."
1 "never realised that until" "...was only twelve. She moved to New York with Dylan and grew up there. Dylan worked for a small face called Michael. He was a violent criminal, but mum never realised that until after she had already fallen in love with him. They were a couple when she was only sixteen, and pregnant with me by the time she was seventeen. She ..."
0 "work suggests that his" "Assignment 1- 102085 Education and Policy  Option 1 Sarra’s work suggests that his success has been achieved by his ability to develop and embrace the Aboriginal identity of his students and the community. Critically analyse this st..."
1 "to assure that everyone" "...hievable, by making your environment at home, work and in your communities a healthy happy place to be.Its my opinion that public health main goal is to assure that everyone lives a mental, physical and emotional well life."
0 "collaborative tool that academicians" "...ul in the creation of a healthy collaborative classroom environment.  Mansor (2011) supports this conclusion when he states, “Google Docs is a useful collaborative tool that academicians can use.  It offers a more productive alternative of collaborating…”   Conclusion The creation of an educational environment that values collaboratio..."
"man that was blind" "Once there was a man that was blind  Was he scientist " 1
1 "not believe that the" "...les and overcoming of these struggles a child can grow and develop into a more educated, strong, and capable individual.  In Rousseau’s theory he did not believe that the teaching of reading and writing should^be taught until a child was ten to fifteen years of age.  This was a skill put forth by man and conflicted wit..."
1 "This means that we" "... the synapse, or might use a bio-skeleton for enhanced strength. In 100 years, embedded technology could replace more and more of our human anatomy.” This means that we are evolving and accepting that we need to become more machine by replacing parts and enhancing "
0 "friend that was always" "... am so happy to have a new friend in town.\"   \"Jos, lets go.\" Darcy was none too happy about Aly, I could kind of understand why She had been the one friend that was always there. When I had moved to Lola, Idaho when I was five she was the one friend that was there from the start. Her mom had grown up in Moonbeam and had..."
0 "we had that archery" "...who were busy sorting and cataloging food so we had an idea of how much we needed and the limit of what we could eat per day. “Guys, you remember how we had that archery unit in P.E.?” “Yeah,” said Christian not sure what I was getting at. “Bows and arrows could be used as lethal weapons,” I said, a look of panic cros..."
0 "recognizes that" "...ure their safety and security are being protected.   2.2 Professional involvement and responsibilities of Key Agencies:   Riebschleger et al. (2008), recognizes that as a starting point  professional involvement in mental health undervalued due to the negative assumption about family involvement in the lives of th..."
0 "me hope that the" "...ly know what I wanted to do or be in life before this but when I found out about trading it opened up a whole new vision and dream for me and it gave me hope that the life I wanted to live was possible. The only part I didn't like about my journey through trading was how alone I was with it. So this is why I know I..."
1 "has shown that there" "...d a good environment for LGBT people, expecially after the gay marriage referendum approved by the majority of the irish people. Indeed, its approval has shown that there was a general acceptance towards the LGBT community and the majority of people living in Ireland had not any problems with the idea of same sex coupl..."
1 "him believe that his" "...something wrong but bc he hardler, actually never, does anything wrong. Archie manipulates Emile Janza by making him follow orders from Emile, making him believe that his reputation is relying on it.   Chapter 8 Jerry’s dad has been acting like a zombie ever since his Jerry’s mother passed away. His days were nothing g..."
1 "We ask that you" "... written notice of your resignation to your supervisor. Your letter of resignation should state your reason(s) for leaving and your last working day. We ask that you give at least two weeks advance notice of your resignation. Once you have given your resignation, we reserve the right to determine how and if a noti..."
1 ", that were never" "... into the spirit tree. The red planks and many nails sticking out of random places was a personal touch we decided to add. The circular, mossy windows, that were never clear enough to see out of were reminding me that my home in the forest was my favorite place to be. This was my home where I live with my brother Aa..."
0 "to stop that from" "...overnor Faubus learned that most of the community was not in favor of integrating Central High School he decided he had to take any actions necessary to stop that from happening. On September 2nd 1957 just two days before Central High’s first day of school Faubus announced that he would order Arkansas National Guard..."
1 "overwhelming evidence that Trayvon" "... says all Mexican immigrants are rapists and murderers. You saw it in the judge who ruled that George Zimmerman was non-guilty, even though there was overwhelming evidence that Trayvon Martin was Racism is a monster. It stalks its prey in the shadows  that racism is molded, created,  and then carefully reinforced, as a potter would ..."
0 "really overcome that and" "...Lehman might have an IEP for pre-K because of you know some sensory issues some behaviour concerns just about his impulsiveness and what not and I’ve really overcome that and I was really upset at first when his teachers and the counsellors we were meeting with and occupational therapists were saying. You know Lehman is an..."
1 "recognition shows that she" "...in the crowd. The fear of staring a new life physically paralyzed her. The fact that she doesn't look at him with any affection or the very least any recognition shows that she is now spiritually and em \t \t \t \t"
1 "always find that the" "...h having to endure their mockery of her family. So what if her family is not as rich or sucessful as the Bingleys or Darcys, they are still people. I always find that the poorest people seem to have the biggest hearts in stories. I wish that everyone could care about other peoples feelings enough to realize that mockin..."
1 "wife said that I" "...ealth and what I eat. On the other hand, becoming a soldier has caused me some issues. My children would tell me that I am more strict to them and my wife said that I have a short temper now compare to before I signed up to the army. Learning that from my family made me realized that I should not allow myself to be..."
1 "I see that ISO" "...en worldwide acceptance of these standards and the uptake of ISO 9001 accreditation has levelled the playing field for developing countries. However, I see that ISO 9001 accreditation has become a commodity just like a lot of products that are made under an ISO 9001 quality management system. It seems to me that ..."
1 "and noticed that there" "...led all the way to the market. “How about we buy a bed of dandelions.” Sasuke pointed to the little patches of soil beds that were growing dandelions and noticed that there were several other new wagon takers who were buying them. Vendors sure knew how to prepare for the times. “Yes please. You can get that,” Naruto took..."
0 "GOD saw that the" "... On numerous occasions, the ‘elect’ remained secure during dire times of persecution and judgement, even when dramatically reduced in numbers.   ‘And GOD saw that the wickedness of man was great in the earth’... Genesis 6:5. God’s remnant consisted of only eight people at the time of the flood, Noah and his family...."
0 "texts reveal that although" "...arian regimes. In Lang’s film, the empowerment of capitalist rulers and industrialization, are alienating the working class. Both Lang’s and Orwell’s texts reveal that although the individual is born free, the desire for power means that everywhere he is in chains. "
0 "you had that information" "...se, fearing for her safety. “I’m sorry I do not have more information to share.  People really didn’t know a lot about her.” “I understand.  I’m glad you had that information to share.”  Sara replied with a slight smile. “Well, if there are no other questions are you ready to go see the manor?” he asked, changing the subje..."
0 "Wisut admitted that more" "...any Thais file for housing loans without first securing their savings, resulting in a high rate of NPLs and ultimately undermining financial systems. Wisut admitted that more studies are needed before implementation, while also noting that 80 percent of Thais have to endure with household debts, which makes doing savings d..."
1 "do ask that you" "...ning stages, but as you develop and become more serious about writing, you’ll need to do better. Your motivation for writing music is personal, but I do ask that you take a few moments and think about your reasons for deciding to become a composer. If you’re thinking that you’ll do this later, stop now, and think ..."
0 "you is that compulsion" "...geling like yourself. This, coupled with the fact that you have a stronger compulsion as a female vampire, can cause you some anxiety. All I can tell you is that compulsion is hard to control at first for us all, but you’re going to be surrounding yourself with a lot of humans. Be careful, and if you accidentally compel ..."
1 "I recognized that I" "...day, someone opens my eyes, telling me that I am not wrong because being an introvert. I learned that being an introvert is just normal, furthermore, I recognized that I am also very sensitive, emphatic and intuitive, what explains how I got stocked in such a dead end in my life and without any support and advice I wo..."
0 "still reads that you" "...appened for me! Look at my inventory!\" you heard the neighbor's kids saying? Well, chances are if you threw a Pokeball and missed, but your Inventory still reads that you have the same number of Pokeballs as before, that's just probably your game lagging. Move back into a good wifi spot, wait a few seconds, and check y..."
1 "information that is publicly" "...hedur.rahman@northsouth.edu    Abstract—An important aspect of finance is forecasting of stock returns. Relation can be established using fundamental information that is publicly available to predict future stock returns. This helps to extract knowledge from existing data and use them to make decisions by the investors. Howeve..."
1 "was made that the" "...intangible asset balance also includes goodwill, patents and copyrights which in themselves are not IT or representative of automation. An assumption was made that the amount represented by these elements in intangible assets was negligible. Other studies have used IT intensity is a measure a firm’s investment in te..."
1 "also that is why" "... Dexter, Judy represents all the glitters that she is the statue of ambition and success, money, and beauty. Those are what Dexter wants exactly, and also that is why he never saw her without his ideals. For Dexter, Judy is a perfect ideal modal, but actually she is not. She is just a human. “She wore a blue silk a..."
1 "coordinate that is required" "...(a reading of a point in time as given by a clock) \"do you know what time it is?\"; \"the time is 10 o'clock\" S: (n) fourth dimension, time (the fourth coordinate that is required (along with three spatial dimensions) to specify a physical event) S: (n) meter, metre, time (rhythm as given by division into parts of equal duratio..."
1 "countries that were previously" "...rly, many countries that were traditionally and historically in conflict have in recent years formed alliances and new partnerships. In the same way, countries that were previously scarred with negative images of aggression and lack of cooperation have succeeded in their rebranding with the help international organizations and s..."
1 "we see that Elizabeth" "...t 3 #24 Danforth puts so much faith into Elizabeth because it takes a lot of strength to say that your husband committed adultery. With this however, we see that Elizabeth wasn’t able to pull through, showing that their still lacks trust in between the two. Elizabeth knows that through both situations, there will be no ..."
1 "without realized that I" "...e other hand, do not ask me why, because I do not have the answer to give you, on my working life, only now I realized that I always used these steps without realized that I was using them. At all time, I try to find the problem first, them the alternatives, advantages and disadvantages, and after getting to a solution, I..."
"we feel that  " "...  2)Why we chose the above art genre 3)teams or individual 4) how big u want the artwork to be 5)How we could have improved our report In conclusion, we feel that  " 0
1 "am puzzled that they" "...st follow me child understood. I hear a voice that says Glenn is she here yet. Yes she is dear Sonja my wife, our daughter Abbie has just arrived.  I am puzzled that they call me daughter, but I am pleased that^I have now have a family. Abbie this is your siblings Carrie, Cassie, Chelsea, Carolyn, Caitlin, Dawn, Annike..."
1 "also find that some" "...t to learn to compose more quickly. You will learn the importance of paying attention to the type of motion used in your melodies.  However, you will also find that some of these melodies never leave you. You may begin to think about one or two of your melodies in your spare time. If this happens, go back to these mel..."
0 "system that is self-regulating" "...and regulates price, product quality and profits.     Building upon the classical basis, neoclassical economics also believes in a competitive market system that is self-regulating and efficient as outlined above. However, neoclassicists place a larger emphasis upon using supply and demand curves to explain the optimum point at ..."
1 "quickly realized that there" "...ore now than prior to the surgery. He'd been  impressed with how normal looking the available options were when he reviewed the glossy literature. He quickly realized that there were many cosmetically pleasing choices at the low functionality end of the choices, but as he moved up the line to the more costly and sophisticated..."
0 "is true that loanwords" "... communication with its influence on Japanese culture, so they mistakenly take loanwords for evil, though these two are totally different matters. It is true that loanwords are actually causing the problems on communication, but it doesn’t mean loanwords are harmful to culture. Japanese culture will not be destroyed by l..."
1 "meditation that is based" "Can Mindfulness Meditation Improve Your Life \tMindfulness meditation is a non-sectarian, research-based form of meditation that is based on a Buddhist practice called Vipassana or Insight Meditation.  Mindfulness involves developing the skill of paying attention to your inner and outer..."
1 "clearly stated that it" "... All the payment made by the Customer shall be only through our Authorised Payment Platform (Pay U Money). In case of discrepancies on payment, it is clearly stated that it is between the Customer and Pay U Money. PROXIMOVE shall not be held liable for anything thereof.     CONDUCT Customer undertake to refrain himself f..."
1 "he feels that his" "...mate, Howdy. Alvin just go to the washroom cubicle to pee whereby Howdy goes to teacher Lee. Howdy tells teacher Lee that Alvin has knocks to him and he feels that his right hand is in pain. Teacher Lee asks Alvin what happen between him and Howdy. Alvin says out, “Need to pee urgently!”   He demonstrated responsive..."
1 "also believe that I" "...they. so one day I just looked in the mirror and then I realized that I'm not different at all that  Erb's palsy is something that makes me unique. I also believe that I deserve this scholarship because I will work very hard for it. Ever since I was little I wanted to become a lawyer so that eventually I can own my ow..."
1 "to questions that i" "... information, going from website to website or app to app. It’s been my way of life. I’ve spent more hours than i care to admit to looking up answers to questions that i never needed to know. Sometimes i played games for hours on end. I’ve downloaded more songs than one person could listen to in a lifetime. I waded th..."
1 "findings suggest that students" "...ere undeterred in behaviours even though they were explicitly aware that their assessment would be examined with plagiarism detection software. These findings suggest that students require education about what constitutes plagiarism in order to clarify the definition of plagiarism and how to avoid the penalties associated.  \tStu..."
1 "something that is decided" "...ke of the Community's present condition, she might have lost her irreplaceable friends. \"That's right. Defeating a Demon Lord sounds cool.\" \"It's not something that is decided by being [Cool].........seriously, this must be youth. This might be called reckless or brave. Well, you'll understand what a Demon Lord is like when..."
1 "ideologies parallel that to" "... with Russia and Iran fighting in opposition to the United States and our partner allies. The Islamic State’s genocide, terror campaigns and polluted ideologies parallel that to Adolf Hitler in 1934 Germany. It is this absolute likeness that impedes on both foreign and domestic security for the United States and global commun..."
1 "core questions that we" "...the performance of our systems.  The main use case for this dashboard is to quickly slice and dice how our suggestions are performing. Below are some core questions that we should be able to answer from the dashboard.  \tCore Questions \tGeneral - Acceptance Rates/Rule Performance What is the overall acceptance rate across..."
1 ")  Notice that the" "...ce, Or to any place? (B) For it behooves ere that into the race (B) We enter, to resolve first hereupon. (C) Now surely brother (said the Fox anon) (C)  Notice that the second line carries over to the third and the fourth line carries over to the fifth. In this way, the poem ties itself together to form a complete th..."
"to realize that there" "It is important to realize that there are good people and bad people in every religious group—Christian, Jewish, and Muslim alike." 1
1 "to ensure that they" "...petency level  Date for retraining    Training is particularly important for young persons. They require additional risk assessments and supervision to ensure that they can work safely.    RFU HS-P-013   ^Further reading:     INDG232: Consulting employees on health and safety    Safety Matters.  "
0 "He suggests that the" "...er mean that all stories are exact copies of one another? No, he simply means that characters are often found in many stories with slight variations. He suggests that the reader should use their previous knowledge and search for these recurring characters. Nearing the end of the chapter Foster announces “There’s only o..."
1 "Once that was done" "... him. Because of this, part of the compositional process was completed for him. The next step was to choose the note values and rhythm for the fugue. Once that was done, it was simply a matter of using it in a recognizable way. For the next month, you’re going to write a motive per day. I don’t expect you to write a ..."
0 "consent is that it" "...aving surgery this proves they consent to the surgery however is does not prove that the consent was obtained legally  The most important aspect with consent is that it was obtained without coercion and without pressure and that they understand what they are consenting to.  Additionally, for consent to be valid under..."
0 "also shows that there" "...tive will be.    It was written to inform young people and adults that kidnapping can occur and that young children should not be left home alone. It also shows that there are good people out in the world who help and care for you even if they don’t know you.     The length of the sentences are shortened to add more emp..."
1 "and ensure that there" "...ence outside of rural areas. If the FARC demobilisation is successful, the government and security forces should have more resources to tackle BACRIM and ensure that there is a state presence in vulnerable areas.   The most likely outcome of the FARC demobilisation is turf wars between different BACRIM and the National ..."
1 "popular that it'" "... to recapture your Pokeball. If you're fast enough, the Pokeball will re-enter your inventory, and your Pokeball count won't go down. This myth is so popular that it's even perpetuated by internet gaming colossus IGN, but as much as we'd like to believe that there was a way for us never to run out of Pokeballs, thi..."
0 ") stated that the" "... amount and frequency of alcohol consumption are attributable to the risk of developing FASD.   The National Health and Medical Research Council (2009) stated that the risk imposed to foetus would be low if maternal alcohol consumption was light, such as one to two drinks weekly. However, the Council still recommend..."
1 "but that is before" "...t revisit their past because it brings back bad, old memories. I think of it this way: one can always think of their past as better than the present, but that is before they delve back into the lives they lived then. There is also a message this passage reminds me of: Let go of your past, but remember who you are. Th..."
0 "I convinced that I" "...on Manager), Peter Chua (MICE Manager) , Ms.Shermine, Mr.Collin, Hui Shin, and two free project staffs : Mr.Sherman, Ms.Judith. Through this meeting, I convinced that I can sales MICE with big confidence because I thought MICE team is well organized and morale is high.     History of Tour East and Telstra  Telstra Co..."
1 "sugar that is involved" "... have on a beer. Bitterness is measured in a beer by its IBU’s and the sugar is measured by a term called “gravity.” The higher the gravity, the more sugar that is involved. If one had the gravity data and the Ibu’s they could predict how sweet or bitter the beer was before even drinking it. One problem with a literal co..."
1 "sure that it is" "...nstalled properly. Now it is time to hit print on your tax prep software and select CutePDF as your printer.  When prompted to save the document make sure that it is being saved into the google drive shared folder and into the client’s folder.  Step # 5: Now back to Google drive in your internet browser. Locate th..."
0 "is that it does" "...ccessible to most teachers and students, especially those with access to the GAFE suite.  The major accessibility limitation of Google Docs, however, is that it does not offer reliable off-line support.  Making sure that students have access to a reliable and relatively speedy internet connection is important when..."
0 "But that is not" "...rtle?\" \tShe came up through the sink nearest him on the right. \"Oh dear, sweet Draco. What's wrong? You look nearly as pale as I am.\" \t\"Much, Myrtle. But that is not why I am here. Did you see someone run in here? Hiding?\" \t\"I did hear some... noises. Some gurgles from above me. I like sitting in the u-bends, you ..."
1 "they realized that there" "... soldier overpowering him to the ground and slashing at him until he stopped moving.  Israa, Fahtma and Aalaa made it back to the car, but once there they realized that there was no way they could get it out, it had been completely blocked by the surrounding cars.  There were also too many people running all over the place..."
1 "email chain that the" "... to find out a way to better help this customer and for this we need to know if the customer confirmed that payment type she will use.   I see in the email chain that the customer was asking about making a deposit and not use boleto, evem know that Chyntia conformed that we do not offer this option, we want to make sur..."
0 "idea that it will" "...e the fact that there are valuable components there are equally negative segments that appeared all through the article also. SDL is based around the idea that it will \" increase student’s confidence in, and capacity for independent learning in dynamic, and challenging education work environments.\" During the 1970's..."
1 "images that is on" "...had a web page size of 1.7MB and Adelaide University web page size was 6.1MB. The large web page size for AU would have been because of the amount of images that is on the test page.                                     Table 1: Comparison table Use Case Scenario  Adelaide University  Sanford University University of..."
1 "shop that is not" "...agnose, repair, and calibrate after collisions. Our target customer is the collision repair facility, automotive glass repair company, or aftermarket shop that is not equipped to perform these calibrations, but need a convenient and economical solution to remain compliant with OEM repair standards of sensitive ADAS..."
0 "just figure that with" "...ling to the side and ears flopping over. Sasuke had to bite his tongue to stop himself from praising the blonde for such an innocent gesture. “Well I just figure that with all the snow your dresses will drag on the ground and get muddy. You might slip and fall. Maybe hurt yourself.”  The blonde nodded slowly, “you’re ri..."
1 "studies shows that generally" "...turm,2002). it's hard to say that obesity and health problem are linked together because some thin people are unhealthy as well. However, most of the studies shows that generally obese people have more physical problem than people in normal body range ( Kelly,2006). Obesity is a significant health issue. Although obesity is no..."
1 "it seems that both" "...er. Also in this case seems to us to be rather confusing the use that the authors of the term \"concept\", since at the time of exemplify these traits, it seems that both the traits in yes, as the elements to which they belong are identified as lexical elements and not as concepts. Let us look at an example:   [...] to..."
0 "• Imagine that you" "...the following:   • Define and distinguish between qualitative and quantitative research. • Provide examples of qualitative and quantitative research. • Imagine that you are a researcher interested in identifying the components of ‘giftedness’ in pre-teen children. What quantitative methods might you use to help you b..."
1 "teenagers believe that they" "...dle to upper class of students and numbers of cannabis users depends on location.  This creates a loop where the next generation of young upper class teenagers believe that they have the right to violate the law rendering illegalized practices invalid for this group.    However, in lower class sections of the world the subcul..."
1 "believe that" "...en ill and die from well known diseases we might choose to let parents decide what is the best for their children. Finally I would like to say that I believe that every parent choose the best for his/her child without any law or dictate from the government. The world and modern society is too complicated to cre..." 0
1 "She claims that she" "...biggest struggle in life.   \tThe advice for young adults that Alberta could offer is do not rush into life. She regrets getting married at seventeen. She claims that she rushed into it too fast and that she was too young. Also, she said that everyone should take their time, and enjoy their life. She thinks that educat..."
0 "trial that is about" "...t is between Revelation chapters 3 and 4!  Rev 3:10 YLT `Because thou didst keep the word of my endurance, I also will keep thee from the hour of the trial that is about to come upon all the world, to try those dwelling upon the earth. This verse is taken out of context to endorse the theory that the Church was promis..."
1 "is assumed that when" "...ional arbitral tribunal rely upon primarily is the contract agreement by both parties. This agreement is based not he principle of party autonomy. It is assumed that when a state submits to arbitration, it is an implicit waiver of immunity.       NEW YORK CONVENTION ON THE RECOGNITION AND ENFORCEMENT OF                ..."
0 "I felt that her" "...he sidewalks and streets. The color green was forever lost under the white blanket of snow.  Baby Ellie’s eyes were virgins to the sight of snowfall. I felt that her eyes needed to see the unseen beauty of what the world can do. I wanted her to feel like the world she’ll grow up in is a magical and mysterious plac..."
1 ") stated that this" "...states that a short advice given in less than 3 minutes by health providers add up to the quitting rate of smoking . The Tobacco Free Initiative (2003) stated that this intervention is supportive and beneficial to smokers in a way that, they are supported by the health providers to make a decision on when to quit giv..."
1 ") argues that the" "... draw attention to possible instances however human judgement is required to determine whether the behaviour is dishonest or not. Selwyn (2008, p. 476) argues that the internet has not increased levels of plagiarism or created new patterns and online cases closely replicate generally documented plagiarism.  \tPlagiar..."
1 "mood that is emphasized" "...ay he could convince anyone else in the court to side with him.   Act 4 #1 Miller’s purpose of setting the scene in a jail cell is to create a dreary mood that is emphasized by the darkness around it. The jail was the place where everyone got sentenced to and only had “moonlight seeping through the bars” to show how grim ..."
1 "accent that is commonly" "...onster in Muskrat Lake? \t\tA- Mussie   3) What town in the Ottawa Valley is known for the discovery of Champlain's astrolabe? \t-Cobden  4) What is the accent that is commonly found in this region? \tA-The Valley Twang   5) Who was the first european to see the valley? \tA-Samuel de Champlain   Canadiana(10)  Who gave indepen..."
1 ") proved that if" "...l as can be used for selection test. Both of them were used in our result sections extensively (Results sections 3.2-3.4).  Hardy Weinberg (Hardy 1908) proved that if a population is infinite, pan mixing, with no migration, mutation or selection happening and have non overlapping generation time, the allele frequen..."
1 "Ibsen believed that the" "...Ibsen was often mistaken of being a feminist, he wasn't. Ibsen couldn't allow the demeaning treatment towards woman to go unnoticed.     \tEven though Ibsen believed that the role of a woman is to be a great wife and mother. He also felt that husband and wife should live as equals, and in these times it was consider immora..."
1 "so that it doesn" "... would be beneficial to take statistics and learn about more of these things. Overall, in the future I just want to do something I really like to do, so that it doesn’t feel like a job. Most likely it will end up being something like a doctor, since I’m interested in biology, but even in the genetics course I took ..."
0 "lordosis that is present" "...the images (Bontrager, Lampignano, & Photography, 2013).  An Erect lateral is another projection that is used to determine the degree of kyphosis and lordosis that is present (Bontrager, Lampignano, & Photography, 2013).  The PA or AP and Lateral projections are used to evaluate the severity each scoliosis case (Bontrager,..."
1 "she believes that she" "...which Jane replies with a no. I feel bad for the Bennet family, they are all worried sick about their daughter who ran off with some stranger because she believes that she is in love with him                       In Chapter 56                        In Chapters 59, 60 and 61                       "
0 "Bbz that is a" "...about gay clubs, which as you know are usually more populated by males than females, so if you are a lesbian girl in Dublin you should have a look at Bbz that is a lesbian night organized monthly. What I have said for gay pubs is also valid for the gay clubs, in Dublin you are not obliged to go in a gay club to ..."
1 ") estimated that the" "...3% had at least one anxiety disorder (Grant et al., 2006). The economic and social costs of alcohol use dependances are staggering. Ben Baumberg (2006) estimated that the “global economic burden” of alcohol abuse was between 210 billion to 665 billion dollars in 2002 alone. Similarly, the economic cost o f excessive dr..."
0 "place is that you" "... and the primary methods businesses are using it today.                                          But the reason you’re reading this book in the first place is that you’re likely already aware of WhatsApp as a platform but are looking to leverage its power into your own business.                                      ..."
1 "to see that from" "...high level of understanding between the characters, and they primarily implied the genuine friendship. Moreover, in the other chapters it is possible to see that from the friendship and respect the relations are developing to the true and pure loving between them. 5.Outline:  Despite being a couple, the characters ..."
1 "goals  Think that your" "...meone else will). Here are a couple of scenarios that would begin with the end in mind. Thinking about going to college  Planning ahead Setting ahead goals  Think that your life is 1,000 pieces do you have a clear picture ahead of what your picture is going to be? People these days only think that they are never going to..."
0 "It states that women" "... and Cushing’s Syndrome (Trikudanathan, 2015). The Rotterdam criteria is the most recent and agreed upon criteria for PCOS (Moschos, Twickler, 2013). It states that women have to exhibit two out of these three crtieria: hyperandrogenism (through lab values or physical expressions of it, like hirsutism), absent or irreg..."
1 "which held that the" "... across that listed fossils of identical plants and animals found on opposite sides of the Atlantic, began proposing a then most controversial theory which held that the continents of the earth had once been joined together but had drifted apart. The evolution of the blowhole, for example, might have happened in the f..."
1 "he understood that there" "...s from the date of his last absence on the 24/07/16. AM then added that even although DJ was getting on the right track, depression is an illness and he understood that there were other outside factors in his life at the moment that could potentially trigger again. AM then stated that his door was always open if DJ ever wa..."
1 "finds that" "...ia] 24 Apr. 2006: n. pag. Web. 16 July 2016. In this article by Joseph kaxzmarek an award winning journalist for the Associated Post in Philadelphia, finds that the techniques that were first implement for the Jehovah Witnesses is gaining popularity within the medical field. Joseph focuses on how doctors and ..."
0 ", that is when" "...ng of the humerus and femur, Macrocephaly, Trident hands, which are short proximal and middle phalanges, a depressed nasal bridge, and frontal bossing, that is when the forehead is extended forward (Hagen-Ansert, 2011).   Thanatophoric Dysplasia can be seen in utero with ultrasound. Some of the sonographic findin..."
0 ") found that a" "...ulties in cutting down alcohol intake after realizing pregnancy, which may translate to more alcohol dependence (CDC, 2002).   Elliott and Bower (2004) found that a proportion of mothers gave birth to children with FAS used illicit drugs such as cocaine and heroin.   Low socioeconomic status was found to be assoc..."
1 "consensus is that the" "...s 7.5%, which is £135bn! Some out economists are predicting the economy would increase by 4% although there is no evidence to support that claim. The consensus is that the economy will drop between 1 and 4% so we would lose a lot of money if we left the EU, making how much we spend on EU membership totally irrelevant in..."
0 "you show that you" "...ting one another, and sharing.    Prerequisite Skills - Vocabulary: citizen parade recycle cooperate  Prerequisite Skills - Guiding Questions: How do you show that you are a good citizen at home? How do you show that you are a good citizen at school? How do you show that you are a good citizen in the community? When..."
1 "to deny that it" "...erritory. There had been no time to pinpoint who had fired the gun, but if Kaitlyn died, the treaty died with her because no one would have been able to deny that it was gang related someway. While they waited for the ambulance and police to arrive, the terror set in and all anyone could do was stand back and watc..."
0 "it proves that Proctor" "...dds stacked against him, and without a lawyer it is certain that Proctor will go to jail. With “ claim so weighty [it] cannot be argued by a farmer”, it proves that Proctor doesn’t have the capacity to to defend himself against the others (99).   Act 3 #24 Danforth puts so much faith into Elizabeth because it takes a lot..."
1 "is true that if" "...tation of an ambiguous word.   Lexical ambiguity is present in a large number of words and is frequently manifested when reading  or when talking. It is true that if this happens in your mother tongue is easier to understand but it supposes a difficulty in communication when it is given in a language that you are ..."
1 "Strategy identifies that the" "...guarding Bill and a range of other legislative provisions rather than a single all-encompassing act of parliament.  The Threat  The Counter–Extremism Strategy identifies that the threat to British society comes from all types of Neo-Nazi, Far Left and Islamic extremism.. The strategy aims to tackle the violent intent of the te..."
0 "also mentions that he" "...uence that in his eyes he will go to “hell” he is still willing to make the sacrifice to protect the friend that has shown so much love for him. Huck also mentions that he has no regrets for the words that he said which shows that he would do the same thing for Jim again.  \tIn the  Adventures of Huckleberry Finn Mark Tw..."
0 "few companies that we" "...f paying it forward, helping those who have helped us by sharing information and their experiences, and yes, we may even draw a little attention to a few companies that we are connected to through our books or our everyday lives. Do your part and research everyone you consider working with, read reviews, and ask others ..."
1 ") suggests that up" "... is disabled, harms or behavioural signs can mistakenly be recognised as the disability rather than the abuse or neglect. Research by Sidebotham (2007) suggests that up to 40 per cent of maltreatment-related deaths is probably the result of neglect, or a mixture of neglect and other forms of abuse, with death resulti..."
1 "is estimated that 1" "...ken to ensure the sustainable development of Tourism in Nigeria?     With over 174 million people, Nigeria is the most populous country in Africa. It is estimated that 1 out of every 4 Africans is a Nigerian. It is imperative for Nigeria to take action in prioritising Tourism as a means to diversify and strengthen its..."
1 "be argued that it" "...learner and as a member of a cohesive and culturally inclusive learning group” ((Munns & Martin, 2005, p. 6). To achieve the big ‘E’ outcome it could be argued that it is a combination of using the “strategies within the psychological (M)  and sociological (e) frames” (Munns et al., 2006, p.6). The primary objective..."
1 "Office suspected that the" "...olitical salience of Udham Singh’s case among Sikhs and the utter lack of interest from the rest of the Indian community in Britain. To that end, the Office suspected that the Sikhs would seek a reprieve and, “if they failed, Udham Singh would die a martyr’s death, and his photograph would be added to the...Hindustan Ghadr...."
0 "library that it would" "...hey are today and who they hope to be tomorrow. My goal, then, was to make sure that I talked about so many titles during class before we went to the library that it would be virtually impossible for students to not have at least 2-3 titles they were interested in. I gave daily booktalks in the weeks leading up our libr..."
1 "he decided that today" "...ng that no one could help him on the island when he is alone.   One day when the Spirit Bear appeared, Cole had so much anger balled up inside of him he decided that today was the day he would kill the Spirit Bear. Cole flung a hand made spear at the bear but a blur of white motion deflected the spear. The bear then lun..."
0 "he sees that it" "... or dislike him because I know so little about him. He is peculiar, and I want to know more of his back story.  Log 3 \tWhen Utterson opens the letter he sees that it's from Hyde, assuring Dr. Jekyll that he should not be concerned about his safety. Utterson ask Jekyll where the envelope was but Jekyll tells him th..."
0 "students that were struggling" "...students. Issues arose for teachers concerning additional needs education as it affected their salaries negatively, and provided no incentive to help students that were struggling or advanced students as the key was mass progression. As for the students they, as a whole, would have been neglected and not experienced the proper ..."
1 "component that is needed" "... in order to set up clear targets and aspirations for the company undergoing changes. Like parts to a  car engine, each skill represents an important component that is needed in order for the organization to operate smoothly.                     References  Acceleraconsultinggroupcom. (2016). Accelera Consulting Group:WHAT..."
1 "we said that “" "... problem (Wright & Leahey 2013. P. 242). We informed the family that we were going to send a social worker to follow their case difficulty as well as we said that “we hope your problem to be solved”. After we told them our plan of sending the social worker, we felt Salwa and her sister were satisfied as they had ..."
1 "do contend that I" "...se the house had been foreclosed, and they were forced to move out. 12. He makes derogatory remarks about me to me, to her, and to others.  NO. 12: I do contend that I am a better parent.  Kaylee and I have always had a very close relationship.  I support Kaylee in all aspects of her life:  school, church, and socia..."
0 "be shown that WS" "...ze on the price range and the customer awareness of such to reduce the wrong impressions of pricing getting ahead of the customers mind set. Needs to be shown that WS provides variety of quality services for low price for its wide customer  base.     Task 3 a. The differences between marketing a product and marketi..."
1 "and that was there" "...nned to go when they have there serenity day firework go off like the Fourth of July here. They figured out that one plastic work car had a satellite and that was there way out.        \t\t            Works Cited Korman, Gordon. Masterminds. Place of Publication Not Identified: HarperCollins Limited, 2015. Print."
1 "to ensure that both" "...een prepared and effectively implemented to control customer complaints and returns.  Each procedure details the purpose, criteria and methods needed to ensure that both the operation and control of the applicable processes for complaints and returns are effective, secure and meeting regulations.   Procedures for supp..."
1 "can testify that I" "...  \\        Reponses to John’s Interrogatories  #1 I was arrested but found not guilty. Anthony Brickey was arrested and found guilty. Barbara McNeese can testify that I go on church trips and camp with Kaylee. Also that I am a youth program director at church. She can testify that I attend many of Kaylee’s social act..."
1 "states that" "...es are made with multiplayer interactions. According to an article written by Tyler J. Hill, a writer for Big Fish, a casual game developing company, states that “games like MMOs require similar social interactions as in real life.”  Games like these can be applied to “complicated real world social interaction..."
1 "I see that there" "...eed a diaper change now.  Abbie gets her 6 diaper change. Sonja picks me up and she carries me to the changing pad that lies on the kitchen counter.  I see that there are diapers, wipes and such by changing mat since this is one of changing stations in the house. So I get laid down on the changing pad by Sonja, som..."
1 "I think that this" "...Philp,  My name is Che Jacobs and I am so excited to be part of your teaching process.I am excited to progress as a student in your English class and I think that this year will be a really interesting year.I hope to enjoy you as a teacher and a person. In math I had a very serene experience and I hope to have the s..."
0 "beds that were growing" "...at all!” Naruto muttered and grumbled all the way to the market. “How about we buy a bed of dandelions.” Sasuke pointed to the little patches of soil beds that were growing dandelions and noticed that there were several other new wagon takers who were buying them. Vendors sure knew how to prepare for the times. “Yes plea..."
1 "friend that was there" "...ly, I could kind of understand why She had been the one friend that was always there. When I had moved to Lola, Idaho when I was five she was the one friend that was there from the start. Her mom had grown up in Moonbeam and had known my mom, so she was waiting there for us when we pulled up. She felt territorial over m..."
1 "Abrams adds that 14" "...oviding food necessary for health and growth. So it is what we what we eat and what we don’t eat affects our body’s overall health and body weight.   Abrams adds that 14 percent of men and 20 percent of women have malignant diagnoses related to obesity, He suggests being as lean as possible without being underweight a..."
1 "experts agree that " "...ty. Activities are likely to happen at high profile areas where large numbers of people gather. Also to Stop Torture ‘Top terrorism and interrogation experts agree that torture creates more terrorists. Indeed, the leaders of ISIS were motivated by U.S. torture.’ This will show that the more we torture the terrorists t..."
1 "can testify that I" "...e one I must clear it with.  She has seen how I value education and the priority I place on her school work. She is also a friend on social media and can testify that I keep my comments clean and positive, as is appropriate in those situations.  I never use social media to bash anyone or to air dirty laundry.  Jennif..."
0 "further indicated that the" "...em is approximately $3 billion per year compared to approximately $510 million in 1993-94 (Marks, Coyne & Pang 2001, p. 20). Bloomgarden (2007, p. 1) further indicated that the average cost per individual with the disease is approximately $7566 per year and that the largest cost factors are associated with the medications us..."
1 "to get that many" "...e data actually reflects the view of them instead of the participating subject.   Needs to be able to sample a large quantity of people   Can be hard to get that many people together for planned research   Requires large funding, since it requires many people and many printed tests or pamphlet’s Qualitative Researc..."
1 "is shocked that Jekyll" "...terson by Jekyll. Comparing the handwriting, he says they are from the same person. Utterson excuses Guess and after locks the letter in the safe, he is shocked that Jekyll forged it to cover up Hyde. Despite there being a prize, still no word about Dir Danvers’ murder has come. Hyde has disappeared but people continue t..."
1 "child that was in" "...e developed the idea of a “Hungry for Heroes” character breakfast. We coordinated locations, times, food, and sponsors for two separate mornings. Any child that was in the program was granted free admission to meet all of their favorite characters from Superman to Elsa, and enjoy a delicious breakfast. All other chi..."
0 "theme that was displayed" "...abor for others. That blacks would be unable to stay par with the expectations of a participating member of society. ( ………………………………. )  Another major theme that was displayed in the novel was Knowledge being related directly to independence and freedom. As slave owners were forced to keep slaves uneducated and loyal to wor..."
1 "are told that he" "...they returned to Israel from Egypt? It probably had much to do with Joseph’s profession. Though not very much is said about Joseph in the Gospels, we are told that he is a skilled laborer (the word used is tekton). Though we traditionally translate that to say a modern skilled carpenter, little woodworking was done..."
1 "also showed that their" "...to the quart to look at ships. The boys looking at the ship showed me their desire for adventure but when they start complaining about being tired it also showed that their plans for excitement were unrealistic. The boys pretty much gave up hope until they meet a strange man. The older man, rubbed me the wrong way as a r..."
1 "term that is used" "...te and be open to the possibility or change my mind if sufficient evidence is given.   February 9, 2016 What is meant by sufficient evidence? It is a term that is used to describe the evidence that is adequate enough to justify the bringing of a lawsuit. Adequate for the purpose; enough: sufficient proof; sufficient..."
0 "it shows that Tom" "...use he couldn’t prove that he didn’t do it and he seemed like a nice guy, which is really too bad because he was innocent. In this quote, down below, it shows that Tom felt bad for the girl. Which can to a surprise to the reader and the characters in the book, because back in the day (still happens in present day) w..."
1 "I believe that your" "...rcial awareness and trained me to be more empathetic — to listen, observe and understand different people’s views and the reasons behind those views. I believe that your company’s diverse connections would continue to maximise my exposure in this regard. I also have been working as a Waitress in a Korean restaurant in..."
0 "style that is easier" "...al memoranda and advises, but also creative and imaginitive writing and articles or essays. This will help him develop more flow in his writing and a style that is easier on the reader. If Mr. Jansen would like to expand his fluency in speaking, a next step would be for him to deliver more presentations and practice ta..."
0 "to remember that it" "...ther without being good listeners and good sharers.  We, students and staff alike, need a place where everyone feels safe and has a purpose.  We need to remember that it takes each one of us to run a school and educate children.  We’re each an important piece in the puzzle, and our “survival” as a school is dependent ..."
0 "even that was limited" "... explained how much the team subconsciously set itself apart from me, especially while he was gone. The only one that was contacting me was Luke, and even that was limited because of North’s constant grumbling and yelling around the house. He’s just mad because Luke has me to talk to instead of him.’  I heard distant vo..."
1 "I predict that it" "... am sure it will be in the range should be between 6969 million and 7975 million.   And if we look at other main rises earlier in that year, Mar2014, I predict that it should rise to 6233 million of total transactions. However,  because it is a prediction, the range should be between 5975 million and 6478 million.  ..."
1 "clearly indicate that happiness" "Various articles and literature works coupled with the ongoing happenings clearly indicate that happiness has no price tag. Since the beginning of human evolution, there has been a saying that “money cannot buy anyone happiness.” Happiness refers to emoti..."
1 "“Is that a" "... yet, her internal organs were still recovering from the stasis. Zera unwrapped the ration bar loudly, Doxie’s head peared from the top of the bunk.  “Is that a ration bar?” She asked, licking her lips with her blue tongue. Zera frowned, “ Do you want a piece, I can’t eat it anyway.” she offered half of the r..."
0 "bag that is placed" "...e stroller that fits me its amazing but its seems to me there is folks that make strollers and baby stuff for adults even. Cassie takes with a diaper bag that is placed in the storage place in my stroller since my siblings takes with them a diaper bag in case I need to get my diapers changed during the ride outside. ..."
0 "Lowe argue that the" "...ations, judicial decisions and national and international action plans relating to the principle of sustainable development.In contrast, critics like Lowe argue that the concept of sustainable development as a binding norm is itself not sustainable. Lowe holds the strong opinion that international treaties and case la..."
1 "someone discovers that I" "...y bottle and some toys, she is so tired she falls asleep. When I wake up I noticed I stink oh no I have both peed and pooped in my cloth diaper. Soon someone discovers that I require a diaper change, Carrie come over to my playpen. She says to me have little Abby done something in her diaper. I have my suspicions that you ..."
0 "Philippines is that China" "...he Philippines agree with China, not to seek a ruling from the tribunal because it is outside the tribunal’s jurisdiction.  Another claim made by the Philippines is that China has unlawfully exploited living and non-living natural resources in other areas including the Philippines’ Exclusive Economic Zone / Continental Shel..."
1 "voter feels that their" "...r whole political system.   Some of the reasons against keeping the current system are also just as strong.  The biggest is that the average American voter feels that their vote does not count.  This discourages voter turnout in smaller states and states that the voter has a different belief than the state as a whole.  T..."
1 "strategies that were demonstrated" "...ill the following strategies assist you in developing the abilities of your students.” The results from data show there was an increase in all of the strategies that were demonstrated to the teachers during their class visits.  Figure 6. - Teacher Strategies Strategy Fall 2014- 1st Visit Spring 2015- 2nd Visit Teacher Questioning- ..."
1 "shows people that cheaters" "...banning Russian competitors who were found guilty of doping and keeping the competitors who were going to participate in the Paralympics fairly. This shows people that cheaters never win and it persuades athletes to not do something like this in the future. However, I do not believe all the blame should be put on Russia’s go..."
1 "business model that -" "...pen year round.   H&R Block, Jackson Hewitt, Liberty Tax, small community tax prep offices. All this companies and small business has follow a common business model that - in my opinion - is no longer sustainable.  #1: Doing things in the comfort of your pajamas We’ve all been there, after a long day at work, the last t..."
1 "be understood that a" "...incaid, 2003). Therefore one could conclude that if you have a student with additional needs, they will most likely have some form of Autism. It must be understood that a student with high functioning Autism may be working to higher outcomes than a child with classic Autism. Therefore it is important when dealing with ..."
0 "Neo-realists argue that anarchy" "...nt and heavily regulated while in constructionism, they are very subjective and can change to reflect new identity being forged by individual states. Neo-realists argue that anarchy, security dilemmas and balance of power cannot be eliminated except in the presence of a centralized world government (Glickman 2010). Furthermore, t..."
0 "music that is truly" "... program to play them back. As you improve, you’ll begin to leave the training wheels that this lesson provides in the past. Then, you’ll be creating music that is truly original.    Chapter 6: Composition Technique No. 6 Musical Themes A symphony must be like the world. It must contain everything. ~ Gustav Mahler  Th..."
1 "also reports that an" "...ertainment Software Association, consumers spent around $23 billion dollars on gaming software, systems, and accessories in 2015. (ESA, 2015) The ESA also reports that an estimated 155 million Americans play video games. And 4 out 5 households owns a device used to play video games. (ESA, 2015) According to a report fr..."
1 "improvement that were witnessed" "...ough. After the walk through, there is debrief with the staff and administration of the school. The debrief focuses on areas of strength and areas of improvement that were witnessed by the external group. After the debrief, the administration will continue to enhance the areas of strength.  The areas of improvement will be become..."
0 "complaints portrays that they" "...ogle information, a user’s Google ID and email address, was being collected” (Brophy 5). Clearly, the fact that Niantic was quick to calm the fearful complaints portrays that they did not have any negative intentions and had no issue with fixing this problem. Also, some say that it might be too much exercise to handle at one ti..."
1 "we believed that de-privatizing" "...given to teachers at the end of the school year during a year end PD session. Several pieces of data came from our pre/post survey. Most importantly, we believed that de-privatizing the secondary classroom was important. Allowing teachers to visit and collaborate with other teachers is crucial to developing their 21st century ski..."
1 "strongly believe that this" "...g so. I would really be thankful if given this opportunity. I hunger for knowledge and need to learn the proper, professional way of communicating. I strongly believe that this insures successful interaction with others, whether it be in one's own personal life or in the business world. Thank you for your time and for giving..."
1 "to get that many" "...ta. The scientists viewpoint is reflected instead of that of the subject.   There needs to be a sample of a large quantity of people   It can be hard to get that many people together for planned research   Requires large funding, since it requires many people and many printed tests or pamphlet’s Qualitative Researc..."
1 "So is that your" "... don’t believe you,” he said. He was ready to scream if he had to.  Frederick couldn’t believe this. No child has ever held this much ground before. “So is that your little sister,” he said pointing to where the stroller was. The boy turned around and gasped. Frederick leaned down to his ear and whispered. “You ar..."
1 "something that is often" "Skylar (Samantha) Peck Mr. Cunningham AP Lang August 6, 2016 Good title \tNature is something that is often taken for granted and unappreciated in this day and age. We spend time indoors and if we do go outside we often do not stop to appreciate and think a..."
1 "facility that is conducive" "...ied, appropriately licensed teachers.    The school will meet and maintain its enrollment and mobility rate goals.    The school will maintain a safe facility that is conducive to learning.    The school will institute a fair and open enrollment process that complies with Minnesota law.   Legal Full and complete compliance w..."
1 "realize that" "...ty will “wake when she tires of [the ailment]”, but doesn’t realize that Ann Putnam's children never got “tired” of the ailment (27). Rebecca doesn’t realize that her solutions don’t necessarily apply to different scenarios as she had eleven children compared to the one Mrs. Putman had. This leads to higher ten..."
1 "to ensure that potentially" "... \"The Human Rights Act 1998\" shows a whole range of rights and freedom of people. DOH (1998)   Physical Intervention Policy Every effort must be made to ensure that potentially volatile situations are avoided using non-confrontational approaches aimed at enabling the resident to take responsibility for his/her actions and co..."
"and that is." "...s are naturally smarter, faster, and stronger than others are. All athletes, whether or not they use PEDs, are not 'playing on a level playing field' and that is...unfair.\"" 1
1 "implies that" "...from Donna Hughes, an investigator for The Coalition Against Trafficking in Women and professor of Women’s Studies at the University of Rhode Island, implies that the sex industry has been the basis for “the^technological innovation and business model” (In fact the sex industry is considered to be the father of..."
1 "thought that it was" "...in the foundation of Rousseau’s Unfoldment Theory but did not agree with the complete absence of the adult in a child’s learning process.  Pestalozzi thought that it was the job of the adult to offer a warm and nurturing environment where the child felt safe to pursue their own curiosity.  Part of offering this safe l..."
1 "salve that is needed" "...ee with young Mr. Malfoy,\" Dumbledore looked to his staff and gave a curt nod. \"Minerva is with the students. Horace is going to brew any antidote or salve that is needed.\" He divided the staff into groups, assigning Remus to keep watch over Draco and Tobias before excusing himself to check on the status of the victims..."
1 "long is that it" "...TU membership compulsory. Key issues: difficulty dealing with instability, separate er system. It remained in force till 1973,The reason it lasted so long is that it was considered traditional,  way of determining minimum wage rates and handling industrial dispute.     Neo-classicalism v Keynesian Classical econom..."
1 "point is that organizations" "...lusive benchmarking process in the organization. Regardless of the approach being used in any organization, there are two points in common. The first point is that organizations are not satisfied for the status quo, and second point, they are looking forward to enhance their competitiveness (Boxwell, 1994). That is to say tha..."
1 "research shows that the" "...bloodless surgery. This helped the mortality rates for the Jehovah witnesses and given them the chance to live without dishonoring their belief.  Her research shows that the facilities used such procedure for the Jehovah Witnesses was having such great prognosis that they started using for others non-religion believers. T..."
1 "data that is available" "... fall.    Weka Forecasting Tool  Weka’s forecasting tool is an effective tool which can forecast the future values of a dataset beyond the historical data that is available. This is done by importing a time series forecasting model into Weka’s forecasting environment. Weka’s forecasting tool is not the same as the classi..."
1 "fact that it may" "...e and minorities follow, it maybe immoral to illegalise certain practises.  This all comes down to the decision of making anything illegal due to the fact that it may lead to the process of criminalisation, marginalisation, exploitation and demoralisation of certain practices of groups, this can be seen in the Jama..."
1 "take that" "...rtain children kept their parents away. Weekly maintainece amount was $40 for each parent of the children. So every week end that child used to come, take that $40 from the doctor or the attendant and leave, without meeting the parents. People might say logically that it should be given to the parents direct..."
1 "idea that it was" "...ntroversial period in history between Mexico and the United States because of American Imperialism over Mexican territory.   Manifest Destiny was the idea that it was the destiny of the United States to control all of North America based on three factors: moral justification (God), the right to spread democratic ru..."
1 "even realize that they" "...successful apps to get people to exercise. Because the primary goal of the game is to collect all of the different Pokemon characters, players do not even realize that they are ultimately increasing their health and getting an incredible amount of exercise. Another way that Pokemon Go is positively affecting society is t..."
1 "demeanor that it was" "... move had been sudden and unexpected, Michael never before exhibiting this kind of aggressive behaviour. It clashed so much with his normal collected demeanor that it was scary, the fear of it shown in Castiel shocked and frightened expression as his stands frozen in front of his brother and reflected back in Michael’s..."
1 "been observed that some" "... aside in the country of its origin. Article V (1) (e) makes provision for the enforcement of an award that has been set aside, In recent time it has been observed that some of the provision of the NYC is not updated with the new trends of the international commerce in regards to the development of the modern e-commerce a..."
1 "survey reveal that 95%" "...the marketing and promotion. Also the Skill of the brewmaster and the industry connection could help Desert Valley produce best taste beer and from a survey reveal that 95% of customers like the taste and 85% willing to buy. The network of the management team could be very helpful. Poor: lack of management knowledge, the..."
1 "You say that you" "...g, even if you love me still so badly injured with your behavior. How come you can not drag a clean break if you're not interested in a relationship. You say that you were too young, I do not want to accept, nor can I believe that it was the real motive. Is there another? But what should answer this question, do no..."
0 "show that" "...ameras on their phones to catch these different creatures. While there are a few complaints and problems with the game, the many benefits of playing, show that Pokemon Go definitely has a Positive effect on society. \tPokemon Go has proven to be a benefit to society for countless reasons. The first and most o..."
1 "reactions show that the" "...hat the affair between Abigail and John is an issue that plagues their marriage for the time being.   Act 2 #3 When John Proctor kisses his wife, her reactions show that the “love” between them remains frozen until a definitive solution. Elizabeth is seen to simply “receive it” rather than enjoying it which ties to the pr..."
0 "I think that the" "...dence you have found, what do you think the theme(s) of this story is/are? Give reasons for your answers. Cite evidence and page number(s).  \tAnswer) I think that the theme of the story is that you should never give up. I think this because Ryder had so many chances to give up on finding his dad to save his mom. Bu..."
"Think that when" "...k that they are never going to win, but that's not true one thing that my father told is that if i put my mind towards something I can accomplish it. Think that when ever you doubt yourself. " 1
1 "knew that it was" "... planetary confederation. Things, I suppose, were going too well. People were too complacent, and it silently rotted on the inside. Myself and others knew that it was nothing more than a gilded authority,^parading around as a benevolent entity, while it gutted the resources of many planets and displaced billions of..."
1 "and prove that they" "...t require them to spend some one-on-one time with me during class time, before or after school, or during a lunch period to come in and get some help and prove that they have mastery of this concept.  If this is something that will be used again in my class, it will be reinforced in future lessons and students can sho..."
1 "to verify that the" "...ollars are spent on research to eradicate medical errors and it's been prevented by new technologies like scanning patient hand bands and medications to verify that the right medication is given to the right patient ,proper timeouts during surgical procedures to make sure the right surgery is done on the right patien..."
1 "not think that it" "...day and age, almost everything is done and or created online, So when you do go a few days without your phone you literally miss so many trends. I do not think that it is possible to go on your phone for less than 20 hours a week  once you have become attached to it. I do agree  with the fact that technology use can..."
1 "be expected that the" "...ine may consult with.   7. EXPECTATION The expectation of the mine is that town council must still be within the limits of the mine, though it should be expected that the mine must be prepared to share 50% cost of principal cost for the filtration plant and to also share the 50% interests.   The chances of reaching the..."
1 "God is that we" "...guided by the Holy Spirit.The Bible remain a best seller,in constant demand. \tOne of the main problems that people have when it comes to believing in God is that we cannot see Him, touch him,or hear him.Now compare God to a concept, such as love. We cannot touch love, see love,or hear love. Therefore, there must ..."
0 "conversations that were easy" "...he chemistry with Carolyn Clifford, Dave Rexrot, Curtis Jackson and Brad Galli was fantastic. They were joking with each other and actually had small conversations that were easy to follow. \t\t\t\t\t\t\t\t\t\t\t\tIf it wasn’t already easy to tell, I personally preferred Channel 7, and it’s not because it’s my personal bias. I enjoyed Cha..."
1 "making chips that he" "...s working hard on his project He wished someday he wanted to make an army of robots. So he snuck out of work and went to his underground home. He was making chips that he can put in his army of the X-55 robots. But he didn’t know that somebody messed up his system and put the virus inside the chips. One small thing can..."
1 "also see that Nora" "...y. While Nora is explaining to Mrs Linde how she had to take several jobs to be able to pay off loan, Mrs Linde demeanor changes towards Nora. We can also see that Nora’s character shows maturity and determination. A side of Nora no one thought she had.  A man comes to the door wishing to speak to Torvald. Nora is no..."
1 "problem is that there" "...d that Hyde's account contains several thousand pounds. It is said that Hyde is sure to be caught now because money means everything to him. The only problem is that there are no photographs or no record of family of Hyde. Utterson leaves to Dr. Jekyll's house, where he is sat looking ¨deadly sick.¨ There the two discus..."
0 "worldview that is imposed" "...who manipulate the culture of that society—the beliefs, explanations, perceptions, values, and mores—so that their ruling-class worldview becomes the worldview that is imposed and accepted as the cultural norm; as the universally valid dominant ideology that justifies the social, political, and economic status quo as natura..."
1 "employment that is not" "... is not authorized or if you do not return after a leave of absence as scheduled.   Involuntary Discharge A discharge is an involuntary separation of employment that is not due to a layoff. When someone is involuntarily terminated we will consider them not eligible for rehire at Hunter's. In most instances a discharge oc..."
0 "companies shows that most" "...gative situations. Whilst there will always be individual directors and boards that flout their responsibilities, the track record of Australia’s top companies shows that most organisations are incorporating good corporate governance frameworks, policies, practices and cultures.  In order for Australian companies to continu..."
0 "He Mean That?" "...e secondary characters because it keeps the story new, and lets us focus are attention on things other than the main character. Chapter Eleven: “Does He Mean That?” Authors purposely place symbols and patterns in every corner of their writing. \tAuthors purposely place symbols and patterns in every corner of thei..."
1 "was low that the" "...ge to inform about her blood pressure and cognition. After trying for few min to arouse Mrs. Burns, she slowly opened her eyes but her blood pressure was low that the doctor thought  it’s ok for the patients age and more over she got enough fluids in OR . He signed off her  records and asked the nurse to transfer t..."
1 "banks that were excluded" "...eds and requirements of the research in a bid to be objective and precise to the needs of the research. An initial analysis was made to determine the banks that were excluded from the study. Excel formulas were then entered into the worksheet to calculate the performance ratios for each of the banks. The ratio results were..."
0 "believe that" "..., Geography, hard, History, interesting, Maths, Science   U1L9. Functional language of agreeing and disagreeing: I agree/don’t agree, I believe/don’t believe that ..., I think …, Maybe, Me too! That’s true, That’s a good point, What do you think/believe? You’re right; Tablet, email, social media, internet   U1L..."
1 "we learned that there" "...d quality to the difference between expectation and performance.  Relating these previous studies to the studies of the physical service environment, we learned that there is a significant impact on perceived service quality and customer satisfaction of customers after purchasing a service because customers remained in ..."
1 "distraction is that many" "...     Question 4: The implication of Morelli’s Quote for Civic Engagement  ​Civic engagement is hindered by the advancement of social media. The major distraction is that many individuals are electronically connected, whether they are at work or home. This affects their social life, such that they allocate little or no time..."
0 "study noted that although" "...nts who had participated in pre-adoptive trainings felt like it was a good resource to help modify expectations going into adoption. Another research study noted that although there has been an increase of post-adoption resources and services since about 1990, “the need for readily available parenting classes, education, [a..."
1 "I see that he" "...sports and spearheaded a new movement against segregation in America. Armed with the knowledge of these men referenced within Andrew McBride’s notes, I see that he saw dreams for rights to all races, racial equality, and had a vision for a new America with Christian moral views. In these notes, Andrew McBride de..."
1 "It found that the" "...found a huge increase in re-employment. The study monitored the effects on individuals’ employment and earnings through an extensive tracking system. It found that the number of ABAWDS on food stamps dropped 75%, freeing 13,000 Kansans from welfare at the end of 2013. “Nearly 60% of those leaving food stamps found e..."
0 "you indicate that you" "...ardless of the means of delivery of our offer of Services to you. By using the Site and/or by purchasing tutoring services from us by phone or email, you indicate that you have read and accept these Terms and agree to abide by and be bound by these Terms (as modified from time to time).  If you do not accept these Terms..."
1 "much that it planted" "...e loved. In that moment, it was a group photo, yet Harry was staring at me and I was doing the same. The looks in our eyes made me feel nostalgic, so much that it planted a seed of courage inside of me.  I rushed to the front window in hopes of stopping Harry. I didn’t have a plan, maybe I would ask him to stay home, b..."
0 "think that" "...n assured Clinton that “political hack” or not, she was “willing to listen” to Clinton’s pleas.  Speaking of influential families and politics, don't think that Caitlyn falls behind in bloodline. If you require to be reminded that our girl reigns from the greatest American, Armanian dynasty of Calabasas, The ..."
1 "book that was read" "...mories first. What I call “I” die will with those memories. As Camus wrote in the Myth of Sisyphus about Goethe is true for me too, even if i wrote a book that was read for 10,000 years no one will know who i am.   December 30, 2015 Tomorrow, and tomorrow, and tomorrow. The days creep slowly along until the end of ti..."
1 "there is that they" "...spent my time figuring out what works and what doesn't and this is how I advanced so fast. The problem with all the Trading \"Gurus\" and \"Mentors\" out there is that they have too many members to even pay attention to one student on a personal level. They just give you dvd's that teach you the basics and all this unnec..."
1 "one that is used" "... addiction possibility that come with their products. They also suppressed the test results that proved their claims to be false. This type of lie is one that is used just for self-benefit. These companies didn’t take into consideration their customer’s health and well-being, or they didn’t care. These type of liar..."
0 "him knows that as" "...seven!” Junmyeon calls out to the chefs, Do Kyungri and Park Chanyoung. Despite having a job at a cafe, Junmyeon was a hopeless cook, everyone around him knows that as well as they try to keep him away from the stove at all times. He shifts aside to let servers Huang Zifei and Kim Jungin walk past, hands full with t..."
0 "” that is what" "...t today. As I get older it takes on more of an in depth meaning, it has almost turned into a love story about life. “Get busy living or get busy dying” that is what this is about, the hope and inspiration to live? I would recommend watching this film as it is a classic drama that will keep its meaning throughout ..."
1 "then stated that his" "..., depression is an illness and he understood that there were other outside factors in his life at the moment that could potentially trigger again. AM then stated that his door was always open if DJ ever wanted to speak. AM added that stage 2 of the companies absence management procedure would be triggered if there was ..."
1 "process that is crucial" "...ndbooks. Social responsibility and ethics are used to stand up for the team as a whole and not for just yourself.    Critical thinking has a six step process that is crucial to making decisions without jumping to conclusions. When it comes to ethics I believe in following the rules and being responsible. This can affect m..."
1 "have confirmed that the" "...in-house or not.  Such a proposal might make sense if the council were ‘insourcing’ a service that has previously been externally delivered, but DCLG have confirmed that the proposals would apply to all in-house services. As a result, some of the proposals appear to be effectively pushing transparency policy towards some ..."
0 "glasses that" "...se Hugo I'll eat your shit that you want to dish out, I gave you money for Zoe senior year $400.00 I can't afford to put out another $300.00 for her, glasses that I'm pretty sure she won't wear. As far as Zoe needs glasses that's great since for the last two years you told her she needed them, and now it's stic..."
1 "parents decided that they" "...rother’s servant. Elizabeth - She is Victor’s future wife. She was adopted by Victor’s parents in Italy. She was then Victor’s adopted sister and his parents decided that they would get married later on.  She is waiting for her future husband to come back. Justine - She was a kind and happy servant that lived at the Franken..."
0 ", that were with" "... and, during his stay in their castle in Germany, fell in love with Irisviel Von Einzbern. How he had two daughters, Illyasviel and Chloe Von Einzbern, that were with their mother's family. They knew that he wasn't telling everything but refrained seeing his pained expression when remembering his past. End Flashbac..."
1 "I think that Miss" "... she is using him to make Mr. Darcy jealous, which is a horrible thing to do. Jane write to Elizabeth, telling her how cold Miss. Bingley was to her. I think that Miss. Bingley think                                                                  In Chapter 27 and 28 \t\t\t\t \t                      In Chapter 35 and 36..."
1 "me realized that I" "...I am more strict to them and my wife said that I have a short temper now compare to before I signed up to the army. Learning that from my family made me realized that I should not allow myself to be 100% soldier all the time especially at home. I struggle adjusting at first, but with the help of my family I am gettin..."
1 "organism is that the" "...rus is added to the sugar beet and this quality modifies the sugar beet.    Commercial issues: One of the commercial issues with genetically modified organism is that the genetically modified seeds cannot create own their own so the whole process of growing seeds should be repeated that takes a plenty of time and money..."
1 "quickly decided that singing" "...? He was just a naive little boy who just had his fourth birthday when he began singing. He loved it so much that his very mature four years old self quickly decided that singing was what he wanted to do for a living. He took it seriously from early on. He gathered friends and family as audience on birthdays or other random ha..."
1 "claims are that GMOs" "...ts, and reasons why they should be labeled. Over the years, the term GMO has grown in popularity, but it hasn't been all positive. One of the biggest claims are that GMOs aren't  healthy for consumption for humans nor mammals. Because they contain dangerous pesticides. Pesticides are toxic substances intentionally rele..."
1 "Some believe that when" "...y there might be this difference in your perception of time. Other notes, thoughts and reflections:  The following passage really resonates with me. “Some believe that when we have new challenges to face, time appears to pass more slowly. When we are in routines that we know inside out, time appears to pass more quickly...."
1 "He states that “" "...anagement classes to resolve them but still has some difficulties with anger however, he never has physically abused anyone since taking the classes. He states that “he is still working on his anger issues and is trying to do better” (J. Doe, personal communication, August 11, 2016). He admits to having to be in co..."
1 "people find that our" "...ited states standard of living is our system ofo in the United States. Our next topic is standard of living which in the very government. Only 43% of people find that our system of government is good or excellent and only 19% of the United States trusts our government. Now you have some of the statistics on how America..."
0 "I think that’" "...aid she died before I was born and she left nothing for me that would even tell me who she is. Not even a birth certificate.”   “How old are you?”   “I think that’s getting too personal,” North growled out.   “Sixteen, as of October 6th.”   “Peanut, don’t answer his questions,” Nathan stated softly.   Suddenly, ..."
0 "does appear that the" "...isks of Bitcoin.     Table 4 Advantages and Disadvantages of Bitcoin  There are evidently advantages and disadvantages associated with Bitcoin yet it does appear that the benefits outweigh disadvantages. Cryptocurrencies present a different risk profile to other monetary forms and therefore requires a specialised appro..."
1 "revelation is that the" "...s than any other banks. The study established that the net effect of automation yields higher results than branch networking. The reality behind this revelation is that the discrepancy between the capital investments in the two is large, with branch networking proving to be the expensive one. Upon this revelation, banks ..."
1 "I think that some" "...ng care of her, but I believe she has the power to make something of herself. Section 2 Dutchy has an idea what will happen to the kids on the train. I think that some kids will end up with that fate but I'm hoping most of them will find good homes.  Vivian has a lot of items from her past most of them are from the ..."
1 "actually feel that Brazil" "...umping hydrogen peroxide into the water and the let out of fans has to do with major budget cuts lowering the amount of food stands in the stadium. I actually feel that Brazil is setting an example for future Olympic locations on what will please the crown and what won’t. With everything going on, Brazil should be very prid..."
0 "think that is one" "... row, my book in a perfect pile, and my clothes put in my dresser like a puzzle. I just like things to be neat and tidy. I like routines. Some people think that is one of my best qualities but I think it is a little annoying. I cannot help it though it is just natural to me to have things in a certain order. My lock..."
1 "assumptions that were made" "...help in forming an accurate assessment for the target, identifying the issues and validating all the financial, commercial, operational and strategic assumptions that were made by different parties. Also a Vendor Due Diligence​(VDD) exists which is a financial due diligence from the target perspective. Rather than looking at..."
1 "sometimes asserted that traffickers" "... in Brazil. One of the strong arguments justifying the anti-trafficking agenda has always been the large profits gained from human trafficking. It is sometimes asserted that traffickers make around USD 32 billion per year,17 and trafficking is the third most lucrative crime in the world, coming only behind drugs and arms.18 These dec..."
1 "divide that is created" "... situation escalates the prisoners of the supermarket become institutionalized they devolve into their primal instincts. The key piece to this is the divide that is created between the preacher woman and the partitioning of the rest of the group. The preacher is able to convince the others and conform to her mindset and ..."
1 "might realize that your" "...er no matter what. Sometimes he does things that make you mad then you wish you did not have a brother, but keep in mind that by the end of a day you might realize that your brother is a only friend closed to you. Next, be kind to your brother even when he is mad. Talk to him kindly when he has calmed down. Also, learn ho..."
0 "I call that progress" "...g are two different things. You can still work even if you don’t feel like it. If you sat down for an hour and accomplished nothing, it’s a start and I call that progress. A couple days of that and your mind will finally call “uncle” and give you nice music to keep you occupied.  Sit down and begin working for a partic..."
0 "gun that is a" "... was symbolically replaced of her father but now as a man who occupies the place belongs Jeanne’s father. Jeanne shoots him with the colonel father’s gun that is a representation of the penis, which Paul named it as her happiness (Mellen; 1973). Paul starts to walk slowly toward the balcony with an innocent expr..."
0 "Note that the" "...f the responsiveness of the controller to an error, the degree to which the controller overshoots the set-point and the degree of system oscillation. Note that the use of the PID algorithm for control does not guarantee optimal control of the system or system stability.  Failure of controllable pitch propeller ..."
1 "also reported that his" ".... She and her daughter reportedly live with him and berates him and makes demeaning statements to him, when he challenges decisions they may make. He also reported that his daughter pays his bills and he received a disconnect notice for the water bill. This case was assigned to this worker on 5/27/16.  II. \t  CASE ACTIVI..."
1 "and that is all" "...is targeting resistant and neutral audience because for the doctors that are educated with the old idea of blood is a gift of life were it save lives and that is all they know. They tend to stick to this concept, but this can show them that there are other options. For the neutral audience could be for patients an..."
0 "be mistaken that it" "...r change is the vital role it plays in the ceremonial gathering of Maōri people. Every Kaikaranga is different “There is only one of me. Women, don't be mistaken that it will sit in others footsteps. You have your own mana, embrace it totally. To advance yourself.” (The first voice,S2, E2,Rhonda Tibble Baker Reid)    ..."
1 ", that is required" "...ty, but because of strictness it is also faster to find a match for billions of sequences. We are losing sensitivity by being strict but with the time, that is required to do a proper search for every short sequences, is beyond a PhD thesis work. After mapping we acquire a bam file with all the information. In my opi..."
1 "crop is that they" "...mers make benefits as the yield of the production is increased so the deficit of food decreases. But the social issue related to genetically modified crop is that they can stimulate infection or diseases in humans so the health is at risk.   Genetically modified medicine: Insulin:   there was a risk in getting the i..."
1 "I think that the" "...f. Although this may apply to many others lives, it does not apply to mine.  After reading the article, what are some of your own ideas on the topic? I think that the criteria used to diagnose mental disorders should not be as stigmatized. Even though the DSM may label you with a mental disorder, does not mean you ..."
1 "and that was “" "...he mission aspect of each of my previously held positions.  For example, as the 52d CS Commander, I  knew exactly what I was asking for from the unit…and that was “getting the mission accomplished”.  I aligned my actions to that of the priority tasks & missions of the group and wing commanders, and then focused t..."
0 "that decide that they" "...most important part of being a vampire, yeah?”   “Right!” Sean exclaimed. “Sang, because you’ll be around a lot of vampires, especially a certain few that decide that they can just trample through my house whenever they please when they don’t live here…” Sean gave Olivia a look, which she ignored, “You may experience a ..."
1 "she realizes that “" "...main ideas and mixes it into an indirect adaptation from the mindset of a woman name Anna. In Oates story it shows the action of Anna’s behavior when she realizes that “the stranger” (Oates) has come to Ohio to meet her. Oates Anna, was startled by her lover “the stranger” (Oates) visit. “Panic rose in her long shudde..."
1 "they feel that it" "...ster, while the remaining feels that teamwork allows them to achieve greater heights. In conclusion, more cedarians like to work individually because they feel that it is more sufficient.       What size of artwork would catch your attention when you go to an art exhibition?  Based on the responses we collected, 59...."
1 "bought that was still" "...ver gave me a single spanking like the former nannies and master did to me. When, I was about 20 years old my master got two younger children that he bought that was still in diapers. He asked or said to me I was responsible to get them feed and change their diapers when it was need. So I did as he told me and the two g..."
1 "I found that it" "...he business to improve.   During my awakening to the positives that can come out of negative situation like a customer complaint or a service failure I found that it is a great way to learn more about a customer’s process or unspoken needs or wants. Beyond this increase in information exchange in tyring to better ..."
1 "do believe that any" "...mposer. There is a real scarcity of instruction in techniques that truly help composers to improve their skills. This book aims to fill that niche. I do believe that any composer who hasn’t made a name for themselves and tries to sell you courses without any formal training is not the right person to teach you to comp..."
0 "Foster explains that every" "...evelop the character. Every action is purposely placed to further develop the character. In the chapter Every Trip is a Quest (Except When It’s Not), Foster explains that every action a character completes has an impact on his/her development. This is symbolized when Foster told the story of Kip, a boy who went on a trip to ..."
0 "lines that were added" "...ft and the current script on the right. Differences are highlighted in red (previous version) and green (current version) for easy comparison. Entire lines that were added or removed are highlighted in grey on the opposite panel.  Note: You cannot edit from this panel, but you can copy content into the clipboard from ei..."
1 "Lanyon says that he" "...ondon physician named, Dr. Lanyon. Later the two talk of Dr. Jekyll, and how they have seen much of Jekyll. When Utterson asks Lanyon of Edward Hyde, Lanyon says that he never heard of him. Once Utterson leaves he begins to watch the door until he finally spots Mr. Hyde.  \tThe beginning of the novel was a bit strange ..."
1 "from experience that never" "...e of me. However one thing was good that he didnt had any injury but bad thing was as he was on the floor and trying to get up but couldnt. I learned from experience that never leave resident alone at any time any thing can happen always ask for help and prepared with all necessary equipment before any procedure. Preparation..."
1 "highly doubted that they" "...lammed into me. This was whiplash! I had enough of whiplash with Crazy talking in the background.   There was a bar, but with all the kids in there I highly doubted that they served beer. We walked up to a stool and each ordered a root beer float. The girl behind the counter eyeballed us, giving Darcy the once over. I coul..."
1 "am puzzled that they" "...st follow me child understood. I hear a voice that says Glenn is she here yet. Yes she is dear Sonja my wife, our daughter Abbie has just arrived.  I am puzzled that they call me daughter, but I am pleased that I have now have a family. Abbie this is your siblings Carrie, Cassie, Chelsea, Carolyn, Caitlin, Dawn, Annike..."
0 "Others suggest that the" "...agreed upon. Some use the five discourses with their prominent concluding formula as “markers” and suggest that Matthew wrote a Gospel in five books. Others suggest that the repeated clause “From the time that Jesus began to . . .” in 4.17 and 16.21 is intended to mark the beginning and ending of major sections of the nar..."
0 "SOAD agrees that it" "...alth Act Commission (MHAC) and is called a Second Opinion Appointed Doctor (SOAD).  Electroconvulsive therapy can only be given without consent if an SOAD agrees that it is appropriate for the treatment to be given. To do this the SOAD has to determine that the patient is not capable of understanding its nature, purpo..."
0 "their own that we" "...lling one is just wrong. I thought I could still be in that family, or at least give the illusion that I’m a part of it, but they’re just deciding on their own that we aren’t going to play along with that idea? Seriously?”   ‘Is he having some sort of breakdown? This seems like a completely different man than I saw ..."
1 "me realize that when" "...ect effort day. I didn’t think that the project efforts would count     towards my grades/records.     What I learned: The bridges program has helped me realize that when you don’t put forth the effort in school you get consequences.  In my opinion Bridges is a consequence.  I did not complete my homework so in return ..."
", that is -" "... are both distinctively visual texts that utilise visual techniques, such as motifs, coloured imagery and symbolism to demonstrate their central ideas, that is - existentialism," 0
1 "Lily learned that the" "...Secret Life of Bees the minor characters affect Lily and who she is at the end of the book, just as much as the main characters. From Franklin Posey, Lily learned that the world is not fair, and not every^race, person, and age in treated well. From Neil, Lily learned to never give up on what someone believes in, because..."
1 "attempt tasks that he" "...t the conclusion of this intervention over the same time period. Malachi’s teacher has identified a much more focussed and attentive student who will attempt tasks that he would previously percieve as out of his ability. Pre-intervention Engagement Data Charts Post Intervention Engagement Data Chart  Pre intervention Fr..."
0 "Association claims that there" "...ion claims to have ‘tested’ the security surrounding the Target changing rooms by having sent men into the women's changing room. The American Family Association claims that there is a distinct lack of security to stop people from entering the changing rooms not correlating to their apparent gender and that this proves the new ..."
1 "Police confirmed that “" "...07; Stadtler 2012). \tLike many Punjabi migrants to Britain in the interwar period, Udham Singh came to Britain in 1933 and, in 1934, the Metropolitan Police confirmed that “Udam Singh Sidhu,” of 9 Adler Street, Stepney, London, had been granted a Pedlars Certificate in December (Metropolitan Police 5 December 1934, MEPO 2..."
1 "research suggests that EMI" "... participants and found it both feasible and acceptable with an 89% response rate. Although evidence of feasibility is limited in an alcohol context, research suggests that EMI via mobile-phone has been feasible in other contexts, such as smoking cessation. Berkman, Dickenson, Falk and Lieberman (2011), used an SMS text form..."
1 "it means that he" "...g Artaxerxes).  Nehemiah does not use the word servant in 2:2-3 just as he used in 1:11 but when he said that he was much afraid and said to the king it means that he replied to the king out of respect and reverence. The explanation of Nehemiah’s cry before God (1:4-11) and the sad facial expressions in front of th..."
1 "Utterson concludes that Hyde" "...Utterson leaves, but before he’s gone he asks the servant, Poole, who handed in the letter. When Poole said that no one had come to hand in a letter, Utterson concludes that Hyde must have given the letter to Jekyll in the dissecting room. Utterson leaves to his house and he is alone there besides his clerk Mr. Guest. He begin..."
1 "a district that that" "... school. Being part of the TPSD has provided me with the opportunity to have a rewarding career and I will be forever thankful. I believe the TPSD is a district that that puts students first and cares about its students, teachers, and families and I am blessed to be part of a great school district.     ."
1 "we hope that she" "...has united America, no, she has united the world.  And while she probably must now move on to more significant issues like world hunger and genocide, we hope that she has enough time to still show us all how real and humble she is weekly on her hit reality series “I am Cait”.  I recognize that not everyone can be p..."
1 "to achieve that but" "...buted systems like consistency, availability etc as well.  So, how do we implement transaction in micro-services?  Actually, there are different ways to achieve that but micro-services let us re-think on idea of transactions and see if it's really required for the given use case. To explain the idea let me take same e..."
1 "the model that they" "...owers, paper rolls, plastic cartons). • Encourage children to use words that describe textures (e.g. hard, soft, smooth, rough) when they share about the model that they have constructed.          References Berk, L. E. (2012). Infants, Children, and Adolescents (7th ed.). Boston: Allyn & Bacon. Berk, L. E. (2013). C..."
1 "t-test is that the" "...the means in two unrelated groups. As such, the t-test was deemed appropriate in testing the null hypothesis. The null hypothesis for the independent t-test is that the population means from the automated and non-automated banks are equal: H01: u1 = u2 The t-test was used to determine whether there was evidence to re..."
1 "not believe that Eric" "...   Eric’s restroom stall was suddenly opened by none other than the Bartender himself. The Bartender soon stood in shock as his jaw dropped. He could not believe that Eric had assumed the position to play guillotine. For a moment, He had remembered that his girlfriend, Lotus had an obsession with playing guillotine and ..."
0 "flow chart that clearly" "...zza delivery program, and what attributes I would like to see as a customer in the new delivery service. Lastly, I will discuss and outline a process flow chart that clearly demonstrates my requirements for the new pizza delivery service.   Pizza Delivery Service Attributes That are Important To Me  \tThe primary point of ..."
1 "point is that food" "...ty of affording food, and even with that help of GMOs  there is still world hunger. Now imagine people having to pay a higher cost for there food. My point is that food with GMO labels, and food  not containing GMOs will either way increase significantly the amount of our money spend in food. But as well there is peo..."
0 "you is that almost" "... has been able to see, events can pop up where thing can get…out of your control, if we don’t warn you,” Olivia surmised. “All we are willing to tell you is that almost all of your life mates are fully human, while one is a changeling like yourself. This, coupled with the fact that you have a stronger compulsion as a..."
1 "I notice that Abbie" "... her diaper and then do the same on the right side of her diaper. She then gets her feet lifted up by me, and I grab and pulls down her cloth diaper. I notice that Abbie has made a mess in her cloth diaper it's filled with her poo and pee, so I grab some wet wipes and Abbie gets her feet lifted up by me.  My nanny Car..."
1 "he says that he" "...hrough new places at least once a month. My soulmate and I always laugh together for minimum 2 minutes each day. My husband looks at me with love and he says that he deeply and truly loves me. My husband and I kiss each other a lot and we hug each other very often My husband and I make love very often and we never..."
0 "also notice that their" "...ds are sometimes able to spot a few of the symptoms which includes one side of the back being larger than the other (Trobisch et al., 2010).  One may also notice that their shoulders are uneven (Trobisch et al., 2010). Idiopathic scoliosis rarely causes pain in children and adolescents and often comes to attention only b..."
1 "years that it was" "...ary if recovery is not progressing.   In my medical practice, I had the fortune of working with a lab that measured MTHFR for no charge. For the five years that it was available, I tested all of my patients. Surprisingly, I found it played a more minor role in recovery than I expected. I had chronic Lyme sufferers w..."
1 "also says that he" "...Mr. Bingley and Jane. This made me dislike Mr. Darcy again, why would he be so cruel and split up his best friend from someone he loves so dearly? He also says that he did not want to become i        \t\t\t\t \t              In Chapter 40 and 41                        In Chapter 43                        In Chapter 46   ..."
1 "deficiency that was always" "...equirements presented by the 52d Fighter Wing.  However, in both of my unit compliance assessment reports as well as a USAFE Safety assessment, a key deficiency that was always highlighted was “quality of life” and “work balance” issues.  I tried to hone into the challenge(s) by hosting Airman, NCO, and SNCO forums and lunch..."
1 "then added that he" "...n this meeting was called was because of his absence from 17/01/16 to 24/07/16 with a total of 100 days, had triggered a 1st interview of concern. AM then added that he was aware that this absence was due to DJ experiencing symptoms of depression and that he knew some of the history relating to this. AM then stated t..."
1 "moment that it becomes" "...a experience until it becomes social and begins discussion amongst users. This is a crucial moment, it is the fuel to a successful campaign, it’s the moment that it becomes something more than just a marketing campaign and becomes a way for people to connect and feel more human. The sharing of user contributed informatio..."
1 "to mean that you" "...g together, it's made up of the same kind of birds It's only natural for people with similar interests to hang out together. However, it doesn't have to mean that you only spend time with the same people. People have many different interests, so you may be part of many different groups that share interests. For exa..."
1 "doctor said that if" "...im i was so happy he was already recovered and my name was on his arm nick in blazing flames the doctor introduced me and we talk for awhile then the doctor said that if i wanted to i could live inside his cell with him and i won't be a slave anymore but my father told that a should say with the job that way you get m..."
1 "IEP that was in" "...ose IEP team members whose services are being discussed are required to attend.   30 Day Transfer Students If a student with a disability (who had an IEP that was in effect in a previous district within the state) transfers to a new district in the same state, and enrolls in a new school within the same school yea..."
0 "9000 Certified that no" "...iority is on our relationships with our retail partners and collaborations with local artists.  Why we stand out  Our product is 100% sun-grown.  ISO 9000 Certified that no pesticides or dangerous chemicals are used in the growing.  Regular buyers get access to limited edition strains with premium packaging.  Advanced in..."
1 "me is that Koro-sensei" "...scent moon on it. How odd. For being the thing that destroyed more than half of the moon, he surely is wearing it proudly. Either way, what intrigues me is that Koro-sensei’s academic dress hides his whole body excepts for the arms, head, and legs. I wonder: what is underneath that dress of his? “A-hem!” a soft cough fro..."
1 "problem that is directly" "...urs and their attitudes towards the standards of what constitutes plagiarism. Gorman (2008, p. 298) presents the argument that plagiarism is a common problem that is directly related to today’s electronic involvement in document production. In Selwyn’s article the research undertaken found that eighty percent of students s..."
1 "technology that is gaining" "...and empowers viewers: converting them from casual readers to brand advocates. Marketers must also be flexible when it comes to experimenting with new technology that is gaining popularity with consumers. For example, virtual reality is predicted to grow 381% from 2017 to 2020, translating to an estimated 1,091,900 terabytes ..."
"food that was eaten" "...e about how our emotions were during the eating of the food as well as the taste and texture. This will then develop into a short 200 story about the food that was eaten.   " 1
1 "have realized that there" "...n myself, and my determination will always be as firm as a rock, and so, ultimately, I will be bound to be crowned with success.  And through this, i have realized that there is only one secret This is the^only secret of success. Be always a learner. Learn from others and from objects of nature. Know your strengths and wea..."
1 "relationship is that notwithstanding" "... vital to abstain from misconception and construct certainty and trust.13 3. Weak Community and Business Ties: The reality of the Australia-Indonesia relationship is that notwithstanding the endeavours we have made in government on both sides, we have not yet assembled the more extensive supporters that would give the relationship aut..."
1 "diagram that is compliant" "...two online trainings and two on-site trainings (March 2016) Interim Decision Support Structure, Adoption of high-level enterprise system architecture diagram that is compliant with the phase one, data warehouse implementation (       ) Research and findings from two on-site vendor data warehouse and business intelligence vi..."
1 "in hopes that he" "...duated.  \tOne day, I went to the store to shop for my family over summer and I saw Matty there. I was too shy to go up to him so I continued shopping in hopes that he would see me. As I was checking out, he tapped me on my shoulder just like from the night of the show. \t“Hey, I didn't expect to see you here…” I tur..."
0 "do believe that if" "Of the two perspectives I would go with Singer, as I do believe that if you are able to help you should.  If a child is drowning I am not obligated to help the child, but I can not help myself I feel the need to help some..."
0 "We ask that children" "...ing the limitation or exclusion.    Clothing and Personal Belongings Each child will have his/her own labeled storage area for personal belongings.   We ask that children have a complete change of clothing labeled and kept in their locker.   Please send socks, underwear, shirt and bottoms As seasons change please send ..."
0 "you feel that you" "... people. I want to enjoy being on set and creating with a group. So it does help when you get to work with people you admire and are inspired by.  Do you feel that you get cast to play a certain type of character more than others? To an extent, there’s definitely an essence to the characters I get cast as and auditi..."
1 "paper theorises that individuals" "...ineffective. This paper, therefore, extends and widens on proposed new poverty reduction strategy that focuses on individuals and their locality. The paper theorises that individuals in poverty are caught between the external influences, or externalisation process, and the internal ability/capability to fight poverty, or internali..."
1 "victims report that the" "Alcohol also plays a major role in violent crime. Approximately 3 million violent crimes occur annually where victims report that the perpetrator had been using alcohol. The victims in 67% of violent crimes involving people in an intimate relationship report alcohol use by the offen..."
1 "Remember that LRE" "...he disability of a child is such that education in regular classes with the use of supplementary aids and services cannot be achieved satisfactorily. Remember that LRE is based on individual needs. Appropriate placement and services for one student may be too restrictive for another student. For example, placement i..."
0 "blonde hawk that you" "...r school and accepting my conditions. From what I can tell, you are a bad person. Just....misguided. Either way, thank you. I heard from a strawberry blonde hawk that you like Lemon Sorbet. The hawk also cries out that you are just as sour as the Lemon Sorbet. Don’t know why though. The other cake is for your son. I wa..."
1 "self assure that this" "...s in my school .I scored 76% in my high school, achieved 79.2% in my Intermediate studies and an aggregate of 6.98 in my undergraduate studies. I can self assure that this pattern of my academics will continue in my graduate studies as well. I also did an exploration in different fields of civil engineering .I am happy ..."
1 "statue that was created" "...Rushmore. Harambe would be more respected and never forgotten.  The statue would bring in many tourist to the United States to come see the beautiful statue that was created there. It also would add a new sculpture to Mount Rushmore.        "
0 "you demonstrate that the" "...teps to ensure that your Personal Information is accurate, complete and up to date. We are happy to accept requests to update Personal Information if you demonstrate that the Personal Information we hold about you is incorrect. If at any time you find that the Personal Information we hold about you is inaccurate, incomplet..."
1 "gesture that is expressed" "... to.  Illness and wellness are similar to health and disease, in the idea that they do not mean the opposite of each other, they are both feelings of gesture that is expressed either in a positive, or negative approach (Boyd, 2000). A common response towards illness is that when someone is ill, it can be defined within thei..."
0 "school that is free" "...Young Australians declares that 'all Australian governments and all school sectors must provide all students with access to high-quality schooling. A school that is free from discrimination based on gender, language, sexual orientation, pregnancy, culture, ethnicity, religion, health or disability, socioeconomic backg..."
0 "if that was me" "... purple curtains covering the window. I see the moon and sit on the window sill staring at it. Thinking to myself, ‘Maybe I should be nicer to Aaron, if that was me in my dream then he was the one that found me. I could give him a break? No. I need him on patrol around the house just in case the kid comes her and..."
0 ". states that during" "...y of the adolescent; as to when the child was younger friendships came along through parental socialization (125). ​In this same study, Laucelle et al. states that during the stage of adolescence is where romantic relationships emerge, causing most of the time intense conflicts and also serving as a socializing functio..."
0 "was annoyed that the" "... words such as “very”. When the doves are described, they now seem to be trying to send a message that Matt has no hope, he has lost all hope.  “Matt was annoyed that the two seemed to have forgotten it was his party, his coming-of-age. He sulked in his bedroom. He twanged the guitar, hoping the noise would disturb the..."
0 "observation is that countries" "... have tended to outlast past alliances. Alliances have increasingly institutionalized which is attributed to the longevity of many alliances. Another observation is that countries have tended to counterbalance threats other than bandwagon in the hope of being spared by the threatening state. With multipolar international politi..."
"concrete evidence that our" "...means you actually are in another parallel universe and can connect future past lives. This means that dreams can make you enter the future. The most concrete evidence that our souce reli " 1
1 "This meant that thousands" "...le to show proof of U.S. citizenship In order to vote. The state of Kansas was enforcing proof of citizenship In order to discourage minority voters. This meant that thousands of people who were unable to^vote for not showing proof of citizenship can now vote in the upcoming election. ( look into more)   The March on Selma ..."
1 "respondents said that they" "...     Mum 9   Dad 6   Sibling 4   Aunty/Uncle 1   Grand Parent 2   Cousin 1                       Out of the 72 students that completed the survey, 20 respondents said that they had a family member that has previously been or is currently is employed as a teacher. 52 students responded that they don't have any family members ..."
0 "he believed that human-beings" "...he play, Ibsen was forced to write a second ending, in which Nora decides to stay and give her husband a second chance. Ibsen was not a feminist, but he believed that human-beings had a right to live their own life, posses their own identity. No one should be force to stay in an unhappy marriage because of what society might sa..."
1 "Utterson concludes that Hyde" "...Utterson leaves, but before he’s gone he asks the servant, Poole, who handed in the letter. When Poole said that no one had come to hand in a letter, Utterson concludes that Hyde must have given the letter to Jekyll in the dissecting room. Utterson leaves to his house and he is alone there besides his clerk Mr. Guest. He begin..."
1 "is estimated that the" "...sponsive behaviors.  Although, dementia is a progressive, life limiting illness, it is not possible to clearly predict a person's life expectancy. It is estimated that the prognosis may range from 2 to 15 years(Lloyd-Williams, 1996). Dementia  also raises ethical challenges because of the kind of suffering that people g..."
"have demonstrated that I" "As elite sport person, I have demonstrated that I have unstoppable determination to achieve what I have set out to achieve. I have dedicated over 30 hours to my training and competition on top of ful..." 1
1 "he hears that his" "... him to fill up the empty space on the worksheet.  He uses his left hand to hold the blue colouring pencils to colour on the ocean. At the same time, he hears that his classmate, Wayn say out “I run hurt myself^cannot eat”. Then Alvin joins and say out “When he runs and bangs on everything”. After he tells teacher V..."
1 "who suggests that Ralph" "... always suggesting good ideas that will keep all of the boys alive. In the beginning, he and Ralph are alone and find the conch, but Piggy is the one who suggests that Ralph blow it to find the others boys. Another example of his reasoning is when the boys begin to fear the Beast, instead of thinking it is real, Piggy tri..."
1 ") argued that as" "...logy resulted in better performance. Later studies however find a positive relationship between technology and profitability. Malhotra and Singh (2009) argued that as the intensity and experience in the usage of Internet increases, the financial performance of multichannel banks is likely to improve. Claessens et a..."
1 "I believe that Santiago" ".... Coelho believes that we deem ourselves to be more important than anything else and he is trying to say that it should be the other way around.  2. \tI believe that Santiago, the protagonist in the novel, observes his sheep to live meaningless lives. For instance, he believes that they wake with him because he provides th..."
0 "class is that you" "...erance, kindness, and understanding. 4.   Use proper English.  Different environments call for different forms of language.  One of the goals of this class is that you will finish the year with more skill in speaking standard English, and the skill of knowing when it needs to be used. The way you speak in school sho..."
0 "mother noticed that as" "...out of breath from putting my all into the race, that I bent over to place my hands on my knees to try and catch my breath. Well at that time my step mother noticed that as I was bent over, one side of my back appeared to be significantly larger than the other. This was very disturbing and unusual so a doctor’s appointme..."
0 "child that is walked" "... to insure safety for your child as well as serve as a safeguard for the school.  We appreciate your cooperation with these guidelines.   Walkers Any child that is walked into school is considered a walker.  Please park in parking lot and walk your child into the east doors next to Blue Ridge Elementary.  If picking up..."
1 "I think that de" "... \tAfter Jane and Mr. Bingley become engaged, Lady Catherine de Bourgh visits the Bennet household, and requests that Elizabeth takes a walk with her. I think that de Bourgh is up to something.                        In Chapters 59, 60 and 61                       "
1 "not believe that CGSS" "...rs of joy. On the way back home, no one spoke anything. No music. No chatter. I looked out of the window and felt like crying the whole time. I could not believe that CGSS vb was so weak.   After watching the first day of volleyball zonal competition,I learnt how defence is as important as a strong attack, that we shoul..."
1 "and says that his" "...ct is when the monster decides to ask Victor for another monster to be made so he can get rid of his loneliness. The monster feels alone in the world and says that his loneliness is the cause for his crimes. Another conflict is when Victor does not make the second monster. He sees the monster looking through the win..."
0 "class that is very" "...cs course I took over the summer, we did a lot of statistics. It surprises me how much statistics there is in all subject areas, so I think this is a class that is very important for my future whatever I end up doing. In the past, I’ve learned some statistics in class and I’ve really enjoyed it. I decided to take the..."
1 "and denied that she" "... his wife's aides in the past. Mr. Banks' aide, from Ideal Nursing, also privately told this worker that the daughter is only a help to the household and denied that she verbally abuses him.   III.   PLAN/RECOMMENDATION This worker was   Therefore, it is recommended that this case be closed in Intake.    \t\t\t\t      \t\t\t..."
0 "he explained that Natalia" "...or him to kill her, and afterward Kiritsugu looking at his father betrayed face shot with a pistol that he found in his father's drawer. To this end, he explained that Natalia figured that the only person who could prevent Noritaka from escaping and ensure his death was his own son and later she would wound up taking him wi..."
1 "I see that his" "...ing over my soft moans and gasps; he murmurs that I’m a good girl, his good girl, telling me to keep going, keep touching. He’s breathing heavily and I see that his hands are busy, too. The water is swirling around us as he kneels between my spread legs, so far apart that they’re aching, staring down at me. I’ve ..."
1 "I support that euthanasia" "... deny its existence. When we face with death, euthanasia is a way to respect the right to life. Thus, under the assumption of perfectly legal system, I support that euthanasia should be legalized. Nowadays, euthanasia is not legal in Taiwan. If it can be legalized in the future, law and the government must take responsibili..."
1 "We believe that each" "...  On behalf of all the management and employees of Hunter's Furniture and Appliance, we welcome you and wish you every success in your new position.  We believe that each employee should have a commitment to excellence as being part of Hunter's Furniture and Appliance and we hope you will take pride in being a member o..."
1 ") proposes that automation" "...nology increases competitiveness and creates a perfect market through price transparency given comparability of pricing among customers. Simpson (2002) proposes that automation is to a great extent driven by its ability to minimize costs and amplify revenues. Indeed, stronger correlation of lower costs and higher incomes to ..."
1 "winter boots that he" "...ow, it’s that broad strap we omega’s wear around our pouches. You know,” Naruto flushed and looked away to slip his socked feet into the only pair of winter boots that he owned, “the womb always has to be just the right temperature all the time. And I know, you’re probably thinking that you know-” “Not it’s alright. Of..."
1 "you realize that the" "...lessons that I understand better is to not be afraid to fail. I know that many people tell me this, but it seemed legit from Santiago’s story because you realize that the biggest failure in his life would’ve been if he never decided to embark on his Personal Legend. This lesson is hugely important to my high school jou..."
0 "Nobody cares that she" "...gether dum-de-dum when Leah suddenly turned and declared, Adah you are just too slow. I am taking all the nourishment here and going on ahead” (9).  “Nobody cares that she’s bad on one whole side because they’ve all got their own handicap children or a mama with no feet, or their eye put out” (13).    Book II: The Revel..."
1 "I believe that Miss" "...left her, without saying anything, to go to London. In the previous chapters, Elizabeth had said Mr. Bingley’s leave was all the doing of his sister. I believe that Miss. Bingley forced Mr.                                            In Chapter 26                        In Chapter 27 and 28 \t\t\t\t \t                      ..."
1 "State require that a" "....\tAre there explicit requirements as to the nature and extent of the sampling to  \t\tbe conducted and the analytical methods to be used?  \t6.\tDoes the State require that a State certified laboratory be used? \t7.\tWhat process is in place to review and validate the sampling design if a plan is not \t\t\tsubmitted but data ar..."
0 "site that is not" "...ights; access this site for use in anyway that is in conflict with these Terms and Conditions; attempt to gain unauthorized access to any area of the site that is not made readily available by us; Use the website in a manner which could be harmful to any computer system, network or server used in hosting or maintai..."
0 "they report that when" "...ns such as heart disease and stroke, which can be detected with routine ECG tests, are two to four times more likely to occur in diabetics.  Further, they report that when diabetes is combined with inactivity, smoking, excess weight and high blood pressure, the risk increases even more. The kidneys are affected when ele..."
0 "to argue that he" "...e a good man Sasuke. Whatever Uchiha thing you have that you’re afraid of. Naruto will love you all the same. He’s stubborn like that.” Sasuke wanted to argue that he wasn’t afraid of his beast powers but was that really the case? He’d have been mated to Naruto a long time ago if he wasn’t worried about his childre..."
1 "I realize that I" "...n fit Abbie.  Meanwhile me and Chelsea and Caitlin is outside waiting on them, and I am shocked when I begin with filling my diaper with my poo. Soon I realize that I am now wearing a pooped disposable diaper and I begin to stink. Do you smell something says Chelsea to Caitlin.  Have you done something your diaper,..."
1 "He requests that Nora" "... over her husband so she is sure Mrs Linde will be working there. Krogstad knows of his bad reputation and his position in the bank it's in jeopardy. He requests that Nora uses her influence on his behalf. He assumes that if Mrs Linde is hired he would be the one dismiss from the bank. Nora takes back what she said abou..."
0 "showed that" "...implications on Australia’s health system are expensive and in many cases avoidable. A recent Australian diabetes cost study (Bloomgarden 2007 p. 1), showed that with 7.4% or close to one million Australians with Type 2 diabetes, the cost to the country’s health system is approximately $3 billion per year comp..."
1 "malt that is involved" "...r today. The longer the barley heats the darker the color. Porters and stouts can obtain hints of chocolate or coffee and this is because of the dark malt that is involved during the brew. For example, Guinness claims that 232 degrees Celsius is the temperature that turns their barley “into a black state of perfection.”..."
0 "emotions that were snarled" "... closed the door behind me after entering the laundry room, leaned back against it and heaved a sigh. I did not know how to process all the different emotions that were snarled inside me. It almost made me sick. I was confused, i had the feeling of family, as crazy as it sounded, my family wasn't even here, but yet Aly and M..."
1 "south that was on" "... law, Little Rock Arkansas was a town considered to be the least likely for confrontation when it came to integrating, and was one of the cities down south that was on the lower scale when it came to racism. Soon after the U.S. Supreme Court ruled in Brown v. Board of Education, the local high school of Little Rock,..."
1 "belief that is suitable" "... are many points that are very characteristic. Body     Modernism was a movement that happened in a catholic church thought people should support the belief that is suitable with brand new thing in the late 19 century and early 20 century. In this term, people were having an unequal treatment. Minority, women, poor were s..."
0 "clear is that President" "...oped awareness on hostility that was existing between various militaries including Japan, China, and the rest of Europe.  One of the aspects that are clear is that President Roosevelt was aware that an attack from Japan was imminent. The President noted that there were developments occurring in the Pacific area that threa..."
0 "index shows that the" "...ables    The table 4.1 showed that descriptive statistic of eight independent variable and one dependent variable.   The dependent variable which SMI index shows that the low of 1083.03 was observed in July 2005 and shows the high of 5954.77 which was observed in September 2007. Mean value of the dependent variable is ..."
1 "feature that was put" "...lind friendly.   Figure 4: Examples of color scales used in the client. These color scales are rainbow, parula, cube-helix, and red-blue.  \tThe final feature that was put into this first prototype was the ability to draw a box and receive some statistics from the data in that area. The statistics returned were the mini..."
0 "week that is eliminated" "...d delinquent activity amongst youth, due to more free time (Sparks 1). There would no longer be school provided lunch and breakfast on the day of the week that is eliminated. This could be detrimental in economically disadvantaged school districts where students are dependent on school provided meals. If all businesses an..."
0 "to show that you" "...always what they seem, and what was once safe can become dangerous. People you once thought were friends can change your life for the worst. It comes to show that you can’t always trust everyone, and places that were once safe and serene can be loud and dangerous. The pond was a tranquil place, but then it was tran..."
1 "do expect that you" "...liarize employees regarding their privileges, responsibilities and other important information. IT IS NOT A CONTRACT or a legal document. However, we do expect that you will read, understand and follow the provisions of this handbook.   It is obviously not possible to anticipate every situation that may arise in the ..."
1 "evilness that is hidden" "...s between savagery and civilization to show just how close they actually are.  “Lord of the Flies” is a literary masterpiece that shows the extent of evilness that is hidden within each and every person. Through symbolism, Golding showed the evil things anyone can do and how civilization can only prevent savagery for a ce..."
0 "also indicated that there" "...s). The results of the study stated that individuals who are continuously exposed to stress, are at a major risk to suffer from depression. The study also indicated that there was considerable heterogeneity, meaning that there was a diverse group and not all people ended up with the same outcome after stress; which meant mo..."
1 "believe that" "...tent with it. It is our way to refresh, to revitalize, to nourish our soul, the dwell of power we need. We prefer solitude, our alone-time, but don’t believe that we don’t can enjoy social interactions with other. Spend time alone and actually enjoy it is a virtue. Being content in solitude means that you don’t..."
0 "with that is not" "...t it is going to be hard to integrate them into our school systems. The school system must change into something more innovative and new. The problem with that is not everyone learns the same way. The iPad is a tool for the educator to use you can’t just hand the kids an iPad and expect them to learn by themselves...."
1 "understanding is that we" "...ts can share files with the tax offices. As I mentioned this is a paid service, but the data we saved all year it is only available for that year. My understanding is that we have to renew and start fresh.  Another example is ATOM. I watched one of their webinar, and this company shares fantastic information on how to run ..."
1 "hand that was being" "...hopsticks and poked his knees and wrists carefully to make sure they were poked at the same spots. I then brought out a roll of paper and smacked his hand that was being reflected. I then brought out sandpaper and lightly grazed his arm that was being reflected. I then brought out a small hammer and lightly tapped his..."
1 "states that" "...e article, Motivating First-Generation Students to Academic Success and College Completion, Petty Tanjula, a professor from Alabama State University, states that institutions plays an important role on students. She mentions that first-generations students are more likely to leave college without a degree. Ove..."
1 "and suggests that the" "...n than the previous year(UNWTO). Robb (2016) in his article points out that despite the wars, terrorism and disasters, Africa is not defined by those and suggests that the stable growth should be acknowledged.   Tourism research has looked into aspects like temporal evolution of destinations, impacts of tourism developm..."
1 "was convinced that I" "...abits with the goal of composing on a regular schedule, and these habits were rooted primarily in emotional responses to writing. Half of the time, I was convinced that I must be taking part in a social experiment to see how far you could push a student composer before breaking the mind. Of course, you may notice that ..."
0 "be said that CA" "...ica, CA’s and specialised Tax Lawyers are considered the highest demanded tax specialists available in the market (Bendlel, 2005:). Therefore, it can be said that CA’s can perform in a multitude of industries.    In a study completed at the University of Southern California, the authors examined the accounting edu..."
1 "be argued that it" "...ia’s government. While 118 of the athletes were found with drugs in there system, the other 271 were not. Maybe if the numbers were reverse, it could be argued that it is the government’s fault, but less than half the athletes were proved guilty. This shows that these athletes did it by choice and not by being force..."
1 "man that was eating" "...... \"This is the police from the department of Edwards body, you have the right to remain silent!\" a police said. \"now i know the name of the strange man that was eating in my house for the couple off weeks                       " 0
1 "They claim that if" "...on, taste, and safety of GMO products are exactly the same as those with out, and 88% of scientist agree that GMOs are safe and shouldn't be labeled. They claim that if they label GMOs they will be discriminating or diminishing  products for no reason or even more confuse consumer. They argue that isn't  the main goa..."
1 "to see that it" "...ls integrated with Google Docs. Through the examination of Google Docs, using the four features of a useful collaborative Web 2.0 tool, it is obvious to see that it meets and exceeds, in most cases, the needs of both teachers and students.  While the application has a number of limitations, it offers a strong num..."
1 "people think that euthanasia" "...urance or inheritance. Euthanasia will help these people killing others legally. This is the main reason for against euthanasia to be legalized. Some people think that euthanasia should be legalized. The right was given by civil liberty lets people to decide their lives. People should have the right to choose their death inclu..."
0 ", that was when" "...ing at me in the rear view mirror.   \"Nah about what?\" I asked curiously gazing out of the window. The neighborhood we lived in was pretty quiet, Well, that was when people weren't throwing parties.  \"Malcolm hooked up with Mindy\" She replies with a look of disgust. I just rolled my eyes. That wasn't anything new,..."
0 "disadvantage is that you" "...ond family has a dog. I don’t have a pet. I think one advantage of having a dog is that I can become healthier by taking a walk with it. However, the disadvantage is that you have to be very responsible to take good care of the pet.   Q3. Is the size of your family similar to the size of the first family or the second fami..."
1 "above provides that an" "...ward that has been set aside in the country of origin has triggered several arguments among academic writers and scholars, Article V (1)(e) as stated above provides that an enforcement of award may be rejected only if the objecting party can prove that the award has been set aside, suspended by a competent authority or n..."
1 "also believe that communications" "...form (email, staff packages, etc) and in the verbal form, is vital in today’s more mobile environments that we find ourselves in on a daily basis.  I also believe that communications needs to be direct.  I value the direct information flows that occur between all troops at all levels.  To that end, from an accountability perspecti..."
1 "information that is available" "...individual, they will want to talk to coworkers of that individual (or teammates).  Behavior: What is the information they gather? With the spanse of information that is available, how to the determine quality of individuals? What is that for time? Positive behavior is determining more efficient ways to use their time to find q..."
1 "brains that were larger" "...owed them to walk longer distances than before. After the Australopithecines, a new type of human came to be. They were known as Homo habilis and had brains that were larger than their predecessors by 50 percent. This, coupled with being bipedal, allowed them to become the first humans to create tools and become more soph..."
1 "students said that they" "...nses that said ‘yes’, 9 students said their mother has been employed as a teacher. 6 students responded that their father has been a teacher. While 4 students said that they have siblings that are teachers. Some respondents said that there was more than one person in their family.                   Figure 1.   An overwhel..."
1 "example that is familiar" "... and talk accompanying action” (Hertzberg, 2016, p.147).      Recycling activity, whole class will watch a youtube clip advertisement, an appropriate example that is familiar to students will be chosen, for example a food related advertisment. Using a modified version of think-pair-share, pair students up, provide each pai..."
0 "cameras that were placed" "...ehind us. We immediately pushed the trash can into a corner and dropped down our stuff. I looked up at a wall of monitors. They showed feeds from the cameras that were placed throughout the school. I watched as a group of people chased another smaller group down the hall. I realized that the remaining kids would start figh..."
1 "abundantly clear that we" "...go out, but mother refused. Then she said you have a tablet, that us to engage himself with. This ties in with my next point about technology.  It is abundantly clear that we are on a fast moving, technology world and everyone up the tides and keeping up the Jones, less we suffer the shame of being behind times.However, th..."
0 "environment suggests that things" "...t only the peace and quiet, but the safety of the place. “The crash of the shot rolled up the hills then back down again”(106). This sudden change in environment suggests that things are not always what they seem, and what was once safe can become dangerous. People you once thought were friends can change your life for the worst. ..."
1 "young people that the" "Ollarves1   Stress during the life span of adolescents Adults commonly tell young people that the teenage years are the “best of life.” Series like High School Musical embrace the idea, by showing young groups of students always happy, engaging in..."
1 "Association reports that the" "...nd and body are connected and as a result, our mental and emotional states can have a great effect on our physical health. The American Psychological Association reports that the six leading causes of death in the United States are all liked to stress. Heart disease, cancer, lung problems and suicide are just some examples.  H..."
1 "airways that is characterised" "Chronic Obstructive Pulmonary Disease    Chronic Obstructive Pulmonary Disease (COPD) is a chronic inflammation of the airways that is characterised by limitations in lung airflow (Garvey, 2016). Worldwide, Chronic Obstructive Pulmonary Disease (COPD), is one of the main causes of morbidity and mo..."
1 "am reminded that my" "...hat I used to guide the unit over the last two years. Section I (Senior Leadership Philosophy)   As I sat down to outline my leadership philosophy, I am reminded that my guiding principles have always been linked to two things...“doing things right” and “doing the right things”.  As a result, my approach in executing ..."
1 "I felt that it" "...ets and pillows neatly folded and stacked in my papasan. I felt my heart sink. It really was over. My best friend had left, and she had left mad.     I felt that it was for trivial reasons, but she obviously didn't. I was upset, but I knew she would come around. She had to. We never had a fight that lasted more t..."
1 "cases that were not" "...is evidence of information sharing between children’s services and health visitors and GP to HV where there was concern of domestic abuse as 5 of the cases that were not referred to MARAC by the HVs, information was shared with the HVs by Children’s services and GP, and this reflects adherence to the Working Together ..."
1 "They forget that we" "...HING TO DO WITH THE EU!!! Many times I see them say they're unelected and we need to take our country back, who has it and where did it go? No where. They forget that we have an unelected House of Lords, we pay more for bureaucracy than most, if not all countries in the world! If you ask me, I would rather have the EU..."
0 "and said that the" "...led and won a lawsuit against the school under the grounds that it was discrimination and a violation of the Human Rights Act. Maines later spoke out and said that the school treated her ‘like an other, an exception’- not a regular student. The situation at Target is relatively similar to this case, just on a larger..."
1 "the best that you" "...r even how good you are at a sport. Then you avoid the tumor twins, which means that a little competition is healthy because it drives yourself to be the best that you can be, and then don't compare yourself to other people because we were all made different and we all develop at different speeds. You should also be..."
0 ") reported that the" "...penalties to another individual competing in an unrelated sport, particularly for use of the same substance. Earlier this year Herman and Bourke (2016) reported that the International Tennis Federation had issued Maria Sharapova a two-year ban for testing positive for the substance known as meldonium. "
1 "empirically demonstrated that they" "...the government always remains partnership working in social and health care sector. In spite of hard work from both the sides the partnership has not empirically demonstrated that they produce good results for users. This is because they produce nothing but harassment. After examining an overview of the different ways in which the p..."
0 "mucus that is secreted" "...hese cancers start in early versions of the cells that would normally secrete substances such as mucus. (“Key statistics for lung cancer,” 2016). The mucus that is secreted through glands can be found throughout the body as it starts off in the cells then eventually in the lining of the lungs, which overall causes the mu..."
1 "are concerned that individuals" "...his morning, the Court bearing has been delayed. These individuals arrested over 24 hours ago and remain in custody in the City and Country jails. We are concerned that individuals’ First Amendment rights are being chilled, and we are prepared to file writs to have individuals released who are being illegally held in jail.” Refe..."
0 "kawa that is upheld" "...or what the individual, but also for the need as an iwi to keep these practices alive in today’s society. “It’s a way of life, it’s a tikanga, it’s a kawa that is upheld by all iwi.” This quote is relevant when it comes to both kaikaranga and kaikorero, as they are both ancient teachings passed on through generation t..."
0 ". that is if" "... of those things people still mess up. It's hard. Words and phrases that sound fine in your head can suddenly look like gibberish when written down ... that is if you've evein realised you made a mistake in the first place.  It's easy for little grammar mistakes to slip by -- especially whien you're self-editin..."
1 "had wished that she" "...k step forward, the gravity felt a lot stronger on this ship. She remained silent, her throat now thrashed from her outburst of desperation. Then she had wished that she had died in the pod, like the other unlucky soul in the darkened pod. She didn’t know what awaited her beyond this chamber, and didn’t want to find o..."
1 "also means that there" "...ears.   Observation: As more 3rd party sourcing firms provide names and information on people, there is less of a chance for people to be hidden, but also means that there is a lot of noise. The best way to reduce noise is to change the room you are looking in and focus on small pickings. Is there another way to provide..."
1 "must ensure that the" "...uld be harder to fabricate. As we begin to draw the drawing, we met with many difficulties such as drafting the lines plane over to the Styrofoam. We must ensure that the lines are asymmetry to each other and must be very meticulous when tracing. Done with the drawing of the ship structure we continue with the cutting ..."
0 ") stated that he" "...ed “Germany’s Housing Finance System: How to Acquire Your Own Home in Thailand.” At the seminar, Finance  Minister Wisut Srisuphan (วิสุทธิ์ ศรีสุพรรณ) stated that he wishes to see Germany’s ‘bausparkassen’ savings system applied to Thailand to foster saving habits among Thai citizens and reduce non-performing loan..."
1 "consultation shows that either" "...ournalists can’t be bothered to make the effort to analyse the data, instead preferring to make local authorities do it through FOI requests.     The consultation shows that either Ministers, civil servants or indeed both, don’t understand how councils work in practice. That most transparency data is already published through Ke..."
1 "should ensure that their" "...t people who decline to participate in a study or who withdraw from it at a later stage. (Polit & Beck, 2010)  3.c) The right to Privacy  Researchers should ensure that their research is not more intrusive than it needs to be and participants' privacy is maintained throughout the study. Participants have the right to expec..."
0 "information that is asked" "...rdbrobe at one of the locations. Definitely made us question who used the place before us!    How about television projects? (Please include the same information that is asked for above☺) I played the role of Johnny in the pilot “Color Me Grey”. I was also one of the producers of the project and took it to the AFM in 2015 t..."
1 "guardianship that was Notarized" "... until. I was situated With a home and job. Her  daughter Sarah Taylor Rios, paid the airline  ticket  to get Jadan my son there.  I made a temporary guardianship that was Notarized by myself and Gladys Riios. I had it faxed to her with my signature and had her sign it and fax it back. So, that we were both on the same page and u..."
1 "be disappointed that he" "...usband.  It wasn’t that she didn’t want it to happen, it was the nervousness that Brandon would finally see her and that she was so terrified he will be disappointed that he is married this big fat cow. She turned to look at herself in the mirror, turning so that she could see her body and what Brandon would be seeing in ..."
0 "to notice that we" "... best interest. We can go and refuse Sean’s help and have Sang mad at us for quite a while, or we can stay here and figure out how to get the Academy to notice that we have Akuma right under our noses,” Kota pointed out.  ‘Are they serious having a family meeting, know that I’m not present? I get it, the family is b..."
1 "time that is generally" "...ical ambiguity in a noun is the following: \"Steals clocks; faces time\". In this case, the lexical ambiguity is found in the word time. The meaning of time that is generally known for those who start learning English it's of an indefinite period. But in this case that meaning wouldn't be suitable for what is expressed in ..."
1 "and insisted that its" "...tates of the federation did not pass consequential value added tax legislation at the state level.  The Yap State Legislature withheld their approval and insisted that its state constitution prohibited any entity other that the Yap State Government and local municipal governments from collecting any taxes in Yap, which ..."
1 "to say that obesity" "...alth problem excess body fat described as being dangerous for our health. Obesity is known cause of chronic health condition (Sturm,2002). it is hard to say that obesity and health problem are linked together because some thin people are unhealthy as well. However, most of the studies shows that generally obese people..."
1 "(foreshadows that Jerry" "...een acting like a zombie ever since his Jerry’s mother passed away. His days were nothing great, nothing awful. His dad starts this repetition Jerry. (foreshadows that Jerry will soon show strength and passion)     -The destruction of room 19 went more perfect than anyone could have predicted. Everything fell apart within..."
1 "question that was undertaken" "    Abstract    The research question that was undertaken was “How Society creates Subcultures through Practices rather than through the Legalisation Process?”  This question has been shaped around the anthr..."
1 "had heard that Gypsies" ".... Since she didn’t do what Santiago was paying her for, he was doubtful into believing that she was a real fortune teller. He was hesitant because he had heard that Gypsies deceive many people into getting something in return.  6. \tThe story that the King tells Santiago was meant to motivate him to stay in contact with h..."
1 "fully realized that during" "...ed blaming something else and noticing that he was the one that should have been blammed. After this coincidence the Spirit Bear returns, Cole hasn't fully realized that during this situation he can make a bad choice or a good choice.   Cole flings a wade of spit at the Spirit Bear with all his strength, it misses and lands ..."
1 "to ensure that it" "...ement choose which ever procedural rules they are comfortable with, can also be their own rules. An arbitration agreement should be drafted carefully to ensure that it will be recognised and enforced without difficulties by the courts at the place of the arbitration. Arbitration awards are easily enforced across nat..."
1 "AM stated that he" "...hen mentioned that the company had DJ in for welfare meetings and enquired how he felt they went. DJ said that they were great and really helped him. AM stated that he was really happy that DJ found these meetings beneficial. DJ then mentioned that his doctor prescribed him stronger tablets of 100 grammes and he fel..."
0 "but assumed that life-prolonging" "...end of life treatments, expectations, decision-making and timing of the provision of palliative care approach. Many considered comfort was paramount, but assumed that life-prolonging interventions should be provided until the very end.  Participant's understanding of dementia was an important determinant factor in their attitudes ..."
0 "year is that I" "...o you want to be an actor? Jason: My personal strengths are as a director and producer. I like telling stories. The reason I came to Dubai early this year is that I’m looking for locations to film a documentary about environmental conservation efforts in the UAE. Hameed: A documentary? So, I suppose you won’t nee..."
1 ") suggested that observations" "...thcare professionals do and how they interact will be revealed as well as expression of feelings. Authors such as Al-Busaidi (2008) and Creswell (2012) suggested that observations will determine who interacts with whom, reveal how participants communicate with each other, and determine how much time is spent during healthcare a..."
1 "actually say that the" "... who always are that honest don’t receive a reputation for being kind. They get a reputation for being rude and mean. With further insight, one could actually say that the nicest people tell the most lies. Not only do lies help you become more delightful to be around, they also can help you in the event of a perilous en..."
1 "I realized that I" "...am prepared for this part, the prodding, the cleansing, the inappropriate questions about my sexual life and hygiene . I had embraced this part after I realized that I was not going to be killed. They’ll erase me completely, so be it, at least I furthered the cause. I would do it all over again with even more fanfar..."
0 "pitch that is a" "...nt uses a pitch that is a fifth above the melody, you may use the pitch that corresponds to a third above the melody note. If the counterpoint uses a pitch that is a sixth above the melody, you may use the pitches that correspond to a third or fourth above the melody note. All Levels: Editing the Composition Once ..."
1 "been observed that some" "... aside in the country of its origin. Article V (1) (e) makes provision for the enforcement of an award that has been set aside, In recent time it has been observed that some of the provision of the NYC is not updated with the new trends of the international commerce in regards to the development of the modern e-commerce a..."
"crime that is putting" "...lympics, there should be more working to catch criminals on that night. It is a dangerous task, but it’ll pay off in the end if we put an end to some crime that is putting fear in our hearts." 1
1 "to say that my" "...tructional program conducive to student learning and staff professional growth.” As I have taken on more leadership and managerial duties, I am proud to say that my top focus is on my classroom instruction and^the learning of my students. Of course, additional leadership responsibilities, especially those related..."
1 "bond that was brimming" "...onnection that neither of us had experienced before.  What we had was a pure raw chemistry that fused an emotional, sexual, creative and intellectual bond that was brimming to conceive the first prose together.   We embraced without fault, allowed love to flow openly, two people that believed in each other. Something pow..."
1 "technology proves that the" "...state that Equality 7-2521 has committed many transgressions by creating this box, and immediately refuse his invention. In the story, the absence of technology proves that the society is one in which many would not want to live. Another critical aspect of the society is the social relationships between citizens. In Anthem, ..."
0 "to understand that these" "...y view it as positive while the other as negative depending on their means of interpreting it through their social lens.  It is vital for our society to understand that these differences exist.  The same thing can be said when applied to literacy.  Based on our socialization background with reading and writing we approach ..."
1 "would understand that I" "... you feel like you were important to me. I thought that I had done what you asked me to do. I thought that having done what you asked me to, that you would understand that I was always on my phone.    When you started saying things like there has to be someone that you are talking too on that phone, that has to be why you..."
1 "It shows that anything" "...ant because it helps us remembered that growing up is a walk in the park. It shows us that growing up is not easy and is an emotional roller coaster. It shows that anything can happen while growing up even if it's good or bad. We can never be prepared for growing up or prevent growing up. Growing up is one of the hardest..."
1 "to ensure that you" "...rst stage of learning to develop your internal ear is to listen to a piece and become familiar with it. Follow the steps provided, and take your time to ensure that you have completely mastered each step before moving on to the next one. There is no reason to rush through this as you are only competing with yourself...."
1 "and ensure that they" "...rtant to review them from time to time (new tasks/employees): seasonal problems differ. Involve your employees in developing safer methods of working and ensure that they are adequately supervised.    RFU HS-P-022 Manual Handling Policy     Further reading:     INDG143 (rev2) Getting to grips with manual handling – a s..."
0 "it stated that if" "...ons. These factors were more related to the context, or environment of work than its content (Cole, 2003, pp. 37-38). This theory was chosen because, it stated that if the factor “advancement” was met, then the employee is considered as satisfied with their work. If the employee was given cross-cultural training, an..."
1 ") suggested that they" "...arch works of Adimora and Odetunde (2007), Afolabi et al. (2012). Although, majority of these occur within the first week of life, Bhutta et al. (2014) suggested that they occur mainly due to complications during pregnancy and delivery reflecting the intimate link between new born survival and the quality of maternal ca..."
0 ", that is required" "...mited to any research discipline or methodology, but provide any method, regardless of whether it is primary or secondary, qualitative or quantitative, that is required by your information requirements. Recommendations are realistic and plans are workable, based on your needs and resources. Relationships with clients..."
1 "Many believe that empowerment" "...s out the responsibility shared by the leader therefore.Its important to have hierarchical decision-making process for creating a positive workplace. Many believe that empowerment really exist only when there is level IV authority .Conflict appear when there is a misconception that Level I and level II are less important and po..."
0 "to ascertain that I" "... to run on a daily basis to ensure that I understand the information that he is discussing in class. It falls on me to ask questions of my instructor to ascertain that I am on the correct path to being knowledgeable of the topic being taught. I have to be able accept criticism he has for my assignment and I must be wi..."
1 "Experts say that this" "... A recent pledge to ISIS from extremists in Brazil seems to be either a real proposed threat or a fake attempt to scare everyone before the Olympics. Experts say that this is most likely fake because a small number of the residents of Brazil are Muslims and even smaller number that are Islamic Extremists. There also hav..."
0 "show that it’" "...ries to redeem himself by saving someone.  Act 4 #7 It is important for the court to get one of the “respectable citizens” to confess because it will show that it’s worth being in the wrong to live. If this were to not happen as it did, it shows their resilience and strength against the court as they are proving..."
1 "learned is that one" "...ern continues on and on and on I won't be the smartest person in the world no one ever is because there's always new things to learn, but what I have learned is that one can ever be little me unless I let them. I had to learn on my own no matter how much support I had no one tell me that something is wrong with me and..."
1 "story is that you" "...you think the theme(s) of this story is/are? Give reasons for your answers. Cite evidence and page number(s).  \tAnswer) I think that the theme of the story is that you should never give up. I think this because Ryder had so many chances to give up on finding his dad to save his mom. But he did not give up on trying ..."
1 "to ensure that no" "...ight is far from straightforward. Witman (2005)suggested that participants should be asked to select the pseudonym to be used in the final writing up to ensure that no individual is identified .   The rich data generated from the research will be coded, to ensure that anonymity of the participants in the research is..."
0 "only upset that their" "...sfaction to the authorities responsible for maintaining law and order in India” (DIB 2 April 1936, Ibid.). The leadership of the Ghadar Party was not only upset that their recruits’ revolutionary careers were undermined, but the Comintern officials grew impatient with the inability of such recruits to contribute to the ..."
0 "twists that is new" "...y is a gang roleplay inspired and based off the book and musical, Wicked by Gregory Maguire, as well as The Wizard of Oz by L. Frank Baum, with a few twists that is new to the tags. We will be opening with 24 characters and 6 open slots for original characters to join in. Our talk tag can be found here and below you ..."
0 "I support that euthanasia" "... deny its existence. When we face with death, euthanasia is a way to respect the right to life. Thus, under the assumption of perfectly legal system, I support that euthanasia should be legalized. Nowadays, euthanasia is not legal in Taiwan. If it can be legalized in the future, law and the government must take responsibili..."
1 "diaper pants that she" "...s with undressing me and she starts with taking off my t-shirt.  Carrie: I begin with opening the buttons on her red diaper pants and I pull down the diaper pants that she is wearing and takes off her diaper pants. Now I notice the foul odor is getting stronger and I make myself ready to pull down the diaper cover that ..."
1 "and believe that they" "...ion. In Selwyn’s article the research undertaken found that eighty percent of students surveyed openly admitted to moderate internet based plagiarism and believe that they were less likely to be caught due to internet anonymity. (Selwyn 2008, p. 465). Similarly, the article by Volkov (2011, p. 23), discovered that stude..."
1 "feedback determined that Stanford" "...ion it therefore took 47.2 seconds for users to find the page. The about page for Stanford University took an average of 61.8 seconds to find.   User feedback determined that Stanford University was easy to navigate with users experiencing some hard scenarios, one user stated “ Relatively easy to find most important information … P..."
1 ") explains that it" "...omesticated animal can be overwhelming with joy and overtime it has the potential to lower cholesterol and blood pressure.  Mc Nicholas & Collis (2000) explains that it is necessary in order to look at how pets have a positive impact on an individuals health and well-being.  It strengthens social networks and provisi..."
0 "Jongin registers that he" "...t.   ↠↠↠  Blearily, Jongin awoke and sat for a while, waiting for his line of vision to clear. Rubbing at his eyes, the tanned boy slides out of bed. Jongin registers that he’s most likely last to wake due to the fact that Jongdae isn’t in his bed."
0 "I appreciate that you" "...ager takes a long, agitating sip of his drink before replying. “Oh Sehun.”  Sehun informs him.  Junmyeon scribbles down Sehun’s name in his notepad, “I appreciate that you trusted me enough to give your name, your total for today will be 10,510 won Sehun.” Sehun shrugs to himself before placing a surprisingly accurate a..."
0 "to fulfill that knowledge" "... admission:  Option 1: The Greek inscription above the gates of Porter’s Lodge translates to “Know Thyself”. It serves as the mission of each student to fulfill that knowledge at the end of their academic career at the College. Where do you see yourself on Commencement day when you pass through the same gates? \t I was not a..."
0 "to bet that if" "...essons might be affordable, but that doesn’t mean I’m going to go easy on you. If you want results, you need to stick to the assignments. I’m willing to bet that if you’re writing music, you’re using some form of notation program to help you. There is no single, great classical composer living today, or ever, tha..."
1 "conclusions that were drawn" "...s parts of the world.  The research was then applied to the case study of marijuana and how the legalization of the drug has impacted society.    The conclusions that were drawn from the investigation are that firstly, the criminalization of a drug does not reduce the rate of crime within a specific region or area; secondly t..."
1 "conclusion that it was" "...at I was not asking my dad 1 million and one questions about this new dude showed how bad my pain was.  After checking out my foot my dad came to the conclusion that it was not broken, just badly bruised. For all the pain I got it, it should have been broken by my standards. My dad picks up all of my scattered underwear ..."
0 "pool that was 9" "...g the bay window 10 centimeters narrower than specified. In Ruxley Electronics & Construction Ltd v Forsyth (1995) the builder constructed a swimming pool that was 9 inches shallower than specified. The only way to rectify the problem would be to rebuild the pool. The court found it would be unreasonable to expect..."
0 "to tell that to" "...st grant all wishes at all costs. And killing that man was the cost.”, said the monkey.  The boy now thought the monkey was insane, but he was afraid to tell that to the monkey. He didn’t want the magic monkey anymore. He wanted the monkey to leave and never come back. But, the monkey loved the boy. If the boy tol..."
1 "knee that was being" "...reflected. I then brought out sandpaper and lightly grazed his arm that was being reflected. I then brought out a small hammer and lightly tapped his knee that was being reflected.  Results: After the test subject’s halves had synced stimulation, the following results had happened: When the test subject got smacked in..."
1 "the best that I" "...ents. I would like to give a better understanding of my style by writing a short piece. This is completely off the top of my head, so it might not be the best that I can do.   \tRobby didn’t particularly like the older boys talking about his height. He was a scrawny dwarf of a boy, and he would do everything in his..."
1 "you had that information" "...se, fearing for her safety. “I’m sorry I do not have more information to share.  People really didn’t know a lot about her.” “I understand.  I’m glad you had that information to share.”  Sara replied with a slight smile. “Well, if there are no other questions are you ready to go see the manor?” he asked, changing the subje..."
1 "Nazareth reinforces that thinking" "..., little woodworking was done in that part of the world. It is much more likely that Joseph was some sort of a stone mason. The decision to settle in Nazareth reinforces that thinking as it was close to a major source of work for skilled laborers like Joseph. Nazareth was one of a handful of towns that housed people working on the ..."
"internet that is saturated" "...ves website traffic in the great race to capture audiences attention. Video is rapidly becoming the new normal for marketers, translating to a future internet that is saturated with video content" 1
1 "letter that was given" "...tterson’s character so far, I believe he is going to search for Hyde and not stop looking until he finds him. I feel as if whatever is written in the letter that was given to Utterson by Jekyll is going to^only drive Utterson to find Hyde more. At this point I also believe that Jekyll is going to die at some point. He i..."
1 "can testify that I" "...stify that she would like to live with me and visit her dad.  She can testify that changing every week was very unsettling and stressful for her. She can testify that I take her to almost all of her activities and appointments and take care of all things involving school and education.  I make all decisions regarding..."
0 "fervently believe that such" "... humbly pray that you see fit to recommend to His Majesty that a reprieve be granted in favour of one Udham Singh, otherwise known as Azad Singh...We fervently believe that such act of mercy, in sparing the life of the aforesaid Udham SIngh, will strengthen the bonds of union between the British and INdian peoples (Petition f..."
0 "she said that although" "...as afraid to kill. She was afraid to give in to the war life. Just like me, she was afraid to murder, but it had to be done in order to survive. Then she said that although she was afraid and refused to use violence as a weapon in the beginning, she had to stay alive for her family, especially for her mother. She didn’t ..."
1 "organizations report that they" "...he year. In order to mitigate the impact of role of lack of infrastructure as a cause of criminality, product documentation was strengthened and some organizations report that they agreed to use simple smart mobile technology such Onenote to synchronize information for security and also on products status and availability within..."
1 "guess is that this" "... Association (EFTA).  The response from BoE on lowering of interest rates and quantitative easing is an example of feedback effect in the economy. My guess is that this feedback effect will help UK get a good deal with EU and its member countries apart from the other attractive partnerships with the world. Internally..."
1 "letter says that Lydia" "...do something that stupid. I only wish that Elizabeth had told the family the truth about Mr. Wickham, and then this may have not happened. The second letter says that Lydia and Mr. Wickh                       In Chapter 47 and 48                        In Chapter 56                        In Chapters 59, 60 and 61       ..."
0 "platform that is difficult" "... is new functionality implemented? Who codes? What do end user workflows look like? What is the scope of the data? What do users really want from the platform that is difficult to deliver at this point? Customization for clients? Ability of clients to customize? Demo  Illumon Iris  Can be thought of as a simple analytical pr..."
0 "disadvantage is that you" "...ond family has a dog. I don’t have a pet. I think one advantage of having a dog is that I can become healthier by taking a walk with it. However, the disadvantage is that you have to be very responsible to take good care of the pet.   Q3. Is the size of your family similar to the size of the first family or the second fami..."
1 "this is that I" "... overload for you and causes you to get overwhelmed which takes the enjoyment out of learning and slows you down even more.   So the reason I'm doing this is that I see I'm needed in this Industry, for people who want to become successful at this but don't have over $1,000 to spend or the time to wait, and for th..."
0 "one that is relatively" "...risk-weighted consequences of various options.  Part II – Analysis of GMOs  The Natural Environment and the issue of GMOs  The natural environment is one that is relatively unchanged or undisturbed by human culture. The term ‘natural’ encompasses all things that are not artificial or manufactured by humans. Man-made tech..."
1 "litigation creeps that rarely" "... consuming problem for academics and administration (Selwyn, 2008, p. 466). Tertiary institutions were labelled in Gorman’s article (2008, p. 298) as litigation creeps that rarely imposed penalties on students and while plagiarism is a variable offence it should still always be prosecuted with consistency. Tertiary institutions..."
0 "explains that" "...o represent an individual’s current status, with the statement that it is of being in positive reflection (Schimmack, 2009).  Bourke &Geldens (2007), explains that wellness is a personal based belief where the individual’s feel that quality and satisfaction are obtained in their life.  It is the different interp..."
1 "I confirmed that nobody" "...y bunk. I leaped down as quietly as I could. I snuck over to the lower part of the east dormitories. I turn my head to see if Darren had awoken, when I confirmed that nobody was awake I went over to what I thought was Darren’s bunk. “Darren, wakey wakey.” I said in a childish tone. Darren groaned as he opened his eyes. “ ..."
1 "Party agrees that it" "...e Confidential Information of the Disclosing Party and which may be provided to said Party hereunder.  Maintenance of Confidentiality.  The Receiving Party agrees that it shall take such measures as are reasonable under the circumstances to protect the secrecy of and to avoid the disclosure and unauthorized use of the ..."
1 "we realized that Salwa" "...ur best to ask questions that explored the family concerns to get a broader view of the problem they were facing. As we were interviewing the family, we realized that Salwa’s issue was not the immunization process rather the exhaustion she was going through as a single mother caring for her children after the death of he..."
0 "result found that the" "...amine the relationship between Foreign Gross Domestic Product and Malaysia stock market and employed monthly period from January 2000-June 2012 ,They result found that the GDP  have no significant effect  on stock market.  Hunjra, et, al (2014) used Co-integration  and Granger Causality to examine the effect of GDP on P..."
1 "or reasons that the" "...e way and manner in which the Lord said do it. 3. We must do what the Lord said do, in the way and manner in which the Lord said do it for the reason or reasons that the Lord said do it.                                                                  G. Woods       JESUS   THE GREAT PHYSICIAN John 5:1-9 PHYSICIANS WR..."
1 "I hope that the" "...actly who I am as a person. Taking this course im very excited and can’t wait to learn new things about the english language and widen my vocabulary. I hope that the goals I’ve set out for my junior year will be fulfilled at the end of this school year. All in general i'm very pleased to be apart of this program a..."
0 "often means that no" "...common for only the families who seek out the study participate. Adoption study samples are largely convenience samples with small sample sizes. This often means that no firm conclusions about the generalizability of a study can be drawn. There also seems to be a lack of longitudinal studies due to small samples sizes..."
0 "language that is friendly" "...vey questions so that Gold Star would be able to gain any real insight into the feedback. When developing the survey questions it is important to use language that is friendly and invites objective answers as a good survey should not seek the best or most correct answers (Brace, 2004). A survey for a restaurant customer sho..."
1 "model that was used" "...and manner I Indulged myself on all the evening sporting activities, I started with. They called me J5. J5 was a Peugeot Mini bus (18 seater) vehicle model that was used for  commercial transportation (passengers and sometimes goods) at the time. May be it was because I could run and play football well. At least bette..."
1 "stage suggested that the" "...anded down a judgment holding that three individuals, ‘P’, ‘MIG’ and ‘MEG,’ were deprived of their liberty in three different settings ,no one at any stage suggested that the arrangements for either P, MIG and MEG were not in their best interests. The question was solely whether the arrangements amounted to a deprivation o..."
1 "evaluation processes that I" "...cument it and then assess it for learning. In this essay I will revisit one of my planned learning experiences with an emphasis on the assessment and evaluation processes that I have observed and documented the social interactions and the learning activities of small groups of children during our daily encounters within our s..."
0 ") suggest that it" "... both the supplier and the purchaser to make decisions about how much of the good to supply and how much of the good to purchase. Layton, et al. (2012) suggest that it’s the common relative of the value of goods and services and that without dollars and cents there’s no common denominator, thus suggesting that crypt..."
1 "homework that is given" "...tudents may need to use the drug for long periods of time, which may cause greater memory loss in all areas of memory. How classes are taught and the homework that is given may need to be altered for each student.  "
1 "Please remember that we" "...he meeting.   If your student receives any related services, check with the provider and list them on the services form with frequency and duration.  Please remember that we need time to process these services before the meeting.  Please remind the general education teacher of the date and time of their students’ meeting...."
0 "believed that" "...hey named as DRD4. According to them, the gene is responsible for various activities in the in the human’s brain dopamine receptors. They; therefore, believed that this gene is responsible for making an individual happy or sad, depending on the situation that a person faces. Many experiments have been performed ..."
1 "would appear that Alice" "...any would be a step in the right direction in order to correct departmental deficiencies and enhance company moral.  After reading the case study, it would appear that Alice Thornton has been given a very difficult task to accomplish. Each department in Cosmo Plastics expressed some form of discontent about how the compan..."
0 "But that was reckless" "...You kids got lucky this time only because Draco had enough forsight to research what we did to help you, and he applied what he knew to help Weasley. But that was reckless, even for you. With the blocks on your magic weakening and breaking, you are stronger than you've ever been. A little more force applied to the bindi..."
0 "take kids that you" "...He knew he wouldn’t be coming back. He knew he would be able to save his sister. If he doesn’t see her, August 31, 2016 he will freak. “Do you always take kids that you have kidnapped back to where you kidnapped them?” he asked Ernest. The poor man had to drive all the way to Weston, Minnesota by himself because the ..."
1 "and tells that she" "...hen she puts a small piece of agar agar to her mouth, she licks on the it. She has repeats this a few times. Then she passes to the observer the bowl and tells that she does not want the dessert. Teacher Rachelle tells her to place the bowl and spoon to the bucket for washing. Then Mdm Lan passes Pelin a piece of app..."
0 "to ensure that any" "... who assist us in operating our website and conducting our business including but not limited to the individual tutors.  We take all reasonable steps to ensure that any third party contractors are bound to keep your information confidential. We can also release your information when we believe release is appropriate ..."
1 "and says that his" "... continues to go on about Lanyon, but Utterson ignores the comments and urges onto the subject of Mr. Hyde. Jekyll grows pale at the mention of Hyde, and says that his relationship with Hyde is strange. After Utterson tells Jekyll that he could help get rid of the strange relationship, Jekyll thanks Utterson and tel..."
1 "Lily realized that there" "...om Neil, Lily learned to never give up on what someone believes in, because eventually they will finally get the result they want. From Clayton Wood, Lily realized that there are still good white adults out there who will treat blacks nicely, and that not all white adults are bad people. Throughout books especially this bo..."
1 "you are that your" "... to have no social life.”  “For two days?” Tyler snorted. “Sounds like the end of the world.”  Frankie flipped him off. “You lot don’t know how lucky you are that your mum’s aren’t annoying like mine.”  “Yeah, so lucky that she lives thousands of miles away,” Yasmin mumbled, filling the wine glasses up.  “You know w..."
0 "principle recognises that an" "...olution to this issue is found in the precautionary principle, which has become an established feature of our law and is part of the ESD package. The principle recognises that an ‘absolutist view of the precautionary principle is untenable’ and that the only way to meet the interests of different publics is to embrace a more r..."
0 "’s that NiNI" "...ginnie, you need to head to class. We’ll meet at lunch okay? Everyone eats together.” He sighs when Junmyeon’s small frame disappears from sight. “Who’s that NiNI?” Jongin nearly jumps five feet in the air at the sound of Zitao’s voice. Whipping his head around, he’s face-to-face with Sehun and Tao leering at h..."
1 "We trust that this" "...e or convert the current service to a to a greater extent efficient one for the seniors. c. Contribution selective information with the community. 5. We trust that this needs assessment will start a major modification in the community and become the beginning of a plan that will secure that senior citizens have the m..."
1 "I think that Elizabeth" "... I believe Mr. Darcy may be hiding something, but I do not understand why he could not just tell Elizabeth, since it seems like he likes her so much. I think that Elizabeth, deep down, likes Mr. Dar                        In Chapter 24 and 25                        In Chapter 26                        In Chapter 27 and 2..."
0 "student demonstrate that s" "...The student does not respond to all questions, or may respond in a cursory manner to questions. B. How reflective is the student’s response? Does the student demonstrate that s/he is open, willing to consider different perspectives, and has made connections between the article and him or herself? The student really appears t..."
1 "who believed that I" "... in LSI  determine my personality.  . The humanistic encouraging style  on the circumflex 1 o’clock  position my high scores describes me as a person who believed that I can help people improve and enjoy guiding and supporting the efforts by using skills like listening and demonstrating genuine concern for others and ..."
1 "Windows decided that Apple" ".... In 1976, Steve Jobs made a Computer. He didn’t fail. In 1983, Apple made a personal computer! You could take it home! Wow! A couple of years later, Windows decided that Apple couldn’t have all the fun and announced that Windows was out and that it was better than Apple. In 1999, Wi-Fi became popular. It was use in computer..."
1 "criticisms indicate that while" "...es appears lack of consensus about its classifications and that some of the models used in deploying benchmarking had significant shortcomings. These criticisms indicate that while benchmarking is acknowledged to be a useful technique, there are still doubts about how and why it is deployed. There is need therefore for a study t..."
0 "lumbar bulge that it" "...al., 2010). Idiopathic scoliosis rarely causes pain in children and adolescents and often comes to attention only because of the hunched rib cage and lumbar bulge that it causes, or because of asymmetry of the shoulders, chest, or pelvis (Trobisch et al., 2010). During a clinical evaluation for idiopathic scoliosis, th..."
1 "country that is right" "...ings that I learned from this book that I was surprised with, there were also many that I did know about. Two summers ago I traveled to Laos. It is a country that is right next to Vietnam. While I was there I learned about the Secret War in Laos. When the Vietnam War was happening and our country was dropping bombs, if ..."
1 "Santiago is that the" "...s, everyone has a unique and distinct one, but each one deserves the same care and responsibility. The thing that separates the crystal merchant from Santiago is that the merchant wants to continue to dream about visiting Mecca, but never work to actually go there. He believes that if he visits Mecca, his dreams will c..."
1 "I hope that he" "... is very polite and civil during their encounter. He then joins them on the rest of their walk. I think it is nice to see this side of Mr. Darcy, and I hope that he will keep this attitude                        In Chapter 46                        In Chapter 47 and 48                        In Chapter 56        ..."
1 "I fear that you" "...r ambitions, you feel unfulfilled in your life \t- I fear that you don't know your worth, you don't know your value, you don't know your uniqueness \t- I fear that you have unresolved emotional pains that made you think that way. It's a bullshit story you tell yourself.  \t3 - Expectations: Write down your expectatio..."
1 "provisional assent that the" "...l. Ideally, in a controlled experiment, we would like to be 95 to 99 percent confident that the results were not caused by chance before we offer our provisional assent that the effect may be real. Failure to reject the null hypothesis does not make the claim false, and, conversely, rejecting the null hypothesis is not a warr..."
1 "can argue that Google" "...take full advantage of Google’s systems.  Google Drive. Google drive is the core of our paperless system. I have a strong technical background, and I can argue that Google drive is the most robust cloud drive out there.  Many web programmers have built small pieces of software that integrate with google drive.  For exam..."
0 "duties that was not" "... job done” to the best of their abilities.  Within that 2nd week, I started displaying those same work ethics by always volunteering to help with job duties that was not generally asked of me.  I was then asked by my Acting Supervisor to provide secretarial office coverage for another office within my agency which is ..."
1 "I think that the" "...hey can not afford the 200,000 dollar price tag to keep his mom alive. And that is the thing that I think affects the important part of the story    \tI think that the theme of the story is you should never give up. I think this because Ryder had so many chances to give up on finding his dad to save his mom. But he ..."
1 "idea that is being" "... other hand, the common assignment essay is more focused on other things. For example, common essays can persuade the readers to react to an issue or idea that is being exposed. They can also inform, propose, review, etc. There are more varieties of common writing essays than rhetoric essays. Furthermore, multimodal ..."
1 "had happened that I" "...alking about now, and I had wanted to keep that to myself. I did not want her soiling my good thoughts.   That was when I realized the one thing that had happened that I never imagined, I had become a jealous, raving bitch! That was not me, but when it came to Mikael, I wanted him to myself. I wanted to keep him my se..."
1 "however insisted that the" "...Government to collect the new tax and then forward it to the national government, to avoid breaching the state constitution.  The Mori administration however insisted that the United Revenue Authority conduct all tax collection.  In a further bid by the FSM congress to reach consensus, the sunset clause was further extended..."
0 "instincts that were heightening" "...I knew he was pregnant you know.” It felt like a ton of steel had dropped in Sasuke’s gut. “I asked the doctor about it. He said it was my protective instincts that were heightening. Babies are such troublesome small things you know. Kiba’s powers increased too.” “They did?” “Yea. Not just his claws come out anymore. He can shift..."
0 "Janelle mused that it" "...pping him across the face as hard as she could manage. He squawked indignantly in response, releasing her and jolting away. He clutched his face, and Janelle mused that it was a pity that the crowd had already dispersed. It would have been a nice lesson in humility for the dragonborn male. all the same, his look of utte..."
1 "detail that it could" "...importance of first understanding the scope of the project for which we are developing a solution, while also esuring not to overdocument in too much detail that it could paralyse the project through overly detailed analysis of requirements.  Develop Iteratively Develepment of the project will be completed in itteratio..."
1 "I believe that God" "...millions of people around the world.It is a strange topic with so many views,opinions,and debates.When it comes to god the possibilities are endless. I believe that God exist and he called us to live together in peace,in unity,and in love. The Bible itself is proof of God’s existence because He used 40 different peop..."
1 "we decided that the" "... the fastest will get an apple,while the rest will have to find anoherway to survive,this is the situation we will put future generations in ,because we decided that the lives of bees were more important than ours and decided to stop the use of neonictinoids(nenics) .Neonics are new agricultural pesticide derived from..."
1 "lesson  is that you" "... the cards and ask the pairs the same question that is on the card. 4 minutes The reason why you make  productive skill a stage in a receptive skills lesson  is that you are  building and developing fluency and confidence of the students in practicing the\tnewly learnt material (Scrivener 149:435).   See Appendix 5    ..."
1 "study concluded that there" "...er the intensity and duration of those advertisements resulted in a reduction in the numbers of teenager that might take up the habit of smoking; the study concluded that there has been a reduction in the prevalence of adolescent smoking (V. M. White, Durkin, Coomber, & Wakefield, 2015). However, the research did not examine..."
1 "as evidence that there" "...cealment is a justification for the low number of studies conducted. Similarly, the low number of cases taken to court is interpreted as impunity-not as evidence that there is not much trafficking happening. According to Castilho (2015), Brazilian data from 2005 to 2011, the Federal Police conducted 514 trafficking-relat..."
"because that is false" "...e with things like poverty in the United States. You say that it does than what makes equal rights so important, are blacks killed by police more. No because that is false, whites are killed more often" 0
1 ", that was almost" "...a became. The southern colonies was the ideal setting for growing crops because of the climate and long growing season. Tobacco and the growing season, that was almost double that of New England, were what brought^the slaves to the southern colonies.  The large tobacco plantations increased the demand for labor, whi..."
1 "and that was there" "... when they have there serenity day firework go off which is like the Fourth of July here. They figured out that one plastics work car had a satellite and that was there way out           \t\t            Works Cited Korman, Gordon. Masterminds. Place of Publication Not Identified: HarperCollins Limited, 2015. Print."
1 "and that is why" "...r and some guest, and asks if Elizabeth would like to meet her, to which Elizabeth says yes. I think that he wants his sisters’ opinion of Elizabeth, and that is why he wants                        In Chapter 46                        In Chapter 47 and 48                        In Chapter 56                       ..." 0
0 "everyone that is not" "...violations, please contact your property manager.         In addition please know that no one is being singled out, we are sending warning letters to everyone that is not compliant. This is something that Riverstone is enforcing across the board at all of our communities. Cleaning the community up, helps the values of ..."
0 "or register that the" "...ries in records and registers”, (2) “A person who is required by this Regulation to keep any record or register must not make any entry in the record or register that the person knows to be false or misleading in a material particular” (NSW Legislation. 2008, p.72).   Reflective Furthermore, from my observations seemed..."
1 "to say that it" "...eing self conceited, it didn’t get a jubilant ending. Coelho believes that we deem ourselves to be more important than anything else and he is trying to say that it should be the other way around.  2. \tI believe that Santiago, the protagonist in the novel, observes his sheep to live meaningless lives. For instanc..."
1 "We believe that if" "...supervisor to develop plans for improvement.   Training And Development We have a strong commitment to personal and professional growth at Hunter's.  We believe that if we are not going forward we are falling behind. Every new employee in our company goes through a training process for their specific job role. As men..."
0 "thought that was kind" "...rs in past lives constricted us both. Delimited by an embittered environment that believed in mediocrity and thrived on the negative. Until we met, I thought that was kind of life you had to settle for. Nothing more, nothing less, but an everyday idea that boredom begets the kind of longing that never was satisfied.   I..."
1 "helps ensure that customers" "...de to put a facility at a specific location in order to expedite delivery. An added benefit to this is being close to customers. “Such proximity also helps ensure that customers needs are incorporated into the products being developed and built” (Jacobs & Chase, 2011).  An primary example of establishing facilities that are c..."
1 "I feel that math" "...hing gaming Youtube videos which drives me to make my own one day. I really like video games, running, and recently developed a liking into bowling. \tI feel that math is super important but ironically, i'm really bad at it. When it comes to remembering formulas, steps, equations, etcetera, it just goes from one ear..."
0 "Office acknowledged that the" "...especially in such sensitive areas as war-zones, the route that the papers took was difficult to discern and, therefore, difficult to stop. The India Office acknowledged that the effort to reduce the circulation of the Hindustan Ghadr exacerbated because receipt of the paper was not contingent on subscription. Although it was ..."
0 "to balance that with" "...r, something about establishing expectations) - Give the other person an out - Be effusive with praise, especially in front of others (figure out how to balance that with being patronizing) - Ask others what they think (and take it seriously) - Figure out which hills you're willing to die on and leave the rest - Summar..."
1 "I realize that these" "... have more say and control of the incumbent.  The two party system has much power and in some ways have gotten too big for the britches as they say.  I realize that these changes do have consequences, and people much smarter than I would need to make some contingencies but overall I feel would be beneficial to the Amer..."
1 "so that it made" "...so, the picture for Chris was changed so it would not have the cutoff appearance that was seen in the first revision.  Finally, the copy was reworked so that it made sense and reduced the errors in the copy.  The program, Grammarly, was used to help fix common errors and words that did not need to be there in orde..."
1 "face is that of" "...:For a vampire strong all around during night weaker during day :For a three person connection to land/faster travel but fire hurts badly :Cat person face is that of a animel night vision less water protection :Giant extremely high hp and high attack power can carry more things hard time focusing on smaller enemie..."
1 "who claim that the" "... billion years ago when it began expanding from an almost inconceivably hot, dense state and this state was smaller than an atom. Therefore, to those who claim that the very idea of a Big Bang violates the First Law of Thermodynamics (also known as the Law of Conservation of Energy) that matter and energy cannot be c..."
1 "she said that this" "...wall and tap it then a big puff of smoke came from the wall and formed around me a couple seconds later the was a top of a girl floating on the smoke she said that this will be very important for your new life i will be your guide then she stepped of the cloud and shook my hand and said my name is sdf399389 or sidf f..."
0 "manner that is superior" "... provides skills necessary for situations on and off of campus while using literature to examine life during and after attending boarding school in a manner that is superior and would be most beneficial to our students.\t       \t\t \t \t \t\t Dystopian Fiction (Semester 2)  - Dystopian fictions – fictions that present frighteni..."
0 "also indicates that Tiffany" "...rding to the Conners 3 administered 8/2016.  Tiffany is able to remain engaged in activities that combine high interest with movement.  The Conners 3 also indicates that Tiffany struggles with inattention, distractibility, hyperactivity/impulsivity, and executive functioning.  Based on teacher records, Tiffany’s work is often..."
1 "fossil that is over" "... layers of sedimentary rock, which span over 550 million years old. There are also many fossils that were discovered at the Grand Canyon; a trilobite fossil that is over 500 million years old. Even though it is a very primitive (simple) species, it had a complex eyes, having over 15,000 lens just in one eye. We have l..."
1 "never complained that she" "... characters their true identities in different ways. Negis reacted to all of this by being appreciative of what she had even though she was poor. She never complained that she was poor either. Ponyboy reacted in a different way he tried being nice to the Socs Gang even though they were bullying him just because he was a gre..."
0 "algorithms that were suggested" "...the state space of a quantum register of size n-qubits. [3] Quantum computing power over classical one was demonstrated dramatically in the different algorithms that were suggested. For one was Shor algorithm which gave a solution to the factorization problem which was in polynomial time. Also Grover algorithm which gave a solut..."
1 "God that it was" "...f. As soon as Harrison woke up, he was trembling all over and full of sweat.  Finally, he took a big breath and to his amazement he was alive! “Thank God that it was a dream,”said Harrison. “It felt so real.” He asked one of the guards what time it was. “It is twelve o’clock,”said the guard,”Go to bed.” Harrison w..."
1 "people believe that Rontu" "...he had killed her younger brother, but evanescently [voc]came to befriend him. Rontu, the name of the dog[iw], means “fox eyes” in her language. Some people believe that Rontu was left by the Russians or the Aleutian. The dogs destroyed [V]many of the wildlife on the island, decreasing the marine and bird population. Becaus..."
0 "product that is so" "...illate  In order to create our distillate, we heat our oils at high temperature and low pressure, allowing us to eliminate any impurities and offer a product that is so high in THC/CBD purity that it is actually clear. It’s the cleanest way to vape!   Sales process  Research   Grading The first step in any sales proc..."
1 "killing that is happening" "...rayvon Martin’s right to be able to walk down the street with a hoodie on without being victimized.  Guns would only need ` With all of the senseless killing that is happening in the world today, we need to change our actions. In the mid 1960s, Jackie DeShannon recorded a hit song entitled, What The World Needs Now is Love...."
0 "I realize that I" "...ween us, even though I know I’m cutting off my own nose to spite my face. \tI hear him move before him arms encircle me and pull me back to his chest. I realize that I haven’t been here in a long time and I’m suddenly desperate to get as close to him as I can, to feel as much of his bare skin as possible. Turning on..."
1 "really believe that the" "...he time to work on projects with people, what makes you pick one role over another? It’s a mix between the story and the people behind the project. I really believe that the material needs to resonate with you for you to be able to do it justice. If there’s no emotional connection then it’s not a good fit. And I feel that..."
1 "important is that you" "... compelling musical works in a process I refer to as “coloring” a composition. The notes you use in a composition are important, but what’s even more important is that you write a piece that has a dynamic range of colors also known as timbres. The timbres in a composition can help to add something new to a section that ..."
1 "but knows that it" "... high status made her too big to fail. Proctor still holds back from revealing the truth because he doesn’t want the public to know about his affair, but knows that it may not even work due to how many people worship her. The town has formed a group around her, making her become their compass for who is a witch.   A..."
0 "to believe that something" "... Nathan added. “I think the fact that a ‘family meeting’ seems to have been called, and yet not all the members were informed surely leads us further to believe that something certainly isn’t right with the Academy if that’s how we’re taught to treat our family.”  Some of the boys had the decency to look guilty at least, bu..."
1 "rumour that was very" "...d. All became topics of discussions at different places: during parade, in lecture hall, in the cafeteria and at the dormitory. I recall a particular rumour that was very popular. It was doing with a local government, where people were said to be carnivorous. I will call the local government S. The hot story was that a..."
1 "proponents respond that the" "...ang violates the First Law of Thermodynamics (also known as the Law of Conservation of Energy) that matter and energy cannot be created or destroyed, proponents respond that the Big Bang does not address the creation of the universe, only its evolution, and that, as the laws of science break down anyway as we approach the cre..."
1 "also says that where" "...y the same people they were when they arrived.” This is meant to show that his father believes that traveling lacks effect on the ones that do it. He also says that where they live is where most travelers wish they could stay forever, but Santiago continues to tell his side. Eventually, his father gives his blessing be..."
1 "have shown that although" "...the way that behaviors are perceived by parents and researchers. \tOther potential sources of the stress being attributed to adoption. Several studies have shown that although we may be finding answers for some beneficial ways to cope with adoption stress, we run into limitations with true diagnosis especially with RAD. Vas..."
1 "please add that info" "...ant notes and informations regarding the request in question. If request is specific in any way or requires additional data to be passed in payload - please add that info in Description section. Data from Description section will also be visible in docs generated automatically by postman so we can use it as a valid way..."
1 "one is that you" "...lace before you think about driving is have a really good sleep so that your not tired and which may lead to you falling asleep at the wheel. Another one is that you could watch your speed so that you are in control of your car. Never be under the influence of alcohol or any drugs otherwise nasty accidents may hap..."
0 "We ask that you" "... by employee negligence.   Care of Merchandise And Product It is the responsibility of each employee to handle all merchandise and product with care. We ask that you treat all merchandise with the same care and respect that you would with your own. No product may be removed from the premises without the proper aut..."
1 "to elaborate that Miss" "...s. Please.” \tAs lightning seems to strike the former teacher, Asano snaps out of his daze and questions the glowing female, “One year? Would you care to elaborate that Miss Sinclair?” \tThe girl blinks owlishly, clearly realizing her mistakes. The female youth utters out a silent curse and then breath a deep, and heavy si..."
1 "already seen that it" "... behavior change is complex, but we believe it is the only way to transform health care, clinical outcomes and the total cost of health care. We have already seen that it is the way to deliver not just 1% or 5% improvements, but 10X improvements in all of the key areas that matter to a patient or payor: Better health o..."
1 "study showed that it" "...ontraindicated, and MRI is modality of choice for them (Kenisberg et al, 2015). Although polycystic ovaries are not a definite sign of having PCOS, a study showed that it had an 84.8% sensitivity in the diagnosis of PCOS (Moschos, Twickler, 2013). This study was done using the Rotterdam Criteria – stating that a diagno..."
1 "you sense that God" "... your local license once your situation has improved and we will reevaluate.   Thank you, and remember to read thoroughly the information below.   If you sense that God is calling you to ministry, talk to your pastor about it. He/she will be a support and encouragement to you and guide you in the process of identifyi..."
1 "is advised that the" "... cover for their health and safety. Thus safeguarding their interest in health and social care is a very vital point of discussion.   Consequently it is advised that the interest of health and social care of everyone must be protected and must be safeguarded.   Physical abuse includes hitting, beating, and pushing. Sh..."
1 "It seems that too" "...cay of Japanese language.  However, in this paper I will write about that loanwords are actually not a menace to Japanese language or culture at all. It seems that too many people mix the problems of loanwords on everyday communication with its influence on Japanese culture, so they mistakenly take loanwords for evi..."
1 "“suggests that for" "...with the relationship between the school and student. The optimal relational outcome between school and student as argued by Munns and Martin (2005), “suggests that for students to feel that “school is for me”, they have to feel supported as an individual learner and as a member of a cohesive and culturally inclusive..."
1 "country that is fixated" "...eatest commandments is Love your neighbor as yourself. It is backwards to say, “God Bless America,” but not comply to his commandments.  We live in a country that is fixated on hate. Hatred towards religious groups, people of different backgrounds, and sexual orientations. We could change as many laws that we want or impl..."
1 "author hopes that the" "...nto everyday lessons and learn how to use it wisely. Also, affording this technology does require a lot of money which some schools do not have.  The author hopes that the government will create some programs to help schools get iPads. "
1 "allegations that were made" "...e child has been living with her grandmother until recently when the Department of Family and Children Services removed her because of physical abuse allegations that were made against the grandmother. James is trying to get custody of her but when the grandmother found out about his intentions, she accused James of sexually..."
0 "pool that was shaped" "...,” explained Alberta.   Many people haven’t been to Conway Twitty’s, Loretta Lynn’s, and Elvis Presley’s houses like Alberta. She saw Elvis Presley’s pool that was shaped like a giant guitar in Graceland, also she got to go into one of his airplanes. Alberta was able to see Elvis’s dark brown tombstone that surrounds a..."
0 "I agree that music" "... with the following statement: Music is the heart of Emirati traditional culture. Explain why. (Backup Q) When did people play traditional music?  A. I agree that music is very important in our traditional  culture. In the past, people played traditional music at family celebrations and festivals. They also sang song..."
1 "can assume that Foster" "...are typically more than one, and its range of possibilities is far larger than with something like rain or snow” (Foster, 103). Ultimately the reader can assume that Foster believes violence acts as a bigger symbol and adds more to a story than weather. Chapter Twelve: “Is That a Symbol?”         "
1 "but that was nothing" "... feeling. My body was tingling, not in a sexual way, but as if my body was falling asleep. I had my arms and legs fall asleep on me before of course, but that was nothing compared to this. It was a prickly sensation, but without the pain. My vision seemed to dim in the bright lights, and my body drooped. I was limp. I ..."
1 "evolution states that organisms" "...us system. I am nothing more than a substrate neutral algorithm. Meaning they can run on a variety of different materials. Charles Darwin’s theory of evolution states that organisms evolve and adapt to their environment by an iterative process. This process can be conceived as an evolutionary algorithm that searches the space of ..."
1 "conduit that was 1" "...ng our third ledge, we made it to a small recess in the rough cut stone, measuring to about crawling height. We shimmed through and saw a cylindrical conduit that was 1 meter wide and went 3 meters down. Right at shoulder height  was a ladder on the wall in front of us. “I’ll go first,” i offered. After leaving Toby ..."
0 "to suggest that I" "... I should follow your angry ass to figure out what your fucking problem is.”  “I don’t think I’m the one with the problem, Gabriel.”  “Are you trying to suggest that I’m the one with the fucking problem here?! Who’s the one who fucking thinks ‘No, I’m not going to use my words like a fucking adult. I’m just going to..."
0 "on that is yellow" "...ow diaper cover over my red diaper and I gets put on a pair of red diaper pants that I am wearing over my diaper cover. Abbie then gets a t-shirt put on that is yellow and there is written baby on the t-shirt.   We should get the diaper bag ready in case the little girls needs her diapers changed during the day or t..."
1 "well believe that they" "...tends to be an optimistic country which believes that anything is possible if enough work is put into it. Not only political leaders, but citizens as well believe that they hold a “candle” everyone else should follow, but this power America holds has its downsides. When America becomes such a large authority in the world..."
") says that “" "... first strategy is to listen.  When we are looking for to understand the client, we need to hear them, their values, and their passions.  Curtis (2015) says that “Everything is driv" 1
0 "him realize that it" "... the ways in which Emergency ate into the consciousness of all those it touched.  Rohinton Mistry was influenced by his brother Cyrus Mistry who made him realize that it is “not necessary to write about^London, Paris, New York where things happen;” but to be a successful writer, “Bombay is a viable city for fiction” (..."
0 "this asserts that the" "...was considered a settlement rather than taking the land by force, theft or conquest. (Howitt, 2012, p.818). The second ‘The discourse of occupation’, this asserts that the occupation of the continent at the time of colonisation, providing the basis for jurisdictional sovereignty and the rule of law. Meaning it was Engli..."
1 "is detected that a" "...o nothing more than a servant. One of her superiors saw an opportunity to gain status If he was able take care of this \"problem\". Around this time It is detected that a demon has arrived in the neutral plane of earth. Her superior, knew this was the opportunity he needed. If she succeeded he could take the credit. If..."
0 "ll notice that each" "...arn it quickly.  ~ Arnold Schoenberg  A Composer’s Personal Style I’m going to have you listen to two composers who lived at about the same time. You’ll notice that each composer has a unique style and voice, but how does this happen?  How is it that a writer who uses the same rhythms and scales creates a piece that s..."
0 "year is that I" "...o you want to be an actor? Jason: My personal strengths are as a director and producer. I like telling stories. The reason I came to Dubai early this year is that I’m looking for locations to film a documentary about environmental conservation efforts in the UAE. Hameed: A documentary? So, I suppose you won’t nee..."
0 "also shown that there" "...) there are advantages to self-directed learning (SDL) within the nursing field mainly throughout the education of undergraduate nurses but there was also shown that there are some disadvantages. However, in this article by Davis (2015) it is shown that there are more advantages towards self-directed learning (SDL) and ..."
0 "to certify that the" "... that the college or the real life we are entering is accredited. Accreditation is rigorous process that higher education institution must go through to certify that the curriculum is up to per with regional and national standards. According to the various commencement speakers, the important factors to consider when ..."
1 "writing that is a" "... In here, I am going to focus on the story of Winter Dreams that written by F.S. Fitzgerald in 1922. In this period of time, there were revolution of writing that is a new style at that time call “Modernism”. Modernism is different from traditional. Break the traditional way of writing. The Author wrote the characte..."
1 "she assumed that they" "...to face the angry mob of white people alone. Eckford saw the Arkansas National guard’s standing at the door, which gave her a sense of relief because she assumed that they were there for her safety, and protection. Eckford got to the doors thinking that she was going to be entering the school, but got turned away just l..."
1 "me that was beautiful" "...inning of wisdom” Aristotle .  Working on LIS  was like looking myself more intensely in the mirror I was more clearly able to visualize the areas in me that was beautiful and that was ugly or needed a change,  I learned the methods to use to work on those areas which will help me create  a person  better than the perso..."
1 "she stated that she" "...old me she put Jadan Rios, on medicare which Jadan,did not need because he had full Insurance which I have proof of . Also,the court paper I received she stated that she did not know where Jadan's biological father was Ramon San Miguel, which is a lie because I sent her the support card on.  And the log on number to a..."
"novel is that of" "...ile writing a beautiful novel, but it left the audience conflicted with which side to support. Another critical argument that could be made about the novel is that of Siddhartha’s chara " 0
1 "Mozart is that he" "...an beat Mozart through sheer work and determination to get their music out there and produce compositions that matter. Well, except, the problem with Mozart is that he was pretty disciplined and committed during^his work hours. After work? He was a party animal. Okay, Mozart is a bad example, his music composed itse..."
1 "Susana believes that each" "...direct insight into the end-to-end value chain within the jewelry industry, from sourcing raw materials for production to selling to the collector.   Susana believes that each collection uniquely communicates with society. She brings passion and enthusiasm throughout the design and production process, from the initial idea ..."
0 "believe that" "..., Geography, hard, History, interesting, Maths, Science   U1L9. Functional language of agreeing and disagreeing: I agree/don’t agree, I believe/don’t believe that ..., I think …, Maybe, Me too! That’s true, That’s a good point, What do you think/believe? You’re right; Tablet, email, social media, internet   U1L..."
"was annoyed that the" "...s words such as “very”. When the doves are described, they now seem to be trying to send a message that Matt has no hope, he has lost all hope. “Matt was annoyed that the two seemed to have forgotten " 0
0 "care services that non-Canadians" "... healthcare to their daily life. Not all taxes contribute to education the government gives back to the society and locals enjoy benefits like health care services that non-Canadians do not^receive.  Language barrier is a big problem that people tend to over see when they plan to study overseas. The second one gets off the plane t..."
1 "frown that was plastered" "...e was going to, until his voice made me jump as I put the kettle on.  “Are you okay?” he asked. I turned to face him, noticing the somewhat concerned frown that was plastered on his face. “After yesterday.” He remembers, I thought, waiting for him to continue. “I didn’t mean to upset you. I’m sorry, Flora.”  His apology wa..."
1 "This means that if" "...aras. If you require a hiatus for a period, please do not hesitate to ask for one.  There will be a THREE STRIKES policy in effect for this roleplay. This means that if you have been on two or more activity checks in a row, you have been spoken to about your behavior towards others multiple times or you break any of ..."
1 "I feel that that" "...ve that the material needs to resonate with you for you to be able to do it justice. If there’s no emotional connection then it’s not a good fit. And I feel that that is also down to where you are at in your life as well. Sometimes the right projects come along for where you are at in your own life. They help you e..."
1 "scientists believe that the" "...r harvesting. With the domestic species' lack of a savvy seed dispersal mechanism, it's unlikely it would have survived in the wild. For this reason, scientists believe that the hybrid mutation occurred through artificial selection. The domesticated Einkorn wheat was preferable because it yielded more edible seeds and slightl..."
0 "work suggests that his" "Assignment 1- 102085 Education and Policy  Option 1 Sarra’s work suggests that his success has been achieved by his ability to develop and embrace the Aboriginal identity of his students and the community. Critically analyse this st..."
1 "homework that is given" "...tudents may need to use the drug for long periods of time, which may cause greater memory loss in all areas of memory. How classes are taught and the homework that is given may need to be altered for each student.  "
0 "to ensure that the" "...for modern-day uses such as offices, shops and hotels, while the spirit of the buildings’ original designs were retained. This kind of approach helps to ensure that the historical buildings do not just become hollow and soulless ancient relics, but still manage to remain economically viable and relevant, hence allowi..."
0 "worried that" "...who he was saying it to. However, I knew that what the male said was true, or what he believed to be true.   “North? Guys…? What’s going on?” I said, worried that I  was missing something on the other side that I couldn’t see.   “Sang?” A few of the boys called as they turned around to face me and parted like t..."
1 "then mentioned that his" "...he felt they went. DJ said that they were great and really helped him. AM stated that he was really happy that DJ found these meetings beneficial. DJ then mentioned that his doctor prescribed him stronger tablets of 100 grammes and he felt better thus made it his goal to get back to work. DJ stated that he still has a lot..."
1 "people call that an" "...at's because your mother wanted to show you off.\"  Sometimes in life something really ugly, but it is art, for example  art work with a bunch of line people call that an art work, street paint looks are better than those but people say that is not art. Don't use your kids as a tool to show off, if you really want to s..."
0 "language said that he" "... meaning.  “Do you really think it’s smart to chase after an angry vampire, Gabe?” Luke asked, a worried expression, but every other part of his body language said that he wasn’t worried for the same reason he was saying.  ‘I know him and he’s been too quiet today. I get that he’s still obviously emotional from being fo..."
1 "to believe that after" "...k to the bed and picks up the phone.   “Good Morning, my soon to be official wife” said the message from Brandon. She thought again that It's so hard to believe that after years of waiting, today is finally here. She was starting to believe that it might not ever come. Her phone vibrates again “I didn’t believe this day..."
0 "case states that as" "...fined by the genetic code of a person, their biological factors. A commonly known serial killers is David Berkowitz, born and raised in New York. His case states that as a young boy he was always sweet, quiet and simple. David grew up in a home with his adopted parents, and It’s been said, “He had a normal childhood i..."
0 "instincts that were heightening" "...I knew he was pregnant you know.” It felt like a ton of steel had dropped in Sasuke’s gut. “I asked the doctor about it. He said it was my protective instincts that were heightening. Babies are such troublesome small things you know. Kiba’s powers increased too.” “They did?” “Yea. Not just his claws come out anymore. He can shift..."
0 "becomes clear that Jim" "... dead! you's back agin, 'live en soun', jis de same ole Huck—de same ole Huck, thanks to goodness!\" (Twain pg. ) as Jim conveys this quote to Huck it becomes clear that Jim shows plenty of heartfelt feelings towards his best friend. This is truly a wise and noble characteristic that Jim is displaying because he is puttin..."
1 "stakeholders is that it" "...ease school readiness and, children’s achievement in school and beyond (http://www.aecf.org). The most significant goal for recognizing and accepting stakeholders is that it permits one to engage them as a portion of the work. Stakeholders of an exertion are individuals who have an entrusted awareness in it, either as per..."
0 "Please ask that for" "... if he/she is familiar with the B.A.R. format of answering questions? If yes great, if not explain B.A.R. stands for Background, Actions and Results. Please ask that for each of the following questions; the interviewee provides you with specific examples, and ask them to use the B.A.R. format.  1) Tell me about a spec..."
1 "they realized that they" "...attack on Nice, France had an immediate effect on the country that is hosting this year’s Rio Olympic Games, Brazil. Brazil upped their security when they realized that they’re expecting about 500,000 more foreigners into their country and "
1 "could tell that Darcy" "...at is to be expected and I was used to that coming from a small town anyway, so it did not bother me.   We were walking, and talking, and laughing. I could tell that Darcy was tolerating Aly (she had told us that everyone called her Aly and I picked it up right away, Darcy was still calling her Alyson just as an insult,..."
1 "and proves that he" "...es his best to cheer his son up. Tried to get him to marry Elizabeth immediately and let him go to England. He stays with him until the court hearing and proves that he was innocent. He takes him back to Geneva and gets him married to Elizabeth and dies after hearing the news of Elizabeth dying. Elizabeth - She gets ..."
1 "now revealed that individuals" "...ty of the content. Learning gains, increasing and giving an expansive diversity to knowledge. (Fetherston, 2006 pp. 313-314 )   Link  As studies have now revealed that individuals have different learning styles the way they receive information, process the knowledge, store, and use then information does not coincide with the tr..."
0 "He demands that Nora" "...er her husband so she is sure Mrs Linde will be working there. Krogstad knows of his bad reputation and that his position in the bank is in jeopardy. He demands that Nora uses her influence on his behalf, he assumes that if Mrs Linde is hired he would be the one dismiss from the bank. Nora takes back what she said abou..."
1 "to consider that before" "...sitive side for the mine, the mine has employed to date 2 500 people who constitute 20.8% of the population of the Rustenburg and the Mayor will have to consider that before opting for mine closure. 2.1.2 Influences on power relationship The mine has the following power of influence on the negotiations: • Rustenburg is st..."
1 "music that is played" "...t to ride in a wagon pulled by a tractor up to it,” she said. “There wasn’t much to see at Conway Twitty’s house.” Alberta announced that the country music that is played nowadays is not the country music that she enjoys.  \tAlberta has had the privilege to see technology go from rusty kerosene lamps and out houses, to ..."
1 "I realised that the" "... mindset that keeping arrears were part of college life and that it would be cool to be part of this wonderful tradition, but sanity won me over when I realised that the extra workload would be too straining for anyone to handle. So back to the reference books and notebooks I went, hoping and praying at the same time ..."
0 "so that is automatically" "...toral votes, and a candidate must receive at least 270 to win the presidential election.   Regardless of states of population, each has two senators, so that is automatically two electorates for each state.  Then based on population, each state has a number of house of representatives, which is meant to represent the major..."
1 "I realized that whatever" "...rrow down the path I want to take in the future. In addition to volunteering, I watch my dad develop medicines that save people's lives each day, and I realized that whatever path I follow, I want to make a difference. \tAlso known for her determination, Princess Elizabeth Charlotte has also served as a source of strength f..."
1 "it comprehended that a" "...2014).   Nordstrom as a design retailer sooner or later understood that the significance of having a site was not only for online corporate nearness, it comprehended that a strong online nearness ought to incorporate a powerful e-commerce administration that backings the corporate destinations of development and gainfuln..."
1 "” shows that the" "...r presents the loss of opportunities for the boys, as they have no time to have regret and reflect upon their mistakes. “not after blowing up my exams” shows that the protagonist must undergo a transformation, moreover underline multiple problems with life after “exams”. “In a year biggie will be dead” indicates th..."
1 "soon realize that you" "...en darkness shroud your whole being, drowning you in your own mind where you will continue falling. Leaving you in a black pit of your own fears, you soon realize that you can do nothing about it. When you feel a presence looming creepily over your shoulder, you know that you will never be able to escape it.  You just h..."
0 "him knows that as" "...seven!” Junmyeon calls out to the chefs, Do Kyungri and Park Chanyoung. Despite having a job at a cafe, Junmyeon was a hopeless cook, everyone around him knows that as well as they try to keep him away from the stove at all times. He shifts aside to let servers Huang Zifei and Kim Jungin walk past, hands full with t..."
1 "quickly learn that Sonia" "...anticipation for the start of the show.         \tThe beginning scene opens with Vonya sitting down to enjoy his morning coffee, then enters Sonia. We quickly learn that Sonia is Vanya’s adopted sister, and the two have been living together for many years in their family home. Sonia is discontent with their past and present..."
1 "so fast that I" "...y moving into town so I was lost. I thought about the look on his face when he realized that I was hurt. It's slowly recounted the event, it happened so fast that I didn't have a moment to think it first, now I sat back and thought about the concerned on the dude's face, he had Shocking Blue Eyes that were almost..."
1 "it seems that the" "...our name to fill the records\", after thinking he spoke truthful \"The only thing I remember is a name, Shirou\". The elder became silent, 'Hmmm… I see… it seems that the traumatic event made him forget everything about his life before the fire.', then he finally admitted \"I think that you won't recover your memories, ..."
1 "people argue that GMOs" "...re's no need to provide that information nor labels. Safe: meaning they won't cause us any health complications or illnesses. On the other hand, some people argue that GMOs aren't safe for consumption, and the public should be informed of them, by providing GMO labels. They say GMOs  do lead us to health problems as well..."
0 "walls that were built" "...edieval World.  When was The Great Wall built and who by? The Great Wall was started by Qin Shi Huang between 221-206 BCE. It was a series of smaller walls that were built of stone, wood, earth and other materials. It was built by many emperors over many, many years. The Great Wall was started by Qin Shi Huang in the ye..."
1 "should admit that when" "...as really going on at the school. That meant getting beyond what people thought and encouraging them to share what they were actually experiencing. I should admit that when I reached the school, the staff was unsettled, students were frustrated and parents sceptical. I wanted to establish the mindset that we're not perfe..."
1 "Zera pretended that a" "...stomach. As a child Zera had spent nights without food in her belly, and she taught herself to imagine that she had eaten a feast to calm her aching. Zera pretended that a tantalizing scent of broth was teasing her nose, and filling her stomach. It was an effective way to relieve her hunger momentarily. She was definite..."
1 "Once that is done" "... to change the in-game value at real-time i.e. expending ammo and then watching for the memory address that changes corresponding the in game action. Once that is done now the user has the correct memory block associated with that in-game value and can now begin to modify the value. Cheat Engine is equipped with a c..."
1 "information that is being" "...is and there is no manual input of data. Having just gone through a situation needing staff primary phone numbers, I am acutely aware of insufficient information that is being synced and am in the process of revisiting which fields need to be included for teachers. As part of this process, I will be asking that Human Resour..."
0 "have that it will" "...d panic and potentially unsafe environment, unlike those who support the change in policy.   Despite the lack of evidence those who oppose the policy have that it will create a negative outcome, their concerns remain somewhat valid. It can be understood that they fear for the safety of women and children in changing..."
1 ") proved that the" "...to complex, high-value added transactions that yield higher fees. Studies have also shown that benefit from IT investment lags behind. Lee & Kim (2006) proved that the greater the dependence on IT, the higher the productivity lag. Yu, Han & Mithas (2013) addressed the lag issues by using one-year lagged values of IT..."
1 "food that is made" "...that is made up of not less than 18% protein. Conversely, if he or she has a Shih Tzu at his or her home, he or she should ensure that they give them food that is made up of not less than 22% protein.   Fat   Dietary fat is not too vital in the diets of various dogs. In fact, it is often important that an individual..."
0 "poll indicates that 60%" "...ults may be biased in the long run.  Lastly, there is the use of Survey. This investigative study uses several surveys. For example, a survey by TIME poll indicates that 60% of the respondents stated they are not comfortable with spending time on social media. At the same time, 76 percent of the interviewees reported that..."
0 "has proved that the" "...stitutions have turned their attention to. NATO has also seemed as an important agent in the execution of the UN Security Council’s resolutions. This has proved that the interest and threat definition for NATO has significantly broadened.  Another factor put forward to explain persistence of alliances is the level of ..."
1 "ve learned that software" "...t the following benefits: #1: Keep control of my data. As a business owner, you want to make sure you have control of your company data. With time, I’ve learned that software companies - most of the time - use different format of data that runs in compatibility with their software. Over the years, I have used different sof..."
1 "also meant that many" "...s led to three very bad harvest in France. This lead to peasants and farmers having smaller incomes, while food prices rose sharply. The poor harvest also meant that many French farmers became unemployed. Many poorer people were starving, but could not afford food and could not find a job. Meanwhile, the nobility and t..."
1 "firmly believe that when" "...oids these kinds of words? I do. And when I think about how they communicate, they are typically described as being clear, concise, and convincing. I firmly believe that when you decide to wr         - Take a compliment - Engage without agreeing or disagreeing - Avoid saying \"you\" and \"I\" - Say \"yes\" a lot  Paid content  -..."
1 "Please note that anyone" "...onal needs whenever possible and when doing so does not cause undue hardship for the company or fellow employees.  Returning from a Leave of Abscence Please note that anyone who does not return from a LOA on the date agreed to will be considered to have voluntarily terminated employment. The effective date of the terminat..."
1 "this experience that never" "...r. However, One good thing was he didn’t had any injury but bad thing was as he was on the floor he trying to get up but could’nt wet. I learned from this experience that never leave resident alone at any time, any thing can happen. Always ask for help and prepared with all necessary equipment before any procedure. Preparati..."
1 "we ensured that we" "...is area of the assessment was not lost within the unit.  We strived and exceeded the Wing CC’s mantra of “Leave it better than you found it”.  First, we ensured that we maintained and communicated the strategic alignment of the Wing’s Goals to that of the units.  For example, as we executed Europe’s first deployment ..."
1 "nothing that is bad" "... or hurting. He said there will be sameness and perfection in every way. He said that perfection will be no crimes, no hurt, no loss, no sadness, and nothing that is bad for people. He said that bad people, the people who break rules, will get released, and explains that a “release” is killing someone with no pain. He..."
1 "to identify that an" "...o heavy to pick up due to its sheer size, but this progression is through investigations. Though examinations with concrete materials, they can begin to identify that an object may be too big to fit into a container but with a bigger container the object may fit trial and error approach. The preoperational stage is fr..."
1 "of paper that they" "...blic. Families who choose to buy a Lotto ticket instead of food for their families or rent for a roof over their heads are only paying for that piece of paper that they hold. When a company like Lotto is earning upwards of half a billion dollars a year what they should be doing with that money is giving it back to pe..."
1 "some argued that such" "...oversial. Later that year, the Coventry IWA leadership unilaterally sent “considerable sums” to India without the input of the membership. Evidently, some argued that such money should be spent primarily on programs to improve conditions for Indians in Britain, which was a foundational, if competing, concern for the org..."
1 "such that it satisfies" "...ities, as well as using the superposition of the states. The main key used in the mentioned algorithm is shifting the phase of a quantum system state such that it satisfies some pre-defined condition at each iteration. [3] Grover’s algorithm’s main idea depends on applying Walsh-Hadamard transformations to prepare the in..."
"have known that you" "English 9A \t\t\t\t\t\t\t\t\tAsma Ali  Contrast Description Essay\t\t\t\t\t\t\t8-13-16 I was too young to hsve known about loss and to have known that you never reall  " 1
1 "he believe that Africans" "...r matter emerges from fermions and bosons. I am going to agree with David Hume in that a wise man proportions his belief to the evidence. Yet how did he believe that Africans were inferior to^Europeans especially Anglo-Saxons? He should have withheld judgment until he more data. I will try to be a skeptic always asking: Ho..."
1 "also assumes that individuals" "...makes sense, as an individual who wants to showcase their work, that if the individual belongs to an effective team to also showcase their work. This also assumes that individuals have the availability to review such an option. This may break down to who can and who cannot, but the main drive for an individual is to keep the st..."
1 "I hope that this" "... procedures working, it showedthe fire brigade strategy, once the correct information had been given, in helping to decide the best course of action. I hope that this training session can be repeated to ensure the continuous improvement of the Stadium’s fire procedure.     Yours Sincerely   Chris Powley. Tech IOSH ..."
0 "app that is used" "...ncers in the community like Spoon University, Eugene Restaurants and Eugene Foodies.   We will use targeted social media  Instagram: the social media app that is used for the longest amount of time daily out of any other social app. We will create 15 second videos, showcasing the care and ingredients that go into m..."
0 "me that it is" "...tion at Memorial Hermann Hospital Southeast and has been there ever since. We did discuss his salary and it was well over the average pay. He assured me that it is a very satisfying career and he does not regret going to PA school. Overall it was an amazing experience and I feel very confident that this career i..."
1 "above provides that an" "...ward that has been set aside in the country of origin has triggered several arguments among academic writers and scholars, Article V (1)(e) as stated above provides that an enforcement of award may be rejected only if the objecting party can prove that the award has been set aside, suspended by a competent authority or n..."
1 "to say that our" "... pattern of my academics will continue in my graduate studies as well. I also did an exploration in different fields of civil engineering .I am happy to say that our faculty members are very cooperative and helpful in our work. Civil engineering is observing an expeditious growth which is assuring an excellent fut..."
0 "if that is trust" "...check with at least two more sources to make sure that the statement is true. It is also helpful to check who is the publisher of the website and see if that is trust able. You also have to stay true to yourself and others. Making sure that your work is original and based on your own effort is very important in an ..."
1 "This shows that for" "...collected, 59.8% of Cedarians chose artwork that is A3-A1 size, 26.1% chose bigger than A1 Size, 9.8% chose A4 size, 4.3% chose smaller than A4 size. This shows that for most people, artworks that are A3- A1 size would catch their attention at an art exhibition. We think that most people like A3-A1, as the size is big..."
0 "It represents that euthanasia" "...must respect the patients’ will with critical disease. Also, euthanasia will be performed after the treatment cannot relieve the pain of the illness. It represents that euthanasia is a method through multiple evaluations. Since doctors have patients' agreement, there is no doubt of murder. In the contrast, performing euthanasia..."
1 "He believes that the" "...tion to the North Pole. He has a goal of going to places man hasn’t been to before. In the second letter, he is melancholy because he has no friends. He believes that the people on the ship are not worth his friendship. In the third letter, his ship sails and he believes everything is going great. In the fourth letter,..."
0 "He suggests that the" "... Foster mean that all stories are exact copies of one another? No, he simply means characters are often found in many stories with slight variations. He suggests that the reader should use their previous knowledge and search for these recurring characters. Nearing the end of the chapter Foster announces “There’s only o..."
1 "Moore suggests that teachers" "... with any newly acquired skill set, students need to be able to use trial and error as a way of creating their comfort with the framework.  Secondly, Moore suggests that teachers need to “spend more time demonstrating how to use the technology” utilized in the classroom (Moore 2016).  It is easy to assume that 21st century stu..."
1 "curdling scream that they" "...owards her, shouting but Israa could not make out what they were saying.  When the soldiers got closer to the little girl, she let out the same blood curdling scream that they heard before. It took Israa by surprise because it did not seem possible that such a loud scream could come from such a little body.  The little girl..."
0 "dream that is dying" "... addition, the Los Angeles Catholic againsted this Act by hunger strikes within nine days. But for terminal ill patients, they can realize their last dream that is dying with dignity. In Taiwan, the article 15 of constitution claims, “The right of existence, the right of work, and the right of property shall be guaran..."
1 "and feared that “" "...est history, the Indian Political Intelligence service was concerned that the IWA could have been a destabilizing force among Indians in the Midlands and feared that “under invasion conditions some of them, particularly the Sikhs, might present considerable danger” (IPI to Mr. Silver 15 May 1942, IOR/L/PJ/12/645) Su..." 0
0 "• Imagine that you" "...the following:   • Define and distinguish between qualitative and quantitative research. • Provide examples of qualitative and quantitative research. • Imagine that you are a researcher interested in identifying the components of ‘giftedness’ in pre-teen children. What quantitative methods might you use to help you b..."
1 "been told that Mr" "...a few hours now on our way to go save Gabriel and this alleged ‘Mr. Blackbourne’ I’d have yet to meet. He’s a big part of this group, apparently. I’d been told that Mr. Blackbourne had been kidnapped once by a strange man, which made me think of the stories my mother-ahem-stepmother used to tell me whenever I left t..."
"demonstrates suggests that we" "...our students in both multiple choice questions and questions where students were required to write, including extended and short response. This graph demonstrates suggests that we continue to s " 1
1 "and that it would" "... mosquitos. Then he got a call from a biologist named Ethan Bier. He told James that he has a tool which would make sure that the trait was inherited and that it would spread quickly. As a test they put 2 anti^malaria mosquitoes in a box with normal mosquitos and let them breed. There were 3,800 mosquitos which were..."
0 ") investigated that the" "...1:4 quarterly data .The researcher used VEC model and johansen to test . The interest rate has insignificant on stock market index.  Khan, S. M. (2014) investigated that the interest rate effect on KSE-100 in Pakistan .Data sample period from 1992-2011, They applied the correlation and multiple regression and found that i..."
1 "students indicated that their" "...ision themselves. The responses don't result to a sum of 72 as some students responded with more than one answer to this survey question. A number of students indicated that their rapport with high school teachers, particularly PE teachers, encouraged them to further a career as an educator. “My Primary school PE teacher was a ..."
1 "also known that areas" "...cytes which are neuroectodermally-derived cells which are usually found in basal layers of skin, skin adnexas and some of the mucosal membrane .it is also known that areas which are frequently exposed to sunlight such as head, neck and lower extremities are the common sites for melanomas, which is identified as one of t..."
1 "he notices that the" "...ck’s becoming smarter than him, so that hurts his ego and he doesn’t want him to go to school any longer.  Motif Huck’s reaction to the footprints is he notices that the footprints end near the house and he recognizes the boots that the unknown person is wearing. We can infer that he knows something is going to happen..."
1 "to explain that most" "...rrence of similar characters and themes within literary works. Foster states that, “there’s no such thing as a wholly original work” (24). He goes on to explain that most authors do not wish to plagiarize in any form; they simply retain the knowledge they have stored in memory or personally experienced through life and..."
1 "the rights that they" "...y used literature like John Locke’s Second Treatise of Government.  That book brought forth the thought that the government was not giving the people the rights that they should have had.  More specifically, their natural rights of life, Liberty together with property.  For Patriots the thought of national independence..."
0 "many believe that the" "...and turn good. Legalism rose in popularity during the Warring States Period. Its popularity rose in hopes that it may facilitate peace and unity, yet many believe that the ideals of Legalism promote fragmentation. Legalism promoted the division of social class, giving even more power to the aristocrats, and taking power..."
0 "and intimated that he" "...h Bhagat Parwar Sahaik Committee (“Report on Ghadr Party” 10 May 1939, IOR/L/PJ/12/285). A few months later, Charan Singh Chima wrote to Rattan Singh and intimated that he had abandoned his plans to organize a discrete association, but hoped to collect funds for remittance to Punjab from among the Punjabis in the Midlan..."
1 "fossil that is over" "... layers of sedimentary rock, which span over 550 million years old. There are also many fossils that were discovered at the Grand Canyon; a trilobite fossil that is over 500 million years old. Even though it is a very primitive (simple) species, it had a complex eyes, having over 15,000 lens just in one eye. We have l..."
1 "she said that everyone" "...fer is do not rush into life. She regrets getting married at seventeen. She claims that she rushed into it too fast and that she was too young. Also, she said that everyone should take their time, and enjoy their life. She thinks that education is very important, and that people should try and further their education as ..."
0 ", that is big" "...ted type of kid.  Page 5 ‘’Momma, I had the best dream in the world. I dreamed I was on national television talking to the Queen of talk shows.” ‘’Now, that is big, Baby! You just keep on dreaming. You can do anything you put your mind to’’ said Momma. Meechie grabbed his bag of candy and put his things in his b..."
1 "with people that she" "...ad her mom and Luke. She felt betrayed by Luke because of what he said to Valentine’s followers and her mom was taken away from her. She had to fight with people that she barely knew and there was only so much time that she had to save her mom. Most events made sense to why the happened and how it will help the charact..."
1 "which displays that she" "...ra truly shows that she is not a reporter to mess with. According to her Channel 7 page, Dahl is “...willing to push the boundaries for a good story” which displays that she see’s no blockades, she sees no “line” that can’t be crossed. Ronnie Dahl is a fantastic reporter to follow. You can feel her passion for her work wh..."
0 "anything that was beneficial" "...a child, I never completely understood what my true identity was or what my purpose was for being on Earth. Prior to high school, I seldom focused on anything that was beneficial to others around me or my community. Sad to say, my main focus was fixed on myself. Through taking leadership roles, spreading positivity and being k..."
1 "Ensure that the" "...er and committee assignments on the Branch website (http://sites.ieee.org/hosting/) Be responsible for all correspondence. Post a calendar of events. Ensure that the Branch Constitution and Bylaws are adhered to. Arrange for an orderly transfer of all records to the incoming Secretary.    Student Branch Treasurer ..."
1 "I think that this" "...d a little out of place. Simon wasn’t a major character in this book but this scene seems to tell that he will become more important in later books. \tI think that this book is about what love can make us do. Despite the fact that Clary and Jocelyn left off at a rocky stage, Jocelyn’s disappearance made Clary worried..."
0 "to imagine that she" "...p in her belly, beginning to churn the acids in her empty stomach. As a child Zera had spent nights without food in her belly, and she taught herself to imagine that she had eaten a feast to calm her aching. Zera pretended that a tantalizing scent of broth was teasing her nose, and filling her stomach. It was an effec..."
1 "been stated that consumers" "...Danielsson , 2012). In previous studies conducted on ´the luxury market´ (Kuang-Peng, o.a., 2011; Cesare & Gianluigi, 2011; Song & Hur, 2011), it has been stated that consumers of luxury products are indeed loyal customers. However, studies have not been conducted on the reason why consumers develop loyalty and emotional att..."
0 "facts show that it" "...eapons (NRA 2016). Many states allow their citizens to be able to purchase a weapon.  Some have a strict process in order to purchase a weapon.  Will facts show that it is in the processing or the lack of enforcement? These states allow gun ownership as a right of their Second Amendment rights to bear arms. “Making i..."
0 "distraction is that many" "...     Question 4: The implication of Morelli’s Quote for Civic Engagement  ​Civic engagement is hindered by the advancement of social media. The major distraction is that many individuals are electronically connected, whether they are at work or home. This affects their social life, such that they allocate little or no time..."
0 "said that" "...re’s no trace of his usual sarcasm or cynicism on his face. \tI whisper back that I love him, too, and I can feel him smile against my skin. I haven’t said that to anyone in so long, not since the last time I said it to my poor husband before he left and didn’t come back. It’s dangerous to love someone here, ..."
1 "pin-reset means that the" "...over. So why not knock over TEN somethings? New Entertainment Desktop Bowling is the perfect desktop gadget for quickly unwinding on the go. Magnetic pin-reset means that the little pins won't scatter all over your desk, and the moveable ball launcher lets you aim from any angle. Sturdy, compact, and fun, this cool desktop..."
1 "was decided that she" "...to the courtroom when Jane's punishment was decided. If he did, he would have seen his once wife using all her cards to gain the judge's sympathy. It was decided that she needed help so she was sentenced to a couple years in a mental institution in upstate New York.      Peace filled Dick’s life with the selling of his..."
1 "I feel that she" "...rs and production practices. It would be difficult to say with absolute certainty whether or not Alice’s proposal to decentralize will work. However, I feel that she has conducted an detailed assessment of each department and that her thought process on the subject matter is logical.   \tEach department within an o..."
0 "would appear that Tom" "...hat allowed for the demolition and rebuilding of the house, as this was the only way of truly fixing the problem. In the case under consideration, it would appear that Tom’s decision to use second hand bricks would expose him to a similar outcome as the above case and that damages will be awarded to pay for all remedial..."
1 "and remembered that you" "...mg thank you! I've been wanted some stuff from Victoria Secret for awhile now\" I say squeezing her tight.  She laughs. \"I didn't know what to get you and remembered that you really loved Victoria Secret. So you're welcome.  I grab the next gift that's a bit smaller and wrapped in green paper with stars everywhere. The nam..."
1 "plan that is acceptable" "...terview. Nurses  reported that when they were faced with an acute illness, they felt they try to 'play the middle-man' in order to create a treatment plan that is acceptable to the resident, family and other professionals within the team. Nurses expressed their unhappiness over family interference in the decision-making, ..."
1 "that promote that it" "...ent at all.  There are many ideas that revolve around the idea of having love that has been destroyed is better than never loving at the ideas. Ideas that promote that it is better to love and lose are that love is in a friendship, love is always present in one's heart, one can learn from others experiences and that de..."
0 "to ensure that the" "...lant to cater for the expansions and they also need the maintenance of their roads to fulfil their core mandate as town council. Their objectives are to ensure that the company pays for all the costs of their demands.   3.3 Determination of the extent of bargaining 3.3.1 Resistance level The company’s resistance leve..."
0 "Barrett asserts that the" "... see Agrippina as the product of a family background marked by political intrigue and violence which made her determined to protect her own interest. Barrett asserts that the extreme hostility of ancient writers and early modern interpretations both offer a lop sided portrait of Agrippina. He also believes that she should ..."
1 "I think that it" "...im. She says, “I really should not have thought that he could have behaved in so cruel a way by anybody as he has done by poor Wickham.”(Austen 149). I think that it is important to make your own opinio                       In Chapter 46                        In Chapter 47 and 48                        In Chapte..."
1 "authors is that they" "...fact believe in a simplistic lifestyle and that he is not just living with a small amount of things for no reason. Another similarity between the two authors is that they both believe that one can find themselves and their souls through nature. Emerson says in the beginning of Nature, “Standing on the bare ground… I be..."
1 "standard that is preferred" "...r experience, making whatever you watch as close to what filmmakers originally intended. Third, we have Dolby Vision – an elevated high dynamic range standard that is preferred by major studios. Movies mastered for Dolby Vision are cinematic and stunning, making this a truly amazing 65” curved TV. Features at a glance: •    ..."
0 "I guess that’" "...ble to find a woman who is basically a google translator. Her job somehow fits her character as well, if I might add. Mom can never stop yapping. But I guess that’s what makes Mom so sweet.  Additionally, with parents like mine, I learn more than I need to. Way more. Sure I get the 6 requiring subjects: math, sc..."
0 "Victor said that there" "...the people in the house.     Being nosy, I rolled down my window slightly, allowing me to possibly overhear what they were talking about.   “Okay, so Victor said that there could be people, but they were talking about going home soon before that other man entered the house and was killed. How many would you estimate to b..."
1 "tension that was growing" "...ems your Academy didn’t make the right decision,” Sean glowered.   “My stepmother is why I decided to come with the boys today,” I said, breaking the tension that was growing between the two sets of boys, “It’s also why I walked back in here, even after the boys said Akuma was here and I just pointed a gun at him…w-wait, y..."
1 "knew that it would" "...some lighting errors on a shoot from the week before. I shut it down and tidied my desk just in time for the door to knock. It was almost three, so I knew that it would only be Frankie and the others. I admired my flowers once more before I left my office and headed downstairs. Frankie, Tyler and Yasmin all piled in ..."
1 "then added that the" "...ot wanting  to speak to anyone at all during this period, not even his grand children and that his doctor prescribed him anti-depressant tablets.  DJ then added that the first batch of tablets he was prescribed werent great and the second batch put his blood pressure up.He then mentioned that he was trying his best to..."
0 ") notes that nothing" "...easuring the organization against others. Benchmarking allows you to discover the gaps in your performance when compared with someone else. Camp (1989) notes that nothing will happen, however, unless you actually do something to close the gap or surpass the gap so identified during the process of benchmarking. The real..."
1 "Act ensures that the" "...with the consequences of the decision that they might be making without capacity by framework this will enable others to make decisions for them. The Act ensures that the decisions taken by a third party are done with the best interest of the individual concerned. At the sometime the mental capacity Act deprivation of ..."
1 ") believed that obesity" "...uctive and successful . Moreover , base on negative stereotype ,those people are less desirable employee (( Rothblum et au 1990).O'Hara and Gregg(2006) believed that obesity is a war on fat people.   In addition, Study by Rothblum, Brand, Miller and Oetjen (1990) asserted that obese group reported more discrimination in t..."
1 "and decided that they" "... be tied to a stool and burned by a scolding hot showerhead. This is when the boys deiced among themselves that I wouldn’t be going back there again, and decided that they would trade their nights to stay with me at Nathan’s empty house.   But in the last few days, I’ve become frustrated by the fact that they haven’t tr..."
0 "notes that" "...or a suntan, it cannot be done at second hand.” Such is the nature of fandom, and of subcultural capital, which Thornton delineated in 1995. Thornton notes that this form of capital extends to the media, and hence fandom, and is less bound by class distinctions than Bordieu’s conception of cultural capital. I..."
1 "This ensures that a" "...rty safeguards.   Mental capacity Act 2005   The mental Capacity Act 2005 its covers the two main important agendas of independence and safeguarding. This ensures that a person has the capacity to make their own decision and choices unless the individual demonstrated otherwise, Safeguards them with the consequences of..."
0 "I learned that my" "...chords, and scales.  This was supplemented by practice and by a considerable amount of YouTube demonstrations. After joining the University of Miami, I learned that my creative talent in playing classical guitar opened many enriching opportunities. \t First, my creativity in (classes) Second, (cultural festivals) Thi..."
1 "know that is also" "...nd it back to you.  Then,I found out what someone else said. They said that there is a law about flying drones for commercial purpose (Commercial). I know that is also true but when they release the law everyone will be ready to use drones. Say for instance, amazon has a field precisely for testing and flying drones..."
1 "just imagined that another" "...pped out my keys and jammed them into the ignition. Then screamed; something had moved next to me. I sat there with my eyes closed; hoping that I had just imagined that another human had somehow magically appeared in my Jeep. I thought that maybe, just maybe I really had lost it. I should probably just drive myself to a ment..."
1 "been documented that it" "...crease seizures; the effects of the drug on memory has not been frequently studied. Although many people do not feel that Cannabis is harmful, it has been documented that it can cause neurocognitive deficits, relationship difficulties, education issues, employment issues and mental health issues.        According to the a..."
0 "to say that I" "...\t Choose a p​assage ​that shows the fear​ felt by one of the main characters (part 5):            “I thought about this a lot, to be truthful. I have to say that I think the bravest thing I ever did was become friends with August. But I couldn't write about that, of course. I was afraid we'd have to read these o..."
1 "Jr that is offer" "...st intriguing club/organization on the campus life tab. I would like to learn more about the similarities and differences between  CSUF SHPE and SHPE Jr that is offer in my high school. The UC Irvine SHPE JR. organization empowers and promotes high school students, including myself, to pursue a higher education in ..."
0 "had felt that it" "... and onto the second. I finished the test with fifteen minutes to spare. I felt really good about it. That day I went home and told my parents that I had felt that it went great. Then I went to my computer to check Power School and the grades were up. The first thing I saw was that my average raised up to a “B” and..."
1 "to realize that my" "...vironment, meeting the right adults, and other things I considered luck, were all the hard work and efforts of people trying to be successful. I came to realize that my desires were goin Our desires mostly remain unfulfilled because they are mere wishes. They lack strong urge and motivation. That's why i have built a..."
1 "achievement that is not" "...o take these common complaints about schools and turn them into great strengths of the system. But this system is put in jeopardy by the push towards achievement that is not going away. In fact, with high stakes attached to standardized tests at a state or national level, the pressure to achieve is detracting from the fun..."
1 "not think that BACRIMs" "...ieves that criminal groups known as bandas criminales (or BACRIMs) are planning to take-over when FARC begins to withdraw from its territories. We do not think that BACRIMs will be able to expand their influence outside of rural areas in the medium term. Violence in FARC-controlled territories is very likely to continue ..."
0 "prison ensured that she" "...ainly wake everyone in her row and become the most unpopular inmate.  Damn it,  her body suddenly lost the rhythm of her pleasure. Thinking about the prison ensured that she couldn’t achieve orgasm from her fantasy. The walls of her cell had finally encroached on her, the reality of her situation was solidifying. The scen..."
1 "is true that these" "...orphological processes (adding a negative prefix to the adjective), and the morphological rules apply to the lexical units, not to their meanings. It is true that these lexical units must have a \"reflection\" semantic, but we do not think it is very clear the way in which a relationship between shapes antonímica lexic..."
"he realizes that “" "...to think maybe it oculd be the same little boy from the first story. The little boy is searching for adventure and fun. He looks at the Wild West and he realizes that “real adventure \t \t \t" 1
1 "vocabulary that is associated" "...human brain works shed some light on this topic I was unfamiliar with. I feel like I have a better understanding of the transgender community and the vocabulary that is associated with them.  The course^has erased some of my ignorance.   Word count : 250"
1 "I feel that any" "...dapt well to change. Health care care is a rapidly changing industry. I am mindful about what has worked for the past to pave way to a stable future. I feel that any change that happens should be for the benefit for the people. My overly programmatic, focusing nature and wanting the change to adhere to present rul..."
1 "Studies demands that students" "...se, audience, literary devices, figurative language, transitional phrasing, as well as rhetorical strategies and structure. Similarly, History/Social Studies demands that students be able to demonstrate disciplinary literacy in distinguishing the expertise of an author, target audience, argument, integration of quantitative or ..."
1 "peaks that were lost" "...s. It was the only way from the highlands across over the mountains and down to the sea, the coast and the lowlands. The mountain range with its high peaks that were lost in the sky, they lay like a bulwark around the highlands, it is enclosed and separated it from the rest of the world. The few passes that existed, we..."
0 "I get that he" "... but every other part of his body language said that he wasn’t worried for the same reason he was saying.  ‘I know him and he’s been too quiet today. I get that he’s still obviously emotional from being force to leave me here. He’s not acting like he usually does… I’m going to have to talk to him about this…’  “..."
0 "needs that is not" "... because she wanted see the walls white to make same with her room with Paul. She tried to turn Marcel as a replica of Paul to get fulfilment for her needs that is not provided by Paul. Paul’s monolog against to Rose’s death body reflects his ambivalence and opposite feelings for her. Rosa is not dead for Paul. In t..."
1 "I believe that some" "...two sales offices and a NATA endorsed technical services laboratory accredited under ISO 9001.   From my perspective in my exposure in the sales team I believe that some customers do place an up front value on using a supplier with ISO 9001 accreditation. Typically organisations that do value ISO accreditation are uti..."
1 "universal rules that everyone" "... Because I am so clear about my reasons for acting, I tend to believe that the motive justifies the method. I tend to believe that ethics is a set of universal rules that everyone must follow, just like I do. I follow the rules- everyone else should, too. My preferred lens is rights and responsibility. I use my reasoning skills..."
1 "leaders that were generated" "...s in this community issue are Allen Shaklan, Executive Director of Refugee Family Services, a nonprofit agency in Stone Mountain, Ga and twenty-seven leaders that were generated to partake in the Leadership in Action Program (LAP). Their roles were to increase school readiness and, children’s achievement in school and beyond ..."
0 "Liberals counter that the" "It is here that the two approaches differ greatest, as whilst Realists believe that war cannot be prevented, Liberals counter that the governing body of a powerful World Government could prevent war.   Both Realist and Liberal approaches have different outlooks. Realists firmly belie..."
1 "further proposed that as" "...enced less alcohol-related negative consequences (also see Araars & Adams 2008; Benton et al. 2004; Martens Taylor et al. 2004). D’Lima et al. (2012) further proposed that as PBS involve modifying drinking behaviours to avoid alcohol related negative consequences, they could be considered a type of alcohol specific SR. Sug..."
0 "you that is by" "... that they will lose you \t- They might be afraid of getting hurt \t- They might be in negative emotional states and the only way they know how to tell you that is by anger-projecting against you.  \t3 - Expectations: You'll be able to then see from their fears, what their expectations were of you. The possible expe..."
0 "one that was not" "...nsition I have made from the knowledge of this course thus far and how it will assist me in my future. I must say that I have found this course to be one that was not only fun but interesting as well. I say this because although we are well aware we negotiate things on a regular basis, the skill, knowledge, time, r..."
0 "is that" "...ng like yourself. This, coupled with the fact that you have a stronger compulsion as a female vampire, can cause you some anxiety. All I can tell you is that compulsion is hard to control at first for us all, but you’re going to be surrounding yourself with a lot of humans. Be careful, and if you accidenta..."
0 "rule states that when" "...t. As such, it can be concluded that Tom is bound by the express terms in the ‘heads of agreement’ and that the Parol Evidence Rule would apply. This rule states that when a contract is reduced into writing it is assumed to contain all relevant terms.    Has Tom breached any of the statutory warranties contained in the ..."
1 "data shows that there" "....  Figure. 4- Fall 2014- 1st Class Visit  Figure 5.-Spring 2015- 2nd Class Visit   Although the sample size decreased for the second class visit, the data shows that there was an increase in comfort level upon entering a teacher’s classroom and an increase in teacher’s willing to host others in their class.  We also ask..."
1 "must understand that permission" "...ted in all areas of suspected disability. Procedural safeguards and thorough explanations are critical as “informed consent” is the standard. Parents must understand that permission for this assessment may lead to the recommendation for special education eligibility.   The purpose of the initial IEP is to review all assessment da..."
1 "society deems that a" "...ded that official bodies cannot properly illegalize any subculture or practice due to the views that society have on that subculture or practice.  If society deems that a subculture is legitimate, illegalization cannot change the moral views of society.    The implications that this places on society include the realit..."
0 "never thought that Johnny" "...rcia when Dally was saying things that the girls didn’t like. This action really shocked me because Johnny looks up to Dally as an idol. I would have never thought that Johnny would defend two random girls. On top of it all Johnny is a little bit scared of Dally. \tThe theme of the outsiders is  \t"
1 "class believed that the" "...r.  This is examined in the book Ganja in Jamaica, where the drug laws in Jamaica were specifically targeting the working class, who the white ruling class believed that the working class were on the verge of overthrowing them.  This degree of law violation relates back to the idea of how distinctions to the extent that p..."
1 "theory stated that children" "..., 2002)                       Vygotsky’s theories emphasise the basic role of social interaction in the development of cognition. His social learning theory stated that children learn from imitating or modelling advanced peers and adults. The main aspects of his social learning theory are: scaffolding, guided participation, z..."
"to see that          " "... arm with a shot so he wouldn't die in this day. \"Wow this place is way different from the pictures I saw in a book\" Steve thought.. until he started to see that          " 0
0 "Client agree that the" "...nded if applicable), a valid and binding agreement shall be formed between the Client and Kika (the “Agreement”). DEFINITION OF SERVICES Kika and the Client agree that the Services to be provided are those as^set out in the Branding & Creative Proposal (the “Proposal”), a copy of which is attached to this Agreement; and..."
1 ") suggests that up" "...n is disabled, harm or behavioural signs can mistakenly be recognised as the disability rather than the abuse or neglect. Research by Sidebotham (2007) suggests that up to 40 percent of maltreatment-related deaths is probably the result of neglect, or a mixture of neglect and other forms of abuse, with death resultin..."
1 "can tell that I" "...ood.  \tThen, suddenly my feet are back on the ground and he’s pulling away from me. “I can’t do this,” he says. His eyes are on my face and I know he can tell that I’m hurt. “No, no,” he says shaking his head, “Just not here, like this, in a fucking alley.” He kisses my forehead and smooths back my hair. “What if ..."
1 "child that is of" "...n was assertiveness (2.0 out of 10), conflict resolution, and self- control.         He is going through a child custody legal issue at the time. The child that is of concern in this custody battle is not his biological child but an adopted child from a previous relationship. The child is a seven year old female an..."
0 "booktalk titles that students" "...ure in my classroom. Thankfully, we are lucky to have wonderful librarians who not only help students navigate the library, but also take the time to booktalk titles that students might be interested in reading. I invite the librarians into my classroom 2-3 times a year to speak to students. But our librarians―as wonderful as t..."
1 "to provide that information" "...onsume because, the FDA has the same regulations, and standards for foods, and crops containing GMOs to those with out GMOs, therefor there's no need to provide that information nor labels. Safe: meaning they won't cause us any health complications or illnesses. On the other hand, some people argue that GMOs aren't safe for c..."
0 "as perfect that he" "...rgiveness, Dorian recognises that he must repent for his sins, ‘however it is only for his egotistical desire for the painting to also reveal himself as perfect that he feels the need to repent, distorting the painting even more. This idea of repenting for sins corresponds with 19th century religious beliefs. With Ch..."
0 "I believe that credentials" "...s in my domain of study. Having that title behind your name indeed set's a higher standard and expectation of the average human service professional. I believe that credentials show employees and clients that we are competent in our field of study and capable of helping them with their problems. One last benefit that I must ..."
"Admit that I" "...y thinking the most and has been the most challenge for me is definitely admitted I don't yet possess the skills needed to become a critical thinker. Admit that I do not have a ability" 1
0 "who demanded that the" "...sts by Arab armies from North America lack of any powerful sub-Saharan states able to resist Muslim influences grassroots movement among poor Muslims who demanded that the ruling and commercial classes^respect their religion  16.  Which of the following religions spread from India into Southeast Asia? (3.4) Islam Buddhi..."
"to believe that he" "...nt of acting, Bob Brown playing Vanya gave a believable performance. His relaxed posture as he lounged in his chair sipping coffee leads the audience to believe that he spends every morn      " 1
1 "all that it has" "...l against their soceity? Is their rebellion successful? \tBoth Bernard and Helmholtz dispise living in their society at first, but then after learning all that it has to offer, Bernard changes h"
1 "she means that Mary" "...eft with “a certain disappointment”, suggesting that her inner-dialogue may be resentment (54).   Act 2 #5 By calling Mary Warren, “A mouse no more”, she means that Mary is starting to shape up to become a stronger^a bolder person. Due to Mary becoming an official, she now receives the attention she lacked previously...."
0 "exercise that is easy" "...entually, you may decide this is a good use of your time. The goal of this exercise is to help you build your composition technique through a regular exercise that is easy to complete. Over time, you may find that you want to go beyond writing the melody. The important thing is to get in the habit of creating something ..."
1 "is suggested that learners" "... all necessary qualities that are needed throughout a nurse’s career. This is one of some advantages that have been shown throughout the article.  It is suggested that learners who have taken in the SDL approach are the learners that take initiative within their own education. As Levett-Jones states it has been recommended t..."
0 "obstacle that is hard" "... caused. A big part of being proactive is to encourage yourself to be an even greater person than yesterday. This habit can also be used to handle an obstacle that is hard  to overcome. A good way to be proactive  is to use those baby steps that are provided at the end of each chapter to help you apply that habit faster..."
0 "purchase books that the" "...rders Book orders will be sent home during the year.  There is no obligation to order. If you are interested, this is a relatively inexpensive way to purchase books that the children can call their own.   Pictures We use student pictures throughout the building as a learning and teaching tool. If you do not want your chil..."
1 "and understands that they" "...e understand who we are communicating with and that what we conceptualize and the theme is being done right  The designer sees and hears the audience and understands that they are giving them the information n"
1 "substance that is used" "Zoe Hunt \tIndustrial Revolution \t8 SEALP SOSE \t19 July 2016    Anaesthetic   An anaesthetic is a drug-like substance that is used to induce insensitivity to pain. (dictionary.com)  Anaesthesia is commonly used in modern day surgeries and has been heralded as one of the greatest ..."
0 "I think that most" "... big as it is now.  The Untied States is getting help from other countries banks to loan us money to help us pay our bills and help other countries.  I think that most people or countries are not following the Garrett Hardin theory because in this day of age it does not make good sense and it makes you look like tha..."
1 "weaknesses are that I" "...since I started babysitting at 14.  I am very consistent. I give Kaylee clear expectations, and she knows exactly what the consequences will be.   My weaknesses are that I can be bossy.  Sometimes I say too much and “over lecture”.  I probably spoil her.  I seldom tell her no, but on the other hand, she rarely asks for ..."
1 "argument is that since" "...s, on the other hand, define economics and trade as strongly influenced by the principles of mercantilism, neo-colonialism, and colonialism. Theorist argument is that since States have discrete self-interests, they will protect local markets from foreign penetration and will constantly provide jurisdiction and resources ..."
1 "show people that you" "...s and what is and store and it's upsetting but she isn’t angry at the world. Her positive outlook gives an insight to hear purpose. Her purpose is to show people that you can be happy with a chronic illness, and that you can be a normal person. How other people react is addressed in the essay quite a bit. She talks abo..."
0 "Tribunal found that it" "...d their obligations to stop such activities.    The final ground for the Permanent Court of Arbitration’s decision, Aggravation of Dispute, where the Tribunal found that it lacked jurisdiction to consider the implications of a stand-off between Philippine marines and Chinese naval and law enforcement vessels at Second Th..."
0 "character that was depicted" "...ese forces that had started concentrating in the region. President Roosevelt was critical of the approaches that the country had used and a defensive character that was depicted by Japan compounded a war that had already begun.  The letter also contained a threat of the steps that the U.S. government would take if a war was t..."
1 "boy that was allowed" "...ich was around them.   \tJean-Jacques Rousseau (1712-1778) explained this theory further in his book Emile (1762), which described the life of a young boy that was allowed to grow up and develop “naturally”.  In this book, Rousseau claims that there are three acting forces on the education of a child; nature, man, and t..."
1 "realizing that it is" "...d transfusion for religion beliefs. Now this bloodless technique is growing for more than those who refuse for religion beliefs. Lot’s of doctors are realizing that it is a safer and cost effective way to avoid unnecessary blood transfusions.  This is a good article that supports on the benefits of bloodless surgeries...."
1 "Gran says that ‘" "...r.” And with that Tamsin was gone.   “What now?” Bo asked.   “Now we get drunk, dance and celebrate my dads life. Tomorrow we begin afresh with ours. Gran says that ‘every new beginning is another's beginning's end’ and it finally makes sense to me.” Lauren answered.   Lake house  The sound of rain could be heard o..."
1 "also recognize that the" "...ly and explore nature, history, and culture, and to engage with the world around you and make it a better place,  is the worthiest of objectives.  We also recognize that the ability to write opinion pieces that have a call to action, or analyze author’s point of view, using mentor texts to demonstrate beautiful narratives..."
1 "they state that they" "...k page they will “photograph just about anything”. They are currently offering 8 different packages with a range of prices at different locations and they state that they can tailor a package to suit individual needs. (Facebook, n.d.). According to Jo most of the photo shoots are done outside, she is unsure what her cl..."
1 "I believe that we" "...ed in the PLC, we learned many lessons moving forward. First, we learned that timing was important. Giving time for the process to unfold is crucial. I believe that we would not have been as successful if we were only given one year to plan and implement this project. Because we were given support for up to three ye..."
1 "I think that the" "...rticle that I read was “Why we Need to Keep iPads Out of the Classroom” this article’s main point was why we need to keep iPads out of the classroom. I think that the author chose this point over the others because of the fact that many schools get iPads because they believe that they will help the students excel b..."
0 "Silicon believes that FERC" "... USD 6.6 million including accrued interest of USD 0.7 million. The utility provider has filed a notice of appeal with the D.C. Court of Appeals. REC Silicon believes that FERC’s ruling will be sustained by the appeals court. The Company has reported other income of USD 5.9 million and interest income of USD 0.7 million in t..."
0 "is envisaged that this" "...to the application: Mobile application: this refers to all functions required for the user to access the application when the rules are satisfied. It is envisaged that this would be a mobile optimised web page Customer portal: this component manages users/customers and provides an interface for users to define and manage..."
1 "I think that you" "...became silent, 'Hmmm… I see… it seems that the traumatic event made him forget everything about his life before the fire.', then he finally admitted \"I think that you won't recover your memories, this kind of situation sometimes appears in patients with Post-Traumatic Stress Disorder and is difficult to recuperate...."
1 "which is that the" "...s arise that delay the resolution? (10-15 sentences)  \tThroughout the book there are several conflicts that deepen the plot of the book. The first of which is that the main character has a cancerous tumor in his brain. While going through other conflicts in the plot, Jack, the main character is always thinking about..."
1 "Spanish is that I" "...ased shows at the end of class. Even though it is Spanish class I dislike the way we talk. This is, because we have to speak Spanish. My strengths in Spanish is that I study well, and improvements should be classwork and learning the language. P.E. is a very fun subject we play games and we learn about fitness My fa..."
0 "key that was hanging" "...ed over to the door and pulled the handle, locked. “Uhh,” I said in disgust. Then I looked at the wall, then at the hook on the wall, and then at the key that was hanging on the hook that was attached to the wall. I picked it up and tried it in the door. It fit. We pulled open the door and stepped inside. Our eyes wide..."
0 "fact that it isn" "...oject I've ever been involved with due to the complexity of the subject (two dragons instead of one), the incredible detail of the engravings and the fact that it isn't just one component that's engraved, but the designs cover practically the whole watch.  - explains  Peter Speake-Marin   The ornate and beautiful e..."
1 "and services that they" "...ceries is trading the money earned from hours worked. Trading is very important and what makes interdependence possible. Countries have certain goods and services that they are exceptional at. They trade those goods and services for others that they cannot make or are not proficient at making it. Supply and Demand Curves..."
1 "we found that the" "...t. If the user has the authority then the data will be shown to him while if he doesn’t have it, the data won’t be visible. To analyze the algorithm, we found that the time evolution of the amplitudes of the marked and unmarked states can be described by first-order linear difference equations with some special prop..."
1 "to achieve that he" "...logical challenges he has previously faced in his life. With the right level of support and monitoring of progress he will have all the opportunities to achieve that he personally endeavours. Here are a number of future recommendations to help ensure he meets his potential in the near and distant future. Continue wit..."
1 "I believe that if" "...ey're not impossible nothing's impossible. I'm a big kid believe it or not I actually enjoy going to school so that I can learn more everyday because I believe that if I go to school then I'll be smarter than I was the day before. as this pattern continues on and on and on I won't be the smartest person in the world..."
1 "it is that I" "...promises worked for a few days, sometimes hours or not at all.   Later after much talking and louder and louder arguments, I remember you asking what it is that I like about the phone so much. I remember telling you that it made me happy. The phone doesn’t ask anything of me and is always there when i need it. ..."
1 "We theorize that the" ".... Educational games could serve as a solution since they have proven to also be an effective tool to motivate low-performing students (Meyer, 2015).  We theorize that the implementation of Dr. Raul Portuondo’s methodology on the instruction of third-year grade students of the Cartesian plane through educational boards ..."
1 "I think that if" "...s my face with his hands. “Look at me, Rixie. I need to know that this is what you want. That you want me, because I’m not easy to-to care about, and I think that if this is you and me, that neither one of us is playing.” \t“It’s dangerous to care about someone else now,” I start, “but I do.” \tHe nods and looks at ..."
1 "I believe that A" "...y end of the book. This is important because the way society sees one person or another it can change them in many different ways.  Journal 3: Title  I believe that A Long Way Gone is an apropriate title for Ishmeal Beah’s book. In A Long Way Gone Ishmael leaves his old life behind him, family, friends and his way ..."
1 "one that was contacting" "...him a few days ago and finally said it. I explained how much the team subconsciously set itself apart from me, especially while he was gone. The only one that was contacting me was Luke, and even that was limited because of North’s constant grumbling and yelling around the house. He’s just mad because Luke has me to talk ..."
0 "also realized that it" "...g in the beginning but it has truly helped me grow on a more professional level and financially. By observing and displaying these work ethics I have also realized that it is very instrumental with overcoming obstacles in the workplace.  Furthermore, surrounding  yourself with successful and professional individuals mot..."
1 "have said that with" "...ve discovered I line up even better with the Libertarian Party than I do as a republican.   The libertarian parties’ motto is “live and let live”.  I have said that with regard to government and how it should affect individuals before.  I agree with their views on everything, something I could not say with the republi..."
1 "I see that our" "...rl smiles. Seeing the two polar opposite students befriend each other, the class ease up with a heavy sigh. “Nurufufufu,” a familiar voice snickers, “I see that our resident bully have ease up on Miss Sinclair. My aren’t you becoming such a softie.” “KORO-SENSEI!” a collective the students voices gasp. The said t..."
0 "Foster explains that every" "...evelop the character. Every action is purposely placed to further develop the character. In the chapter Every Trip is a Quest (Except When It’s Not), Foster explains that every action a character completes has an impact on his/her development. This is symbolized when Foster told the story of Kip, a boy who went on a trip to ..."
1 "learns is that to" "...yet he would never forget everything that would lead to that, including the prosperity and hardships that came with it.  10.\tOne lesson that Santiago learns is that to progress forward, change needs to be constant. This lesson also has a great impact on the merchant because his business becomes successful after he c..."
1 "study found that patients" "..., 2012). Furthermore, a study that targeted understanding self-management experiences of patients with COPD and the challenges of such practices; the study found that patients’ practices evolved as they experienced symptoms of COPD; however, there was no evidence about whether these measures would have an effect on improvin..."
1 "lexicons is that this" "...ious applications that require access to lexical information.                   The basic difference between this and other projects of computational lexicons is that this is the only project in relatively large scale in which has had as fundamental idea the organization of the lexicon in semantic fields. In fact, the p..."
1 "I pray that no" "...n anyone else was even there. “Jesus, that got dark fast,” says Gavin, looking uneasy.” \t“I’m much better now,” I insist. “That was a long time ago.” I pray that no one asks me if I’m glad now. Although I wouldn’t--won’t ever--try again I’m still not thankful. There was never any epiphany, no newfound appreciatio..."
0 "do jobs that Brits" "...o can just walk through, use your common sense.   The thing I see a lot when immigration is mentioned is \"they're taking our jobs\". No, most migrants do jobs that Brits see as \"beneath them\" and would rather be on benefits! Or they're taking our benefits or taking our houses! Again, no. You have to have a job to move..."
0 "so that it was" "... grinning with his hands in his jean pocket. She nodded, smiling and followed him to his Mercedes-Benz.  \"Where to?\" He asked, turning the radio down so that it was playing softly in the background. She gave him the address and he pulled out heading there.  \"So where you from?\"  \"I was originally born in Hawaii b..."
1 "I believe that the" " CHAPTERS 1-3  Literary Element Response  Setting  I believe that the woods have great significance on his life. I think they have a great significance because it was a place he could forget about his problems and be by..."
1 "is envisaged that this" "...to the application: Mobile application: this refers to all functions required for the user to access the application when the rules are satisfied. It is envisaged that this would be a mobile optimised web page Customer portal: this component manages users/customers and provides an interface for users to define and manage..."
0 "just assumed that he" "...It meant a lot to me and I always wore it, but I’d left it in a hotel room years ago and we never found it. Harry said he’d replace it one day, and I just assumed that he had forgotten over time, and to be honest, so had I.  “I said I’d replace it one day. I’m sorry it’s so late,” he said, half smiling.  “It’s okay. Th..."
0 "mother noticed that the" "... I placed second in the race. At the end of the race, I bent over and placed my hands on my knees to grasp my breath. At that present moment, my step mother noticed that the right side of my back was significantly larger than the other. This was disturbing and unexpected, thus a doctor’s appointment was set so that we cou..."
1 "’s that?" "... breakfast bar. I put the kettle on and got four mugs out of the cupboard, ignoring Harry as he came into the kitchen. “What about you, Harry?”  “What’s that?” he asked as he sat down next to my dad.  “Work?”  “Oh. It’s going really good, actually.”  “He’s opening up a new studio on New York,” I said.  “Oh ..."
1 ") state that there" "...erns thus helping them feel they belong and allowing them to continue on to the next level on the hierarchy of needs.   Morton-Cooper and Palmer (2000) state that there are three phases of a mentor/student relationship that can help the student feel they belong.  These phases are initiation which coincides with orien..."
1 "and that is false" "...decision not only affects women, but the world’s view on Muslim countries. We tend to be seen as countries that own and decide the lives of our women and that is false. I for one do not believe that men should be given any kind of authority over women, you should be under your own control. I hate seeing stuff like t..."
1 "area that is able" "...ustomers  Criteria For Selecting  An IKEA Store Location    One of the most important aspects of selecting a location for an IKEA store is to find an area that is able to support the size of the store.  IKEA furniture store are built like large warehouses and need the right amount of space in order to display their ..."
"sisters home that the" "...y paralyzed. The little boy hesitates to ask if he has died. After having a nightmare about Father Flynn, the young boy eventually finds out from the sisters home that the priest has died.  \t \t \t" 1
1 "woods that is away" "...ilization and having to live a simplistic life. This is exactly what Thoreau has done and recounts in his novel. He moves into a minimal shack in the woods that is away from society where he is completely^surrounded by nature. He describes his house as having a small amount of furniture and not even having a walkway ..."
0 "Kiritsugu that was calmly" "...o see her Big brother taste hers food. With a big grin on her face Miyu gave the meal to each one and they started to eat. They were all talking sans Kiritsugu that was calmly reading a newspaper, however one thing that they were missing except the latter was how his cup of tea was shaking on the table. The Emiya's veteran ..."
1 "you said that 1" "...ntrol them. For example, if your mom asks you to clean your room and you say “sure” and then in 1 hour she asks again and you say “yes” and she says “you said that 1 hour ago” and you say “that's the way I am”. That's not true because you control YOU.  Habit 2 - Begin with the end in mind   The meaning of begin wi..."
1 "researchers believe that if" "...d rich, thick description (Merriam, 2002).  All researchers attempt to design and implement good/ethical and trustworthy studies. Indeed, qualitative researchers believe that if a study is credible, it has to be good in the ethical sense and be trustworthy. A sound case study is significant and complete, utilizes alternative ..."
1 "and sees that it" "...The man looks around to see why the dogs are singing and sees a green, glowing object that appeared to be moving. He slowly gets closer to the object and sees that it is not a human, it is a figure. One of the dogs come up to explore it, then pees on it. This helps the man discover that is a stump that soaked up ph..."
0 "and suggested that it" "...difficult.  GHBank President Chatchai Sirilai (ฉัตรชัย ศิริไล) however, said it is possible that Germany’s savings system can be adapted for Thailand and suggested that it would work well for new graduates entering the work system who wish to own their own home within 3 to 5 years.  The bank believes it can issue up to ..."
1 "faces that" "...Darren. “Darren!” I called as I rushed over to his seat. I placed down my plate and beamed my eyes at Darren. “Oh what is it now, rubbing in people’s faces that you got extra sugar or what?” Darren snapped. I roll my eyes. “Darren, for the last time, just because-” I started. “Ugh, yes I realize but seriously..."
1 "I see that my" "...oming with my diaper bag it's Carrie, she opens the diaper bag and she takes the changing pad out from the diaper bag and place it down on the floor. I see that my nanny is taking a clean disposable diaper from the diaper bag that she place beside the changing pad. She is also taking a pack of wet wipes from my ..."
1 "you believe that you" "...e “I” am aware of it.  December 22, 2015 To “want” something means you feel that you “lack” that which you want. For example, to want to belong means you believe that you lack being related to or a part whatever you perceive as not belonging to. On my drive home, I was talking to the plant, we call a poinsettia and I t..."
0 "I realized that Luke" "...ll be staying.”   Following him out and up the stairs, I heard Gabriel and a few of the others yelling in a different part of the house. This is when I realized that Luke barely spoke since we’ve arrive here, which was weird for someone who was usually the life of every conversation and Gabriel’s partner in crime. Howe..."
0 "and that is conveyed" "...n   This story about war is true. War changes people; it changes the way they view the world as a whole but doesn’t necessarily change their beliefs, and that is conveyed through a war story, a true war story. One that doesn’t hold back. One that you are too embarrassed to tell. One where the truth seems surreal and we..."
"like that it can" "You sure you good ? 👍🏽 usually when someone acts like that it can mean something is wrong, something is bothering you ? I'm always here for you if you wanna talk. You've been there for me and,  I can be there for yo..." 1
1 "Sculptures that were made" "...lobal significance of Benin was their art. Benin was most famous for their sculptures. The sculptures were made out of terra cotta, ivory, and brass. Sculptures that were made out of brass were the best.^The brass sculptures told legendary and historical scenes. Also, the Edo people were able to make “life-size terra cotta ..."
1 "believed that it traveled" "...urope and even as far as Eastern Asia. What is not certain is whether the knowledge was being shared, or being discovered around the same time.  It's believed that it traveled into Europe through Anatolia (today known as Turkey) to Greece. Then further north to Balkans (Romania, Austria, and Italy) through the Danube areas,..."
0 "evident that it’" "...to help him recover. He hated his family and left them as soon as he possibly could. When researchers search for the source of these behaviors,  it’s evident that it’s a mixture between both nurture and nature. He was born a troubled child and was tortured in boarding school, both leading him to the person he becam..."
0 "11 advises that psychologists" "...plagiarism is a key component that authors, both professional and amateur must be watchful. The APA Ethical Standard regarding Plagiarism, standard 8.11 advises that psychologists are held to maintaining integrity in their research (American Psychological Association, 2011; Cozby, 2015). From copying paragraphs, sentences, or p..."
1 "environment that is free" "... management at Hunter's considers its first responsibility to be the safety and health of its employees. Management’s responsibility is to provide an environment that is free from workplace hazards. Management provides direction and full support of all safety procedures, job training and hazard elimination practices. We mu..."
1 "you think that this" "...is but I'm no child, and I'm not going to be one for anybody espeacialy you. You and your King think your stronger and better than everybody else and you think that this  war is for a purpose, but your wrong..... It is no purpose but a grudge. I don't care if you take me away or kill me and i dont know if you'll do ei..."
0 ") found that 14" "...t women were more likely to drink at risky levels (Elliott, Latimer, Fitzpatrick, Oscar, & Carter, 2012).   In Northern Australia, Tew and Zhang (2010) found that 14 percent of Indigenous pregnant women reported drinking during first midwife visit, dropped to 8 percent during third trimesters; while only eight per..."
1 ", that is where" "...t day Serenity, New Mexico. Every house looks identical which comes with a pool and a tree house. They also all have jobs usually at the plastics work, that is where most of serenity work so no one is without a job. Serenity is a rural place it doesn’t have many people in the community. Everyone knows everyone the..."
0 "would think that I" "...ends’ or my future.’  “If it’s about Sang, then it would be worth the pain if I can possibly help prevent it,” I glared at him, getting angry that he would think that I wouldn't abandon or not risk myself for any one of my team members, even if they seemed to be okay with abandoning me.  “Fuck off, Gabriel,” he growl..."
0 "them promise that they" "...nd, considering the average for a magus with an ancient lineage is 20-80 Circuits, this was unexpected. When the sudden shock wore off Kiritsugu made them promise that they won't reveal this to anyone with an unusual face of fear. He told them about his past, how a cheerful boy in a remote island has his life destroyed w..."
0 "and that is true" "...school work.  When students are invested in the educational process and can see how their curiosity can construct results they are motivated to learn and that is true inquiry. Personal Reflection: \tIn our society intelligence is no longer identified by who can memorize and rattle off the most facts.  Most people ha..."
0 "showed that" "...implications on Australia’s health system are expensive and in many cases avoidable. A recent Australian diabetes cost study (Bloomgarden 2007 p. 1), showed that with 7.4% or close to one million Australians with Type 2 diabetes, the cost to the country’s health system is approximately $3 billion per year comp..."
0 "is believed that an" "...h and causes global warming. For instance, america faces this crises of overcrowding car and environmental hazards such as skin cancers.  However, it is believed that an effective solution to this problem can be an increase in oil and gas prices . As a matter of fact , this  will limit the use of cars and as a result ..."
"I suggest that you" "Ms. Cybulski,  I suggest that you contact Donyell Batts dlbatts@unc.edu or 919-843-7827, Student Service Specialist, in the Chemistry Department. In regards, to the Math 130 self-pace..." 1
1 "study that was conducted" "...            This study will focus on the luxury market, specifically on luxury brands, which consist of fashion luxury products/ goods. In a previous study that was conducted on luxury products (Melika &^Muris, 2009), the consumers of luxury products thought that price was less of an importance than the actual quality of t..."
1 "savings that were in" "...hen he hears that the Abbey bank is bankrupt. This comes as a shock for Anne and Marilla, for Matthew who worked the whole farm is gone and all their savings that were in the Abbey bank too. Anne and Marilla don't know what to do. Should Anne go to Redmond College and leave Marilla at Green Gables? Who will work the fa..."
"I am that I" "...evil of adults and many other things. I feel that the three mockingbirds truly were innocent in their situations. I can’t describe in words how happy I am that I read this book and truly had a valuable lesson on life." 0
1 "only say that Google" "... other web apps that work with Google drive, the possibilities are endless.  Google Docs.  This is not a Microsoft Office vs Google Docs thing. I can only say that Google docs offers the basics functionalities^for small business.  I am able to write this article and other types of documents with no issues, nor I feel l..."
1 "Assistant position that you" "...ington, Vic 3350 M: 0431175495     ​​​​​​​​​                2nd June 2016   Dear Sir/Madam,     RE: OSHC Assistant       I wish to apply for the OSHC Assistant position that you have advertised. I believe I possess the skills and knowledge to effectively fulfil the requirements of this role.   I’m currently studying a Bachelo..."
1 "and theorized that the" "... more complex Bitner, Brown, and Meuter (2000); Salomann et al. (2007) suggested that companies view technology as a way to enhance service exchanges and theorized that the increasing role of technology in such encounters offers benefits to both customers and firms. Service delivery is characterized by human error which ..."
1 "instead suggested that researchers" "...ng, to be credible, qualitative researchers must be good and trustworthy. Stake (1995) cautioned qualitative researchers against narrow thinking, and instead suggested that researchers learn to understand their research as their participants do, rather than impose their own assumptions. In qualitative research, these protocols come ..."
1 "to ensure that both" "...een prepared and effectively implemented to control customer complaints and returns.  Each procedure details the purpose, criteria and methods needed to ensure that both the operation and control of the applicable processes for complaints and returns are effective, secure and meeting regulations.   Procedures for supp..."
1 "she realizes that “" "...main ideas and mixes it into an indirect adaptation from the mindset of a woman name Anna. In Oates story it shows the action of Anna’s behavior when she realizes that “the stranger” (Oates) has come to Ohio to meet her. Oates Anna, was startled by her lover “the stranger” (Oates) visit. “Panic rose in her long shudde..."
1 "distinction is that the" "...the composer writes the harmonic background. The Passacaglia uses a ground bass pattern, while the chaconne uses a primary harmonic sequence. Another distinction is that the passacaglia is usually more grave, and in a minor mode while the chaconne consists of a set of variations on a harmonic theme and in a major key. La ..."
1 "has decided that it" "...elor     Red Davis is passionate about making a difference in his community and helping young people.  So much so, that at this point in his life, he has decided that it is time to make his volunteer work his primary occupation.  Red has recently returned to college at CSN (College of Southern Nevada) to earn his cert..."
1 "to ensure that both" "...een prepared and effectively implemented to control customer complaints and returns.  Each procedure details the purpose, criteria and methods needed to ensure that both the operation and control of the applicable processes for complaints and returns are effective, secure and meeting regulations.   Procedures for supp..."
0 "and trust that others" "...l, I have learned numerous life lessons that are extremely valuable. For example, I know how to work with others as a team, delegate responsibilities and trust that others will do their job. I have learned how to tackle stressful situations, especially when something does not go according to plan and I have also acquire..."
1 "I realized that I" "... As a first generation college student, I have greater responsibilities, and it is hard to keep track. Going over my college schedule multiple times, I realized that I have free time almost every day except for Tuesdays and Thursday. The question is “how will I manage that time?” I plan to study and do my homework i..."
0 "to see that I" "...hool and the grades were up. The first thing I saw was that my average raised up to a “B” and was ecstatic. I clicked on my average and scrolled down to see that I aced the test. I was so happy. The reason I got the “A” was because I believed in myself and knew I could do it with hard work and determination. I b..."
0 "side that was thought" "...o unfold. The thought of integrating schools brought out a side of the white citizens of Little Rock that no one had seen, it brought out  the racist side that was thought to not even be a side of the community as a whole itself. Violence towards African Americans, and even white people that supported desegregation was ..."
0 "” is that he" "...ar, and is able to manipulate the whole society to reach John Proctor.   Act 3 #3 What Giles means what he says that “he broke charity with that woman” is that he ruined his wife’s reputation and status through saying that she read books secretly. He says this, “openly weeping” because he never had the intent t..."
1 "have demonstrated that compliance" "... strategies recommended by epidemiologists and infection control teams are a product of the primary healthcare teams at the bedside, however, studies have demonstrated that compliance to such policies can suffer at times (Peterson & Walker 2006). The World Health Organisation’s (WHO) Prevention of Hospital-Acquired Infections: A Pr..."
0 "which recognised that a" "...nd paid little attention to wider economic or social issues. The principle was then popularised in 1983 by the Our Common Future (Brundtland) Report, which recognised that a trade-off was required between economic development and the preservation of the environment, given the rapidly growing global population and the Eart..."
1 "for help that I" "..., spontaneous , and even hard headed. Even for me I was confused on who I am as an individual in society. Then I went to my closest and best  friends for help that I love with as much love the heart can give. With their wake up call I realized my best qualities that I use within and outside of school. The qualitie..."
1 "’ beats that I" "...is blazing his own path to greatness. Please help me in welcoming Meechie to the stage.\" The audience claps loudly as I strut out to one of my knockin’ beats that I slipped to the audio guy. After I hug the hostess I take a seat on the posh love seat and cross my legs so everyone can peep my customized-by-me snea..."
1 "I realized that the" "...ver, I did notice quite a bit of similar limitations found in each one. As I thought more about adoption and the limitations on all adoption research I realized that the vast amount of variables could make it really hard to find answers for how to help families cope with adopting a young child. Some of the limitations..."
0 "to show that China" "...re soldiers and slaves.  Why was the Great Wall built and what is it used for? Emperor Qin Shi Huang built the wall after he unified China. He wanted to show that China was a single country rather than several states and was also built to stop the Mongols from the north invading China. Genghis Khan was the ruler of t..."
0 "are reminded that the" "...laining why certain answers go in specific places and what their functions are.  Conclusion:  What does the conclusion of the lesson entail? Learners are reminded that the notes they create are vital for studying. The more indepth they make their notes the more they will have to study from and if they fail to fill out t..."
1 "Paul explains that he" "... 2 guys in the black suits walk away. Mark goes into his camper and starts to talk with Paul and how he can help him get his ship back and head home. Paul explains that he needs fuel and a scrap piece of metal for his ship. Mark starts to think about where he can get a scrap piece of metal. Paul said the back end piece ..."
1 "populations that was mentioned" "...ns (Andamanese, Papuan, Australian etc.) and replaced the first OOA populations.  In this thesis we supported single OOA hypothesis (at least for the populations that was mentioned earlier to be created from first OOA event). It is interesting to mention that remnant of first OOA modern humans were discovered inside Neanderthals..."
1 "this job that I" "...My bank account has always more € 4.000 minimum. I win the lottery once a year I work from home I am a teacher and I get to earn a lot of money doing this job that I love so much. I adore my work-from-home and my husband is so proud of me and of my job. My job is in the IT/technology field and it’s related to teac..."
1 "One says that Lydia" "...you think of them, not based on what other people have told you.    Chapter 46 \tAfter returning to the Lambton, Elizabeth finds two letter from Jane. One says that Lydia has married Mr. Wix                       In Chapter 47 and 48                        In Chapter 56                        In Chapters 59, 60 and 61 ..."
1 "Banks reported that he" "... him. He participates in the Medical House Call Program and Dr. George Tyler is his Primary Care Physician.   Family Support / Community Support  Mr. Banks reported that he had a daughter; LaWanda Evans, and his three sons are all deceased. He reportedly lost his first in in 1996 and the other two in 2011. He seemed to s..."
1 "Lily realized that there" "...ell. From Neil, Lily learned to never give up on what you believe in, because eventually you will finally get the result you want. From Clayton Wood, Lily realized that there are still good white adults out there who will treat blacks nicely, and that not all white adults are bad people. Throughout books especially this bo..."
1 "even claim that “" "...op from pest by killing them. They can be found in potatoes, cotton, and corn.  In 1995 the United States authorized the first Bt in potatoes.   Some even claim that “ there is evidence that Bt will impact directly on human through damage to the ileum [the final portion of the small intestine, which joins it to the ..."
0 "content that is familiar" "...his lesson.  Effectiveness/success – did learning take place? Yes learning did take place. This leson has taught me that by beginning the lesson with content that is familiar to the learners the teacher is provided with the opportunity to open up the lesson to the prospect of developing their understanding and building upo..."
0 "to realize that Olivia" "...g behind us only moments ago.   “Let’s go, hurry up!” He said, bouncing on the pads of his feet as he ushered us in the room, and it took me a second to realize that Olivia didn’t follow us in when he closed the door.   I looked around to find five people standing in the room. Gabriel was sitting with a man who looked ju..."
1 "reality that is created" "...er suicide and male half naked body Paul’s sexual history with Jeanne in the apartment. Also distorted face of the man in the painting represents the reality that is created by Paul and Jeanne in the apartment. Paul is lies down on the reddish textile (Rosa’s blood) because he cannot escape from the guilty feeling. Paul’s..."
0 "I guess that’" "...care he gave her. “I guess Mr. Bing forgot to call and let you know I would be here working on getting the place cleaned up?” “No he didn’t call, but I guess that’s why he said he would call tonight.  It’s nice to meet you.”  he responded, shaking her proffered hand. “I’m really sorry I scared you Miss Bayhill.”..."
0 ", that is all" "... answer, is what product or service are you offering the end user, and what requirements do you need to meet your service goals? At the end of the day, that is all your user is concerned with, and that’s what will make your website, brand, service or app a must have.  How can we determine together if a mobile ap..."
0 "he believes that their" "...a careful preparation of allies”. Additionally, Barrett questions the traditional view of ancient writers on her influence over Claudius’ principate, he believes that their collaboration seems to transformed” Claudius’ regime because “she was an aggressive supporter of his political agenda” and more importantly, their ma..."
1 "also learned that there" "...not move. It is beneficial to a business when they can have the amount of Inventory on hand to satisfy the needs of the costumers and the business. I also learned that there are a number of different costs that are factored into a business’s inventory cost analysis. Each one of this cost must be carefully examined careful..."
1 "Rank knows that he" "...t Nora denies it.  The two discuss the plans for  the evening, Nora wants to make sure Dr Rank, a mutual friend will be attending. Torvald replies Dr Rank knows that he is always welcome and therefore doesn't need to be invited. The door bell rings,  Torvald returns to his study room. It was Dr Rank and Nora’s childh..."
1 "also means that they" "...Value: 3.5 Power banks are big bussiness right now especally that poeple are getting outdoors now to play games on their battery hunger devices. This also means that they are no longer very expensive like they were a few months back. You are also finding high captivity batteries (16000mAh+) in the below $20 range so it..."
1 "so terrified that he" "... alone with her new husband.  It wasn’t that she didn’t want it to happen, it was the nervousness that Brandon would finally see her and that she was so terrified that he will be disappointed that he is married this big fat cow. She turned to look at herself in the mirror, turning so that she could see her body and wha..."
1 "meaning that is conveyed" "...at has stolen clocks and now has to face its punishment for this wrong act. After analyzing all these details the definition that suits better to the meaning that is conveyed in this headline it's the following: S: (n) prison term, sentence, time (the period of time a prisoner is imprisoned) \"he served a prison term of 15 ..."
0 "serum that is specific" "...in Reaction (PCR) — Direct detection of microbe DNA.  Indirect (serology) Enzyme-linked Immunoassay (ELISA, EIA) — Measures antibody in the patient’s serum that is specific to microbial antigens (part of the microbe) by using labeled enzymes to bind the antibody for measurement.  Immunofluorescence Assay (IFA) — Utilizes..."
0 "to ensure that the" "...ery month can make a big difference for a family in desperate need. However, insofar as these assistance programs are provided by government, we need to ensure that the inherent problems of bureaucracy do not inadvertently incentivize dependence. These workers need incentives to become self-reliant and they need the ..."
1 "him that it “" "...cent direct communication between him and the Party,” Udham Singh instructed his solicitor, Robert Clayton, to respond to the Sikh Temple and assured him that it “would bring in anything up to £1,000” (IPI to Mr. Silver 23 April 1940). Engaging the Ghadar Party for funds seems to have irritated some Indians conn..."
1 "questionnaire that was sent" "...es of open ended questions) (Sekaran & Bougie 2013:3) as the questionnaire does have a few open ended questions as well. Refer to Appendix A1 for the questionnaire that was sent out to the respondents. Appendix A2 depicts a decision tree followed in order to answer the survey questions. The decision tree is the basis on which..."
1 "also mean that we" "...eyes, my own beauty reflected.” This suggests that the lake used him for it’s own selfish purpose and Narcissus did the same. However, the myth could also mean that we tend to see things in the way that they affect us. Narcissus never saw the lake as a gift of nature, but instead he just saw his own narcissistic sel..."
1 "I believe that you" "...e receptionist said that people were calling in asking where they could find your poem. I was impressed, Meechie, great eye contact, strong delivery. I believe that you gave them your very best you.”  But I really can’t wait until they meet my friends, Mr.J.   ‘’Hello there Meechie, the producers are so excited about..."
1 "information that is contradictory" "...ity to represent a larger population. Surveys However are not ideal for the issues that are controversial in nature because the respondents will give information that is contradictory as opposed to the expected results.  Question 2: Three conclusions Deduced from the Graphs  The bar graphs on page 34 deduced from the survey conduct..."
"and that was not" "...his crazy monkey.   The boy thought for a few days, and decided to tell the monkey to leave. He was getting creepy. This monkey was murdering people, and that was not okay to the boy. " 0
1 "has announced that it" "...ent of time, cost and resources into account, a new process can be hard to justify no matter the benefits that we can outline.  Consider this: Google has announced that it will be giving significant weight^to mobile-friendly sites in mobile search. The biggest content portal in the world is looking at the same metrics w..."
1 "managers believe that their" "...rs\". The 80% of people who do not receive a service of appropriate quality care they decide to buy elsewhere. The problem is the 80% of the owners or managers believe that their company offer a superior customer service, but as many as 54% of their customers do not perceive it.                                                 ..."
1 "think that was a" "...kham, and is just using the money as an excuse. She also tells Elizabeth that she must not embarras her father by becoming attached to Mr. Wickham. I think that was a little harsh, but I adm                                                                  In Chapter 27 and 28 \t\t\t\t \t                      In Chapter ..."
"and advised that the" "Called  Vernon Heating & Air Conditioning regarding missed ETA, Spoke to Cyntiya who redispatched SR and advised that the  Tech will contact VIXXO shortly." 1
0 "result found that the" "...d the relationship between interest rate and stock market ,They employed the regression model to analysis, data during the period from 2008-2012, The result found that the interest rate have a negative impact^on the stock market.  Naik and Phadi (2012) employed VECM and cointegration analysis to investigate the relation..."
0 "consider that" "...s, are working now to save on commission fees by recapturing those OTA reservations through direct bookings.   Gated Discounts  When you buy a hotel, consider that many large chains, as well as small, independent hotels, are now rewarding customers with discounts, typically about 10%, via a “gated discount” wher..."
1 "such that it could" "...e of first understanding the scope of the project for which we are developing a solution, while also ensuring not to over document in too much detail such that it could paralyze the project through overly detailed analysis of requirements.  Develop Iteratively Develepment of the project will be completed in iteration..."
1 "so that it is" "...and accomplish victory (ftp.cdc.gov). Effective communication is a give-and-take street. It is not only how an individual expressage a subject matter so that it is received and understood, it is also how one listen to increase the full grandness of what is being expressed and making an individual feel heed to an..."
0 "also believed that it" "...ough reflection and dialogue to better help the child understand their mistakes as a means of developing into more empathetic members of society.  He also believed that it was the role of an educator to develop informal instruction to better facilitate the child’s learning, (Tracey & Morrow, 2012).  Pestalozzi’s  model ..."
1 "and advise that she" "...ting and update/ new ETA   Called  Guardian Fueling Technologies - Fort Lauderdale regarding missed ETA, spoke to Amanda who took the SR  information and advise that she will ask to tech to contact - No answer . Avoice message was left advising that this emergency SR ETA  was missed.  I also spoke with TL John Denny a..."
1 "internationally recognized that ISIS" ".... High Commissioner for Human Rights determined the actions of ISIS “may amount to war crimes, crimes against humanity, and possibly genocide.” It is internationally recognized that ISIS has committed sickening human rights violations, deliberately targeting specific ethnic and religious groups, woman and children, including Christian..."
1 "he recalled that “" "...he boundaries of ethnicity. While explaining his chosen name to Divisional Detective Inspector John Swain, after he had been detained in Caxton Hall, he recalled that “when I was seven I call myself Mohamed Singh. I like Mohamedan religion and I try to mix with Mohamedans” (Swain 16 March 1940, MEPO 3/1743). Furtherm..."
0 "I see that there" "...were nonexistent. Although he was nought but a child at the time, when he said, “‘If I’m here and you’re me, how can you be there at the same time?”, I see that there may be a hidden meaning to the phrase. It could mean that he wondered how there could be any possibility where his ideal self from the mirror could b..."
1 "and resulted that the" "...eover, we insured them that this interview is confidential.  We were understanding and good listeners to a family member when they were communicating and resulted that the family trust of us and feel comfortable. In addition, that helps to make a therapeutic relationship between family member and us. We described that t..."
0 "to realise that your" "... the society of my new home country. Therefore don't give up and keep on going. Slowly, after you secured a financially stable future, you will begin to realise that your family, friends and lifestyle outweigh the negativity. That's the moment where you know that from now on life is going to be really good. Now you kno..."
0 "and found that everyone" "...oy stood over his form. Another man was sitting on the ground, however this man didn’t seem fazed that he was in that position. I then took inventory and found that everyone was safe, including Gabriel.   Seeing the boy standing over North menacing, despite his size, angered me. I lifted the gun and cocked it at the boy. ..."
0 "to see that I" "...hool and the grades were up. The first thing I saw was that my average raised up to a “B” and was ecstatic. I clicked on my average and scrolled down to see that I aced the test. I was so happy. The reason I got the “A” was because I believed in myself and knew I could do it with hard work and determination. I b..."
0 "clearly defines that the" "...n of the board and company’s compliance with all of the ASX’s recommended corporate governance principles.  Cochlear’s corporate governance statement clearly defines that the “Board is responsible to Cochlear’s shareholders and other stakeholders for the Company’s overall performance.  The board’s prime objectives are to i..."
1 ") found that for" "...ysically and emotionally safe within their environment, this can be achieved by the relationship between mentor and mentee.  Rogers and Freiberg (1994) found that for an effective working relationship three conditions must be meet the first acceptance, of who the individual is, for their strengths and weaknesses an..."
1 "change that was not" "...o make the correction. If you do not maintain your home you will receive fines. You will need to follow the new standards even if you recently made a change that was not approved before hand. If the cost of the project is a problem, please come to the office to discuss the matter.  T There is a program we offer to hel..."
0 "she says that “" "... Abigail uses truly reveals she is willing to go large lengths to protect her reputation. She can deceive and trap the girls with a scare tactic when she says that “Indians smash my dear parents’ heads on the pillow next to mine”, showing that she may keep her plan hidden through having others follow up with her p..."
1 "meaning that it is" "...ilable for German shepherds. It has all the required ingredients for a nutritionally balanced diet. Most of it comes from pork meal and deboned beef, meaning that it is high in protein.   60 percent of it is beef while the rest is whole grains and fresh produce in equal parts. It has 35 percent carbs, 30 percent fat,..."
1 "and agree that arbitration" "...orced as a foreign arbitral award.   2.2  DEFINITION AND TYPES OF ARBITRATION Arbitration is basically an agreement between parties who come together and agree that arbitration will be used as a mean to decipher disputes which are likely to occur in the future out of the legal relationship. Arbitration can also be defined as..."
0 "data dictate that we" "... and an assessment/modification plan.  Despite the use of subcommittees and common planning time to achieve these goals, staff surveys and assessment data dictate that we are not making adequate progress toward them.  “21st century student outcomes require a deeper understanding of academic content at much higher level..."
1 "which stipulates that everyone" "...deprived of their liberty however of particular relevance are ECHR Articles 5 (1) e (the detention of persons of unsound mind) and ECHR Article 5 (4) which stipulates that everyone who has been detained should have the right to a legal process and a speedy review to test the legality of their detention. {{9 Marshall, J., 2008;}}..."
1 "been documented that it" "...crease seizures; the effects of the drug on memory has not been frequently studied. Although many people do not feel that Cannabis is harmful, it has been documented that it can cause neurocognitive deficits, relationship difficulties, education issues, employment issues and mental health issues.        According to the a..."
1 "lose people that you" "... injuries. Some short term effects are headaches, neck and back pains, numbness and even abdominal pain but one major effect is that you may not only lose people that you love or you may even get killed. Some minor effects are that you might get your car impounded and demerit points against your name.   Some solutions ..."
1 "truth is that the" "...aponry are those who decide what truths will be trumpeted around the world  and what truths will be silenced and suppressed  Summary   The problem of truth is that the human mind has no inner compass to seek it unless it provides some sort of benefit. The mind is a predator of its own survival, and so whatever aids ..."
1 "also agree that the" "...rbitral awards 1958 is primarily used to enforce awards. When both parties to the agreement have their place of business in different states and they also agree that the arbitration will be bound by the NYC if any dispute arises. International arbitration is the preferred means for settlement of petroleum disputes, be..."
0 "be argued that up" "...proximately 10-20% of the population carry the S. aureus bacteria persistently and over 50% are intermittent carriers (Naber 2009). Therefore, it can be argued that up to 70% of the population are at risk of spreading or contracting SAB without proper infection control strategies  implemented.   In the Australian he..."
1 ") found that a" "...t, build on confidence hence affecting self-esteem (Gopee 2011). It is important to positively reinforce behaviours as Levett-Jones and Lathlean (2008) found that a negative response/praise can cause avoidance behaviour and greatly damage self-esteem which in turn hinders the learning process.     With these four..."
0 "never realized that that" "... of my back as Nikolai stood left of me, making a statement that he was staying out of the discussion, but he was still here if things went sour.  “I never realized that that’s how you felt about this, Gabe,” Victor stated softly.  “We never meant to make you feel like you were any less a part of this family,” Kota added, ..."
0 "be argued that Nation" "...wo political approaches, at least up until the unexpected breakdown of the bipolar war that Realists argued would continue. In this respect, it could be argued that Nation States were the most important State actors at least up until the Cold War ended. Though Liberals failed to explain as effectively as the Realists on..."
0 "show that" "...their phones to catch these different creatures. While there appears to be a few complaints and problems with the game, the many benefits of playing, show that Pokemon Go definitely has a positive effect on society. \tPokemon Go has proven to be a benefit to society for countless reasons. The first and most o..."
1 "to assume that they" "...ritance. The text is very interesting because it lets you see into another culture. Because a lot of our students are from other countries it is save to assume that they are interested in other cultures. I think the text is suitable for pre-intermediate students.  I would choose to pre teach the parts/words/structures..."
1 "have recorded that we" "...ng the customers’ needs and wants, they need to feel valued and recognised” (p.8). Approximately 75% of our our messages ages are non-verbal. Studies have recorded that we must be as mindful of the way we communicate through body language as of the words we use (Tafensweduau, 2016). The sentiment expressed in the quotat..."
1 "provided evidence that amongst" "...first as an inpatient in treatment for alcohol dependence, and then again at 3 months, then 1 year following discharge from the facility. The results provided evidence that amongst alcoholic men exposed to severe psychosocial stressors, those with higher psychosocial vulnerability scores from the assessments were more likely to ..."
0 "some say that it" "...tic was quick to calm the fearful complaints portrays that they did not have any negative intentions and had no issue with fixing this problem. Also, some say that it might possibly be too much exercise to handle at one time for the apps users. Opposers to the app claim that, “some users might overdo it and exercis..."
"genuinely thought that she" "...zed all of the nagtivity behind her ignorant comment. Now see i never looked at the situation as me against her becuase we are diffrent at the time i genuinely thought that she was sick  " 1
0 "only show that these" "... their beliefs are still prominent. The way that cartoons show Puritans, as extremes of many common beliefs including the foulness of sex and gossip, only show that these beliefs, though not as extre"
0 "say is that I" "... am spoiling your life, that without me you could work. And you will, I know. You see, I can’t even write this properly. I can’t read. What I want to say is that I owe all the happiness of my life to you. You have^been entirely patient with me and incredibly good. I want to say that — everybody knows it. If anyb..."
0 "further suggests that the" "...d factors make Indigenous Australians more likely to develop Type 2 diabetes, which has major implications on these people. Diabetes Australia (2003) further suggests that the prevalence of Type 2 diabetes is largely due to limited access to culturally acceptable health care, which often leaves this disease undiagnosed and ..."
0 "was concluded that the" "...capable of testing loading times of resources, and by demoing the prototypes to potential users, mostly scientists, to see which they preferred.  \tIt was concluded that the LERC data type was the best for fast loading, however, the w10n data was the most precise. The drawback to w10n was that, for large data sets, it was..."
1 "to emphasize that I" "...empowerment mantra” difficult to realize.  A “Work-Life” balance example follows.  At the beginning of this paper, I mentioned that I made it a point to emphasize that I did not expect them to work as late as I do.  Yet, it was a challenge for me to have the Section Chiefs (Some of which were the homestead SNCOs) to “..."
0 "is that it is" "...hey are ultimately increasing their health and getting an incredible amount of exercise. Another way that Pokemon Go is positively affecting society, is that it is creating a whole new way for people to connect with others and be more social. Brigette Voisinet, an average Pokemon Go player, explains that the gam..."
0 "deny that" "...ct. The reduction might be small, but its overall impact can indeed be felt. 6. Aesthetics While not technically a picture quality benefit, you can’t deny that a curved TV looks awesome. Samsung, LG, and Sony designed their curved screens to look as slick as possible by reducing the width of frame edges. A c..."
1 "has shown that the" "... perform well enables users to have a trouble free experience. All three websites were tested for how fast their web pages fully downloaded. Research has shown that the average web page now ta                               Table 1: Comparison table Use Case Scenario  Adelaide University  Sanford University University..."
1 "Elizabeth says that she" "...beth explains to Mr. Darcy the situations then blames herself for not exposing Mr. Wickham for the monster that he is. Darcy also blames himself, and Elizabeth says that she and the Garnier                       In Chapter 47 and 48                        In Chapter 56                        In Chapters 59, 60 and 61     ..."
1 "I believe that my" "...on University Study Abroad, posted on the BU Human Resources website. I will graduate with a PhD in history from Syracuse University in May, 2017 and I believe that my 4 years of experience in university program management and teaching matched with my commitment to experiential education, intercultural competency, a..."
0 "species that were only" "...getation was closer to the ground.  Then on other drier islands their necks were longer to reach the higher cacti.  Later he observed there were some species that were only on specific contents.  Darwin called this Natural Selection.  This means that the members of a species better suited to their environment survive and..."
1 "one reason that consumers" "...ting cost savings by eliminating the commission fee charged by OTAs for bookings.   Marketing Your Direct Booking  Research has shown that the number one reason that consumers leave a hotel direct booking site and head to an OTA to book their reservation is that they believe that the OTA rate will be cheaper.  This is the y..."
1 "which is that the" "... equal: H01: u1 = u2 The t-test was used to determine whether there was evidence to reject the null hypothesis and accept the alternative hypothesis, which is that the automated and non-automated means are not equal: HA: u1 ≠ u2 Where: u1 = automated banks and u2 = non-automated banks T-statistics value was then cal..."
1 "definitions explain that the" "...priate remedial actions. In general, although many number of definitions with no agreed upon definition of the term benchmarking, it can say that all definitions explain that the benchmarking is an effective tool used to search for best practices from other organization and apply these practices in your organization in order t..."
1 "I believe that the" "... My commitment towards self-improvement, my excellent work ethic, and my leadership abilities allow me to strive for the highest possible standards.  I believe that the undergraduate course is just a first step in my academic formation as an Architect. Without any doubt, I aspire to become a certified architect in th..."
1 "they felt that they" "... also affects the individual’s level of happiness. For instance, more respondents from the Democratic party felt happier than the Republicans because they felt that they were more connected than others.  Question 3: The physiological and psychological processes Used in the study of empathy.  According to Lieberman and..."
1 "shocked that" "...rson by Jekyll. Comparing the handwriting, he says that they are from the same person. Utterson excuses Guess and after locks the letter in the safe, shocked that Jekyll forged it to cover up Hyde. Despite there being a prize, still no word about Dir Danvers’ murder has come. Hyde has disappeared but people con..."
"later that it hit" "...s black. This was just the start of how my perception of the world changed in a instant.I  wasnt hurt by the comment initially. It was a couple years later that it hit me and I realiz " 1
1 "to ensure that they" "...with me vice an email.  Additionally, I used work-center visits and Bi-Monthly CC calls with each of the enlisted tiers and Civilians within the unit to ensure that they had a direct link to me whether it was^to highlight a concern, ask a question, or just chat about “anything”  That said, under “Leading the People” a..."
1 ") reports that ‘" "...cting increasing numbers of Australians as the incidence of inactivity and obesity rise within the country. Australian Diabetes Council (ADC 2004, p.1) reports that ‘the incidence of this disease has tripled in the past twenty years, and obesity is a contributing factor in 80-90% of cases’. The condition is caused ..."
1 "home that is usually" "...nnot help but like his character. Let’s not forget sweet Nina played by Sierra Bachman who insists on calling Vonya uncle. She brings optimism into a home that is usually melancholy.  Her wide eyed innocent expressions and her overly cheerful voice gave her a childlike persona.         \tI was totally convinced by the c..."
1 "that said that they" "...t could help them know where to shoot in a different city/country. 17/20 photographers said that they would buy this magazine if it existed and the 3 that said that they wouldn’t was because they couldn’t afford it or they do not want a physical magazine.    Limitations and Goals    My main limitation is the time peri..."
0 "to see that the" "...ay this could be done is to give them printed versions of very large shapes. These shapes must overlay  1cm X 1cm grid. Learners can then join points to see that the shape is infact made up of squares. An area model can then be drawn on the board to show that this can be proven mathematically as well as visually. ..."
1 "that restart that the" "...g the CentOS (operating system) and installed software package updates that were downloaded and partially installed over the past month. It was after that restart that the performance and stability of the web servers (2 nodes in total) were impacted. At that time, the WordPress updates were still outstanding, and were u..."
1 "also requested that we" "... This can be improved by examining which fields are part of the nightly sync and to add these fields if they are not already present. Librarians have also requested that we add the Reading Counts subscription to our Destiny service as many of our sites use this product and this would allow the library books to be coded w..."
0 "I see that the" "...e with a handshake as I watched the first glimmers of sunlight peek over the horizon.” (178-179) \tThis passage shows a turning point in James’s life. I see that the odd purple of the river, caused by light from the moon, may have been a symbolic reference to the gloom and suffering that his family had to go throu..."
0 "sure that was possible" "...ear mandatory national service. It is called National Youth Service Scheme (NYSC). Unlike some, I did not lobby for a choice state. In fact, I am not sure that was possible in the year 1989. It was not, I think. You are posted to where your luck called you. I was posted to Imo State (currently Imo and Abia states). It wa..."
1 "have mentioned that we" "...ubconscious mind have about an average of 50,000 thoughts per day. About 60-80% of these thoughts are negative self-talks.  \tThat's why psychologists have mentioned that we are our own worse enemy. Because, nobody else in your life is telling you more negative things, than yourself.  \tWe can change this pattern. Because,..."
1 "aware that it exists" "...od marketing strategy is a must if I want to reach my target audience and enhance product awareness. The product will not sale is no one if no one is aware that it exists. Careful thought and consideration should be given in order to determine which segment of the population constitutes a large percentage of my target ..."
1 ", that was being" "...d.  Results: After the test subject’s halves had synced stimulation, the following results had happened: When the test subject got smacked in the hand, that was being reflected, with a roll of paper, the hand that was not reflected had twitched When I lightly grazed the arm, that was being reflected, with sandpaper..."
1 ") said that he" "...five years, 58.07 percent voted in favor and 41.93 percent voted against. Meanwhile, Election Commissioner Somchai Srisutthiyakorn (สมชัย ศรีสุทธิยากร) said that he is satisfied with voter turnout and the rate of invalid ballots, especially in the three southernmost provinces, where a high number of voters came o..."
0 "to deny that there" "...k of the possibility of someone being romantically involved with her right now,” he glared around the table they were all sitting at, “Don’t even try to deny that there’s something each of us feels for her,” he turned slightly from his position, and seeing my position in the doorway must have caught him off guard. He..."
1 "was seen that individuals" "...s. This prompted the redesigned of the legislations regarding working practice and strategies to minimize abuse in health and social care context. It was seen that individuals with specific needs or disability were not taken care of by their families as they were considered a burden to the family. This where the role of gov..."
0 "diaper pants that I" "... slide underneath my bum and she folds and fasten the cloth diaper. She puts a yellow diaper cover over my red diaper and I gets put on a pair of red diaper pants that I am wearing over my diaper cover. Abbie then gets a t-shirt put on that is yellow and there is written baby on the t-shirt.   We should get the diaper..."
1 "way that is a" "...lity,' reveals ambiguity in the Trafficking Protocol. Individual governments, like that of Brazil, can translate the concept of consent into law in a way that is a de facto response of repression, rather than protection. Interpretation of 'consent' determines whether the government's response is one of protectio..."
1 "not think that I" "...they had a mommy they could run to.   His head popped back in the living room and I went about my chores. The load of dishes were already done, I did not think that I had been away that long. I guess the my little reunion took longer than expected. I wiped out the cabinets and started to replace the dishes, after I..."
0 "have imagined that Zimbabwe" "...at describes the setting (beginning of novel):           “I assumed most kids, regardless of where they lived, had lives similar to mine. And while I have imagined that Zimbabwe was radically different from suburban Pennsylvania, where I grew up, I had no idea how much.”  Before I went on my first trip to India, I thought Ind..."
1 "is said that Hyde" "...d the other half of the murder weapon. Utterson and the inspector go to Hyde´s bank and find that Hyde's account contains several thousand pounds. It is said that Hyde is sure to be caught now because money means everything to him. The only problem is that there are no photographs or no record of family of Hyde. Utt..."
1 "I fear that you" "...rself with others too much, you care too much about what others think. \t- It's not because you're lazy, you just don't have higher ambitions in life. I fear that you're unmotivated. \t- I fear that you're not taking care of yourself, not loving yourself. \t- I fear that because you don't have higher ambitions, you f..."
1 "to ensure that our" "...chelor's Degree who are subject matter experts with a proven track record of effective math tutoring and/or teaching.  We conduct rigorous interviews to ensure that our tutors have exceptional content knowledge and an ability to break down difficult math concept and make it easy to understand. All tutors receive ongo..."
0 "movement relayed that individuals" "...ng a sense of shame, reform themselves.”  This renown statement further suggests Confucians attitude towards government involvement. The Confucianism movement relayed that individuals have the complete capacity to reform themselves when they are guided by a ruling body who refrains from interrogating and imposing, and rather simply..."
1 "and find that Hyde" "...eed to search the apartment where they find a burned checkbook, and the other half of the murder weapon. Utterson and the inspector go to Hyde´s bank and find that Hyde's account contains several thousand pounds. It is said that Hyde is sure to be caught now because money means everything to him. The only problem is ..."
1 "I felt that the" "... laid back and causal. Also, I didn’t feel like the chemistry between Carmen Harlan and Devin Scillian from Channel 4, it felt a bit off and awkward. I felt that the breaking news Channel 4 used really wasn’t breaking news. Maybe it’s just a personal thing, but I personally feel that breaking news should be used f..."
1 "nice is that they" "...t in the cars they use. Since they spend so much money and drive such nice cars their actions portray them to be somewhat snobby rich people. What is nice is that they don’t act in such a way. They are usually very nice unless dealing with each other, which is alright because that's what friend do to create a tighte..."
1 "who says that everyone" "...h no, you’ll see racism across the board. You’ll see it in the kid to pulls his eyes to the side to look like an asian person. You’ll see it in woman who says that everyone in the Middle East is a terrorist. You’ll see it in the man  who thinks it’s okay to make racist jokes  because he has a black friend. You’ll see it ..."
1 "nominate people that they" "...icipants of the sample are not guaranteed, thereby making sampling biases a threat to the researcher. The earlier recruited participants will tend to nominate people that they know well, it possible that the subjects share the same traits and characteristics. If the researcher wants to recruit participants based on own inte..."
0 "Buddhists believe that Buddha" "...’ lives. Because of the life is given by the god. So, only god has the right to take it away. In Taiwan, the mainstream of religion is Buddhism, most Buddhists believe that Buddha will help everyone when people have any problem on the way of live. They think euthanasia is a kind of suicide and it is a selfish behavior. In most ..."
1 "bass figure that you" "...progression. Create the Melody: Once you have created the ground bass, create the melody on top of it. The theme should begin and end with the ground bass figure that you have created. Each time the bass figure is repeated, bring in the original melody and vary it slightly, try to do something slightly different each t..."
1 "to say that I" "...  I am rather lost as to how, while solely teaching reading, I can offer students the chance to employ the problem-based learning model.  That is not to say that I do not wish to do this, but rather that I am not yet comfortable as to how this would be presented in a reading class.  I feel that after reading thi..."
1 "determine that" "...gram of the student and to participate, as appropriate, in the general curriculum. If the IEP team and other qualified professionals, as appropriate, determine that no additional data is needed to determine whether the student continues to be an individual with needs, the District shall provide prior written noti..."
0 "and verified that we" "...School for four days to investigate and substantiate our Self-Study. Thereupon, they wrote a report which outlined the stellar aspects of the School, and verified that we truly do what we say we do - and that we do it very well!  Through the process, three Major Areas for Improvement were identified and an Action Plan ..."
1 "bad that is shown" "...most Jesus-like figure, and he shows how there can be kindness in the midst of evil.  Objects are also used as symbols in the battle between good and bad that is shown on the island. One object is the conch, a creamy pink shell, which represents law and order. The conch is used not only to call assemblies, but it is..."
1 "couples found that some" "...viduals and couples may be strengthened by these experiences” (Freeark et al p3). A specific study comprised of both heterosexual couples and lesbian couples found that some of their participants felt that adoption after infertility had a “positive and healing impact” and that it was a “welcome alternative to the unending..."
0 "Overseer proclaimed that Udham" "...hes, recitation of poetry, chants of inquilab zindabad, and eulogizing Udham Singh. For instance, at a February 1942 meeting in Bradford, Karam Singh Overseer proclaimed that Udham Singh “did not care for his own life” and Banta Singh echoed these remarks and entreated all in attendance that “Everybody should be like Udham Singh..."
0 "girl that was Norikata" "...estroyed when Norikata Emiya, Kiritsugu's father researching for a method to continue seeking The Root, Akasha, created a potion and Shirley, a local girl that was Norikata assistant and Kiritsugu crush, drank the potion intending for it to prove that Norikata research would save the world. However she became a vampire a..."
0 "all that is expected" "...ate certain concepts or remind the learners of something to watch out for.   Course:  How is subject content handled/introduced? The teacher displays all that is expected of them on the data projector. This information reminds the learners of the task their robot needs to complete as well as guides them through the cor..."
1 "things that was in" "... everything and when it was finished taking over something it would harden, unable to be broken. No one knew who made the haze or why they would. All things that was in contact with the substance was demolished to try to get rid of this holy mess. Earth was no longer habitable so we went to the next best thing, the p..."
0 "many people that truly" "...gh my budgeting, we were able to help 5,600 kids get a coats and shoes for the winter. Never in my life have I been able to have such an impact on so many people that truly needed help. \tAs of today, SASO has more than 200 mother-daughter pairs from my community and I still serve as a founding member, board member and tr..."
0 "grounding that it gives" "... Right now, even the therapists out there will be going, “This guy is confused!”. But, I feel blessed to have such a multicultural background and the grounding that it gives me.   When and how did you get into acting? Conscoiusly or subconsciously? On hindsight I probably was into it from when I was a little kid. I don’t ..."
1 "biggest is that the" "...thus could lead to the collapse of our whole political system.   Some of the reasons against keeping the current system are also just as strong.  The biggest is that the average American voter feels that their vote does not count.  This discourages voter turnout in smaller states and states that the voter has a differ..."
1 "and that it is" "...s – did learning take place? Yes, learning did take place. This lesson has taught me that with the aid of laptops notes do not need to be printed out and that it is often best to create a platform for learners to take charge of their own learning. By asking the learners to fill in the spaces and the notes only be..."
1 "system that was as" "... expecting. They thought that the iPads would directly transfer the information into the students’ mind without the teacher. LAUSD wanted to create a system that was as efficient as technology makes other features of life. An iPad is a great device for transmitting information but if the information isn’t interesting..."
1 "I realized that I" "...nto the dishwasher, I made my way through the piles of boxes and sat down on the grey velvet couch and took up most of our living room. As I sat down I realized that I had not unpacked any of our pillows or blankets.  \t“Rebecca! Do you know where the pillows and blankets are?” I yelled \t“I don’t know!” I heard. I be..."
0 ", that is different" "...orms that encourage intelligent risk-taking, local improvements, cross-organizational collaboration, and best practice sharing. However, in my opinion, that is different than strategic change management which is leader-driven and initiative based. Here is where the confusion enters in the McKinsey blog. They discuss s..."
1 "he believes that every" "...he play, Ibsen was forced to write a second ending, in which Nora decides to stay and give her husband a second chance. Ibsen was not a feminist, but he believes that every human being had a right to live their own life, posses their own identity. No one should be forced to stay in an unhappy marriage because of society ..."
1 "research shows that at" "... expressed that the embezzlements of funds is a major player in regard to the underdevelopment of Africa. In this same report they claimed that their research shows that at the least $300 billion has been lost to corrupt activities from the conception of Nigeria in 1960. Nigeria has been known for a high level of wide sp..."
1 ") that is present" "...]. Even in the absence of symptoms, many clinicians refer for parathyroidectomy all patients with marked hypercalcemia (serum calcium values >11 mg/dL) that is present for >6 months from time of transplantation.  \t\t\t\t\t \t\t\t\t \t\t\t \t\t    What to choose for the treatment of severe PT-HPT; parathyroidectomy or calcimimeti..."
1 "something that is required" "... in the absence of fear, rather it is about showing bravery to stand up to it.  Bravery is something that poses a physical danger, whereas courage is something that is required emotionally and there is no physical danger. It is not only what people do, but how they do it. When fear is struck upon someone, it is up to them to..."
1 "API that is simple" "...is for it to be easy for users to request features and also make it simple for them to implement their own. This would perhaps be done by creating an API that is simple to use and understand.  \tAs far as other mapping libraries to experiment with, a Cesium prototype is currently in development. The goal of the Cesium..."
0 "animals that were domesticated" "...sticated animal the dog may have helped Hunters track game animals additionally provided me but also eventually supplied milk, wool, and energy  Many animals that were domesticated included cattle, goats, sheep,  and buffalo The causes that caused population to begin agriculture Include climate change which could change local cl..."
"Changemaker is that you" "The theme or central idea of Be a Changemaker is that you should make your own change and not wait for others to do it for you. The text explains a story about Craig Kielburger, a twelve year old boy, who re..." 1
1 "must understand that permission" "...ted in all areas of suspected disability. Procedural safeguards and thorough explanations are critical as “informed consent” is the standard. Parents must understand that permission for this^assessment may lead to the recommendation for special education eligibility.   The purpose of the initial IEP is to review all assessment da..."
1 "He feels that not" "... his daddy would die and that his father never showed him love or ever told him that he loved him” (J. Doe, personal communication, August 11, 2016). He feels that not being loved by his father hurt him more than the physical abuse. In another subsequent conversation he stated that “his father made him call his moth..."
1 "It reveals that the" "...epts. The meanings of the homonymous words to concepts concerning what is restricted to the presence of a context according to some of their meanings.It reveals that the context is one of the variables most closely related to the interpretation of an ambiguous word.   Lexical ambiguity is present in a large number of ..."
0 "disease indicates that it" "...n to educate the Australian community with regard to improving their health to avoid such conditions as Type 2 diabetes, the rising incidence of this disease indicates that it is a major contemporary issue facing Australian society and the health system struggling to cope.   Type 2 diabetes mellitus (most commonly referred ..."
1 "to find that it" "...ed, but instead find a envelope with a will similar to Jekyll’s. They also find a letter saying that Jekyll has disappeared, and Utterson is relieved to find that it was Jekyll's handwriting. Another .packet was found containing a confession from Jekyll but Utterson told Poole he would read it after he read Lanyon..."
0 "(Is that really" "... to ask your daughter a series of questions and quite frankly, they are difficult to hear, but we must ask them. Would you both prefer to stay or...” (Is that really an option? Leaving our daughter here alone to talk to a detective to spare my feelings? So, I can get up and walk out to spare my feelings and emotio..."
"ichoku is that it" "... could not be bold enogh to speak without hiding their identity because sometimes the raw truth flows from it. However, one thing we don't know about ichoku is that it is a group name, it is not personal " 0
1 ") notes that the" "...tion posit the system as either a factory of testing focusing on a final product, or a mash up of decentralized and disorganized systems. Graham (1998) notes that the national attitudes about schools tend to change^over time, sometimes cycling through the same set of different opinions. Through most of the criticis..."
0 "participants indicated that the" "...at severe and thought they could find a way to live with it. Age also plays a major role in the interpretation of the health limitations. In addition participants indicated that the lead time played a significant role in the answers they gave.   Conclusion. Except for one participant, participants were not willing to give up 10 y..."
1 "law claims that 80%" "...k J Crew attire, we don't care that you are being thrifty with our tax dollars, we want to see what Gucci number Caitlyn's wearing.  UCLA’s School of law claims that 80% of the transgender community are teens that hardly get through each day struggling to discover themselves, desperately seeking answers to why they ar..."
1 "witches predict that someone" "...it.   Macbeth was a play written by Shakespeare. The story goes like this: Macbeth and Banquo are two generals in an army. While in their camps, some witches predict that someone in Banquo’s family line will eventually become king. On their return home, Macbeth kills the current king and assumes the position of king himself. B..."
0 "you demonstrate that you" "...ce – this is a statement about what point your paragraph will make.   Example – this is evidence to back up your point.   Explanation – this is where you demonstrate that you understand your example, and explain how it supports your point.  Link – this is where you sum-up your point, and then introduce your next idea.    E..."
1 "Americans find that the" "...ic education is on a downward spiral with behavioral issues and large classes making it hard for teachers to teach and students to learn. Only 32% of Americans find that the public school systems are great or excellent-these are not reassuring numbers for parents. Ironically the innovation and advancements in science and ..."
1 "have indicated that most" "...and towards experiences, they then suggest that primary experience there is to have online is an emotional one. Additionally, Dobele’s (2007) surveys have indicated that most people who pass on a viral campaign feel like they don’t connect emotionally to it. A viral campaign must make the people it’s interacting with feel ..."
0 "was annoyed that the" "...ords such as “very”. When the doves are described, they now appear to be trying to send a message that Matt has no hope, he has lost all hope.  “Matt was annoyed that the two seemed to have forgotten it was his party, his coming-of-age. He sulked in his bedroom. He twanged the guitar, hoping the noise would disturb the..."
1 "a model that many" "... liberal world order was designed by the West and mostly for the West, but it provided great human and economic progress to other states and is still a model that many people aspire to” (Ghattas, 2016.) The book successful illustrates the inner workings of a contemporary Kissinger approved ‘shuttle diplomacy’, and d..."
1 "headroom that is needed" "...’s CEO has been quoted as saying “Competition has intensified and managers are being hired to drive innovation and boost operational efficiencies for headroom that is needed to spur growth.” It is on the verge of these contrasted strategies on automation and branch network trends that this research was done. 2.4 Related r..."
1 ", that was normal" "...y studying and learning. I’ve written (typed) more of my thoughts down than most writers do.  But for whatever reason i was on my computer or my phone, that was normal to me.   So when you first started to make comments about my phone, i was surprised by them. When you explained to me that you wanted me to be presen..."
1 "not believe that anyone" "...w money’; he came from a low-class background and worked his way to the top of the hierarchy. A social concern arises. The people born into wealth do not believe that anyone who acquired their money will have the refinement of the “normal” wealthy person. However, by the end of the novel this assumption proves to be false..."
1 "research that was conducted" "...research paradigm, followed by a discussion of the research design strategy and ethics. Finally, the chapter concludes on the overall adequacy of the research that was conducted in this study.    Orientation of the research methodology    This empirical research study was an exploratory, descriptive study (Sekaran & Bougie 20..."
0 "God saw that the" "...ace of the deep, and the Spirit of God was [c]moving over the [d]surface of the waters. 3 Then God said, “Let there be light”; and there was light. 4 God saw that the light was good; and God separated the light from the darkness. 5 God called the light day, and the darkness He called night. And there was evening an..."
0 "composition that is more" "...ou’ll know he continually challenged himself to compose works based on restrictions. When you restrict what you’re permitted to do, you end up with a composition that is more creative. By eliminating many of your choices, you have less decisions to make. This makes it possible to concentrate on the composition without havi..."
1 "I fear that because" "... just don't have higher ambitions in life. I fear that you're unmotivated. \t- I fear that you're not taking care of yourself, not loving yourself. \t- I fear that because you don't have higher ambitions, you feel unfulfilled in your life \t- I fear that you don't know your worth, you don't know your value, you don't kno..."
0 "Some believe that such" "...nts may specialize (“Division of Labour,” n.d.).  Although the industrial revolution intensified the division of labor, it wasn’t unique to the era.  Some believe that such system can be found even in our pre-historic era, suggesting that the division of labor gave modern humans an advantage over Neanderthals (Cummings, ..."
0 "was annoyed that the" "...ds including “very”. When the doves are described, they now appear to be trying to send a message that Matt has no hope, he has lost all hope.  “Matt was annoyed that the two seemed to have forgotten it was his party, his coming-of-age. He sulked in his bedroom. He twanged the guitar, hoping the noise would disturb the..."
0 ", that was just" "...oked nervous about something,” Then a look of horror appeared on his face,” I hope we don’t have to do the B.U.T.T. (Basic Unit TImed Test) test again, that was just awful.” It was then that the bell rang. We all quickly dispersed to our first period class. I noticed what Christian had said about the teachers bein..."
0 "to realize that he" "... men, to continue her search of finding love. After her marriage came to an end, she continued to search for a new husband. She remarried, but failed to realize that he was an extreme alcoholic, and an abusive husband and father. She remained in this second marriage for sixteen years pretending that all was well. Aft..."
1 "so that it can" "...is why the objective of my research is to describe a method of analysis for those who are learning a L2, like English, to be able disambiguate a text so that it can be understood and not be an impediment when learning a new language.                                               2.methodology 2.1 WordNet   The le..."
"never thought that  \t" "...arcia when Dally was saying things that the girls didn’t like. This action really shocked me because Johnny looks up to Dally as a idol. I would have never thought that  \t" 0
1 "to tell that he" "... Simon turned into a rat and was taken to Hotel Dumort seemed a little out of place. Simon wasn’t a major character in this book but this scene seems to tell that he will become more important in later books. \tI^think that this book is about what love can make us do. Despite the fact that Clary and Jocelyn left of..."
0 "to stress that you" "...n. I will be happy to address this issue for you. It looks like you are trying to choose the most suitable product category for your business. I want to stress that you should try to choose the most relevant product category that is available. It is OK if the product category does not match up exactly, choose the clo..."
0 "situation that is occurring" "...ple out in the world who help and care for you even if they don’t know you.     The length of the sentences are shortened to add more emphasis on the situation that is occurring and grab the reader’s attention. The short sentences in the story make it more powerful and easy to understand such as, ‘I freeze’ and ‘it terrifies ..."
1 "years is that I" "... far away from my family showed me I’m independent and capable of handling things on my own.     The biggest thing I think I can take from the past 2 years is that I cant control everything that will happen to me. I cant prepare for every experience good or bad. Even though it’s scary not knowing what will happen,..."
0 "Is that you" "...er\" He assured leading her inside and closing the door behind them. That explained why she got along better with Jason than she did Malcolm.  \"Jason? Is that you?!?\" A deep voice asked from upstairs. Delana sat quietly and awkwardly by the door.  \"Yep\" Jason replied absent-mindedly while sliding his backpack n..."
0 "man that is well" "...                        Siddhartha  Log 1 \tThe novel begins with a brief description of Siddhartha. He is described to be a strong and handsome young man that is well known and loved by the people in his town, who is also on a path for the search of self-knowledge. Although he is well loved throughout his town, the..."
1 "then realized that I" "...ached and talked to my in-laws, they started mimicking me. Every time they talked to their grandparents, they are more polite and playful together. I then realized that I can have a positive influence not only to my kids but also to other people.  Since then, I would have inspiring stories to tell to my closest friends..."
0 "she felt that Shirou" "...iyu.\" spoke the now identified Miyu, perplexed her precious Big brother didn't remember her, 'hmm… but who is onii-sama?' questioned herself, clearly she felt that Shirou was her brother but couldn't explain the reason clearly. When she woke up and saw the now identified Kiritsugu became inexplicably frightened, howeve..."
0 "this means that our" "...at ESD is playing an increasing role in our legal system and that environmental laws in Australia take the principle into consideration. Accordingly, this means that our legal obligation to future generations is to regulate GMOs so that we can meet the our needs and not exhaust the natural environment for the future. ..."
0 "arguing that it is" "... nature of the international system itself- meaning that they believe there is no overarching international power. Whilst liberal would contend this, arguing that it is not the anarchic system but rather a failure in the balance of power. It is here that the two approaches differ greatest, as whilst Realists believe ..."
1 "hand that was not" "...d stimulation, the following results had happened: When the test subject got smacked in the hand, that was being reflected, with a roll of paper, the hand that was not reflected had twitched When I lightly grazed the arm, that was being reflected, with sandpaper, he had said he felt a sensation in the other hand. Wh..."
0 "objective is that we" "... “jazz,” or other “serious” types of music you are creating new ideas. Popular music is intended for light entertainment. In the classical world, one objective is that we are trying to create new sounds in our music. Because of this, it is extremely important to include indicators in your music for your piece to be per..."
1 "I wish that Lydia" "...s happy as can be that one of her youngest daughters is getting married. The Gardiners arrive at Elizabeth’s room and are filled in on what happened. I wish that Lydia would realize how                       In Chapter 47 and 48                        In Chapter 56                        In Chapters 59, 60 and 61   ..."
1 "the fleet that the" "...leet.The reason the 63rd expeditionary fleet returned was because the locals of the feral planet of Davin called for aid. The locals (Davinites) tell the fleet that the planetary governor is rebelling against the imperial truth and has hid on the moon of Davin. The 63rd expeditionary fleet prepare to retake the moon ..."
1 "works is that it" "...cking that’s not quite as ethical as some other kinds of hacking. RAM scrapes have been used lately in point of sale inside retail stores. The way it works is that it first needs to be installed on whatever system the hacker wants access to, in this case P-O-S terminals. Then when a customer makes a credit card pur..."
1 "study stated that individuals" "...ife events, and daily hassles on depressive symptoms. The three different domains were classified as stressful life events (SLEs). The results of the study stated that individuals who are continuously exposed to stress, are at a major risk to suffer from depression. The study also indicated that there was considerable heterogen..."
0 "be noted that the" "... already rigorous curriculum. In an examination of Literacy and Writing standards for English/Language Arts and Social Studies for grades 9-10 it can be noted that the demands vary. While there is crossover in standards for these disciplines, students are expected to access knowledge in discipline-specific ways. Tab..."
1 "to add that it" "...\" (primitive semantic components), and consider concepts to which ascribed a field lexicon and the lexemas contained therein (Miller 1993:5). We have to add that it is considered that these components are required to accommodate both conceptual domains as lexicons and this mixture between the conceptual domain an..."
0 "Note that the" "... The number of footprints below the Pokemon's silhouette indicate how far away the Pokemon is to you. Each footprint symbolizes roughly 30-50 meters. Note that the Tracker only displays up to a maximum of three footprints, so three footprints can also roughly translate to 150 meters or more.  2)    Pokemon silho..."
1 "we ask that you" "...hey are today is the result of many years of support and sacrifice by their parents.  CHARGE TO THE COUPLE  Seeing that no moment is without meaning, we ask that you take this marriage as a beginning of your lives together. Today signifies the creation of a new home and a new family for you both. May you be fulfil..."
1 "after that it went" "...he hybrids but it was up to me then she pointed to the screen and said set it up first question after I taped the screen was are you male or female   after that it went to a long list of rashes and it showed on the other screen what it looked like and details about the rase :For a human npcs will not give you a hard ..."
1 "and ensure that the" "...advocacy through email, blogs, social media and other technology focused expansions. Evaluation techniques need to reply to these innovative advances and ensure that the actions they use to evaluate them are significant and have interpretative worth (Community Tool Box, Section 8. Identifying and Analyzing Stakeholder..."
1 "finally realizes that he" "...off the relationship. Years later he reads an article in the newspaper about her death. It isn't until her death that he finally has his epiphany. He finally realizes that he should have kept their relationship because now he is truly alone and convincing himself he can still hear her name as the train passes. \tIvy Day in ..."
1 "I fear that you" "...family. He tries to assure his family through the movie that he would ever hurt them, as he is institutionalized he resorts to a new set of beliefs, “I fear that you will have to deal with this matter in the harshest possible way, Mr. Torrance. I fear that is the only thing to do” (Grady), “There's nothing I look ..."
0 "test indicated that there" "...05) examined the relationships between the export and stock market  in Turkey the period from  1982 to 2002.  The result showed that a co-integration test indicated that there was no equilibrium relationship between the two variable.  Hussain, et, al, (2012) used the ADF,VECM ,Co-integration analysis and Granger causality t..."
1 "Research suggests that PCOS" "...der 1990 NIH criteria, PCOS seems to be evenly distributed amongst ethnic and geographic groups, with some minor exceptions (Sirmans and Pate, 2013). Research suggests that PCOS has a genetic factor seen through familial occurrence (Sirmans and Pate, 2013). And its incidence is higher in monozygotic twins when compared with d..."
1 "worried that" "...who he was saying it to. However, I knew that what the male said was true, or what he believed to be true.   “North? Guys…? What’s going on?” I said, worried that I was missing something on the other side that I couldn’t see.   “Sang?” A few of the boys called as they turned around to face me and parted like th..." 0
0 "ensure that" "...s sought to kill him before He got to the cross. Luke 22:43  There are rocks in the oceans that cause ships to wreck. The lighthouse keepers thirdly, ensure that the light keeps brightened on dangerous and hazardous zones so that the lives on the sea voyage will not perish but will be guided to safety. Similar..."
0 "I realize that it" "...k to my first school, I always felt this relentless loneliness, no matter what was going on in my life. Actually, the more I think about it, the more I realize that it was not loneliness. It was aimlessness. \tA change was triggered in me. A cumulative guilt settled over me. Guilt from being a drifting leaf on the al..."
0 "point that is has" "...ne, there are a substantial number of women who are raped every year (Testa, VanZile-Tamsen, & Livingston, 2007). This threat is so persistent to the point that is has become one of the basic considerations in the day to day lives of women (Cahill, 2001). Statistics have shown that in 2004, approximately 95,000 rape..."
1 ") demonstrate that children" "...her possibilities of being achieved if educators work with families (2009), and also the Victoria Early Year Learning and Development Framework (VEYLF) demonstrate that children learn in the context of their families, so effective teaching requires educators to engage with families in lesson planning and assessment. In this p..."
1 "have noticed that most" "...m about or to look forward to getting one day. Having the power to get whatever and whenever you want something is not how it should be. In my life i have noticed that most people that are wealthy waste more money on their wants then there needs."
1 "to ensure that these" "...an adult to have a child perform sex acts under the statutory rape laws.  The Safe Harbor law was to raise awareness of the treatment of children and to ensure that these kids were given the attention and services rather than criminal convictions. The state law criminalizes adults for having sex with children under the..."
1 "is discovered that their" "...in some cases, a form of motivation and even inspiration. However, the opinions and perspectives people have can suddenly shift and be swayed when it is discovered that their favorite players, athletes and teams are guilty of illegal drug use to enhance their performance in their respective sport."
1 "theme that is no" "...th the repeat), the development 30 seconds, and the recapitulation 30 seconds. Here are some tips you can use while creating your masterwork Create a theme that is no longer than eight bars. This is important for comprehensibility.  Break that melody down into two or three smaller motives. Use your motives to creat..."
1 "to say that  I" "Jenny,   Many thanks for sending this through. I’ve read through this afternoon, and I have to say that  I think it is very well written and well edited so that there is a cohesive narrative, which isn’t something you get with such strategy documents.  Wit..."
0 "be convinced that the" "...to bring charges against it. However, one government minister lamented, “it was doubted whether, in the event of a prosecution, an English jury could be convinced that the questionable matter amounted, in fact, to incitement to murder” (Minute 23 January 1946, Ibid.). In any case, the fears that “a second Udham Singh sh..."
0 "Nora realizes that he" "...e than all the world. All she wants to do is leave so Torvald won't suffer due to what she has done, she doesn't want him to take her guilt. But soon Nora realizes that he wouldn't take the guilt for her. Torvald says: oh, what an awful awakening! In all these eight years-she who was my pride and joy-a hypocrite, a liar..."
0 "quote explains that we" "...make mistakes. I am always going to have to deal with the possibility of failure and I will always be able to utilise these things in my work….” This quote explains that we are not perfect in life so therefore there are going to be challenges, mistakes, or obstacles in our life but those mistakes or hardships should help..."
0 "and that is where" "...nfortunately, all the freedom cannot persist without being governed. Rules have to be put in place to make sure everything continues to run smoothly, and that is where the government comes in. Economics as a Whole \tIf a Country has a high standard of living, they probably are very productive and produce high levels ..."
0 "in that it has" "...t (64 kilobytes)(http://leafletjs.com/), which boasts simplicity and making “the basic things work perfectly.” Cesium is different from the other two in that it has the ability to display maps onto a 3D globe, which allows for a more accurate picture of the world. (http://cesiumjs.org/)xLeaflet was decided agains..."
1 "This means that Toronto" "...0 stores and restaurants, 50 office towers, 20 parking garages, five subway stations and a railway terminal over its’ twenty eight kilometer length.  This means that Toronto is a bustling, non stop city on the move.  In fact. It is known as one of the most multicultural cities in the world with a whopping 30% of 30% of To..."
1 "void that is inherent" "... as if Mr. Hitchens is still with us - writing his way through the 2016 political cycle with his individualistic English wit - delving into the moral void that is inherent to all politics. His writings serve as both an historical record, and, as a foreshadowing of what may come - a three weird sisters of sort, for the c..."
1 "environment that is NOT" "...s been received enthusiastically.  They are beginning to see the advantages to themselves, in turn they see the benefits to the Students.  Even in an environment that is NOT 1to1 the advantages to posting assignments and curating content in one central DIGITAL location are numerous.  Teachers are requesting access to comp..."
1 "so excited that she" "...ch other with a what did she do this time and No idea but this better be good looks, but Anne quieted them beaming because this is important. She was so excited that she jumped up and squealed. She opened the boxes and took out these custom printed white shirts with We think Harry has the X-factor on them. Ok, this wa..."
0 "I see that there" "...were nonexistent. Although he was nought but a child at the time, when he said, “‘If I’m here and you’re me, how can you be there at the same time?”, I see that there may be a hidden meaning to the phrase. It could mean that he wondered how there could be any possibility where his ideal self from the mirror could b..."
"you think that the" "a.\tDo you think that the future of Sri Lankans will be the new education path ?" 1
1 "situation that was placed" "...he Germans [intended] to make an example of them.”(85) Vladek’s character during the war was resilient through the struggle to survive each difficult situation that was placed on him and his family. On^the streets of Sosnowiec, businesses and money were taken from every Jew that lived. The Nazi’s which were portrayed as cat..."
1 "others claim that GMOs" "...d for consumption for both humans, mammals, and mainly their reasons why they support GMO labeling. Second, sub-sections will discuss the reasons why others claim that GMOs are appropriate for consumption,  what the FDA states, and there reasons why GMOs labeling is not only  a waste of time but also a waste of money.  I..."
0 "\"Is that Addilyn" "...one called her Aly and I picked it up right away, Darcy was still calling her Alyson just as an insult, a subtle insult, but an insult all the same.) \"Is that Addilyn's little girl?\" I heard from behind me, I swung around and came face to face with a very round man, he had on jeans, work boots, and a tool belt. He ..."
1 "it realized that the" "... Indian soldiers and encourage them to dessert the India Office sought to monitor the movement of their publications. In February 1942, for instance, it realized that the Hindustan Ghadr had “played no small part in inducing a general atmosphere of disaffection” among Sikh soldiers in the Far East” (IPI to Mr. Silver 2..."
0 "I recognize that not" "... hunger and genocide, we hope that she has enough time to still show us all how real and humble she is weekly on her hit reality series “I am Cait”.  I recognize that not everyone can be president, it takes certain qualifications to lead the world's greatest nation. Caitlyn may represent the perfect package of new soci..."
0 "called that is because" "...wikthunder and today i am proud to present a new fan-fic to the Ben 10 Community called All-New All-Different Ben 10. Not the reason why the story is called that is because that this story is taken in an A.U. where the events of Alien Force to Omniverse never existed. Now what that means is that this is a story where the..."
0 "and states that no" "...nment.  Article V: Article five describes the process by which an amendment is made.  Article VI: Article six describes the “supreme law of the land” and states that no government official should have to take any form of a religious test.  Article VII: Article seven states that nine out of the thirteen states must ra..."
1 "argument is that our" "...ally held back by the EU. So their answer is to leave the EU and negotiate trade deals with countries such as Germany. But how is that logical? Their argument is that our hands are tied by the EU so we must leave, but then we should trade directly with Germany! Wouldn't Germany have their hands tied because they're in ..."
0 " felt that the" "...Benjamin Tillman appealed to South Carolina voters who ____(5.4)  believed in white supremacy and opposed giving African-Americans the right to vote.\t felt that the economy of South Carolina would benefit from northern investment and control.\t supported equal rights for African-Americans and pushed for equality i..."
0 "has shown that nearly" "...s, such as tension, frustration, anxiety, anger, and depression, resulting from aspects of work as a teacher” (Brown & Uehara, 1999). Recent research has shown that nearly all teachers are affected by rising stress in their workplace. Teachers are expected to fill many roles in their daily chores. These roles may includ..."
1 "which confirms that he" "...laxly and undefined in front, our outlines dim and misty on that side; as our shadows reveal an insensible perspiration toward the sun” (Thoreau 304) which confirms that he does in fact believe in a simplistic lifestyle and that he is not just living with a small amount of things for no reason. Another similarity between..."
1 "offer is that you" "...g for. They offer a variety of many renowned and famous name brands. They also offer fabulous discounts upon signing up to their website. Their great offer is that you get 20% off on your first purchase. Besides that, there are always discounts to take advantage of. Starting from 10% flat discount to 30% off on purc..."
0 "Steve that was fascinated" "In the 200th century there was a teenager called Steve that was fascinated on the art of science along with his friend Mark that both of them liked to invent inventions that will helped the human race but the other people "
1 "and that is how" "...e can not. Most teens are fake around their friends just so other people will not judge them. “The Outsiders” represent all of these things perfectly and that is how it still is in today's time.         These three reasons are why I believe, “The Outsiders,” by S.E. Hinton, should be saved from the fire. The three..."
1 "had noticed that Salwa" "...ing included the baby “Saddi”, the mother “Salwa” 42 years old and her sister “Sarah”. As we initiated in to introduce shook hands, and ourselves, we had noticed that Salwa looked tired, sad and depressed. Throughout the conversation, we discovered that she has been married since 10 years. She lost her husband in a car a..."
1 "She thinks that the" "...ed to wear jeans. The only time I could ever wear jeans was to school in the winter time, and I had to take them off once I got there,” said Alberta. She thinks that the clothing style has changed a lot. She was so used to wearing fancy dresses that never came above her knee, and now girls and women wear all different..."
1 "he realized that she" "...high school, he was finishing, but that didn't stop him from pursuing the younger blonde. It had started out as another conquest for Freddy, but when he realized that she would not make the pursuit easy, he softened his approach. Four months before the shooting, and after almost seven years after meeting, Kaitlyn final..."
1 "clearly shows that this" "...my 5’5 ft height by a few inches. He has a sharp jaw with narrow violet eyes and short strawberry blonde hair. His body stature seems firm and broad, clearly shows that this guy is either in a sport or just exercise a lot. He is wearing the school standardized uniform: a white collar shirt with two red stripe running arou..."
1 "project that is to" "...oughout my undergraduate course. PROJECTS During my undergraduate studies at VR Siddhartha Engineering College I got an opportunity to do a real-time project that is to Estimate a G+3 Structure, which is going to be constructed by our college. I have also done exploration on concrete by replacing cement with fly ash ..."
1 "may think that a" "...thin this show there are three hosts whose’ characteristics are half the fun. Jeremy Clarkson seems to be the most ornery of the bunch. The other two may think that a vehicle is quite good, but he will always respond in a way of saying they are wrong and their ideas are stupid. Before the show his profession much l..."
1 "to ensure that the" "...uded covering items such as Physical Training, Safety, Training, Security, and inbound/outbound  transitions.   I also held Monthly Commander’s Calls to ensure that the unit was kept informed of pertinent issues that needed to be communicated via personal contact with me vice an email.  Additionally, I used work-cent..."
1 "companies that were riddled" "...costs inflated WorldCom’s profits” (Tran). It didn’t help that WorldCom’s accounting firm that missed the fraud was the same company that served some companies that were riddled by scandal, such as Tyco, Enron, and Adelphia. Arthur Andersen was replaced by KPMG after the scandal broke (Tran). As a result of the bankruptcy fil..."
1 "activists say that Brazil" "... of money going into making the Olympics as successful as possible, many human rights activists believe that money is being put to the wrong use. The activists say that Brazil could be using that money to help many families out of poverty. That money could be used to provide shelter, survival necessities and even education ..."
1 ") suggested that credibility" "...data based on everyday understandings and practices (Sofaer, 2002; Beneito-Montagut, 2011). Authors such as Patton (1999), Bekhet & Zauszniewski (2012) suggested that credibility in research could be achieved by ensuring that rigorous techniques and methods for gathering high-quality data are analysed carefully, with attention..."
1 "ghosts that were watching" "Section 1  Vivian is speaking in the prologue, you can tell this by Vivian saying “I am ninety-one years old…”. The ghosts that were watching over Vivian and told her to go on with her life.  When it comes to Molly, many things have gone wrong in her life, Molly’s father died and her mother..."
0 "event that is believed" "...length or even spelling, but it is packed with meaning in terms of what it says about God. Merriam Webster defines a miracle “an unusual or wonderful event that is believed to be caused by the power of God”. Wikipedia defines it as “an event not explicable by natural or scientific laws. Such an event may be attributed to..."
1 "This means that there" "...public works projects.  Under CUPCCAA, projects that are $175,000 or less are bid through an informal bidding process and do not require advertising. This means that there is not an RFP and, per district requirements, three quotes are solicited from vendors that have submitted for prequalification in the district’s CUPC..."
"Is that men" "...cause that is false. I could write a full book about this, and I will, but i will try to explain it briefly. The reason men are paid more than women. Is that men are more likly t" 1
0 "factor that is robustly" "...kers et al noticed the importance and effect of such personality trait and expressed the following: ​Neuroticism is a well-known stress vulnerability factor that is robustly associated ​with the onset and course^of depression. In support, the impact of SLEs on ​​depression has been found to be moderated by neuroticism, an..."
"said that was bad" "...the children of Germany and the Soviet Union. They were brainwashed, and taught to become spies who would turn in their own parents for anything they said that was bad about the government. " 0
0 "He suggests that heroes" "...led by a standard character. In the chapter “Never Stand Next to the Hero” Foster explains that in many books the primary supporter of the hero dies. He suggests that heroes have many needs and goals that^a standard character cannot complete. “No matter how large or small the actions, though, the most important thing that..."
1 "Baker claimed that Danos" "...he Nigerian law and the parties did not agree to apply the US law. The contract and arbitration clause was governed by the Nigerian law, subsequently Baker claimed that Danos and Chevron had breached the agreement. Baker further went ahead and obtained a default award of damages against them, the award was set aside by the..."
0 "now that it’" "...at thing off,” he starts, but then his gaze travels down my body and he finishes, “No, leave it on.” The shirt covers everything but conceals nothing now that it’s wet. It’s molded to my body, clinging to my breasts, my pink areolae showing through, my nipples standing out aching to be touched. His hands cup me..."
1 "to express that they" "...to difficult situation or the patient could be misinterpretation of their actions of others people. This could be simple result of the individual try to express that they are not happy. Thirsty or they are in pain.     3.1 Working practice and strategies used to minimize abuse in health care setting:   The working Prac..."
1 "I feel that any" "...dapt well to change. Health care care is a rapidly changing industry. I am mindful about what has worked for the past to pave way to a stable future. I feel that any change that happens should be for the benefit for the people. My overly programmatic, focusing nature and wanting the change to adhere to present rul..."
0 "only show that these" "... their beliefs are still prominent. The way that cartoons show Puritans, as extremes of many common beliefs including the foulness of sex and gossip, only show that these beliefs, though not as extreme, are still prominent in our society. Puritans were among the first people to immigrate into the United States from Eng..."
1 "have shown that hospitality" "Archaeological and textual evidence have shown that hospitality in the “early legal codes and writing\" from, Mesopotamia (c. 2000 BC) and Greece (c. 500 BC), illustrated where the industry was first originated.  T..."
1 "sheets that were in" "...d been in the laundry room for too long, I grabbed the sheets out of the dryer and stuffed them in a basket, I would leave them for later, loaded the sheets that were in the washer into the dryer and turned to walk out. I grabbed the door knob, took a deep breath and stepped out.   I walked through the house, it was q..."
0 "I understand that I" "... I was very honor to take charge of this project. However, my careless and mistakes caused tasks and took time to settle down.   It is basic mind but I understand that I should had to reconfirm properly and not judge by myself. I must not make same mistakes again and drawn on my failure to the next step.     MICE (TEL..."
1 "feel that" "...elp you answer these questions. \"That Same Pain, That Same Pleasure\" is particularly helpful. Some critics, Marcus Klein for one (see \"The Critics\"), feel that Ellison violates point of view in the Epilogue by making the narrator come to conclusions that are too optimistic, too affirmative for his character...."
1 "of benefits that many" "...ts and exceeds, in most cases, the needs of both teachers and students.  While the application has a number of limitations, it offers a strong number of benefits that many teachers would find to be very useful in the creation of a healthy collaborative classroom environment.  Mansor (2011) supports this conclusion when ..."
1 "is clear that Dustin" "... Studies, and for all of the on-ground campuses.  We have worked closely on several significant change-projects where he was the sole stakeholder. It is clear that Dustin has a solid andragogical knowledge base, but what is really impressive is the skillful way he can apply what he knows in order to lead important init..."
1 "is shown that this" "...r concludes that Islamic ethics support a poverty-alleviation strategy based on the principle of promoting economic growth with productive equity, it is shown that this is dependent on the social context under consideration.   Keywords: poverty, Islamic societies , institutions, equity, ethic"
1 ", That is what" "...icial appearances  Jim   Kim's boyfriend Jim was presented to us viewers as your typical boyfriend, kind and caring although Jim seemed to be all that, That is what happening when judgments are made too quickly it's like judging a book by the cover you can't do it. With Jim practically been judged from what you c..."
1 "performance measures that CBK" "...ts, Central Bank of Kenya (CBK) measures bank’s performance by reviewing loans and advances, deposits capital & reserves and profit before tax. Other performance measures that CBK monitors include: asset quality and liquidity. While CBK has set accounting and presentation guidelines in the Central Bank of Kenya Act to enable co..."
1 "been recognised that a" "...re their safety and security are being protected.   2.2 Professional involvement and responsibilities of Key Agencies:   As a starting point this has been recognised that a good deal of mental health professional will not be convinced about the value of their role as due to a negative assumption about family involvement ..."
1 "ll find that some" "...a practice routine. As you go through these exercises, I urge you to give each one at least two weeks before you move on. Give them a chance, and you’ll find that some of them will surprise you in their simple and profound ability to improve your technique.   Which brings me to another point: Unless you have signifi..."
0 "and ensure that there" "...o expand their influence outside of rural areas. If the FARC demobilisation is successful, the government should have more resources to tackle BACRIM and ensure that there is a state presence in vulnerable areas.   The most likely outcome of the FARC demobilisation is turf wars between different BACRIM and the National ..."
0 "projection that is used" "...tient is standing and sitting, if  possible in order to compare the images (Bontrager, Lampignano, & Photography, 2013).  An Erect lateral is another projection that is used to determine the degree of kyphosis and lordosis that is present (Bontrager, Lampignano, & Photography, 2013).  The PA or AP and Lateral projections ..."
0 "‘that is about" "...e 1st century.  The time indicator within the passage renders impossible the idea that the promise was to saints 2000 years in the future. The phrase ‘that is about to come’ includes the verb ‘mello’ which was used to express imminence. When Jesus said ‘the hour of the trial that is about to come’ He meant it wou..."
1 "I hope that you" "...nd go through any stress that could tear their family apart, or create unnecessary hardships or circumstances that would be stressful to her family.  I hope that you take all these factors into consideration for their sake.      Michael Cline"
1 "This meant that they" "...und to their students. In this study the teachers found working in an urban school as challenging, by way of the cultural barriers with the students. This meant that they weren’t able to build positive relationships the students. Flory and McCaughtry found that often the teachers had rigid class room teaching technique..."
1 "can prove that the" "...ong academic writers and scholars, Article V (1)(e) as stated above provides that an enforcement of award may be rejected only if the objecting party can prove that the award has been set aside, suspended by a competent authority or not binding on the parties… the term “not binding” is not define, there is lack of cl..."
1 "the fleet that the" "...h expedition fleet.The reason the 63rd expeditionary fleet returned was because the locals of the feral planet of Davin. The local's (Davinites) tell the fleet that the planetary governor is rebelling against the imperial truth and has hid on the moon of Davin. The 63rd expeditionary fleet prepare to retake the moon ..."
0 "would appear that a" "...based on their shared expertise and experiences. Tasks are grouped into functions which helps to enhance productivity and increase effectiveness.  It would appear that a divisional structure is more vertical in design and is managed from top to bottom. How information is disseminated throughout the structure is also a..."
0 "some say that?" "...g this Jack felt anger like never before that some little punk was messing with Fareeha for no reason just because the color of her skin.  “Why would some say that?” Fareeha asked.  “Because Justice, there are some people in this world who just want to see you crack.” Jack explained. “They don’t care who you real..."
1 "they claimed that their" "...2(cited in Martini,2015) expressed that the embezzlements of funds is a major player in regard to the underdevelopment of Africa. In this same report they claimed that their research shows that at the least $300 billion has been lost to corrupt activities from the conception of Nigeria in 1960. Nigeria has been known for ..."
0 "this indicates that empathy" "...ustrate how the emotions of others are differently engaged, depending on the magnitude used to understand other people’s emotional encounters. Hence, this indicates that empathy can generally be induced by observing what others face in life.     Question 4: The implication of Morelli’s Quote for Civic Engagement  ​Civic engag..."
1 "I believe that I" "...“Loving Family” is not my priority, then the professional goal of “achieving my fullest potential in the Air Force” is not very rewarding. Therefore, I believe that I have kept a balance throughout my 20 years thus far in ensuring that I meet the needs of my personal goals which have carried over to my professional..."
1 "discovered that" "...and believe that they were less likely to be caught due to internet anonymity. (Selwyn 2008, p. 465). Similarly, the article by Volkov (2011, p. 23), discovered that students deem plagiarism to be trivial in comparison to other cheating behaviour. The research conducted in the Youman (2011, p. 754) article discove..."
1 "sense that it views" "...l organization and society’s inherent desire to establish structures that promote law and order.  Additionally, neo-realism is extremely rigid in the sense that it views war as unavoidable. In contrast, constructivists argue on the dynamic nature of interests and identities which can change over time to allow for coop..."
1 "to suggest that James" "...y in time and especially after the legal proceedings are over with and should have no bearings on the ability to raise a child. There is not anything to suggest that James may has sexually abused anyone.  Diagnostic Assessment       James Doe meets criteria for the following DSM-5 (2013) diagnoses:      300.02 Major Dep..."
1 "Scobie felt that he" "... he was then  people would start being friends with her. After this had happened, Louise wanted to go to South Africa to get away from horrible life. Scobie felt that he was the reason for her misery so he would do anything for this to happen.So he had gone to the bank to borrowed some money but the bank had denied th..."
1 "games are that good" "...y remote or keep her from chewing my headset cord. I admit it is bad sometimes. But it’s not my fault,(well it is) but I can’t help it because to me, games are that good.  Thesis Statement: I am going to stand up here and try my best to show you that playing video games, in moderation, can be very positive and benefic..."
1 "because that is when" "...ed (“Texas Weather, Climate and Geography”; “Top 10 Central Texas Weather - Hazard Facts”). If travellers like the rain, they should visit during May because that is when the most precipitation occurs (“Weather - Average Temperatures”).  If travellers enjoy rainy days and dry days, they should visit Texas, because the ..."
1 "“Heard that you" "...ther than Cash Murray, the dude who has been terrorizing me since i was 10 years old.  “What do you want Cash?” i said as i walked over to the jerk.  “Heard that you were sent to Principal BrickWall’s office.” Cash said. “Did she tell you that you’re too poor to still be coming here and said to beat.”  “No, in fac..."
1 "carriers that was created" "...ip between two states where one exercises some decisive control over the other. \t  Pan-American        \tPan American World Airways was one of several carriers that was created and flourished as a result of the Air Mail Act of 1925. The Air Mail Act of 1925 was the first major piece of legislation created by Congress that wo..."
1 "scholars argue that the" "...enced both Christian and secular world. Some modern Christians have a real difficulty with the concept of God’s judgment (κρίσις). Most of the modern scholars argue that the preaching of resentment and revenge in Revelation is not compatible with Christian love and forgiveness. Perhaps they compromise divine love and holi..."
1 "sport that is dominated" "Ashlyn Murphy 8/5/16 Mitchell Dakota High School Hollyfeild park: should they ban skateboarding once and for all? Skateboarding is a sport that is dominated teenagers. I believe that skateboarding is dangerous and can negativly impact Hollyfield Park. I support the proposed ban on skateboardiing. I strong..."
0 "We trust that the" "...u undertakes full responsibility for any damages to the building M&E services. This is the practice of all contractors at site throughout Singapore.  We trust that the above explanation will clarify the issue that you brought up. Please forward this mail to Ascendas if necessary. "
1 "element that is taking" "...e sex traffickers to reach out to victimize women and children, also allows privacy and anonymity for their despicable crimes. Typically the criminal element that is taking part in this activity are not in the place where their behavior or actions take place.                                               Internet sex cri..."
0 "Faubus insisted that he" "...us announced that he would order Arkansas National Guard to prevent the Little Rock Nine from entering the school (O’Donnell). In a televised address Faubus insisted that he was “Preventing widespread disorder, and violence.” (O’Donnell).  That same day, since Faubus was defying the supreme court's decision to integrate C..."
1 ") suggests that educators" "...a range of assessment tools, processes and approaches to build on prior learning, avoid duplication and add value (Flottman et al., 2011). DEEWR (2010) suggests that educators must ensure “meaningful, supportive and respectful interactions” with children during assessments and the most appropriate methods and tools are used..."
1 "commented that" "...t value for what you need, to host your first website using Blogger platform or more commonly known as BlogSpot.   A lot of my peers in the industry, commented that I could be wasting time as there shall always be a day, Google decides to shut down this free platform that I had grown to love since 2006.  I differ..."
1 "Nathan said that they" "... this, which I was grateful for, as I did not need another thing I did wrong thrown in my fact.   I sense truth in most of their statements, but when Nathan said that they trusted me, a red flag went off in my head, but I pushed it down and away for another day and another debate, as there were more important things to ..."
0 "posture that was slouched" "...s seemed outdated also. Sonya dressed frumpy like she was older than her actual age in her pedal pushers and loose fitting shirts. She also used body posture that was slouched with shoulders pulled in to make herself seem smaller. With the exception of the party were she wore a beautiful gown. She came home feeling beautifu..."
1 "poll indicates that 60%" "...ults may be biased in the long run.  Lastly, there is the use of Survey. This investigative study uses several surveys. For example, a survey by TIME poll indicates that 60% of the respondents stated they are not comfortable with spending time on social media. At the same time, 76 percent of the interviewees reported that..."
0 "to ensure that there" "...he historical value of the temple with the needs of the present day. An urban city-state without hinterland, Singapore faces the challenges of having to ensure that there is sufficient land for housing, recreation, as well as business purposes. In spite of this, the conservation of our built heritage is still of utmost..."
1 "Valley that is in" "...heir cocoons The stories of Xia tole he ruled in an ancient dynasty over the yellow river valley The shang Originated in the part of the Yellow River Valley that is in today's Henan  They Extended their control in north into Mongolia and as far west as Gansu and South as the Yangzi River Valley  Shang Society was do..."
1 "methods that was used" "... of them which were used in this thesis.     1.6 Tools to delimit ancestry  In this chapter I’ll try to give basic ideas behind most of the important methods that was used in this thesis.  1.6.1 Sequencing Technology  Illumina became the reigning champion on second generation sequencing technology. The idea of Illumina ..."
1 "rules that were put" "..., the workers in the research and engineering department at Cosmo Plastics felt as if their innovation and creativity was being restrained due to new rules that were put in place. These rules not only affected the morale of the employees but there productivity as well. There is also a distinct possibility that some em..."
1 "8% feel that they" "... feels that it is better to work alone because they don't have to listen to other people’s opinion. Out of the 47.9% that prefer to work in teams, 46.8% feel that they can learn from each other and benefit, 31.9% feels that it is more efficient and faster, while the remaining feels that teamwork allows them to achie..."
0 "This suggests that the" "...velop apart from occupation. The occupational structure often forbids coping strategies that are consistent with the individual’s occupational goals. This suggests that the police structure may impede certain techniques to deal with stress, therefore leading the individuals to look for other methods, such as alcohol use,..."
1 "told is that if" "...head of what your picture is going to be? People these days only think that they are never going to win, but that's not true one thing that my father told is that if i put my mind towards something I can accomplish it. Think that when ever you doubt yourself. "
0 "pitch that is a" "...pitch that is a third above the melody, you may use the pitches that correspond to a fifth or sixth above the melody note. If the counterpoint uses a pitch that is a fifth above the melody, you may use the pitch that corresponds to a third above the melody note. If the counterpoint uses a pitch that is a sixth abo..."
0 "further confirms that she" "... the fact that there could have been many vampires walking among us without us knowing.   “The fact that she can tell whether or not someone is lying further confirms that she is Melody’s daughter, as that was what Melody’s gift was.”   “Will that be her only power? I know some vampires end up with two while some can end up..."
1 "city that is mentioned" "...counts, Jesus taught in many places -- along the roads, on hillsides, in homes and even in synagogues. Archaeologists have excavated a synagogue in a city that is mentioned in all four Gospel accounts: Capernaum. The pictures display a beautiful building with exquisite columns, walls from various time periods and the pav..."
0 "was evidenced that whilst" "...ardie and Cochlear highlight it is the board’s responsibility to deliver, lead and enforce good corporate governance.  In the case of James Hardie it was evidenced that whilst they were had corporate governance policies, when the board chose to misrepresent information to the regulatory bodies   the directors failed in thei..."
1 "to say that evolution" "... Nihilism and Belissa challenged me on why was I reading it and that we’ve been down this road before and I am continuing to spin my wheels. I wanted to say that evolution by natural select does not deny that there is a vague force which in some incomprehensible way that dominates life and change i.e. god, it simply des..."
1 ", that was more" "...ense of relief because Mahoney is his excuse to safety. Toward the end the narrator feels guilty using Mahoney because he doesn't really like him. Yet, that was more than the adventure they were looking for and he is glad to be safe once more. He realizes home is where he needs to be.  \tAraby was definitely a stor..."
0 "Peter confesses that Jesus" "...Opposition 13:  Sermon 3: Kingdom parables – an explanation of increasing opposition 14.1-16.12: Jesus feeds Jews and moves out to Gentiles 16.13-20: Peter confesses that Jesus is the Christ  16.21-28.16: Jesus and his disciples move toward Jerusalem  16.21-17.27: Jesus talks of suffering: Correcting Misunderstandings 18: Se..."
0 "think that is one" "... row, my book in a perfect pile, and my clothes put in my dresser like a puzzle. I just like things to be neat and tidy. I like routines. Some people think that is one of my best qualities but I think it is a little annoying. I cannot help it though it is just natural to me to have things in a certain order. My lock..."
1 "who believe that they" "...y lose their faith in America. “They want to produce good citizens, by which they mean people who take pride in their country.” (Loewen 326) Teachers who believe that they are doing the right thing by disguising the past, are weakening the students for the future. Teachers are essentially doing the opposite of what they..."
1 "I believe that it" "...ir perception of service recovery, value, satisfaction or loyalty. This research is a bit limited though as it is specifc to banking services however I believe that it is the reliable and satisfying quality product or service of an ISO accredited business that creates this loyalty. The quality management system crea..."
1 "model that was being" "...to take more of a leadership role in the PLC. Keeping the pressure on the PLC increased accountability and the PLC groups had more “buy-in” to the PD model that was being used. Third, having the administration at the table co-learning was critical. The teachers appreciated the principal/vice-principal learning at the t..."
0 "I agree that if" "...ucation’s conflict of interest policy and that my responses to the above questions are complete and correct to the best of my information and belief. I agree that if I become aware of any information that might indicate that this disclosure is inaccurate or that I have not complied with this policy, I will notify ..."
1 "lastly believe that if" "...tes seems to be increasing by 24% and with the money from the Olympics, they could be making Brazil and the world a much safer place to live in. They lastly believe that if the money isn't going to go in the two main issues listed above then it could go into cleaning the environment. If they don’t put money into making w..."
1 "to remember that they" "...t tell someone you've loved them for a while and expect them to fall in your arms. Especially with the reputation you have\"  I nod in agreement. Only to remember that they can't see me.  He sighed heavily. \"Yeah, I know\" He sounded tired... Defeated. I walk away from the scene before I get caught eavesdropping. He's com..."
0 "have expressed that they" "...stimated that approx. 1 million non-cyclists will need to be persuaded to start cycling. This is termed as the ‘near market’ – those non-cyclists who have expressed that they would definitely or possibly consider cycling within the next 12 months, which equates to around 26% of Londoners. As a result, the government are lo..."
1 "This means that you" "...ite self wants you to remember it, it must be a pivotal point for some reason to use in your life for the meaning or communication it can offer you.” This means that you actually are in another parrele universe and can connect futre pass lives.  "
0 "should verify that each" "...ould be calculated and reported every year to monitor a school’s demand trends as well as its status (or single-year snapshot). Likewise, authorizers should verify that each charter school is properly calculating and annually updating its waiting list to ensure the validity of its reported excess demand.       Operational..."
1 "We understand that this" "...t copy of your community's Rules and Regulations.  The following is Violation Plan of Action Policy to help us ensure we can clean up your community. We understand that this may be upsetting to you, as these violations may not have been fully or consistently, enforced previously.    Notice of Violations Policy  Effective ..."
1 "think that" "...ceived lots of project effort referrals.  This was because I would turn my homework into a teacher    the morning of  my project effort day. I didn’t think that the project efforts would count     towards my grades/records.     What I learned: The bridges program has helped me realize that when you don’t put ..."
1 "Verify that you" "...the next stage.   Stage 3: Adding a Note Play any two pitches on the piano at the same time. Listen to both notes and attempt to sing the lower note. Verify that you are singing the correct pitch by playing it by itself on the piano. Play both pitches again and attempt to sing the top note. Verify that you are sin..."
0 "information that is contradictory" "...ity to represent a larger population. Surveys However are not ideal for the issues that are controversial in nature because the respondents will give information that is contradictory as opposed to the expected results.  Question 2: Three conclusions Deduced from the Graphs  The bar graphs on page 34 deduced from the survey conduct..."
1 "he declared that the" "...erupting every so often. Lincoln wanted to become the undisputed leader of the Republican party. During a debate between himself and Stephen Douglas, he declared that the government cannot endure permanently half slave and half free. These speeches established lincoln as a leader among the antislavery forces even thoug..."
1 "strategy is that the" "...The magazine creates an image of the product in consumers mind, and how consumers feel about, perceive, and value the product. The reason behind this strategy is that the aim will attract advertisers from company that sell premium and up market products. However a fully dedicated marketing team will secure contracts fr..."
1 "view is that this" "...disabilities, get invited to play with these kids and it builds their mindset by seeing how people with disabilities rise from obstacles. Opinion: My view is that this is a beautiful program and it is very eficient into opening the minds of young kids. Like when teenagers experience different ways people go through ..."
1 "was told that I" "Hello Luis, this Sergio Gaytan we talked on the phone last week about a position for photography and robotics and I was told that I would receive an email from HR the following day. I did not received an email from them so I wondering would I need to come in to fill out any paperw..."
0 "readers that it can" "... Thoreau states this clearly when he says, “Every path but your own is the path of fate. Keep on your own track, then” (Thoreau 112). He is informing readers that it can seem sometimes like everyone is going somewhere except for you, but you cannot do what they are doing to feel like you fit in for you have to keep go..."
1 "to think that someone" "...   \"Accelerating time? That's impossible\" Asuka denied.   \"Naruto is saying truth, considering what we heard about little Garden, it's not impossible to think that someone with time controlling power exist\" Izayoi said as he looked at the damage.   \"I also think so\" Yō said.   Off to the side Kuro Usagi looking at four ..."
0 "“That was for" "...r. You have violated the peace of our Assembly and you will pay a lifetime for that.” Zera muttered with all the strength she could, \" Just kill me.\" “That was for the state to decide, and in their wisdom they decided against exterminating a traitor. No, you will live out your life here on this shattered moon, m..."
0 "Henry intimates that boards" "...eir boards and their businesses activities.  By presenting himself as (and espousing that all boards should be) proactive leaders of good governance, Henry intimates that boards and directors should be held accountable for poor corporate governance.   The importance of corporate governance is evident across all Australian ind..."
"one understand that everyone" "...e even on the most shallow level is a success. Using a quote from Sidney Lumet, Curtis writes “We’re all making the same movie”, and so by doing this one understand that everyone has a role, and a" 1
1 "further added that the" "...n that the LGBT movement encouraging young children to transition is extremely harmful to the child, confusing them about their gender9. The ACP also further added that the trend of gender transitioning^amongst children is equivalent to “child abuse”10. Dr. Paul R. McHugh a Renowned Service Professor of Psychiatry, state..."
1 "I believed that I" "... how well I was progressing as a composer. If I felt guilt, then I felt I must have been doing something wrong. In contrast, if I didn’t feel guilty, I believed that I was on the right track and progressing towards my goals as a composer. The problem with writing a composition that people don’t like is that it’s ver..."
1 ") reported that ESIN" "...lso not well established. Several advantages of ESIN fixation have been described for pediatric both-bone forearm fractures(10, 22). Antabak et al.(22) reported that ESIN osteosynthesis for diaphyseal forearm fractures remains a valid technique with very good functional results. However, some complications of ESIN incl..."
"green grass that I" "... though I just walked into a sanctuary of light. The bush behind me seems miniature now, making me feel more dominant to the world around me.The deep green grass that I sit upon is a carpet c " 1
1 "also included that he" "...n the 2016 Paralympics for violation worldwide doping rules. The announcement from the President of the International Doping Committee, Philip Craven also included that he believed this was because of^Russia’s government. He stated disgustingly that Russia’s government believes ,\"Their medals-over-morals mentality disgu..."
1 "and verified that the" "...lly number 4 “what is terrible, bad, painful is easy to endure. I must admit I felt annoyed. Nevertheless, after I removed the items from the shelves and verified that the three remaining missing pieces were not originally in the toolset. I know something I did not know before. I thought I should be happy because I now ..."
1 "worldview believes that we" "...ry worldview believes wa are separate and in control of nature  Stewardship worldview believes we can use Earth for our benefit  Environmental Wisdom worldview believes that we are part of and dependent on nature and it exists for all species, not just us. Success depends on how well we sustain the earth Living sustainably m..."
1 "said that it goes" "...on is very important, and that people should try and further their education as far as they can. Alberta wants everyone to enjoy their childhood. She said that it goes by too fast and is taken for granted. Alberta states that young adults should “Think twice before doing something, that way you make less mistakes.” ..."
0 "to ensure that I" "...being part of the Post University Community I can effectively work with my team as followed. My instructor and I must be able to run on a daily basis to ensure that I understand the information that he is discussing in class. It falls on me to ask questions of my instructor to ascertain that I am on the correct pat..."
0 "I confirm that this" "... complete details related to this case, and I am here to assist the court and other legal departments to work in this case and do justice.  6. Truth  I confirm that this report containing 15 pages has no errors, and it is giving true details. If in case I am found guilty of hiding information and giving wrong details ..."
1 "Guardian suggests that there" "...Law Myth Of The Ethical Shopper         Articles Sustainable supply chains: why placing ethics over profits pays off \tTom Seal’s 2013 article for The Guardian suggests that there can be a conflict between companies representing themselves using ethically sourced resources and living up to those policies.  It’s not so far-fetch..."
0 "is that it is" "...hey are ultimately increasing their health and getting an incredible amount of exercise. Another way that Pokemon Go is positively affecting society, is that it is creating a whole new way for people to connect with others and be more social. Brigette Voisinet, an average Pokemon Go player, explains that the gam..."
0 "problem is that hospitals" "...of Labor Statistics and U.S. Department of Labor, 2015; Bureau of Labor Statistics and Office of Occupational Statistics, 2016). The general business problem is that hospitals are experiencing an increase in nurse turnover which results in staffing shortages for these organizations (Alhamwan & Mat., 2015). The specific busi..."
"would argue that the" "...As the novel progressed there were many contradicting points given to the audience about the world around Siddhartha and himself. For instance, Hesse would argue that the world has almo" 1
1 "effects are that you" "...ains, numbness and even abdominal pain but one major effect is that you may not only lose people that you love or you may even get killed. Some minor effects are that you might get your car impounded and^demerit points against your name.   Some solutions that you could put in place before you think about driving is hav..."
0 ", that was a" "... They needed to create and break their own PR (personal record) daily. They need to learn the meaning of compete and embody it all day every day.   OK, that was a starting point, but what else did I want them to do? They can get good grades with rote memorization, but that really isn’t the point of education. I..."
1 "year that it became" "... the grains in its hopper.   He received government awards for his revolutionary marvel. It was not until Hugh Victor McKay modified it the following year that it became the industry's standard. And, it wasn't until around 1918 that this machine became popular in the United States of America. Machines like this revolu..."
1 "one team that you" "...r back. A moment that was filled with disappointment, despair, and a withdrawal. This moment might not  be of importance to some, for me it was. That one team that you train, want to be apart of, put hours and hours of preparation into is no longer an option.   The aftershock of this event initially left me thinking..."
0 "attacks that were orchestrated" "...c solutions to WWII before Japan showed aggression to the U.S. troops at Pearl Harbor (Morley, 2013). The attacks were accompanied by other strategic attacks that were orchestrated by Japan amid talks between the U.S. and the country to cease any form of military attack. The letter from President Roosevelt on 6th December 1941, ..."
1 "ll add that to" "...  I think there’s a book about it called “Eat that frog”.   The premise is how to prioritize the big stuff so that you are more efficient.  Perhaps I’ll add that to my summer reading list.    Another thing I noticed is that I check my email first thing in the morning and set an agenda for the day based on the ema..."
1 "eyes that were as" "... he went limping up and down the vestibule, with his grey hair sticking up in scrubbing-brush fashion, his shrivelled yellow face, and his large dark eyes that were as keen as any hawk's, and yet soft as a buck's. The whole room was hung with trophies of his numerous hunting expeditions, and he had some story about ..."
0 "“That is so" "... room.  I got hot so went outside to grab my water out of the car and cool off a minute.  I was just coming back in when you came around the corner.” “That is so weird, I know I heard it playing again.  Maybe Mr. Bing saw it and turned it on?”  Sara said, taking a deep breath to calm her nerves. “No, he is sti..."
0 "you  realise  that  yo" "...ps how you would solder a two pin SMD, such     as your capacitor, using a regular soldering iron tip. \t (5)      1.2.2 \tAfter  inspecting  the  SMD  you  realise  that  yo u  had  soldered  the     capacitor  the  wrong  way  round.  You  now  have  the  task  of  desoldering  the  SMD.  Explain  in  FIVE  steps  how  y..."
1 "women that is because" "...USA assert that weight discrimination occurred almost every day in the life of obese people. It is a third most common type of discrimination amongst women that is because women are more vulnerable.  Obesity have been classified as lack of control and weakness () Obese people face social disadvantage . Obese people are ..."
0 "animal that is very" "...e, maybe not.   A pest, strictly speaking is an annoying small animal or insect that harms or destroys garden plants, trees or property. A pest is an animal that is very small and causes harm to property or to humans directly.  So, while the mosquito is a pest, the deer is not.   Animal Control  In the broad animal co..."
1 "recommendation is that HVs" "...HVs did not use the checklist to assess DV risk may be because children services are already involved because of the DV concern. Notwithstanding, the recommendation is that HVs are required to assess the level of risk by using the checklist to form their own assessment.                   5.0       Discussion: The results of ..."
0 "was completed that a" "...This meant that one could not analyze two related datasets side by side. At the time, a solution could not be found. It was not until the LERC client was completed that a solution for this problem was realized for the encoded PNG client.  \tThe LERC client presented, at first, an entirely different problem from the enco..."
1 "goal indicates that a" "...the goal says the student will demonstrate a skill 75% of the time, give parents the % at which their child is currently performing the task.  If the goal indicates that a student will successfully complete a task on 3 out of 4 occasions, then write in the comment how many times the student has been able to do it.  Prin..."
0 ", that was really" "...judges were impressed with his delivery and his poetry. He won the first place prize package and a huge trophy. Meechie was ecstatic!   Page 18 ‘’Well, that was really cool Mr. J.! Four radio interviews down and The Morning show to go. The DJ’s were really cool. They wanted to know all about me. The Wild Child was c..."
1 "have shown that it" "...oven effective (Leonhardt, 2013). It is a good option for adolescent patients where a transvaginal exam is contraindicated (Leonhardt, 2013). Studies have shown that it is more accurate in antral follicle count that transvaginal 3D ultrasound (Leonhardt, 2013). One study in particular discussed MRI imaging of polycys..."
0 "I disagree that nothing" "...er prevent this by not disposing of these pollutant products. All of these easy methods could overcome the problems of global warming  In conclusion, I disagree that nothing can be done to overcome the problems of global warming. Personally I think we need to think about the outcomes that we will potentially face if this ..."
0 "we put that flair" "... have the courage to possess. That spirit, our energy that draws people in, so they can feel it, savor it and sometimes even envies it.   The instant we put that flair to words, a best seller was born, giving us the privilege to experience a life like we had never known before. It was an exemption to nurture those w..."
1 "then noticed that the" "... the hospital intoxicated and had been intensely violent with the chief physician.         He then continued sobbing while reflecting on his life. He then noticed that the ceiling had a hook. While looking back at the reflection in the toilet water he started to sob louder than he did before. While he continued to stare..."
1 "have maintained that Teachers" "...? I understand that as a digital leader I must meet the staff at their current comfort level of using digital tools.  This WILL be a slow process but have maintained that Teachers learn best: in their classroom, with the technology they have available and with their Students.  I have done my best to make that happen in as many ..."
0 "pillow that was in" "...tting any better for him.  He'd regressed to the point of tearfully gazing at a map of Britain, sobbing as he rocked back and forth with a Union Jack pillow that was in his possession for some unknown reason. The only phrase he had mustered the strength to vocalize was a brittle, wobbly \"Pourquoi?!?\"  After a few eme..."
1 "This means that an" "...e at least an associate’s degree” (Sandiegogov, 2016). The quality and level of education can have a direct effect on the quality of labor performed. This means that an electronic facility operating in San Diego would have a good chance that the labor pool will have the skills needed to perform the job.  \tLastly, ope..."
1 "not realize that it" "...down the hallway into the master bedroom and master bath (opened master bath window slightly to promote airflow through bathroom). At the time, I did not realize that it would also discharge down the main stairs into the lower levels. With the low humidity levels in Denver (20 to 30 percent) I normally measure a 12 to..."
1 "teaching is that your" "...me feel good. When I returned to school   they were so excited to see me most of them ran up and hugged me. One of the greatest and best   rewards of teaching is that your students love you. It’s important to me that I do my job well and   please my principal. It’s a rewarding when my principal gives me a compliment. I ..."
0 "talent that is so" "Some students have a background, identity, interest, or talent that is so meaningful they believe their application would be incomplete without it. If this sounds like you, then please share your story.  (250-650 words)   B..."
"would agree that the" "People would agree that the Afghanistan war was a waste of time for all that it caused was problems and deaths to the U.S and Afghanistan.   Afghanistan has been in war for year..." 1
0 "fact that it was" "...e this book. I think one of the main reasons that I do like this book so much is because it’s a Graphic novel, not a cartoon but a graphic novel. The fact that it was a subject i like and am very interested in made^it even better, but i do like graphic novels. because the genre has a whole different language and fe..."
0 "tribunal found that China" "...he Convention.”  The award ruled in favour of the Philippines, was verified on various grounds including the Lawfulness of Chinese Actions, where the tribunal found that China had indeed violated the Philippines’ sovereign rights in its Exclusive Economic Zone by interfering with Philippine Fishing & Petroleum exploration, ..."
1 "This means that he" "...ing post at the Avonlea school. Gilbert Blythe, who originally was applicated for that teaching post, gave it to Anne so she could stay with Marilla. This means that he would have to travel for a much further distance to teach. Anne is extremely thankful, but also ashamed of herself for not forgiving Gilbert when she..."
1 "population that was mostly" "...a congregation. They did this by having the residence live in close-knit communities, though this idea was later deserted.  By 1700 New England had a population that was mostly English, white, protestant, puritan, and Catholic.  Rhode Island was the only New England colony to practice religious toleration. Plymouth and Massa..."
1 "and acknowledges that any" "...e earlier of (i) Disclosing Party's written request (email will suffice) or (ii) termination of this Agreement.  Remedies. The Receiving Party agrees and acknowledges that any breach of this Agreement may cause irreparable harm to the Disclosing Party for which monetary damages may be inadequate.  Accordingly, the Disclosin..."
0 "had shown that he" "... but perfection. \t In between those days, we texted each other quite a bit. I was so nervous about the guy because I liked him so much and so far, he had shown that he was definitely different from other guys. I loved the conversations we had; they were so silly, dorky, and cheesy but overall interesting. Talking to..."
1 "levels that were not" ".... The risk allele ‘T’ was associated with lower fasting and 2h plasma GLP-1 levels. We found a correlated increase in the 2h plasma insulin and GLP-1 levels that were not influenced by the genotype status, supporting that the defective insulin secretion in risk allele carriers could possibly due to defective GLP-1 secr..."
0 "be fooled that you" "...ones, less we suffer the shame of being behind times.However, this does not come without a price! The child are exploring all sorts online, and don't be fooled that you have put all safety mechanisms in place, so this should suffice. No, no,no. They know how to bypass your security settings and still be able to get o..."
0 "Steve that was fascinated" "In the 200th century there was a teen called Steve that was fascinated on the art of science along with his friend Mark that both of them liked to invent inventions that will helped the human race but the other people "
1 "standard that it is" "...he standard of living would not be beneficial to her or her child.  If a medical problem ever arose the medical treatment in Mexico may not be to the standard that it is here.  Jade and Aubrey would also leave their family behind here in the United States.  \tJades husband currently works and helps contribute to food, ..."
0 "he decided that he" "...me Naruto had gotten everything he wanted it was well past midday. Sasuke was juggling several bags of groceries and various miscellaneous items when he decided that he'd just rent a wagon to help take all their things home and since he said that Naruto decided to buy even more things. He'd decided to make his own fl..."
1 "you realize that you" "...ay you develop this little eight measure piece, and you then decide that there is something you don’t like about it. After analyzing the composition, you realize that you’re mostly repeating the melody verbatim in both sections, and you would like something with a little more variety. Since you know that the theme is b..."
1 "like is that it" "...ty, I believed that I was on the right track and progressing towards my goals as a composer. The problem with writing a composition that people don’t like is that it’s very hard to step outside yourself. A poor reception comes across as an assault on you and an indictment that you’re not smart enough to write a go..."
1 "truth is that There" "...ense we should ignore it but where it made sense we should pay attention.  This truth we are always shying away from is where our problems lie.   The truth is that There are some group of individual holding us backwards, these were the people our big brother Emenike refered to as money bags and Ichoku refered to them ..."
0 "in bundles that it" "...d off Naruto started to wring his tail in his hands. “I’m sorry I kept us in the market for so long. But I found insulators and furs for so cheap and in bundles that it was too good of a deal to not buy them!”  Sasuke snorted and smirked up at the fretting blonde, “It’s fine Naruto. It was nice watching you.” Naruto ..."
0 "customers that it is" "...rvation is that they believe that the OTA rate will be cheaper.  This is the year that the large chains have chosen to spend millions educating their customers that it is will pay to book direct. Hilton’s multi-million dollar “Stop Clicking Around” campaign is evidence of this new marketing strategy.   But what about t..."
0 "garden that is flourishing" "...long run it will pay off. When I am not at a register or glued to a textbook, I really enjoy gardening and hiking. I currently have a small container garden that is flourishing. Some of my favorite places to hike include Mount Mcloughlin, and around the Tulelake lava beds. I find comfort in hot sunny days, and tan lines. As ..."
0 "poll indicates that 60%" "...ults may be biased in the long run.  Lastly, there is the use of Survey. This investigative study uses several surveys. For example, a survey by TIME poll indicates that 60% of the respondents stated they are not comfortable with spending time on social media. At the same time, 76 percent of the interviewees reported that..."
0 "their own that we" "...lling one is just wrong. I thought I could still be in that family, or at least give the illusion that I’m a part of it, but they’re just deciding on their own that we aren’t going to play along with that idea? Seriously?”   ‘Is he having some sort of breakdown? This seems like a completely different man than I saw ..."
1 "is clear that the" "...they portrayed as undisciplined and lazy and less competent  and that affects employment . in evaluating several significant studies in this area, it is clear that the key factors that emerges from research examining obesity has been shown to be social, medical and discrimination. Indeed, regardless of what causes o..."
0 "places that were once" "...become dangerous. People you once thought were friends can change your life for the worst. It comes to show that you can’t always trust everyone, and places that were once safe and serene can be loud and dangerous. The pond was a tranquil place, but then it was transformed with gunshots. It was a trick to Lennie and the..."
0 "years that it'" "...rovided them in choosing PE as a career option. “My parents, they have always seen the way that I have competed and loved sport, and they told me for years that it's what I should do, so I’m doing it. They always told me they could only see me teaching and not sitting at a desk for the rest of my life, and they w..."
1 "Office that was highlighted" "...rap processes around so they could be monitored and tracked.  Aside from the “gotcha” (e.g. troops with negative QFIs) manpower issue within the Post Office that was highlighted by the IG, the resources of the unit were effectively managed.   Summary of Analyses   The above major graded areas provide a useful framework to ass..."
1 "but think that they" "... You love them \t- You cared about their health and safety \t- You cared about helping them move in the right directions \t- You want the best for them, but think that they're blind to see for themselves \t- You want them to be happy  \t \tBe aware that what you say will have different effects on others. So choose your word..."
"I think that Mr" "...dy Catherine was so furious. I do not get why she is so mad. Does she not want her nephew to be happy?  This should show, that being mean never wins. I think that Mr. Darcy and Eliza" 1
0 "argue that" "...a copycat? Why not go straight to the source? What’s that? Because you do it better than the original composer? That might be a good reason… Some may argue that when a composer copies another writer’s style, they^are attempting to improve it, or make it better somehow. There is certainly some merit to this. I..."
0 "Leone has that an" "...s a national sport. Zebra crossings are only so ambulances know where to pick up the pedestrians.  5. Dubai has less than 20cm of rain a year. Sierra Leone has that an hour during the height of wet season.  6. There are few house numbers, street names, or addresses. You need to know descriptions, landmarks, be able ..."
1 "Epicureanism teaches that happiness" "...ctly what it was like before “I” was born.   January 12, 2016 President Obama gave his last of the union address. I will miss him and his presidency. Epicureanism teaches that happiness or the greatest good is to seek modest pleasure in order to obtain tranquility (ataraxia) , freedom from fear and the absence of bodily pain. The sta..."
0 "I realize that I" "...op just to the side of my breast with his thumb underneath it, the other hand still on my ass, caressing me through my dress. I’m almost ashamed when I realize that I’m rubbing my hips against him, but then he’s grinding back into me, and it feels so good.  \tThen, suddenly my feet are back on the ground and he’s pu..."
1 ", that is where" "...s of recognition and enforcement of arbitral awards, d) What is the link between the place of recognition and enforcement and the place of arbitration, that is where the award is been made.   2.1     LEGAL FRAMEWORK APPLICABLE TO INTERNATIONAL ARBITRAL AWARDS Chapter III of the NYC provides that contracting states..."
1 ") revealed that the" "...rs such as parental income and education have a direct implication on health. Various scholars such as Iwayemi and Fowowe (2011), Kirigia et al. (2015) revealed that the impact of child mortality on future macroeconomic output in Nigeria is negative and health intervention coverage programmes stayed low despite increa..."
1 "liberals battled that the" "...face of it boastful, arguing that the craving for power of the state was, in the eyes of leaders, worth the cost paid by wars. (despite the fact that liberals battled that the League fizzled simply as it didn't have the teeth expected to guarantee the balance of power was kept stable).In the more modern, post Cold War perio..."
1 "store that is for" "... one is turquoise and the final one is white.     Carrie buys also some big girls pacifiers, and she also some disposable diapers from the adult baby store that is for big babies like me. They buy 20 more cloth diapers so that we have at least 100 cloth diapers at home. We are headed outside and Caitlin is now strol..."
1 "and undertake that any" "...is Terms &Conditions shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of India and, subject to this Clause 4.7, PROXIMOVE and You agree and undertake that any controversy or claim arising out of or relating to these Terms &Conditions will be adjudicated exclusively before a competent court in Coimbatore, In..."
1 "style that is closer" "...nd it was then that I realised what I’ve been doing with all my writing assignments so far during this school year. I’ve been experimenting a writing style that is closer to how I would word things if I was speaking out loud, and I’m just now figuring out that that isn’t the best style for writing school assignments. I..."
0 "But that is all" "...g the schools in the area and trying to find a position for my wife Lisa.   I also was just accepted into Trevecca's doctoral program for leadership. But that is all online so should not be a problem for me to complete from Iowa.   Have a blessed day!  A simple means of God's amazing grace! Rev. Jeff Skinner (MDiv..."
1 "out stocks that he" "...I learn and apply it to the real world. For instance, I took what I learned from circuits to make a remote controlled car. Also, I helped my dad pick out stocks that he should buy using my experience from 4th and 6th grade in a stock market simulation. Doing this has proved useful in understanding the curriculum and ..."
0 "and pass that information" "...g roles in tech teams and how individual people worked together.  Observation: At a simplistic level, this helped us identify the players in the team and pass that information onto the recruiters or hiring managers. Identifying the role and involvement in the team was crucial to at least understand what type of job they are..."
1 "(that is offended" "...ting electrochemical feedback loops in a physical mechanism (the brain) and  we call the awareness that emerges, consciousness. It’s the brain stupid (that is offended) if “I” am called stupid, nigger, etc. It is just a temporary state of the brain but through neuroplasticity the connect become wired so to speak in ..."
1 "necessarily mean that the" "...ucational approach is allowing students to partake in regular classes, regardless of the additional needs that may be required. This however does not necessarily mean that the child will not receive extra classes or aid outside of regular classroom time, but allows them the opportunity to be included.    Inclusive education..."
1 "trust that is needed" "...onship.   Wilkes Z (2006) stresses the importance of being a positive role model which in turn leads to the student feeling safe and helps build this trust that is needed to ensure an effective relationship.       Darlings (1985) qualitative study found what it was to be a toxic mentor which could make the student feel..."
0 "think that" "...n assured Clinton that “political hack” or not, she was “willing to listen” to Clinton’s pleas.  Speaking of influential families and politics, don't think that Caitlyn falls behind in bloodline. If you need to be reminded that our girl reigns from the millinery answer to royalty, the greatest American, Alban..."
1 "; include that the" "...e-evaluation process Student Needs Relating to Special Factors      Behavior Strategies-If a student has a BIP, then information would be entered here; include that the BIP is found in the student’s file , amount of time that the student will use “time-out/student support room”, why plan is needed etc. ESL Blind/Visu..."
0 "I appreciate that you" "...ager takes a long, agitating sip of his drink before replying. “Oh Sehun.”  Sehun informs him.  Junmyeon scribbles down Sehun’s name in his notepad, “I appreciate that you trusted me enough to give your name, your total for today will be 10,510 won Sehun.” Sehun shrugs to himself before placing a surprisingly accurate a..."
1 "research demonstrates that further" "... on HAI and focuses on limiting the rate of SAB at 2.0 or less per 10,000 occupied bed days for Australian public hospitals (AIHW 2015). In addition, research demonstrates that further transparency boosts accountability and patient safety initiatives in healthcare settings (Edmond & Eickhoff 2008). Similarly, New Zealand’s Health Qu..."
1 "I declared that there" "...d one of the first topics of national discussion was whether under existing Brazilian legislation human trafficking constituted a crime. At the time, I declared that there were existing provisions in the Penal Code and in special laws that sanctioned conduct with characteristics of trafficking. While these give a respon..."
1 "was outraged that the" "...of inarticulate Indians, Udham Singh has attained the dignity of martyrdom” (“Report on Ghadr Party” 17 July 1940, IOR/L/PJ/12/286). The India Office was outraged that the paper would favourably compare these two incidents and present them as “worthy of emulation.” Indeed, the Office suggested that it was engaging in “i..."
1 "can tell that the" "...hness. Complementing the girl’s look is a pair of soft pink lips, a button nose, and rosy cheeks. Even with her feminine and fragile looks, the agent can tell that the girl is an athlete. The youth’s shoulder is a little wide for a female. Her arms are a decent size; not small nor big. The student’s figure is extrem..."
0 "campuses found that 55%" "...veys regarding hazing including over 60,000 student athletes from 2,400 colleges and universities” - Scope. A survey done in 2007 on American college campuses found that 55% of students in any clubs, teams or organisations were subject to hazing. Here is the study by Scope.  Over 325,000 athletes at more than 1,000 Nation..."
1 "and that it was" "...leep, Sara thought about how much she would miss nights like this with her mom.  She knew in her heart if the the house was livable she would move in and that it was the right decision to make, but she would miss her mom greatly. Waking to the warmth on her face from the rays of sunshine streaming in the window, S..."
1 "I believe that God" "...millions of people around the world.It is a strange topic with so many views,opinions,and debates.When it comes to god the possibilities are endless. I believe that God exist and he called us to live together in peace,in unity,and in love.The Bible itself is proof of God’s existence because it was written in three co..."
1 "we mentioned that “" "... started to engage the family with us by greeting them, and we introduced our self. Moreover, we insure them that this interview is confidential, and we mentioned that “if you have any problems with answering our questions you have the right to pass it also if you have any doubt please don’t hesitate to ask”. We fixed..."
0 "also prayed that some" "...d love into her life. But theres only so much you can do at a traffic light. So instead i prayed for her that one day she finds peace in this life. I also prayed that some how light and love could enter her life. It was in this moment that i realized my meditation practice is working. I did not react to this situation a..."
1 "truly feel that Dustin" "...aalman’s reflective practice is evident because he models notable professional behaviors and personal growth in all of our working transactions.    I truly feel that Dustin would be a valuable asset to any college which would have him in their employ.   Respectfully,  Heather Capote-Powell Instructional Effectiveness Spe..."
0 "bag that is placed" "...r that fits me its amazing but its seems to me there seems to be folks that make strollers and baby stuff for adults even. Cassie takes with a diaper bag that is placed in the storage place in my stroller since my siblings takes with them a diaper bag in case I need to get my diapers changed during the ride outside. ..."
1 "people believe that Rontu" "...kill Rontu because he had killed her younger brother, but soon came to befriend him. Rontu, the name of the dog, means fox eyes in her language. Some people believe that Rontu was left by the Russians or the Aleutian. The dogs killed many of the wildlife on the island, decreasing the marine and bird population. Because it w..."
1 "in circumstances that they" "...e of family conditions. Regrettably, some of them are convicted because they were in the wrong place at the wrong time. Unfortunately, they were born in circumstances that they had no control over. Some people tend to focus on individual weakness or lack of values as the reason why people commit crimes. Ultimately, if someon..."
1 "all claimed that they" "...causes the lack of motivation. Few years ago, most of the students in a class of a junior high school in Japan absented from school, and the students all claimed that they had planned it due to intolerable frustration to their teacher. To sam up, there are variety of difficulties with students’ disruptive behaviour. Add..."
1 "can testify that I" "... and found guilty. Barbara McNeese can testify that I go on church trips and camp with Kaylee. Also that I am a youth program director at church. She can testify that I attend many of Kaylee’s social activities like dances.   #11 alleged to whom??? I don’t think that was in the complaint.   He pays for Kaylee’s medic..."
1 "have witnessed that the" "...tect. Without any doubt, I aspire to become a certified architect in the United Kingdom, and inevitably, settle myself there.   As a Latin American I have witnessed that the lack of a long term view that have for long neglected the impact of structures , are one of the biggest issues that jeopardizes the sustainability of..."
0 "to show that this" "...erlay  1cm X 1cm grid. Learners can then join points to see that the shape is infact made up of squares. An area model can then be drawn on the board to show that this can be proven mathematically as well as visually. From here the teacher can move into more complex problems but always refer back to the ‘simple’ exa..."
0 "and ensures that a" "...endment grants protection to criminal defendants. It prohibits double jeopardy, states that a person cannot be forced to testify against him/herself, and ensures that a person will receive  “due process of law” before facing criminal punishment.   (1791): The sixth amendment grants citizens the right to a speedy tria..."
1 "possibility that it can" "...illness, but is the main reason why the illness occurred can also be exemplified with Animal therapy.  If a pet owner has a pet that dies, there is a possibility that it can lead to a ill depression.  Some individuals treat their animal as part of the family, and for some, losing a pet is like losing a child.  This also r..."
1 "regulations require that PPE" "...chemicals and hearing loss, and not least against the elements! It is therefore unfortunate that it is sometimes not used or used incorrectly.    The regulations require that PPE is the last means of protection to be considered after all other safeguards have been eliminated. For example, while grass cutting it is good practic..."
0 "And that was even" "...following and Shikamaru could pick up on that. “It’s a subtle change. For me it was like…” he hummed then looked away and smiled, “it was like life.” And that was even more confusing for the dark haired man.  Shikamaru was terrible at explaining things. Like life?? What the fuck was that supposed to mean? “Hey there..."
0 "implies that" "...sible damage, is triggered only when scientific material suggests that the development will impose a threat to the environment. The second condition, implies that there must be sufficient scientific material or evidence to suggest that this threat will cause irreversible damage. That is any anticipated harms mu..."
1 "is estimated that the" "...rogram, the GAO listed the P-8A as one of ten Department of Defense programs with the highest total acquisition costs for fiscal year ending 2015. It is estimated that the Navy will spend approximately $33.5 billion dollars in its efforts to replace the Navy's fleet of P-3C Orion aircraft.   The P-8A is a commercial ite..."
0 "but that was nearly" "...n the darkness of the mines and the darkness of the surface was only marginal. At the very least, it was easier to catch one’s breath on the surface, but that was nearly the only benefit it offered.   “Come with me. To the town square.” Bartholomew said in an almost demanding tone. Janelle glowered at the back of his ..."
1 "Networks recommends that the" "... of 1 Cloud Systems Architect and a Project Manager with a Total LoE is 3 person days.   The total price for the above services is $4,680. RightBrain Networks recommends that the Ignite take place at client’s offices to ensure optimal collaboration.  A 50% deposit ($2,340) is required prior to commencement of services.  Start ..."
1 "also stated that the" "...n NHS, Boris Johnson is one of the biggest opponents of the NHS yet he's promising that extra money would be spent on the NHS? No chance.   They have also stated that the TTIP (Transatlantic Trade and Investment Partnership) would basically mean the NHS would be privatised, which is strange because those same people wa..."
1 "I think that this" "...d reports of no sign of the love-struck Lydia and that monster Wickham. He also says that Mr. Bennet is going through every inn, trying to find them. I think that this shows how                        In Chapter 56                        In Chapters 59, 60 and 61                       "
0 "pad that is standard" "...ching my siblings packing and putting things in my diaper bag.  There is feeding bottles, cloth diapers, disposable diapers, wet wipes and a changing pad that is standard items in each diaper bag. Both Carrie and Cassie is caring one changing pad each that contains a few cloth diapers, and a few disposable diapers. Now..."
1 "Israa realized that the" "...h he was going to cry. She was so happy from that moment on and thought she would never be happier, until today that is.  \tIt was at that moment that Israa realized that the car had not moved in some time. Aalaa and Fahtma were no longer talking about their weddings. Both we're trying to figure out why the traffic had com..."
0 "who believed that women" "...e only surviving source on imperial histories. He projects a critical perspective from the vicious reign of Domitian and was a republican sympathiser who believed that women should not intervene or have a role in the political arena. Although, Tacitus owe his many successes to the principes, he has a strong disposition ag..."
0 "type that is fun" "...those who need it other than himself. He stands for the opposite of the Friar, Monk, and Pardoner. \tLeading the group is the Host, the fat jolly loud type that is fun to hang around. He although has a short temper, and is willing to start a ruckus if provoked. He makes sure the rest of the pilgrims get along, and m..."
1 "deny that" "...rdized uniform: a white collar shirt with two red stripe running around the short sleeves, a dark grey tie, grey suit pants, and black shoes. I can’t deny that this guy is attractive, but never judge a book by its cover. He could just some prick or bastard that wants attention. \t“You called Father?” the guy ..." 0
0 "to grow that eventually" "...universal themes of Jealousy and prejudice that remain relevant despite context. Antagonist Iago preys on Othello's self doubts allowing for jealousy to grow that eventually becomes the main cause of conflict within the play, misconceptions of characters based upon racial stereotypes allows for themes of jealousy to be ex..."
1 "show is that it" "...e to learn more about the other family and ultimately decide whither to keep the money or give it to the other family.(Miller)  The problem with this show is that it takes poverty and makes it entertainment. It's a disturbing, almost satist  premise, watching struggling families go through an emotional battery for..."
1 "such that it is" "...n Standards and have a BSEN number and be CE marked. It is important to check this specification when ordering equipment.    Equipment must be stored such that it is kept clean and in good working order. If it becomes defective, it must be replaced immediately so it is important to maintain stock levels and check ..."
1 "had believed that she" "...e had never had the chance to really pursue a relationship with one given her job. She had to become accustomed to the worst of the male species, and had believed that she had sworn them off. But now The Warden seemed to embody the best of the male species, physically anyway.  Zera wanted to see him naked and just as vu..."
1 "schools that it authorizes" "...uire that it provide comprehensive oversight of its chartered schools and is a legally authorized agency to help ensure public accountability for the schools that it authorizes.     Bethel does not operate charter schools. Whereas the Authorizer has no authority, control, power, administrative or   financial responsibility o..."
0 "Bertolucci states that Paul" "...lations sometimes serve for his disclaim and insurrection against the pressure of church, family, and ordinance, which has been adopted institutions. Bertolucci states that Paul’s this sex act onto Jeanne is a kind of didactic cruelty and also Paul wants to reach total genuineness in this relationship. He wants to teach what ..."
1 "just hoped that they" "...ed down. “Missed me?” Yes. He did. Being out in the cool air was clearing up all the tension and animosity that had been building up in the house. He just hoped that they hadn’t actually left it there instead and would be walking right back into it when they were done shopping.  He took another deep breath of the blond..."
1 "say that" "...motions would dictate. But now, as he approaches his twentieth year and almost as many years spent within the same small cobbled walls, Castiel can’t say that he carries those fears as heavily as he had in the past, at least not so heavy that he wouldn’t try to convince his brother to at least bring him wit..."
1 "also agree that the" "...rbitral awards 1958 is primarily used to enforce awards. When both parties to the agreement have their place of business in different states and they also agree that the arbitration will be bound by the NYC if any dispute arises. International arbitration is the preferred means for settlement of petroleum disputes, be..."
1 "This means that students" "...hat will help ensure a successful collaborative environment.  He argues that first students must be able to experiment without penalty (Moore 2016).  This means that students need to be able to interact in the environment without feeling like a mistake will be detrimental to their overall success.  For many students, onlin..."
1 "CalorieLab revealed that a" "...ate. The study showed an estimated total energy expenditure of 546 kcal/hour and a heart rate of 190 beats*min (Smith, 2006). Additionally, data from CalorieLab revealed that a person with a weight of 185lbs burns 252 calories during an hour of drumming.  \tLately, fFitness centers are continually coming up with new ways to g..."
0 "’s that ?" "... breakfast bar. I put the kettle on and got four mugs out of the cupboard, ignoring Harry as he came into the kitchen. “What about you, Harry?”  “What’s that ?” he asked as he sat down next to my dad.  “Work?”  “Oh. It’s going really good, actually.”  “He’s opening up a new studio on New York,” I said.  “Oh ..."
1 "also liked that we" "...rd in school and always try my best. I like to get good grades so always study very hard for things. In English I liked that we had reading circle. I also liked that we went to the library, it was very nice to have time to read and think about the book in total silence.My stengths in English are writing,reading and g..."
1 "company realised that the" "Sears Case Study Executive Summary The Sears company realised that the process of ISO accreditation would transform and standardise the business across multiple functions and geographic regions. The actual process of bui..."
0 "EYLF advocates that children" "...on about children’s own learning and development progress is provided to them as feedback on their learning activity (Flottman et al., 2011), and the EYLF advocates that children are active participants in their own learning (DEEWR, 2009), so effective assessment should incorporate children’s views on their learning. There app..."
0 "much that it is" "...ng the interviews with him, he often cries. When asked about the reason behind his crying he stated that “he is so unhappy and misses his daughter so much that it is breaking his heart” (J. Doe, personal communication, August 11, 2016). He also has a need for everything to be perfect and just as he wants it even i..."
1 "responses show that most" "...llected, 40.2% chose visual arts, 30.4% chose interactive art, 12% chose sculpture, and 17.4% chose others like botanical art, craft work, etc. These responses show that most people like visual arts, the arts created for visual perception, as it is very relaxing and easy to do.   Which of the following art materials have y..."
1 "and features that Russia" "...ck by his appearance. A young man- Arabic, it seemed- with wavy black hair that seemed to frame his face, giving way to a tanned, freckled complexion and features that Russia could only describe as ‘catlike’. His eyes were the most intense golden colour that seemed to shimmer like gold leaf and Russia wondered why the boy ..."
0 "problem is that some" "...experiencing an increase in nurse turnover which results in staffing shortages for these organizations (Alhamwan & Mat., 2015). The specific business problem is that some hospital administrators lack strategies to reduce voluntary nurse turnover.  Purpose Statement The purpose of this qualitative multiple case study wi..."
1 "Parties agree that the" "...without posting bond or an amount equivalent to the compensation of such solicited, employed, or engaged personnel, converted to an annual basis. The Parties agree that the financial remedy for each breach of this agreement shall be no less than USD $50,000 per employee or independent contractor involved in the breach.  ..."
0 "be reminded that our" "... to listen” to Clinton’s pleas.  Speaking of influential families and politics, don't think that Caitlyn falls behind in bloodline. If you require to be reminded that our girl reigns from the greatest American, Armanian dynasty of Calabasas, The Kardashians, then you have been living under a rock. Caitlyn worked as a p..."
0 "only taught that America" "...ver do any wrong. Which creates citizens who don’t truly understand their past and are not ready for the future. In history classes, students are not only taught that America is the best, but also of the heroification of past leaders. The small amount of people who have access to good education are the ones who succeed, un..."
1 "they felt that they" "... also affects the individual’s level of happiness. For instance, more respondents from the Democratic party felt happier than the Republicans because they felt that they were more connected than others.  Question 3: The physiological and psychological processes Used in the study of empathy.  According to Lieberman and..."
1 "must understand that each" "...ces in the clinical area and encouraging the mentee to reflect on these experiences can once again solidify the mentees learning.  Finally the mentor must understand that each mentee will bring with them their own learning styles and experiences and will have different aims and objectives within their self-directed learning..."
1 "was worried that you" "...merits and progressing positively in his academic achievements. Even so, what's worrying still is his continuation of detestations and exclusions.  I was worried that you commented about Samuel not having his basic equipment. As I always make certain to check. So I phoned the school. Through my discussion with a staff ..."
1 "to ensure that we" "...   Reliability is a test of how constantly a measuring instrument measures the theory it is measuring (Sekaran & Bougie 2013:225). Validity is a test to ensure that we test the right theory, and it tests how well an instrument that is developed measures a particular theory. (Sekaran & Bougie 2013:225). It is therefo..."
1 "Rank knows that he" "...t Nora denies it.  The two discuss the plans for  the evening, Nora wants to make sure Dr Rank, a mutual friend will be attending. Torvald replies Dr Rank knows that he is always welcome and therefore doesn't need to be invited. The door bell rings,  Torvald returns to his study room. It was Dr Rank and Nora’s childh..."
0 "all is that both" ".... Mrs Linde talks about hardship after hardship and sacrifice after sacrifice, nothing compared to Nora's pampered  “doll” treatment. The irony of it all is that both of their marriages involved sacrificing themselves in exchange for money. As the conversation goes on, Mrs Linde says to Nora that she is still a chi..."
0 "just feel that Statistics" "...d to be a very orderly person and being able to predict trends and organize data is something that is something that I think I will enjoy. Overall, I just feel that Statistics will be right up my ally of challenging yet enjoyable classes."
1 "conditions that it sees" "... home. I know this is where he wants to be. Jadan, should be here with his immediate family and brothers. I am willing to cooperate with court on any conditions that it sees fit to place of me such as my home or anything else needed by the court.  As far as the day she went to court I don't know what happen in court.  The..."
0 "database that is made" "...dge to combat sex trafficking using multiple platforms. The enormous volume of data that is available to predators must be harnessed [collected] in a database that is made available to the global first responder network [interpol].  After the data is collected the first responder network (polaris, state, federal, and gl..."
0 "study are that they" "...The questionnaire was designed so that should a non-trainee or non-qualified CA receive the questionnaire the survey will end.    The pitfalls of the study are that they only look at trainee and qualified CA’s at one firm (PwC) and in one province (i.e. Gauteng). The disadvantage of the population choice is that perce..."
1 "learning that is shared" "...n education leader promotes the success of every student by facilitating the development, articulation, implementation and stewardship of a vision of learning that is shared and supported by all stakeholders.  STEPS TOWARDS ACCOMPLISHMENT Watch.  Visit each of the school buildings weekly. Be observant of both students and..."
0 "which highlights that the" "... is any anticipated harms must have some scientific basis.  In practice, the principle is enshrined in various domestic legislations such as the EPBC which highlights that the Minister for planning must consider the precautionary principle in making decisions. It has also played an important role in judicial decisions such ..."
1 "to foreshadow that he" "...or anything so close to their heart that they are working to pursue. Santiago’s thought “they have forgotten to rely on their own instincts” is going to foreshadow that he will come to face with people who have forgotten who they are and what they believe in. Somehow that group of people will contain many who have forgo..."
1 "quantity that is supplied" "...cannot make or are not proficient at making it. Supply and Demand Curves \tThe supply curve shows the relationship between the prices of goods and the quantity that is supplied. Suppliers want to make money, so of course they would want to supply more of a good or service that has a higher price and less of a good or service..."
1 "remember that" "...ing invalid statements. It is absolutely critical that you think before you post, you may have to explain to someone why you did such a thing online, remember that you cannot control where your post goes.  By following these tips we can make sure that whatever we base our evidence on, is a valid fact. In an hono..."
1 "copulation that is resisted" "...ny cases of rape that remain unreported as an increasing trend appears eminent (U.S. Department of State, 2007).  \tBy definition, rape can considered copulation that is resisted by the victim in his or her full ability unless such resistance would result in death or serious physical injury of the victim or the persons who the..."
1 "and stated that Saluka" "...Republic, The Claimants Nationality was questioned. Whether it was a legal person incorporated under the laws of Netherlands, The Respondent objected and stated that Saluka, was just a Shell company owned by Japanese. The tribunal held that Saluki was a legal person incorporated under the Czech-Netherlands BIT, and was a..."
1 "society believe that cannabis" "...the government body deem cannabis use as illegal, isn’t relevant to the views of the group of teenagers amongst society.  The individuals within this society believe that cannabis use is acceptable to be used as a remedy for stress as well as a recreational drug when associating amongst other individuals.  This act also comes f..."
0 "to indicate that his" "...Should I be worried you’re going to fall over or have you sit down?” he asked worriedly. I could hear the blood rushing in his veins, which I assumed to indicate that his heart was beating fast, if it was beating at all.  ‘Should I mention what happened just now…? No, I’ll wait awhile and see if it goes away, if it doe..."
1 "is recommended that Mr" "... C1  C2- 2. Reading B2+  C1 3. Speaking C1-  C1+ 4. Writing B2  C1-   Advice In order to continue to increase his fluency in legal writing skills, it is recommended that Mr. Jansen continue to write in a variety of areas, including not only legal memoranda and advises, but also creative and imaginitive writing and articl..."
0 "Panel agrees that this" "...icates the strength of demand, and values greater than 1.0 represent a measure of financial security, since full enrollment is assured. The Consensus Panel agrees that this ratio should be calculated and reported every year to monitor a school’s demand trends as well as its status (or single-year snapshot). Likewise, aut..."
1 "was concerned that the" "...d by the Ghadar movement and animated by the trial and execution of Udham Singh. From its earliest history, the Indian Political Intelligence service was concerned that the IWA could have been a destabilizing force among Indians in the Midlands and feared that “under invasion conditions some of them, particularly the Sik..."
1 "recording said that the" "... describing the language of conversion efforts in American Indian tribes. Good to go is attested from 1989.  February 27, 2016 Alan Watts in an audio recording said that the Hebrew words for good and evil dealt with building, mechanical or technical terms that meant beneficial (good) or unbeneficial (evil) for someone usi..."
1 "would think that the" "...away from the desk towards the elevator when I started to see Mason coming out from the underground stairs that we took to get into the building. You would think that the CEO of the company would have a separate entrance to his office. I waved and got a wave back and got into the elevator. The walls and floor of the el..."
1 "she says that “" "... Abigail uses truly reveals she is willing to go large lengths to protect her reputation. She can deceive and trap the girls with a scare tactic when she says that “Indians smash my dear parents’ heads on the pillow next to mine”, showing that she is able to keep her plan hidden through having others follow up wit..."
1 "I felt that I" "...else has to say about me or what I thought of myself, that I realized that there was nothing wrong with me that's just what I came to believe because I felt that I was different but I really wasn't and now I know but I'm just same as everybody else.This took me awhile to comprehend but by the time I was in Middl..."
1 "student that was diagnosed" "... Who Decides Where Jerry Goes to School? Family and Educator Conflict in Special Education Placement,” by John J. Stein. Jerry is a special education student that was diagnosed in the 5th grade with  attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD), oppositional defiant disorder (ODD), and a conduct disorder (CD).  Jerry’s in..."
1 "she said that this" "...h men, Brazil can’t let this go because even the smallest threat could quickly become the biggest one. I agree with the counterterrorism analyst when she said that this could be a time to catch many dangerous enemies and I think other than the 85,000 officers guarding the Olympics, there should be more working to cat..."
1 "or adapt that her" "...ith their extended family and friends were stopped because they did not have time for entertainment and social activity. Salwa didn’t want to believe or adapt that her husband no more with her, which impacted negatively on her social life; she did not want to visit her friends or to go outside, as well as she wanted..."
1 "and that is how" "...e line because you can’t reach success without sacrifices. It showed that he was willing to face everything in his path to get to his Personal Legend and that is how it should be with everyone. He has faced many obstacles, but the dangers of the tribal wars would prove his bravery and commitment. So, the alchemist..."
0 "I Think that it" ".../sport? Who do you think will win overall! Write a few sentences explaining why you think they will win.  \t\t                   NZ Blackstick Woman    I Think that it will be a close chance betwen   Where did the Olympic Games begin? Find out about the history of the Games. What country started the Olympic Games? H..."
1 "him recognize that not" "...t-lived affairs with other women to fight his emptiness. His affairs continue in such manner until he meets Anna Sergeyevna. A young woman that makes him recognize that not only does he needs physical love but a woman that can speaks about the “private realities of life” not about “frenzied gambling, gluttony, drunkennes..."
0 "I suppose that’" "...unching of leaves beneath hooves and the occasional whinney from a steed that was nearby “I cant see where im going “ Allukhan stopped her Mare “Well I suppose that’s why this place is called the Dark Wood” a voice responded in the darkness “Allukhan, keep moving forward we are almost there” Ahkmed nudged her from..."
1 "I conceive that credentials" "...lities in my field of study. Having that claim behind your name so prepare's a higher standard and outlook of the average human service professional. I conceive that credentials show employees and clients that we are competent in our area of study and capable of helping them with their problems. One last benefit that I must e..."
1 "” means that Abigail" "...urt him in the end.   Act 2 #8 Proctor’s quote, “If the girl’s a saint now, I think it is not easy to prove she is a fraud, and the town gone so silly” means that Abigail’s high status made her too big to fail. Proctor still holds back from revealing the truth because he doesn’t want the public to know about his affair..."
0 "payment that is needed" "...dule to ensure I'm on the correct track for graduation. My Financial Aid Advisory and I must collaborate to ensure that I know and have the financial payment that is needed to pay for my courses. My advisory will also be able to make suggestions on how to pay for my courses in the event I'm not able to receive government..."
0 "because that is where" "...can businesses operate in a global environment. Managers must design, produce and market their products catering for the local tastes and preferences because that is where the demand is. The products demanded by the home country of the business will not be demanded in the foreign markets.  Organising the products and se..."
0 "trashcan that was in" "...we ran into the snack bar. Knowing it wouldn’t be long before other kids ventured in here we started shoving all the food we could find into an empty trashcan that was in the corner. We put in burritos, chips, water, fruit soda, some ice cream, and a few other things. When we had gathered as much food as we possibly ca..."
1 "he realized that there" "...finite?   A gentleman called  Auguste Bravais, took troubles to study the infinite arrays of discrete points in three dimensional space. This is when he realized that there could be symmetry in play and we could be looking at the same set of crystals. Thus, we have the 14 Bravais Lattices. We will go into the details of ..."
1 "I believe that almost" "...ronomy. So much so that I read every book in the library and every website that had information about space. Both Caitlin and I had similar feelings. I believe that almost everyone has this same unknown yearning inside us that we don’t understand. Our attractions can be to many different things. In my case, it was astro..."
1 "I feel that he" "...ter 14 was a tolerable chapter. I am not too sure how I feel about Mr. Collins, since he was just introduced. He seems like an okay character, though I feel that he might be hiding something. He kept on complimenting Lady Catherine de Bourgh and her daughter, who as the reader finds out, will inherit the de Bourg..."
1 "was determined that the" "...both to 1) overload the server with CPU usage and memory requirements, 2) respond to cookied/session-based visitors with 403 and 503 HTTP errors.  It was determined that the general public was largely unaffected by site outages from Monday, June 6th, to Friday late morning, June 10th, 2016. During that period, the only af..."
1 "study found that patients" "..., 2012). Furthermore, a study that targeted understanding self-management experiences of patients with COPD and the challenges of such practices; the study found that patients’ practices evolved as they experienced symptoms of COPD; however, there was no evidence about whether these measures would have an effect on improvin..."
1 "presenting that it is" "...nconsistent, just as the methods of assessment are (Farquhar, 1995).  Is this irregularity sending out correct messages to society, or is it possibly presenting that it is important to be inconsistently healthy?  This essay critically reflects on general responses to health and the following statement that: “Health and ..."
0 "To prevent that from" "...mber of students shared their documents with me; this caused my email inbox and my ‘shared with me folder’ in my drive to become extremely congested. To prevent that from happening this year, I plan on creating the assignments in Google classroom and having the students who choose to submit electronically do so through..."
1 "in mind that most" "...the other hand she expressed that she also have problems with her parents because of the same issue (Jerlay). Her answer was what I expected, keeping in mind that most adolescents start to have romance, conflicts with parents and peers around this time. I closed my interview by asking her if she felt a change in her..."
1 "effect is that you" "...ising, conclusions and bad brain injuries. Some short term effects are headaches, neck and back pains, numbness and even abdominal pain but one major effect is that you may not only lose people that you love or you may even get killed. Some minor effects are that you might get your car impounded and demerit points ag..."
0 "Well that completely" "...she would realize it wasnt the other drivers fault and perhaps settle down. I swear my intention was to try to invite some peace,love and compassion. Well that completely back fired. Her anger was now directed towards me. As i watched her unleash her anger all i could wonder was what could have possibly happened in her..."
0 "muscular body that’" "...bathroom is clean and white and unbroken, pristine. There’s steam coming from the bathwater and it’s warm in here. \tI’m going to bathe him, his lean, muscular body that’s whole and unhurt. I wonder, just for a second, exactly how many wounded, mangled men I’ve washed and bandaged, how many soldiers’ blood has run over..."
"Who thinks that they" "...l bringing out bad points of gays and transgenders out of nowhere, who actually feels sympathy for the victims and is going to do something about it? Who thinks that they’ve had enough" 1
1 "people believe that Rontu" "...d to kill Rontu because he killed her younger brother but soon came to befriend him. Rontu, the name of the dog, means fox eyes in her language. Some people believe that Rontu was left by the russians or^the Aleutian. The dogs killed many of the wildlife on the island, decreasing marine and bird population. Because easy to ..."
1 "they learned that they" "...e passes over the slopes of the mountain, through the country where lived since then the hill tribes and settled. How would they take their plan when they learned that they had the intention high over the passes to come over to go down to get to the sea.  About every treetop peace had returned. The setting sun bathed the..."
1 "also believed that tranquility" "...good is to seek modest pleasure in order to obtain tranquility this is achieved through freedom from fear and, the absence of bodily pain. Epicureans also believed that tranquility can be obtained through knowledge of the workings of the world, leading a simple moderate life, limiting desires. Skeptomai “to look carefully, to re..."
0 "example suggests that there" "...Liberty Reserve, another form of cryptocurrency, was closed down for allegedly laundering billions of dollars for cyber criminals (Moore, 2013). This example suggests that there are forms or regulatory controls that impact the operations of cryptocurrencies. Further, the anonymous nature of transaction is transparent, on a pe..."
1 "change is that smaller" "... away, so why to bother, thus voter turnout is never as good as it should be which leaves the voices of many Americans unheard.  Another argument for change is that smaller states can have a larger percentage of the electoral college than states with the major cities. This is because they are less populated but automatic..."
1 "Germans that were so" "... started to invade the countries in Europe. Piggy’s murder is paralleled by the holocaust, mass killing of Jews, and the boys in Jack’s tribe are the Germans that were so engrossed in their country's pride that they followed anything their leader said. Although the war is in the background for most of the novel, it als..."
0 "” that is what" "...t today. As I get older it takes on more of an in depth meaning, it has almost turned into a love story about life. “Get busy living or get busy dying” that is what this is about, the hope and inspiration to live. I would recommend watching this film as it is a classic drama that will keep its meaning throughout ..."
0 "he notes that despite" "...ficient evidence to show that the concept is legally binding upon states’ pursuant to international law and can constrain their conduct. For example, he notes that despite several references to sustainable development in Gabčíkovo–Nagymaros, Judge Weeramantry did not once actually apply the principle to establish rights..."
1 "she remembered that Kiritsugu" "...ing pain invading all his senses, and once he wasn't resisting anymore the world faded to black. End Flashback When he woke up and explained what saw she remembered that Kiritsugu had became mortified, a cold shiver across his spine imagining what would happen should Shirou was discovered by other magus, mainly the Einzbern or ..."
1 "are convinced that it" "...ing in the room is not Jekyll, and that it is some sort of dwarf. Utterson finally decides to break down the door to see who is in the room. Both men are convinced that it is Hyde. They both call one of Jekyll's servant, Bradshaw, and tell him to watch the laboratory on the other side of the square garden. The two decid..."
1 "and ensure that Nigeria" "...en met among other proposed policies in Nigeria. Despite many implemented of these implemented actions to reverse mortality among under five children and ensure that Nigeria is on track to achieve the Millennium Development Goal (MDGs) in 2015, but efforts seemed abortive. 30 percent reduction in child mortality has been ..."
1 "suggested that" "I work at Apple Inc. This work requires me to use the problem solving steps all the time. In the video, John Paul Lobo, suggested that we asked help and brainstorm with my co-workers and managers to do a good job at the first time so our customers continue to be happy with our produc..."
1 "WHO suggests that both" "...nuous surveillance practices be administered by hospitals and national entities which as described is occurring in Australia (WHO 2002). Further, the WHO suggests that both passive and active surveillance methods be applied, which monitor patient and nursing records in conjunction with research studies on incidence and p..."
0 "images is that T1" "...16). The most familiar MRI sequence are T1-weighted and T2-weighted scans (Preston, 2006) . The difference between T1-weighted images and T2-weighted images is that T1 uses short time to echo and repetition times and T2 uses longer time to echo and repetition times (Preston, 2006). In general, T1- and T2-weighted im..."
1 "common is that they" "...'s the Right White\" is a slogan for the Liberty Paint Factory coined by the black Lucius Brockway. What all these expressions and many others have in common is that they are not only funny and clever, they also embody folk wisdom that the narrator needs to hear and understand.  Ellison also has a fine ear for all kind..."
1 "I recognize that I" "...hat I have experienced, but who didn't know me at all, she just told her own story - I was flashed - for the first time in my life I felt understood, I recognize that I am not alone. That I am not weird and suffering under any illness, that I am just different and absolutely normal. That I have the right to be I want..."
1 "and questioned that which" "...entury Rousseau lead the way for the Unfoldment Theory, believing that a child would develop their own understanding of the world as they experienced and questioned that which was around them.   \tJean-Jacques Rousseau (1712-1778) explained this theory further in his book Emile (1762), which described the life of a young boy..."
1 "are told that Hyde" "...inspector that he would be able to take him to the murder, and they show up at Mr. Hyde´s apartment. When they arrive a women opens the door and they are told that Hyde isn't there. They then proceed to search the apartment where they find a burned checkbook, and the other half of the murder weapon. Utterson and the ..."
1 "authorities is that they" "...art of looking at the State is by examining its changes and history over a period of time. A major characterization of any State, Country or even the authorities is that they are closely-connected and interlinked (Hobson 1998). To what historical sociologists would term as partial autonomy, those in power or those with pol..."
0 "‘that is about" "...e 1st century.  The time indicator within the passage renders impossible the idea that the promise was to saints 2000 years in the future. The phrase ‘that is about to come’ includes the verb ‘mello’ which was used to express imminence. When Jesus said ‘the hour of the trial that is about to come’ He meant it wou..."
1 "modified is that the" "...antity of those crops survived http://www.geneticallymodifiedfoods.co.uk/ethical-concerns-gm-foods.html   Social issues:   The benefit of genetically modified is that the farmers make benefits as the yield of the production is increased so the deficit of food decreases. But the social issue related to genetically modif..."
1 "so wet that I" "...p by Chelsea, she pulls up my diaper pants and my diaper cover and she touch my disposable diaper and says yes it's wet indeed.  Abbie your diaper is so wet that I would recommend a diaper change, since it’s a wet diaper  You stand during the diaper change. Chelsea begins with unbuttoning the buttons on my yello..."
0 "deny that" "...rdized uniform: a white collar shirt with two red stripe running around the short sleeves, a dark grey tie, grey suit pants, and black shoes. I can’t deny that this guy is attractive, but never judge a book by its cover. He could just some prick or bastard that wants attention. \t“You called Father?” the guy ..."
1 "countries that were traditionally" "...regions such as Europe that were once riddled with disputes later on came together to form a united entity called the European Union. Similarly, many countries that were traditionally and historically in conflict have in recent years formed alliances and new partnerships. In the same way, countries that were previously scarred with..."
1 "to grasp that the" "...ture and purpose in one’s life.  Even though pet owners are at lower risk of getting cardiovascular disease than non-pets owners, it seems impossible to grasp that the beneficial effects were only associated with biological aspects.  The aspects as to why structure, joy and lower blood pressure became present were f..."
1 "Stewardship believes that we" "...e earth for our benefit while Environmental wisdom believes we are depending on earth’s resources and we have a duty to protect earth from dying out. Stewardship believes that we have a responsibility to our earth  The key concept is living sustainably means living off the earth’s natural income without depleting or degrading ..."
1 "pitches that were not" "...mplative. Note Values: Half, whole, and quarter notes, as well as the equivalent rests. Pitches: This movement will also have seven pitches Use the 6 pitches that were not used in the 1st movement and 1 pitch that hasn’t been used yet in the piece.   Chapter 13: Additional Resources If you’re interested in learning abou..."
"in that was not" "... later became best friends. She herself was about seven too so her perception of the world had been derived from the envorinment she was being raised in that was not her fault.  " 1
1 "Hector thinks that Malik" "... when he is older. Hector Amani, hector is a nerd he is also very skinny and lacks strength. Hector likes malik he really wants to friend with malik. Hector thinks that Malik actually likes him when he is^not around people. Amber Laska, Amber is sort of a control freak she has to have a schedule to do everyday and it has t..."
1 "have argued that there" "...nd renew organization’s culture. Although benchmarking is very effective tool and has a direct impact on organizational performance, many researchers have argued that there are many weaknesses and limitations. The one of common problem is that benchmarking concentrate on data instead of processes used to result in that d..."
0 "He felt that God" "... in prayer. They thanked God for their lives and they read a few of the bible verses that were in a little notebook his mom gave him to carry around. He felt that God would be even closer to him with it in his pocket. He had his mom write as many verses that would fit. “Be joyful in hope, patient in affliction, fai..."
0 "to add that she" "...uined and flashy like her personality. The way she tossed her head back and spoke throwing her arms and hands about fitted her sequined shirt. I have to add that she brought everyone’s costumes for the party giving herself the main role and the others as part of the seven dwarfs. I can’t help but believe this adds..."
1 "I felt that this" "...rked in this department, Dave Gartner, took short term trips for years. He and Chuck are friends from the Daystar days and China.  Upon hearing that, I felt that this is exactly where God wanted me at this time!  So in a 5 minute meeting, Holy Spirit approved and confirmed the short term trips in my future. Thank y..."
1 "to tears that she" "...w happy  they are for her.  Passersby also congratulate her and wish her all the happiness. It was a happy moment for Israa and it almost brought her to tears that she could be so happy. She did not want this feeling to ever end.   On the way, Aalaa and Fahtma  were talking about their wedding days, and how happy th..."
1 "philosophy proposed that it" "...greater expansion. It soon came to embody the governing philosophy of the Polk administration and its fervent expansionist aims. In other words, this philosophy proposed that it was “the God-given right of all United States citizens to take and role land, including that occupied by Mexicans and Indians.”  This attitude helped..."
0 "identifier that is almost" "...ecurity aspect of IT. Find a way to track the criminal element through the dark web. Each computer (laptop, desktop, mobile phone) has its own unique identifier that is almost like a calling card. Using this unique identifier the criminal element can be traced and brought to justice. The technology and the know how is there..."
0 "this book that ’" "...ns that I could apply not to just my life, but everyone’s. The things this book talks about touched me because I feel like I could learn lessons from this book that ’ll help me conquer life and own it. Like one of the lessons that I understand better is to not be afraid to fail. I know that many people tell me this..."
1 "believe that" "...d the offended person,”I am Thorin, son of Thráin, rightful owner of the kingdom under the mountain.” “Oh my gosh!” said Harrison excitedly. “I can’t believe that I am really in The Hobbit!” announced Harrison. Harrison was standing there in amazement while staring at all of the dwarves. “What are you doing her..."
1 "recently stated that they" "...would be privatised, which is strange because those same people want it to be privatised, so further examples of being dishonest. The government have recently stated that they would make sure services such as the NHS would be exempt from TTIP, so it makes it a moot point.   The bottom line is. As yourself if you honestly th..."
0 "he murmurs that I" "...in my fingertips, my other hand under the water, moving while he watches. My hips are moving and I can hear Lew talking over my soft moans and gasps; he murmurs that I’m a good girl, his good girl, telling me to keep going, keep touching. He’s breathing heavily and I see that his hands are busy, too. The water is sw..."
1 "also noticed that the" "... of foods for everyone. The restaurant places a strong emphasis on serving foods that are healthy as opposed to places like McDonalds and Walmart.  I also noticed that the operations at True Foods Kitchen was very refined and efficient. It appears that the waiters were well trained and friendly and made me feel at home...."
1 "thing that is bothering" "...es my lungs. I don’t belong on Mars, I belong on Earth and no matter how others people tell me I don’t belong here, this is a lie or untrue.  Another thing that is bothering me is, I feel I cannot criticize or question Christianity in my home. If I cannot question something that I immediately become suspicious. I am writi..."
1 "community that was emblematic" "... Lewis’s (1995) felicitous phrase, Stepney was a neighborhood comprised of “overlapping diasporas.” Here, Indians and Eastern European Jews created a community that was emblematic of Udham Singh’s overarching commitment to the international labour movement and the degree to which he was able to transgress the boundaries of ethn..."
1 "might indicate that this" "...nses to the above questions are complete and correct to the best of my information and belief. I agree that if I become aware of any information that might indicate that this disclosure is inaccurate or that I have not complied with this policy, I will notify [designated officer or director] immediately.  Signed __________..."
1 "Israa smiled that she" "... was ever going to come, I am so excited, and nervous, and OMG baby I am so in love with you I can’t wait to start our life together” the text said.  Israa smiled that she was having the same thought as Brandon at the same time.  She texted back that she had felt the same way, and that she too was so in love with him, a..."
1 "to see that she" "... She then stated, “I am now convinced, my dear aunt, that I have never been much in love…”(Austen 89). I do believe, that Elizabeth’s aunt wanted her to see that she was not in love wit                                                                  In Chapter 27 and 28 \t\t\t\t \t                      In Chapter 35 a..."
0 "research found that “" "...hat what little resources available were insufficient and inadequate. This lack of resources can significantly add to the level of family stress.This research found that “post-adoption support is a resource that has the potential to enhance parents’ ability to cope with stress… [and] pre-adoptive trainings appeared to b..."
1 "Chances are that there" "...onflict if they aren’t rescued or found by the Navy or rescue helper. This also does puzzle me due to the fact that most of the time in most stories. Chances are that there would be a person who would disagree and will say any type of bad news that would contradict the fact they would have been saved. This puzzles me due..."
1 "we found that the" "...d with him in this algorithm while if he isn’t authorized to see the data the algorithm won’t return anything to the user.  To analyze the algorithm, we found that the time evolution of the amplitudes of the marked and unmarked states can be described by first-order linear difference equations with some special prop..."
1 "people that were appeared" "...ng to Dictionary.com vulnerability means to be in the state of being open to injury. The characters in this novel were represented here as vulnerable people that were appeared to be hurt.            Tom Robinson is an African American farmer who lives with his family. He seems to be an introvert kind of guy, with a shy pers..."
1 "also feel that when" "...f and others making ,what use to be obvious, grammatical mistakes. I know that this course would provide me with the proper tools I am looking for. I also feel that when I have completed it, I will have enough confidence to obtain a job that will be both satisfying as well as profitable in many ways."
0 "others observe that the" "...e “From the time that Jesus began to . . .” in 4.17 and 16.21 is intended to mark the beginning and ending of major sections of the narrative. Still, others observe that the story has the same general outline as that of Mark, with a geographical movement from the early ministry in Galilee towards final confrontation in Je..."
1 "I feel that the" ".... The only way technology becomes an obstacle is when it is misused, or used for things you’re not supposed to, such as video games. But, ultimately, I feel that the of technology helps us to bring our work to the teacher, and even work under the the supervision of our teachers through Google Drive, Classroom, etc..."
1 "I think that this" "...ister, Jane, twice. Elizabeth, the second oldest, overhears Mr. Bingley telling Mr. Darcy the Jane “is the most beautiful creature” he had ever seen. I think that this is absolutely adorable, and shows how much he likes Jane. However, you can’t marry a man that you have just met. Mr. Darcy seems a bit rude, especial..."
1 "We hope that your" "...e contents of the employee handbook as soon as possible; it will answer many questions about your employment with Hunter's Furniture and Appliance .  We hope that your working environment is the best we can make it and that your career here will be enjoyable, rewarding and challenging.  Remember, the management door..."
0 "say is that most" "...coming off a screen directly at your eyes, a curved TV can deliver 1.5 to 1.8 times better contrast than flat screen TVs. Science or hype? All we can say is that most of the curved TVs we’ve seen have slightly better contrast than flat screens. 4. Viewing Angle You might wonder how a curved TV with the same screen ..."
1 "once said that “" "... book touched you in some way, then you did not read it right. Readers could learn so much from this book, as long as they want to learn. John Lennon once said that “Life is what happens to you while you're busy making other plans”. If I have learned anything from this book, it is that you just have to stop and enj..."
1 "he feels that he" "...ations, and has been abused by his drunken father, almost to the point where shirts are unable to hide all the bruises. This has affected Cole a lot, he feels that he is unsafe and can’t go home where his safe haven should be; this has made Cole feel as if no one cares about him. However, Cole’s mother is no better..."
1 "process that is continuously" "...tion you using their five senses by seeing, touching, hearing, tasting, and smelling.   While the cognitive development takes place, there is another process that is continuously expanding. Emotional Development is the emergence of a child's experience, expression, understanding, and regulation of emotions through each stage. ..."
0 "argue that" "...nsistent with the needs, demands, goals, objectives, and/or structure of another component,\" (Nadler & Tushman, 1980: 40). Many researchers, however, argue that organisations are more efficient and/or effective when they achieve fit/integration relative to when insufficient fit/integration exists (Baird & Mes..."
1 "person believes that he" "... country, ideal, freedom. Even though the person’s attitude is changed against the life this changing never be seen as a pathological situation.  The person believes that he/she can overcome of this situation within a certain time. Distinctively from melancholy there is no any deterioration of self-respect in mourning.  L..."
1 "study identifies that they" "...ve a decline in variation through a reduction or elimination of errors and mistakes; that is, you have fewer defects and less rework.” The Sears case study identifies that they did experience increased productivity increases in their mower repair shops and lower recall rates for in house service technicians. Reflective Repor..."
1 "work is that it" "...re in terms of success of the program yet the holistic approach would be deemed sensible by many researchers including…….  The bottom line of Sarra’s work is that it intends to build a positive image of Aboriginality for Indigenous and non indigenous people in Australia. This is a difficult task as you have to ove..."
0 "Faye is that the" "...unday afternoon.”(214) This was the description of Ms. Kate Albey, a new prostitute that established herself quickly in Faye’s brothel. “What puzzles Faye is that the kid looks like a runaway girl except she’s a goddam good whore. She knows all the answers and all the tricks.”(214) Cathy is posing in yet another ne..."
1 "managers ensure that they" "...ct emails.  Protecting your business  With potentially catastrophic data breaches coming from external hacks and being caused by human error, how can managers ensure that they’re organisation is protected?  In addition to up to date security software and regular audits by a security professional it’s also a very good idea t..."
0 "bought that was still" "...ever gave me a single spanking like the former nannies and master did to me. When I was about 20 years old my master got two younger children that he bought that was still in diapers. He asked or said to me I was responsible to get them feed and change their diapers when it was need. So I did as he told me and the two g..."
0 "dress that is red" "... panties. I am given a bath in bathtub and I am washed thoroughly and then she dress me in my red panties and my red bra and I am wearing my finished dress that is red.   Abbie goes up with her nanny and meets her master Alastair and another gentleman in the hallway. The gentleman introduced himself as Glenn and tel..."
0 "was completed that a" "...ers. This meant one could not analyze two related datasets side by side. At the time, a solution could not be found. It was not until the LERC client was completed that a solution for this problem was realized for the encoded PNG client.  \tThe LERC client presented, at first, an entirely different problem from the enco..."
1 "Ellison felt that realism" "...are surrealistic. We will explore the significance of these stylistic shifts more fully in The Story section. For now you may want to think about why Ellison felt that realism alone was not enough. What could these other styles do for him that realism could not?"
0 "all that is required" "...s allows for smooth flowing and sophisticated melodic lines. Fixing poor rhythmic usage usually isn’t too difficult. Simply pointing out the issue is all that is required for most composers. In the illustration below, you’ll see a few different ways you can modify a simple melody just by making small rhythmic changes. ..."
1 "government said that El" "...ate in rural areas in 27 of the 32 departments in Colombia, primarily in northwest, southeast and interior of the country. In May 2016, the Colombian government said that El Clan de Golfo is the only BACRIM with a national presence; other BACRIM are regional.   In addition to their involvement in the drug trade and illega..."
0 "to keep that animagi" "...e secrecy from all prying eyes.\" \"Tonight we will begin our practice. Time is against us. Now then you'll need to learn to still the mind if you wish to keep that animagi transformation under control. Have you considered meditation to control your emotions?\" he asked. Draco did not respond, but the answer was written u..."
0 "I feel that Tom" "...rs in the book, because back in the day (still happens in present day) whites were supposed to feel bad for blacks not the other way around.          I feel that Tom Robinson is a mockingbird because he keeps in his feelings not knowing how to open up to someone. Because he grew up in the country and lives in a sm..."
0 "labs that were obtained" "...lain the purpose of each test.   The information provided by labs is only valuable if it is put to good use. Millions of dollars are wasted yearly on labs that were obtained, but the information was never used. Before you have labs drawn, ask yourself and your doctor: “Will the information from this lab (or any other diag..."
0 "person that was in" "...e the world... what if we could make a formula that will cure Coronary Artery Disease because it's has a great impact in the world\" Steve said. Every person that was in the \"Ha how are you going to get a test subject for this test. No one wants to die\"a scientist shouted. \"I will preform the test\" a man shouted from ..."
0 "system ensures that the" "...ctured and organized layout of the content on the page Intelligent and easy-to-use navigation with a clear hierarchy of content  THEME SYSTEM A theme system ensures that the look and feel of your website is consistent throughout all web pages. The theme will be designed according to the approved design proof. The header, ..."
1 "I realized that I" "...is happens only in my personal life. On the other hand, do not ask me why, because I do not have the answer to give you, on my working life, only now I realized that I always used these steps without realized that I was using them. At all time, I try to find the problem first, them the alternatives, advantages and d..."
1 "reality is that slavery" "... human trafficking in all parts of the world (Keomanivong, 2008). The mere thought of slavery, to many, seems like a thing of the past, but the harsh reality is that slavery has reared its ugly head once again. Modern day slavery is something that robs the children of their innocence and youth. The criminal elements that ..."
1 "have demonstrated that approximately" "...eria involved in the development of SAB is commonly found on human skin; nasal passage; perineum surfaces; throat and auxilla. Many studies in the US have demonstrated that approximately 10-20% of the population carry the S. aureus bacteria persistently and over 50% are intermittent carriers (Naber 2009). Therefore, it can be argued t..."
0 "notes that" "...suring the organization against others. Benchmarking allows you to discover the gaps in your performance when compared with someone else. Camp (1989) notes that nothing will happen, however, unless you actually do something to close the gap or surpass the gap so identified during the process of benchmarking. ..."
1 "everyone that is significant" "...e answers to the questions that have no obvious answers, and explains the unexplainable . He dictates my creation and provides me with everything and everyone that is significant in my life. In my opinion, no one can sit down and debate on the existence of God. It is impossible to discuss and differentiate one’s facts as a pro..."
1 "you realized that you" "...nging up the phone in the first place.  When you said to me that i could show you i loved you, by doing the things you asked me to do. I  don’t think you realized that you were asking me to change who i am. It wasn’t as simple to me as it was to you.   I don’t think that when you love someone you only love part of them...."
1 "course that is to" "...y in Sunbeam. I didn't care about the I-Da-Ho jokes, but here, I felt like I had found a friend, the people were all nice, everyone knew everyone. Of course that is to be expected and I was used to that coming from a small town anyway, so it did not bother me.   We were walking, and talking, and laughing. I could te..."
1 "have said that they" "...ising the business sector, and combating crime. But opposition party Popular Force, lead by Keiko Fujimori, have an absolute majority in Congress and have said that they are unwilling to work with Kuczynski, meaning he will probably find it difficult to implement his policy programme. But neither party plan on making ..."
1 "not believe that men" "... but the world’s view on Muslim countries. We tend to be seen as countries that own and decide the lives of our women and that is false. I for one do not believe that men should be given any kind of authority over women, you should be under your own control. I hate seeing stuff like this going on especially when it is ..."
1 "is anticipated that many" "...ght wing activity.   5.4\tIn response to these threats the government launched the Counter-Terrorism and Extremist Strategy in the autumn of 2015.  It is anticipated that many elements of this strategy will be enacted via the Counter Extremist and Safeguarding Bill detailed in the Queens Speech in May 2016. A briefing, prep..."
1 "project that was supported" "...the lexical memory model based on semantic networks proposed by Collins and Quillian in a lexicographic model of lexical organization.   WordNet is a project that was supported from the outset by various institutions both governmental and private North American: the Department of Naval Research, the James S. McDonnell Founda..."
1 "I disagree that nothing" "...as the usage of fuel transportation devices, fossil fuels and lastly industrial pollution. However, now is not too late to make a change. This is why I disagree that nothing can be done to overcome the problems of global warming.  Everyday, most of our families utilize their automobiles at least once a day to go to specia..."
0 "to argue that he" "...e a good man Sasuke. Whatever Uchiha thing you have that you’re afraid of. Naruto will love you all the same. He’s stubborn like that.” Sasuke wanted to argue that he wasn’t afraid of his beast powers but was that really the case? He’d have been mated to Naruto a long time ago if he wasn’t worried about his childre..."
1 "new people that I" "...ybody else. This took me awhile to comprehend but by the time I was in Middle School I was like it was a whole other ballgame. There were significant new people that I didn't know here I am thinking here it goes again but then nobody noticed and I wondered why didn't they. so one day I just looked in the mirror and ..."
1 "could tell that the" "...es to get coffee and a little breakfast there. We go in by the back.”              Chapter 6 The train had a small area to buy food and coffee, but I could tell that the food was all old, the crackers stale and the coffee was of very poor quality even for my standards of living, someone who uses paper plates on the re..."
1 "thick head that I" "...just going to go to bed, I don't know about you, but I am beat.\" I did not want to add on that I was pissed as well. I couldn't get it through Darcys thick head that I really did not know Mikael, and all my little white lies were not paying off by any means. She knew he was the guy I was talking about now, and I had..."
1 "sees that is from" "...like him because I know so little about him. He is very peculiar, and I want to know more of his backstory.  Log 3 \tWhen Utterson opens the letter he sees that is from Hyde, assuring Dr. Jekyll that he should not be concerned about his safety. Utterson ask Jekyll where the envelope was but Jekyll tells him that he b..."
0 "simply reminded that the" "...ts.   Conclusion:  What does the conclusion of the lesson entail? No formal assessment is done at the end of the lesson or any homework. Learners are simply reminded that the notes they create are vital for studying and it is their own responsibility to have them filled out in detail. The more in depth they make their note..."
0 "pitch that is a" "...e in either bass or treble clef. Complete the following on the second staff: Use the third scale degree for your beginning and ending pitches.  Use a pitch that is a major fifth below the note in the main melody for your penultimate pitch. Fill in the remaining pitches using stepwise motion.  If you jump more than..."
0 "website that was a" "...why we can’t.  If we’re not striving for better, we stagnate.  There’s a “Keethler” algorithm driving the customizable layouts on our primary trading website that was a critical part of a project effort.  It would not be there without the aggregated input from multiple team members in round-the-desk brainstorming aga..."
0 "discovered that" "...ainable initiatives.  How we got our name  It all begins in 1964.   Back then, a team of pretty smart individuals led by Professor Raphael Mechoulam, discovered that THC is responsible for the majority of the plant’s psychoactive properties. His desire for discovery, creativity, innovation and exploration are all ..."
1 "readers discover that Santiago" "...nvey this point]. The result of Angela’s lies was the death of Santiago Nasar, who was killed in pursuit of Angela’s missing honor. Later in the book readers discover that Santiago might’ve been killed for a crime he did not commit. [quote the investigator’s thoughts about how quickly angela threw off the topic of who de-virgini..."
1 "approach suggests that there" "...ns by could greatly implement how the mentor directs the learning facilitated in the clinical area.     Maslow’s Hierarchy of needs (date) Humanistic approach suggests that there are 5 levels a learner much climb, completing each level to attain the next, in order to reach the goal of self-actualisation (Tennant 2006).  Level ..."
0 "Well that was really" "...ce .The judges were very impressed with his delivery and his poetry. He won the first place prize package and a huge trophy. Meechie was ecstatic.  ‘’Well that was really cool Mr. J., four radio interviews down and The Morning show to go. The DJ’s were very cool. They really wanted to know all about me. The Wild Child ..."
1 "and said that she" "...ld make it! The flame inside started glowing once again.However, halfway through the game, when our setter was setting the ball, The judge stopped us and said that she was holding the ball, and gave 2 points to the other team. We knew she didnt ! She didn’t! She can’t ! I shook my head and felt those annoying tears ..."
0 "and suggest that Matthew" "...analyzed in different ways, none of which is generally agreed upon. Some use the five discourses with their prominent concluding formula as “markers” and suggest that Matthew wrote a Gospel in five books. Others suggest that the repeated clause “From the time that Jesus began to . . .” in 4.17 and 16.21 is intended to mark..."
1 "I believe that it" "... for ballet dancers like her because they are always moving and jumping around. She could easily fracture a bone in her body while she is performing. I believe that it is possible for Kylie to live out her dream of being a professional ballet dancer, have a child, and be healthy all at the same time. I know women wh..."
1 "so that it sticks" "...mm,” I answer him, “I see something I like a lot.” \tHe sits down too hard in the bath and water sloshes over the side getting the hem of my shirt wet so that it sticks to my thighs. His grin is wide and silly as he leers at me, his wet hand reaches out to touch my cheek. His hand fumbles down to my collarbone down t..."
"and assure that Suyonman" "...k, Kibum comes up to him with a stack of papers. “These are for the upcoming field trip we’re having. You need to check all the guidelines, sign them and assure that Suyonman’s students" 0
1 "then stated that it" "...added that he was aware that this absence was due to DJ experiencing symptoms of depression and that he knew some of the history relating to this. AM then stated that it was up to DJ to discuss how much or how^little he was comfortable with relating to this absence. DJ stated that leading up to this absence on the 17/..."
0 "because that is where" "...al environment. According to (prezi.com, 2016), managers must design, produce and market their products catering for the local tastes and preferences because that is where the demand lies. The products demanded by the home country of the business will not be demanded in the foreign markets.  Organising the products and ..."
1 "life that was left" "...ces of one’s death obscured his vision. A scent that was unfortunately familiar. He knew not far from where he hid the blackness consumed what little life that was left in this world. A throbbing sensation began to creep up Tag’s neck leaving a blazing warm trail to his temples. Someone was trying to communicate with..."
0 "This shows that you" "...d no problems.The Greasers thought this until, Cherry (a Soc)  told Ponyboy (a Greaser) that  Socs’ didn't have a perfect life and had many problems. This shows that you can not judge a person by just looking at them and seeing what group of people they hang around. You never know what someone has gone through or who ..."
0 "result found that the" "... investigate the impact of GDP on the Nigerian stock market ,Data during from period 2000 to 2004, They used ordinary least square test (OLS) and the result found that the GDP have no significant impact on the Nigeria stock market    HSING, Y. (2011) investigate the impact of GDP on Czech Republic stock market , The dat..."
1 "people believe that its" "...use is legitimate. Views that this practice is legal, only applies to this minority group because it applies to their culture.  In this case, the Twa people believe that its legal to consume cannabis as it is a culture practice within its people, the laws of their country don’t apply to them for this reason although they ..."
1 "is found that for" "... the drawings go through several engineering changes, thus there are lots of inconsistance happens in the ends.  Also, in the manufacturing phase, it is found that for the worker it is difficult to understand the intension of the drawings since the GD&T is noted with code instead of the sign and number.             ..."
1 "I believe that this" "... Do self insight 3.1   I have a high locus of control, I tend to believe I am in control of my own destiny and am responsible for what happens to me. I believe that this would positively impact the way I am as a leader because I know in order to make stuff happen for me I must work hard to get it. This could negativel..."
0 "imagery that is both" "...ing his ‘insider’s knowledge’.   The video for ‘Chains of Love’, despite being a song about the emotions and dynamics of a love relationship, employs imagery that is both urban and metal. Adams performs on a city rooftop in a leather jacket, with a backup band of women dressed in black jeans and black t-shirts. There i..."
0 "territory that is advantageous" "...are there won't be any chance for me!\" He said while remembering Asuka's Gift. There was the problem as the Host, he has to prepare a Game within his territory that is advantageous to him or he has no chance of winning.  Galdo was holding his head when a cold sounding woman's voice could be heard from outside the broken window. ..."
1 "further suggested that health" "...associated to the child being bewitched, cursed, jealousy and inflictions and such cannot be healed by conventional (health facilities) means. It was further suggested that health problems and illnesses are better protected and treated by traditional knowledge among children. However, traditional treatments play important roles..."
0 "I support that euthanasia" "... deny its existence. When we face with death, euthanasia is a way to respect the right to life. Thus, under the assumption of perfectly legal system, I support that euthanasia should be legalized. Nowadays, euthanasia is not legal in Taiwan. If it can be legalized in the future, law and the government must take responsibili..."
1 ": Ensure that the" "...0.01cm / 0.1mm Micrometer screw gauge 0.001 cm  / 0.01mm                      Tape Measure Has  a range of a few metres and it is flexible Precaution : Ensure that the tape is not slack or twisted.                     Metre Rule    Avoid parallax error. Position eyes such that line of sight is perpendicular to the m..."
1 "She feels that her" "...lt as he never consulted with her in any decision asking, he has shelter her just like her father did. He has never taken the time to understand her. She feels that her husband never loved her. Her dad treats her like a doll, and when she married Torvald he also continue treating her like a doll, she feels as she doe..."
1 "and reported that he" "...  I.     REASON FOR REFERRAL This case came to the attention of Adult Protective Services (APS), on 5/27/16, when Robert Banks called the APS Hotline and reported that he was being verbally abused and financially exploited by his daughter, LaWanda Evans. She and her daughter reportedly live with him and berates him and..."
1 "all that it caused" "People would agree that the Afghanistan war was a waste of time for all that it caused was problems and deaths to the U.S and Afghanistan.   Afghanistan has been in war for years. Our war started them after the tragic attacks on the Twi..."
1 "fact that is it" "...ountry sounds easy, fun and adventurous. Everyone gets so excited when they have to chance to study overseas. But, do not let the excitement bury the fact that is it not easy. Some may think money or paying for tuition and day to day expenses in general are the hard part, in reality that may not necessarily be a b..."
0 "to prove that that" "...to go through a difficult situation in his company. However, after the divorce, her dad refused to acknowledge it and since she had no legal document to prove that that money was for the company, her mom walked out of the marriage with sole custody of her daughter and debt.   “How about my brother, Lucy? He’s single ..."
0 "is that it does" "...ccessible to most teachers and students, especially those with access to the GAFE suite.  The major accessibility limitation of Google Docs, however, is that it does not offer reliable off-line support.  Making sure that students have access to a reliable and relatively speedy internet connection is important when..."
0 "to show that the" "...ious instruments were available to him including the starboard shaft tachometer, clutch ‘engaged’ indicator light and the Schottel position indicator to show that the starboard propeller was still driving ahead at maximum revolutions. He could still control the vessel’s heading even with the starboard Schottel driv..."
0 "many believe that it" "...ommunity where everyone helps one another.  \tAlthough there is countless evidence that shows how much of a positive impact Pokemon Go has on society, many believe that it is nothing but a problematic addition to the world. Many claim that Pokemon Go is not helpful to society because they did not like that the idea that..."
1 "activity that is either" "...ace it in the need to be sharpened container and get a sharpened pencil from the other pencil container. Every morning I need to Read my morning work activity that is either on the board or projected. When winter is here, were do I place my coat? On the back of my chair Where do I place my lunch pail? Under my desk or in ..."
1 "to assume that to" "... positive intentions behind their anger-projections.  \tWhether or not they actually have positive intentions behind their anger-projections, you have to assume that to be true, for your own personal development and growth. You'll always get much better results in life when you see from the perspective that everythin..."
1 "to see that Lauren" "...in front of her.  Lauren whispered back, “I know you already know what I now know Bo. Mum told me everything.”  Bo stepped forward and held her, glad to see that Lauren did not pull away.  “Kenzi is pregnant.” Tamsin could not wait any longer and blurted out Bo’s news.   Lauren stepped back and looked up to Bo, “real..."
1 "This shows that these" "...ere not. Maybe if the numbers were reverse, it could be argued that it is the government’s fault, but less than half the athletes were proved guilty. This shows that these athletes did it by choice and not by being forced even while they knew of the consequences. This is an important issue because one of my favorite ath..."
0 "to ensure that those" "...esis will be done by PhD supervisors to ensure the anonymity of the participants as suggested in the study of Lasky & Riva (2006). Care will be taken to ensure that those who have access to the data maintain confidentiality (e.g., the research team, the person who transcribes the data). This will involve agreements so ..."
1 "Heath found that children" "...hree socioeconomic family backgrounds; a professional middle class community, a middle working class community, and a lower working class community.  Heath found that children from the professional homes were being exposed to books at an early age and asked a multitude of questions while reading.  These are the types of act..."
1 "enrichment reveals that chromatin" "...e diet (Figure 1 J). On contrast there was very little change in significant expression between 24 months and 30 months (Figure 1 c and I).  Reactome enrichment reveals that chromatin organization and splicing is upregulated with age (between 15 and 24), on the same period there is a large downregulation of metabolism including; me..."
0 "scale that is unparalleled" "...e Cybermind’ (Wegner, 2012), and in this case, embrace our ‘information filled devices’ as tools of the future that link or minds to information on a scale that is unparalleled in the past. Except, as the author, so disarmingly finishes ‘without our Internet link, we return to our humble little personal minds, tumbling back ..."
1 "ecosystem that is designed" "... to traditional retail sectors such as books, electronics, mass merchandise, and very soon, grocery.  Retailers must compete with Amazon’s technology ecosystem that is designed to reinforce the three demands of a hyper-connected consumer base: immediacy (machine calculated shipping predictions and site load experiences), tra..."
0 ") added that the" "...is nurse responsibility to coordinate care that she provided to the patient to ensure the care afforded to the patient is cohesive. Draper et al (2008) added that the nurse will protect the patient right for example when the patient is so ill and cannot talk it her responsibility to determine what patient want. In ..."
1 "we see that she" "... frozen until a definitive solution. Elizabeth is seen to simply “receive it” rather than enjoying it which ties to the previous question because now we see that she doesn’t want this intimacy Proctor is urging to get back (54). She is left with “a certain disappointment”, suggesting that her inner-dialogue may be..."
1 "scary thought that as" "... one of the most dangerous concepts that has evolved with us humans. I've seen fights break out because of the admiration of the opposite sex. It's a scary thought that as far as we've come in human evolution, some of us still fight because of someone else's decision. Word to the unwise, let these people be, it's their ..."
1 "Also note that the" "...ithin the university. \t\t The minimum effort will to be replicate existing processes of  creating same files and manually importing into Syllabus Plus Also note that the exam timetable for Exam Scheduler will follow the same architecture as above.    Getting the activities back into SITS:Vision is consistent on the St..."
0 "means that" "... advances in technology mean that electronic products are becoming obsolete more quickly. This, coupled with explosive sales in consumer electronics, means that more products are being disposed, even if they still work. Recycling electronics isn't easy, it's nothing like recycling cardboard. Proper and safe r..."
1 "has shown that this" "... a better crime rate than the other, from these results it can be said that illegalization of cannabis does not reduce the rate of crime.  This study has shown that this law or policy put in place to reduce the amount of crime surrounding cannabis is ineffective.      This can be related back to the discussion in the ..."
1 "Please remember that we" "...he meeting.   If your student receives any related services, check with the provider and list them on the services form with frequency and duration.  Please remember that we need time to process these services before the meeting.  Please remind the general education teacher of the date and time of their students’ meeting...."
1 "eventually realize that the" "... as team to finish a given mission. After several failed trials where each player tries to kill as much of the enemy's troops as possible, the gamers eventually realize that the only way to win is to assign roles for each member of the team. In an extraction, for example, each member will have a role to play with a part of th..."
0 "you understand that you" "...r information. The interviewer could ask for instance: “Can you explain your answer?”; “Why do you choose this answer and not the other answer?”; “Do you understand that you would die immediately after X years?”; “So you would rather die immediately after X years, than living 20 years including the last 10 years with limi..."
1 "He requests that Nora" "... over her husband so she is sure Mrs Linde will be working there. Krogstad knows of his bad reputation and his position in the bank it's in jeopardy. He requests that Nora uses her influence on his behalf. He assumes that if Mrs Linde is hired he would be the one dismiss from the bank. Nora takes back what she said abou..."
1 "will says that Edward" "...pulls out the will of his friend Dr. Henry Jekyll and thinks over it for a very long time. Utterson examines the will taking more notice to where the will says that Edward Hyde would be given all of Dr. Jekyll's possessions, and even be given permission to take Dr. Jekyll’s place if he were to go missing. After Utterson..."
1 "be assured that their" ".... Researchers should be vigilant in anticipating problems. (Polit & Beck, 2010)  1.b)The right to protection from exploitation   Participants need to be assured that their participation or information they might provide,will not  be   used against them in any way. Special consideration to be given when researchers have ..."
1 "to DJ that the" "...inded DJ of his right to have a union rep or work colleague present. DJ replied that he was happy to continue on his own.  AM them went on to explain to DJ that the reason this meeting was called was because of his absence from 17/01/16 to 24/07/16 with a total of 100 days, had triggered a 1st interview of concer..."
1 "t-test is that the" "...entical results in that the p-values associated with the two tests are the same. The advantage of the repeated-measures ANOVA over the paired-samples t-test is that the former computes the effect size statistic, η2. Limitations \tThese findings need to be interpreted in light of the following limitation. This study wa..."
1 "walls that were once" "...utside and make a couple of calls.  Just give a yell if you have any questions.”  Mr. Being called out to them. “OK, will do.” Sara acknowledged. The walls that were once a soft sand color, were dull, chipping and had many cracks.  There were two huge bay windows with curtains tied back to the sides to allow the sunlig..." 0
0 "is clarified that the" "... availability of the Service Provider as per your required location booking request made by the Customer to PROXIMOVE. For the avoidance of doubt, it is clarified that the PROXIMOVE itself does not provide vehicle services. It is the Service Provider who shall render vehicle service to you. The services are rendered by ..."
1 "also says that Mr" "...r names like, “Jill Styles”. Mr. Gardiner followed Mr. Bennet to London, and reports of no sign of the love-struck Lydia and that monster Wickham. He also says that Mr. Bennet is goingthr                       In Chapter 56                        In Chapters 59, 60 and 61                       "
1 "was discovered that it" "...server as an encoded file, which must be decoded on the client side. Where in the process this file could be decoded was originally a mystery, but it was discovered that it could be decoded as it was loaded in through the tile load function. The default implementation of the tile load function simply creates a new Image ..."
1 "I believe that my" "...udent Advisor positions in the International Students and Scholars Office of Boston University, which was circulated on the NAFSA Region XI listserv. I believe that my 4 years of experience in university program management and teaching matched with my commitment to experiential education, intercultural competency, a..."
1 "he imagines that Elizabeth" "...lley,216).  Victor believes that the monster’s revenge will never end he will just keep coming and coming. He thinks of killing himself right now but he imagines that Elizabeth would be crying and be in deep sorrow so he decides to fight the monster and try to save himself. "
1 "you feel that anything" "...n.  Problem Solving Problems occur in all companies. Many problems are simply due to misunderstandings. If something doesn’t seem right to you, or if you feel that anything has occurred that is in any way unfair to you, or if you have complaints or suggestions, the best way to proceed is to talk it over with your supervi..."
1 "also suggest that Facebook" "...t that what patients say on Facebook about their experience with a hospital correlates with the discharge survey results. The results of the research also suggest that Facebook comments can serve as an early warning system to hospital administrators, alerting them to problems in the organization before they receive formal do..."
1 "is considered that the" "...       The semantic relationship of hiponimia considered between substantive, is called in the case of the verbs \"troponimia\" (troponymy), because it is considered that the distinctions of \"mode\" are the most important for differentiating a verbal hiponymn and its hiperonymn. The relationship of troponymy between two ver..."
0 "now that it wasn" "...etter to set some clothes out now before the sun is gone for good. I’ll start washing when we get home. Okay?\" Naruto asked but Sasuke had learned by now that it wasn't really a question. Naruto was a homemaker through and through. Sasuke was going to remind the blonde that by the time they reached home they’d only..."
1 "difference is that he" "...hile he is wearing a dark leather suit covering all of his skin.  He has wild black hair covering his pale and fragile looking face.  But the biggest difference is that he has scissorhands instead of hands.  With Edward been brought to live in Suburbia with non-expressive and different people, he is made to try and fit ..."
1 "jolt that was almost" "...e felt heavy, almost too large for his mouth.  Come to think it his mouth felt rather funny there was simply too much of it.  His memory flashed in a jolt that was almost painful, recalling what had caused him to stumble in the first place.  The answer was right in front of him, literally, as his eyes narrowed to stare..."
0 "reader learns that Tom" "...his very wealthy cousin, Daisy, in East Egg where her and her husband, Tom Buchanan, reside. Immediately when Nick arrives at his cousin’s house, the reader learns that Tom and Daisy Buchanan are very wealthy. Tom begins to display narcissistic behavior when Nick enters the house. Mr. Buchanan feels the need to brag abou..."
1 "noticed is that I" "...  The premise is how to prioritize the big stuff so that you are more efficient.  Perhaps I’ll add that to my summer reading list.    Another thing I noticed is that I check my email first thing in the morning and set an agenda for the day based on the emails I get.   So if a teacher or principal contacts me in the ..."
0 "providers that were chosen" "...d hospital stays. c) Preferred provider organization (PPO) Preferred provider organizations (PPO) allow employees to choose from an approved group of providers that were chosen based on meeting the plan requirements established by the PPO. PPO’s have their own set of requirements for deductibles, co-payments and covered serv..."
0 ", that is attitude" "... With guidance from Dalton’s study (Dalton et al., 2014:213-231) the questionnaire was set up under the three factors that affect behavioral intention, that is attitude towards the behavior, subjective norms and perceived behavioral control.    The following questions will measure the dependent variable:   For traine..."
1 "thought that it was" "... to talk.” We sat on her bed and she told me when everyone was saying about Misty, the cheerleader, being raped that night. She told me that everyone thought that it was Matty and that he could go to jail… Why didn't he tell me what people were saying?  “Do you think he did it?” She asked me. “Well, he did say she cam..."
1 "only think that they" "...ad Setting ahead goals  Think that your life is 1,000 pieces do you have a clear picture ahead of what your picture is going to be? People these days only think that they are never going to win, but that's not true one thing that my father told is that if i put my mind towards something I can accomplish it. Think that ..."
0 "They felt that a" "... available to the mass consumer market. When Samsung and LG announced their new range of curved OLED TVs, most reviewers brushed it off as a gimmick. They felt that a 40-inch curved TV was simply too small to be appreciated. It had to be big for the effect to be felt. Fast forward a couple of years later and we’re ..."
1 "and confirm that the" "...ase of space.   Additionally, before Bethel would offer any other services to schools, such as training, the charter school liaison will first review and confirm that the service is both voluntary and does not constitute direct control over school operations or autonomy. Any and all faculty services for schools would b..."
1 ") identified that the" "...success of an airline   depends on quality of service attributes primarily involving cabin servicescape and encounter performances. Wu and Cheng (2013) identified that the basic  constituents of the quality of airline service product are physical-environment and interaction between passengers and crew.it is undeniable t..."
1 ") found that “" "...ath Cartesian concepts will increase after the introduction of the game to elementary school education  since  Mikelic Preradovic, Lesin & Sagud (2016) found that “the use of technology in early childhood education can effectively support and enhance the learning experience.”  If we can get more students to under..."
1 "results indicate that there" "...used as mediators in order to determine the roots causes of individual’s perceptions or understanding of poverty and capability to fight poverty. The results indicate that there are two principal means of understanding and estimating poverty situations. Individuals who have been subjected to ‘stigma’ either due to poverty or ..."
0 "to hear that." "...ve this moon.” Corinthus kept gazing at his vid screen which provided him the latest intel of the battlefield surrounding this outpost.   “I am sorry to hear that.” Shepard replied. “I hear he was good man” Crap… this will complicate the mission. “Who has succedeed him?” Shepard continued, wanting to get of this..."
0 "finally noticed that the" "...very whim of his kind was catered to. She did not realize she was drawing closer to the platform until the dragonborn male lay eyes upon her, and she finally noticed that the crowd had seemed to part for her. She met his gaze, holding it unwaveringly. The dragonborn male tilted his head curiously, and after a moment, his l..."
0 "result  showed  that there" "...s.   GuMing (2007) using monthly data of Shenzhen stock exchange composite index  and shanghai stock exchange composite index with interest rate, The result  showed  that there is negative correlation.  Smirlock（2010）using quarterly data to analysis when the USA stock market in a bear market, The kind of monetary tools most ..."
1 "and ensure that there" "...ntenance regimes on all of their vessels. 3. Sydney Ferries should review the design of the main engine ‘emergency’ stop systems on all their vessels and ensure that there is no time delay in their operation. 4. Sydney Ferries should review the training of masters and provide opportunities to practice appropriate scenar..."
1 "all is that no" "...ones. Lying too much can honestly make yourself miserable. The constant stress and anxiousness that come along with it are not worth it. And worst of all is that no matter how good the lie, someone will always find out. Lying is something that happens in society. There is honestly no way to stop it. Although the ..."
1 "and confirm that you" "...man, duplicate the route or folder you want to change Work on duplicated collections/folders (not on original ones!!!!) Test if everything is working and confirm that you didn’t change/remove any of the collections that should not be a subject of your change If everything os, promote your newly changed folders to becom..."
1 ") noted that effectiveness" "... Zairi (2003) pointed out that insufficient funds hinder undertake benchmarking or implement adopted improvement. Furthermore, Mathaisel, et al. (2004) noted that effectiveness of a benchmarking process is influenced by constant changes in the organization’s business environment. Where stated that today's best practices that..."
0 "And fuse that knowledge" "...stand characters, their motives and how they reflect upon the universe they belong to.​ It is critical for us, to speak the language of comic books.​ And fuse that knowledge into creating cultural icons that can last for decades.​ OFFICE MANAGER As the Office Manager you are joining our internationally reknown team of art..."
1 "we see that God" "...t.     Developing Trust in Him & Identity \"Trust is the foundation of all relationships.\" Through examination of wilderness experiences of the Bible, we see that God uses trust-building experiences to teach His people that there is no risk in trusting Him fully. Through wilderness experiences we begin to understan..."
0 "to play that again" "...ard was the sound of the musical figurine they had wound up earlier, sending a chill down her spine.  Why would her mother go back to the living room to play that again?  Sara mentally questioned. As a sense of unease settled over her, she hurried towards the door calling out to her mom again, still with no answer.  ..."
1 "People believe that eventually" "...nmental wisdom Living sustainably means living on natural income, the renewable resources such as plants, animals, soil, clean air, and  clean water. People believe that eventually Human-Centered Environmental Views will eventually fail it wrongly assumes we now have or can gain enough knowledge to become effective managers or s..."
0 "to ensure that they" "...responsibility to educate as it is a crucial component of the nursing process. As education is a crucial component of the nursing process due to need to ensure that they are embracing the new and innovative techniques to provide effective and the best treatments that are possible to their patients. To do this they mus..."
1 "element that is marked" "... algorithm which gave a solution to the factorization problem which was in polynomial time. Also Grover algorithm which gave a solution to finding an element that is marked in the unsorted N size database. [4] Grover’s algorithm is one of the most important algorithms to address the searching problem in quantum databases..."
1 "takes thinks that Miss" "...t Mr. Wickham is not to be trusted. I think she sees the way that Mr. Darcy looks at her, and wants Elizabeth and Mr. Darcy to be together. Elizabeth takes thinks that Miss. Bingley is                          In Chapter 24 and 25                        In Chapter 26                        In Chapter 27 and 28 \t\t\t\t \t    ..."
1 "To check that the" "...ity for the decrease in significantly altered genes between 24 to 30 months (Figure 1 C, I) could be an increase of heterogeneity in gene expression. To check that the distribution of the standard deviation of gene expression (normalized by the mean expression) was analysed. There are no apparent changes in heteroge..."
0 "content that is familiar" "...handled/introduced? The teacher has a very approachable manner that helps ease the learners into engaging with the lessons content. By beginning with content that is familiar the teacher opens up the lesson to the prospect of developing their understanding and building upon known concepts. In this way, the teacher allows t..."
1 "also showed that she" "...love can make us do. Despite the fact that Clary and Jocelyn left off at a rocky stage, Jocelyn’s disappearance made Clary worried about her mom. She also showed that she would do anything to have her mom back. It is also shown the other way around. Jocelyn loved Clary and with what happened to Jonathan, didn’t tell Cl..."
1 "d think that boys" "...ps.) Johnny: Yo! James!!!! My bro!!! James: Hey. Can I talk to you? Johnny: Ya, wasup? James: Lucille keeps beating me at that game on the y-box. You’d think that boys would be better than girls when it comes to video games, but noooooooooooooooooo, she has to come along… Johnny: Dude, chill. Wait, I think I got it!..."
1 "Everything that is not" "...to resolve the ticket i.e. create the ticket and dispatch the ticket.   Details  Contribution – 3 Types of Contribution  Service Desk Remote Service (Everything that is not first level support)  Extern (Needs to call another service line)             "
1 "and that is totally" "...o be introvert is as normal as it to be extrovert, there is nothing wrong or bad about it. About the half of all people is introverted, more or less, and that is totally normal and good as it is. There is absolutely no need to change it, just a matter of accepting and understanding. Introvert and extrovert are just to..."
1 "she feels that it" "...at  the de St. Cyrs for that reason. One day, she was testified in the trial of his family in which they were all sent to the guillotine. Since then, she feels that it was her fault they were executed.  Coming back to the inn, she ran into a friend from Paris, Chauvelin (the stranger from the night when Mr. Jellyban..."
0 "you show that you" "...uisite Skills - Guiding Questions: How do you show that you are a good citizen at home? How do you show that you are a good citizen at school? How do you show that you are a good citizen in the community? When have you worked with someone to get a job done?   How do you work with someone to get a job done?    Backgr..."
"result that is patient" "...lty for not using her authority and falling in her responsibility  by advocating for the patient to be sent to a higher level of care focusing on the result that is patient safety." 1
1 "style is that we" "...thing which seems pretty normal to him or  a child confessing that somethings which he tried didnt work out   The biggest outcome with this parenting style is that we end up raising a generation of Ctrl+c -- Ctrl^v. What about change for a process., bringing about a change in a way things get done; bringing a chang..."
1 ") states that it" "Self-directed leaning (SDL) is a term used to describe an educational theory that during the 1970s and 80s Levett-Jones (2005) states that it was the adult education ‘fad’. However, in the recent years, has been receiving an increasing amount of attention elevating it into something of a ‘c..."
1 "is felt that Sonia" "...rd authorisation can be set by the local authority, these must be followed by the respite facility. Standard authorisations cannot be extended. If it is felt that Sonia still needs to be deprived of their liberty at the end of the authorisation, the care home must request another standard authorisation. In the event ..."
0 "thoughts are that the" "...e. These individuals are not breaking the law. They are helping to keep legislation in place and they are obeying the law. Rational choice theorist’s thoughts are that the crime are in the control of the individuals that are breaking the laws (NRA 2016). It is their choice to break the law and it is the criminals that m..."
1 "informed DJ that he" "...ce management procedure would be triggered if there was a further 2 periods of absence or 5 days of absence during the 26 week review period. AM then informed DJ that he has the right to appeal this decision and he must do 3 days of receiving his letter.  AM then thanked those in attendance and closed the meeting @ 23..."
0 "knowing that it was" "...ar area. As we ran past a group of other kids. They stared at us suspiciously, but eventually looked away. We rolled the trash can towards the office knowing that it was probably going to be the safest place. I saw a bunch of people running past us towards the cafeteria. They were probably hoping for free food . As we..."
1 "to questions that i" "... information, going from website to website or app to app. It’s been my way of life. I’ve spent more hours than i care to admit to looking up answers to questions that i never needed to know. Sometimes i played games for hours on end. I’ve downloaded more songs than one person could listen to in a lifetime. I waded th..."
0 "it appears that it" "...cryptocurrencies will increasingly impact global economics at an escalating rate with the demand continuing to grow over time. However, at this stage it appears that it is predominantly the early adopters who are proactively operating with virtual currencies as it is not yet mainstream.   Supply of Bitcoin  Bitcoin, ..."
1 "I believe that a" "...tions.  The first area is how I delegate tasks and the other is how I perform mentoring of my troops.   To begin, I’d like to start by describing why I believe that a specific aspect of ‘delegation’ is a deficiency.  Over the years, I have learned to delegate specific tasks to those that have the expertise and the ..."
1 "people hear that my" "...er. He may not be able to fly like Superman or be able to shoot webs like Spider-Man, but he does have a power, and that is super strength. When most people hear that my dad has super strength, they might think she’s super muscular, but the truth is she isn’t. She can’t lift a car with one hand maybe not even a gallon..."
1 "; include that the" "...e-evaluation process Student Needs Relating to Special Factors      Behavior Strategies-If a student has a BIP, then information would be entered here; include that the BIP is found in the student’s file , amount of time that the student will use “time-out/student support room”, why plan is needed etc. ESL Blind/Visu..."
1 "Note that some" "...many occurrences of the phrase “as a result” are there in the stored documents) How many users have used this phrase at least once    Authentication  Note that some sort of authentication mechanism should be present in the final product, for both the dashboard and the API (considering the final product will be de..."
1 "research suggests that EMI" "... feedback EMI and found it both feasible and acceptable with an 89% response rate. Although evidence of feasibility is limited in an alcohol context, research suggests that EMI via mobile-phone has been feasible in other contexts, including smoking cessation. Berkman, Dickenson, Falk and Lieberman (2011), used an SMS text fo..."
1 "laws that was set" "...he idea of social hypocrisy.  Where the deciding factors to whether licit and illicit views are only relevant towards a particular group, established laws that was set by the government body deem cannabis use as illegal, isn’t relevant to the views of the group of teenagers amongst society.  The individuals within t..."
1 "Something that is developed" "...it can be used for evil. What happens when the weapon (technology) used for the elimination of crime is the same weapon used against people’s safety? Something that is developed (built) for good is often exploited which can result in depraved actions. The Internet has become both the hunting ground and the marketplace for hum..."
0 "situation that is occurring" "...ple out in the world who help and care for you even if they don’t know you.     The length of the sentences are shortened to add more emphasis on the situation that is occurring and grab the reader’s attention. The short sentences in the story make it more powerful and easy to understand such as, ‘I freeze’ and ‘it terrifies ..."
0 "Foster explains that if" "...ts, in this case fairy tales. They can mess around with the stories and turn them upside down” (Foster, 55). Similar to chapters four, five, and six, Foster explains that if you look deeper into stories most of the time you will find correlations to old fairy tales. Chapter Eight: “It’s Greek to Me” Greek myths are common..."
1 "perspective is that we" "...nd multiple perspectives on how the world views us and how we view our own country. A similarity between the global perspective and the United states perspective is that we don't have good public safety because of gun violence. We also do not have a good public school system which contributes to the overall safety of the..."
1 "Andrew discussed that the" "... asks her to help arrest the Scarlet Pimpernel. She refuses to help in anyway and walks back to the inn. In mid-night at the bub, Lord Antony and Sir Andrew discussed that the Scarlet Pimpernel was holding a meeting soon  and the family he snuck passed Sergeant Bibot was the de Tournay family. Then these men coming from und..."
1 "people felt that they" "...” issues.  I tried to hone into the challenge(s) by hosting Airman, NCO, and SNCO forums and luncheons, but I was not able to “crack” the code on why people felt that they did not have a better “quality of life” and work-life balance.  In the future, I will lean on my Chief(s) and SNCOs to better communicate with the SN..."
0 "idea is that two" "...Corps program.  If you aren’t familiar with StoryCorps, it started in 2003 with a single “story booth” in Grand Central Terminal, New York City.  The idea is that two people go into the booth, with one interviewing the other.  The range of interviewers and interviewees combinations is large:  daughter and mother, s..."
0 "such that it becomes" "...ns, biases, and the relationship to the study, which may affect investigation.  Engagement................Allowing for adequate time to collect data, such that it becomes saturated.  Maximum variation ....Purposefully seeking variation or diversity in sample selection to allow for greater range of application of the fi..."
1 "So that is why" "...t disappears after he completes a rescue. He puts this type of flower called a Scarlet Pimpernel on every message paper he sends to who he is saving. So that is why he is called the Scarlet Pimpernel. Bibot swears he will never let him pass by the gates. Literally minutes after he had said that, he realized he ju..."
0 "piece that is approximately" "...anced technique for this chapter. You’ll challenge yourself at whatever level are currently at simply by completing this exercise. Assignment Write a piece that is approximately 5 minutes in duration (1 minute per movement), written for a solo instrument. Use the following rules: The Note Restrictions This composition uses no..."
1 "anybody that is in" "...ade very good robots, workers, army, guards, and marine stealth ships. That when the humans made headquarters at South America. They promised to help anybody that is in trouble. The headquarters made more and powerful armies. High tech armor, stealth planes, combat weapons are just some of the things headquarters hav..."
0 "All that is not" "...u like to show those classical jerks that we aren’t afraid of going to the grocery store.    Chapter 10: Score Preparation Getting Your Score Noticed All that is not perfect down to the smallest detail is doomed to perish. ~ Gustav Mahler  How to Get Rejected Immediately In the final chapter, we’ll be talking abou..."
1 "was clear that Tom" "... with Dill. 2. Columbus is very hot during the summer, but Maycomb is even hotter that Columbus. 3. After the long interrogation of Mayella Ewell, it was clear that Tom Robinson had not committed the rape. 4. Before reading the book To Kill A Mockingbird, I thought the book would be about a hunter, but this book is a..."
1 "I predict that it" "...on of total transactions. However,   because it is a prediction, the range should be between 5465 million and 6319 million.   So in 2015, in Dec2015, I predict that it should rise to 7764 million of total transactions. However,  because it is a prediction, I am not confident but am sure it will be in the range shoul..."
1 "characteristic that is favored" "...asier to reap during harvest. While some strains are less affected through severe cold winter climates in northern regions like north Canada. Another characteristic that is favored is the ability to resist some pests, and avoid diseases like root rotting, and leaf rusting. These genetic varieties reduce the cost of production. F..."
1 "Ministry reported that about" "...ths in order to optimize the radii of curvature and slopes, to ensure a truly efficient operation compared to other modes of transport. The Transport Ministry reported that about 1,322 kilometers of railways are They are damaged and slowed invasion railway corridor and theft of infrastructure, due to lack of maintenance and ne..."
1 "d estimate that there" "...n. That was befor e that other man entered the house and was killed. How many would you estimate to be in there?” Kota asked, turning to Victor.   “I’d estimate that there could be four people, not including Gabriel, Mr. Blackbourne, and Akuma, of course.”   “We can handle them easily then, right Kota?” Nathan asked, a ..."
0 "shows that it has" "...analyzed within the previous chapter and present the outcome / recommendation. Look at the Project statement / aim and ensure that the outcome either shows that it has been achieved or explain why it has not.  5  Chapter 6 - Conclusions and area for further studies:  The conclusion covers what action you would want..."
0 "can testify that I" "...use several times a week. She can testify about our home life, family meals, family outings, living conditions, and our relationships.  Jerry Bunting can testify that I am extremely family-oriented.  I cook family meals and plan family activities. We go on trips and vacations as a family, go to the movies and out to ..."
0 "“Is that good" "...hs to my panties, one finger moving gently up and down between my legs.  He pushes my panties aside and the tip of his finger is just at my entrance. “Is that good? God, you’re so wet for me.”  I’m whining in my throat now, full of need, and two of his fingers move into me, moving inside of me, then tracing circ..."
1 "to state that its" "...found that the Ecuadorian judgement against Chevron had been \"procured\" through the \"defendants' bribery, coercion, and fraud\". The court was careful to state that its findings concerned the conduct of participants through the litigation process not the environmental and health issues which had been raised in the or..."
0 "believed that" "...hey named as DRD4. According to them, the gene is responsible for various activities in the in the human’s brain dopamine receptors. They; therefore, believed that this gene is responsible for making an individual happy or sad, depending on the situation that a person faces. Many experiments have been performed ..."
1 "first detect that a" "... can be used alongside steganography to encrypt the hidden data, posing a dual challenge to any exfiltration detection system where they will need to first detect that a message that is being hidden, and secondly to discover what that message is. (Google.com, 2016) Detection of data exfiltration Watermarking  Is where..."
0 "have suggested that individuals" "...ential for infertility to result in unresolved losses that create liabilities after adoption has predominated in the literature, a variety of studies have suggested that individuals and couples may be strengthened by these experiences” (Freeark et al p3). A specific study comprised of both heterosexual couples and lesbian couples..."
"become soldier that he" "...lked about political events,  he started to get more and more into the recent events between England and America.  this is where Alexander started to become soldier that he is known for. \tAlexander" 1
0 ", that was taken" "...vity batteries (16000mAh+) in the below $20 range so its hard to give an 8000mAh a great score. On another note this device does work as advertised so, that was taken into consideration.   Around the Web: 5.0 The^EPB Power Bank is currently holding a 5.0 on Amazon.com    Thoughts I spent a few weeks with this devic..."
0 "Remember that your" "...ks, they may make a difference to you. 3D usability and curved screens are good examples of gimmicky factors that a huge number of people care about. Remember that your needs may be different from someone else’s, so go for it if it’s important to you.  Recommended Product Reviews 1. Samsung UN55KU6600 Curved 55-Inch ..."
0 "was informed that the" "...ore leaving the anchorage, but he was unaware that the engine had only been turned on air astern. Over an hour after leaving the anchorage, the pilot was informed that the cause of the engine failure had not been positively diagnosed, but no additional precautions were put in place and the harbour authority was not told..."
1 "or think that I" "...as going to happen with him because we facetimed occasionally and I knew his friends, but I was still nervous. I was nervous that he wouldn’t like me or think that I was pretty in person. I remember this day from beginning to end, this was the day I fell in love for the first time.  \tI arrived at Kings Island befo..."
1 "House required that I" "...ation in the Critical Language Scholarship Program, the International Partnership for Service-Learning and Leadership, and time at the Himalaya Hindi House required that I fulfill the requirements for international student visas and also taught me the importance of intentionally structured programs that balance classroo..."
0 "Is that really" "... seemed to be cheering me on, as if he was watching his favorite scene in a movie he’d seen a thousand times. It creeped me out, honestly.   “Melody? Is that really you?” Another man strolled over to me. This one had curly blonde hair that smelled strongly of lavender as he cupped my cheeks. His strange embrace m..."
0 "bedroom house that he" "...arge and all he needed to do was properly insulate the windows and doors and keep the fireplace burning.  Sasuke was envious. He only had a small one bedroom house that he and Naruto could barely fit in. Technically he hadn’t ever been preparing for an omega so he was only half to blame. Or maybe he wasn’t to blame at a..."
1 "to remember that everything" "...are two types of compensations at Hunter's: benefits and wages. We think we have a good compensation package for our kind of business. It’s important to remember that everything is a balance – one benefit may be particularly important to you, while you might never use another. We hope that we have something for everyone. What..."
0 "argue that" "...or better or for worse, Beats is a name that always comes up when discussing headphones with a strong bass. In this case it’s a good thing. You can’t argue that the Beats brand doesn’t put an emphasis on the low end, but that can be a good thing if that’s how you prefer to listen to music. Audiophiles will sc..."
0 "desire that is a" "...slaved feel another force that builds and battles against the heat, against the pain, against the suffering, that laces the air like cordite. It is a desire that is a furnace in their hearts. It is a desire that rails against the beatings, the floggings, and the separation. It is the desire for freedom.  Master War..."
0 ", that is a" "...aning the bum of Abbie with wet wipes and I throw the used wipes in the pooped disposable diaper I throw in the trash. Up with your feet again sweetie, that is a good girl so nanny can put on you some ointment and baby powder.   Caitlin puts on me some ointment and baby powder and I get a clean disposable diap..."
0 "discovered that" "...ainable initiatives.  How we got our name  It all begins in 1964.   Back then, a team of pretty smart individuals led by Professor Raphael Mechoulam, discovered that THC is responsible for the majority of the plant’s psychoactive properties. His desire for discovery, creativity, innovation and exploration are all ..."
0 "double that" "...hern colonies was the ideal setting for growing crops because of the climate and long growing season. Tobacco and the growing season, that was almost double that of New England, were what brought the slaves to the southern colonies.  The large tobacco plantations increased the demand for labor, which could be ..."
0 "in bundles that it" "...d off Naruto started to wring his tail in his hands. “I’m sorry I kept us in the market for so long. But I found insulators and furs for so cheap and in bundles that it was too good of a deal to not buy them!”  Sasuke snorted and smirked up at the fretting blonde, “It’s fine Naruto. It was nice watching you.” Naruto ..."
1 "consumer feels that the" "...they are attached to and this will be considered as the first step to a consumer- brand relationship. When a consumer falls in love with a brand, the consumer feels that the brand in some way ignites the imagination, pleases the senses and arouses a deep relevance (Sayers & Monin, 2006; Roberts, 2006; Colegio, 2014). Howe..."
1 "were informed that information" "...ere informed that participation is voluntary and respondents can stop the questionnaire at any time by merely exiting the questionnaire.  Respondents were informed that information obtained will be used for academic purposes only and may be published in an academic journal.  The respondents were requested to mark in the applicab..."
1 "been observed that the" "...o, treaties are not used in some part of the world for example, Russia who has been a signatory to this convention has never ratified it. It has also been observed that the ICSID convention has not developed any specific framework which governs the recognition and enforcement of awards, this is entirely left open for sta..."
0 "who believed that a" "...The end result of this case, showed that participants recalled more in a test, when told the computer was not recording them, than other participants who believed that a record was being kept on the computer.  The assumption being that the internet provided a back-up to memory.   The next effect on memory provided in ..."
1 "It represents that by" "...es and innumerable tents spread around them.  13.\tThe unspoken communication that goes between Santiago and Fatima is known as Language of the World. It represents that by them meeting eyes and knowing exactly what the other one is thinking without speaking. They both hold each other’s gaze and forget about the past or ..."
1 "trend that is will" "...ach year. 2013 to 2014 and then to 2015, you can see that from the actual data they predicted data increases also. This clearly highlights the future trend that is will rise as it has in the historical predictions and the actual data. This table was made to show the increase of the main rising months of the two years..."
1 "they believe that the" "... Direct Booking  Research has shown the number one reason consumers leave a hotel direct booking site and head to an OTA to book their reservation is they believe that the OTA rate will be cheaper.  This is the year that the large chains have chosen to spend millions educating their customers that it is will pay to book..."
0 "people saw that a" "...nce of the natural beauty within each individual. Confucianism was not always popular, and had little appeal to those in power, yet this changed when people saw that a tyrannical government that punished its citizens harshly could be brought down by a peasant rebellion. Confucianism sought to explore the middle grou..."
1 "to ensure that whatever" "...esources of the local educational agency ·         is authorized to make decisions on behalf of the school district, commit its resources and be able to ensure that whatever services are set out in the IEP actually will be provided Evaluator An individual who can interpret the instructional implications of evaluation resu..."
1 "I see that his" "...connected. This yearning combined with the jealousy of the mirror figure may be the reason why he hated the other for much of his childhood. Finally, I see that his siblings jeer at his antics, which reminds me of the people who laughed at Martin Luther King Jr.’s ideals for future society. I think that in both c..."
1 "moment that was filled" "...ake the team.  This failure was a defining moment for my character.  . A “better luck next time” moment when your mom or dad pats you on your back. A moment that was filled with disappointment, despair, and a withdrawal. This moment might not  be of importance to some, for me it was. That one team that you train, want to..."
1 "She pretends that she" "... member (which we see in this book was the relationship between Scout and Jem).Scout is a mockingbird who tries to defend herself as much as she can. She pretends that she’s not vulnerable when she really is.  In this quote, I feel like Scout felt like she was being forced to go with them. The reader could tell that she..."
1 "I believe that our" "...he teacher about the iPads? This was confusing because as I was reading this I was creating a connection with our school since we have iPads as well. I believe that our district didn’t want to replace the teachers with iPads as LAUSD wanted to. Another thing I found confusing was if they had gotten iPads why didn’t t..."
1 "arm that was being" "...the same spots. I then brought out a roll of paper and smacked his hand that was being reflected. I then brought out sandpaper and lightly grazed his arm that was being reflected. I then brought out a small hammer and lightly tapped his knee that was being reflected.  Results: After the test subject’s halves had sync..."
0 "expect that" "...ouldn’t sleep last night due to my excitement and end up waking up late this morning. I just brought enough money to buy some food. However, I didn’t expect that E-Class would be so...secluded. Still, I’m surprise that he doesn’t buy anything from within the country for lunch.” “Koro-sensei likes to go overboa..."
0 "them that was hidden" "...t at one point says, “Maybe it’s only us.” (Golding 89). Simon is the only character that was able to see the Beast for what it really was; a part of them that was hidden. Another important and sadistic symbol is the Lord of the Flies, which is a severed pig’s head that Jack put on a stake as an offering to the Beast. ..."
0 "energy that is accelerating" "...nt theories (the best explanation for the empirical observations) there is a repulsive unknown force that presently have the placeholder name of dark energy that is accelerating the expansion of the universe that began 14 billion years ago with big bang, like an explosion that spreads out in all directions until it reaches eq..."
1 "troops see that I" "...ons.  Furthermore, I try to provide encouragement and also highlight troops that have the ability to balance their time between work and home so that troops see that I value their commitment to the mission but also value the time they need to spend with family.  In the end, a well-rested and happy troop with a pleas..."
1 "” That is lucky" "...the hallway till It was just a low murmur.   “Did you hear them? They said that the door to the equipment was locked.” I said. “Well,” Christian said,” That is lucky for us that they didn’t get there before us. You are though forgetting that we kept our doors locked but we still can go in and out,” he said with a ..."
0 "can tell that the" "...hness. Complementing the girl’s look is a pair of soft pink lips, a button nose, and rosy cheeks. Even with her feminine and fragile looks, the agent can tell that the girl is an athlete. The youth’s shoulder is a little wide for a female. Her arms are a decent size; not small nor big. The student’s figure is extrem..."
0 "clearly show that children" "...do not realize that even adopting young children brings its own challenges and stress. For children adopted at a young age from institutions “studies clearly show that children… suffer substantial widespread developmental delays, including physical and motor retardation, cognitive impairment, and severely retarded language d..."
1 "bird that is small" "...n yes, as the elements to which they belong are identified as lexical elements and not as concepts. Let us look at an example:   [...] to canary is a bird that is small, colorful, sings and flies, so not only must canary be entered as a hyponym of bird, but the attributes of small size and bright color must be includ..."
1 "are pleased that your" "... International Programs: Lori Ornelas (619) 260-3663x687 Technology & Facilities Manager: Greg Wood (619) 223-3663x309    INTRODUCTION FOR PARENTS We are pleased that your child is with us, and we will strive to ensure a successful school experience for him or her.  This booklet will acquaint you with the policies and p..."
0 "allowed provided that his" "...if he was part of some vivisection. She would usually only arrive whenever she had a social experiment she wanted to conduct with prisoners, which he allowed provided that his prisoners would not suffer much. She also performed the name wiping process, reserved for the most offensive criminals.  Otherwise, it would get very..."
0 "evidence suggests that the" "...ted the ‘normal’ main engine stops. The starboard clutch failed to disengage, as it is interlocked to prevent declutching at high engine rpm, but the evidence suggests that the engines did stop in response the stop button actuation although this was probably just before, or as, the vessel struck the wharf. Every instinctive ..."
0 "provided that" "...e previously known as “chief’s courts”. Traditional leaders are allowed to make decisions and pass judgement much in the same way a Magistrate would, provided that they stay within the limits of the constitution as set out  in the Repeal of the Black Administration Act and Amendment of Certain Laws Act, 2005 (Ac..."
0 "policy suggests that the" "...room 114 during before-school tutoring if negessesary. Students are responsible for submitting all formative asessments in a timely manner.  District policy suggests that the number of days missed + 1 day as a timeframe for submitting missed work after an excused absence.  Formative assessments will be available on Planboo..."
1 "can infer that he" "...action to the footprints is that he notices that the footprints end near the house and he recognizes the boots that the unknown person is wearing. We can infer that he knows something is going to happen so he decides to give it to Judge Thatcher to keep it away from his Pap. Some superstitions that Huck believes in ..."
1 "and say that the" "...t his own life and thought process was so worthy of being recorded. The concept of this essay topic is practically paradoxical; to agree with Thoreau and say that the life experience of an elder is unrelatable to that of your own would suggest that you, a person of the modern age, have found similarities within you..."
1 "soon realize that you" "...en darkness shroud your whole being, drowning you in your own mind where you will continue falling. Leaving you in a black pit of your own fears, you soon realize that you can do nothing about it. When you feel a presence looming creepily over your shoulder, you know that you will never be able to escape it.  You just h..."
1 "gene that is resistant" "...s. Some benefits of sugar beet modifications are that some modified sugar beets showed resistor against virus and pests. to change the sugar beet new gene that is resistant to many virus is added to the sugar beet and this quality modifies the sugar beet.    Commercial issues: One of the commercial issues with geneticall..."
1 "group that is in" "...u do as long as you turn in work. Group 2 is the ones who are uptight and strict and seem like they always have a stick up their butt. Group 3 is the group that is in the middle and are usually just the right teacher and are usually a rare breed. These are the 3 types of teachers. Stickiness factor helps students l..."
1 "strategy is that it" "... targeting military infrastructure instead of individual soldiers or civilian settlements is common games and in real life. The benefit of using this strategy is that it cuts down on the capabilities of the enemy as they eventually run out of resources to fight back. Using the counterforce strategy also ensures that t..."
1 "prostitution that was talked" "...s alcoholism and bad financial practices. She was miserable in her marriage so it’s ironic that she is trying to marry her daughter off. The theme of prostitution that was talked about in Two Gallants is once again found in the next story. It is no secret that Polly, Mrs. Mooney’s daughter is selling herself in order to trap a..."
0 "And that is when" "...got it! Are those games hers? James: Yes. Why? Johnny: She is a genius. She could’ve coded the game to make her win when she plays. James Voice Over: And that is when the prank wars started.  Scene 2 Lucille: I got your note James, but who told you I was cheating? James: I have eyes everywhere. Lucille: You watch m..."
1 "cloth diapers that she" "...er. Then comes the real test to change the proper wet poop diaper of Abbie.  Sonja takes a clean cloth diaper from the cloth diaper from the stack of cloth diapers that she opens, and she lifts up the feet of Abbie and slide the cloth diaper underneath the soaking wet pooped diaper that Abbie is wearing. Now I am wearing..."
"honestly hope that I" "...I hope it will be even better this year. I have a positive feeling about Mrs. Rueger that she will definitely help me improve my writing this year. I honestly hope that I get 4.0 all year." 1
0 "person is that I" "...ing. But I implore you to take some time to read some information first, don't just vote for the same thing your friend is. My opinion, as a disabled person is that I am VERY scared of what this government would^do without the EU to hold them to account. We would lose many important consumer rights too, the risks o..."
1 "I realized that I" "... the classroom was in a considerable state of shock. I guess today something was going to ruin my day. But at such an extreme level? It was then that I realized that I should probably be trying to get out of the school so I could evade captivity. I quickly ran out the door. When I had crossed the school grounds I st..." 0
0 "is true that these" "...the environment.\u2028These are 7 simple habits to implement in your everyday life which will make a difference.  Use compact fluorescent light bulbs: \u2028It is true that these bulbs are more expensive, but they last much longer and they can save energy and in the long term your electricity bill would be reduced.  Donate:\u2028Yo..."
0 "Nagra stated that Azad" "...ies” 1 June 1945, IOR/L/PJ/12/646). Indeed, during a meeting of the Federation of Indian Associations in Great Britain on 14 April 1946, Kartar Singh Nagra stated that Azad Hind was modeled on the Hindustan Ghadr and that he hoped to emulate the latter (IPI to David Petrie 18 April 1946, HO 45/25460). An evocative exampl..."
1 ") believes that the" "...p. 475). Turnitin is the detection software used by many tertiary institutions to assist in combatting student plagiarism levels. Gorman (2008, p. 298) believes that the Turnitin.com website should use the term plagiarism instead of digital assessment and learning management. As Youman (2011, p. 750) suggests online p..."
1 "earlier suggested that non-violent" "...Mayor de Blasio at a church in Queens, NY, hundreds of police officers turned their backs on the Mayor. A union and department, which had only a week earlier suggested that non-violent protests following the death of Eric Garner had led to the deaths of Officers Ramos and Liu, decided to utilize the funeral as their own opportunity ..."
0 "wait that" "...meter requirements, so much so that it'd take more than a week to hatch, even for more athletic types with a regular walking routine. What if I can't wait that long for my brand new Pokemon to hatch? What if I just want to catch my Pokemon without it making me burn calories and trying to subvert my couch pot..."
1 "research found that mentees" "...ronment where the student can express her/his any concerns without the fear of rejection or judgement (Walsh 2010).  Levett-Jones and Lathlean (2008) research found that mentees had a strong need for a sense of belongingness and felt it was paramount for their clinical learning to feel part of the team and appreciated.     On..."
1 "order that it did" "... or miscarried. I have lived 47 years which is nothing compared to 13.78 billion years yet every event prior to my conception if they occurred in the order that it did I would not exist, neither would this computer or screen I am writing on, so I don’t feel special, everything on this planet from the amoeba to the z..."
0 "myth goes that right" "...having a higher CP than the Oddish you'd already caught. Thanks for nothing, Oddish, I hope you get hit by a—wait, where were we? Oh yeah. Right. The myth goes that right after your Pokeball fails to connect with a Pokemon, you could tap the screen to recapture your Pokeball. If you're fast enough, the Pokeball will re..."
1 "also testify that he" "... to different activites with us. He can also testify that I am not emotionally, physically, or mentally abusive to him or either of the girls. He can also testify that he and I have primarily taken responsibilty of financial supporting Kaylee.  Kaylee can testify that she would like to live with me and visit her dad.  ..."
1 "context is that one" "...er who you are. This is what both characters do when they fully embrace who they were and who they are. I believe that what he means in the spiritual context is that one can lose themselves in spirit to another time in the life which they left behind. The fact that these notes are inspired by the Bible also enforces t..."
1 "grass patch that Matty" "...e left of me, so I went right. The square was going to be overfull in about two minutes so I speed walked to the front of the school. There was a big grass patch that Matty and I would always sit on. I found it and layed down, the grass was warm and relaxing. Him and I would always tell the stupidest things to each other..." 0
1 "Americans think that our" "...e and technology is our next topic of discussion.  Our science and technology fields have been growing exponentially so it is no surprise that 75% of Americans think that our science and technology advancements are excellent or great.      Cant finish tonight……. Sorry i couldnt get it done "
1 "definitely agree that more" "... minimum wage increase has caused a decrease in total and per person economic output. ​I personally have mixed feelings on increasing minimum wage. I definitely agree that more money needs to be offered to keep up with cost of living but I do not feel a blanket mandate is the way to go. I often employ younger workers, in mos..."
1 "will ensure that there" "... energy. Which it can be standby generator, solar panels and also most importantly UPS to sustain the system until the secondary power comes up, this will ensure that there will be no loss of data during the switching to the secondary power.  My Observation And Point Of View For This Organizations Accepting The New Techn..."
1 "I disagree that nothing" "...as the usage of fuel transportation devices, fossil fuels and lastly industrial pollution. However, now is not too late to make a change. This is why I disagree that nothing can be done to overcome the problems of global warming.  Everyday, most of our families uses their car at least once to go to events, work or just fo..."
1 "with image that the" "...dulges in the subculture of cannabis use is the Hippie movement, where during the 1960s the drug was labelled as “Drop-out drug” which was associated with image that the hippies had during this time.  Although their society started in the 1960s this culture has well and truly stuck within society till this day influen..."
1 "manufacturers  explains that  \"" "replacedWith":{"s":"manufacturers explains \""},"...e tree bumblebee for example,this species is  is exposed to the same food and  weather  as other bees yet is still flourishing. Dr. Julian,one of the manufacturers  explains that  \"If it were pesticides causing the mass destruction of our fauna, surely you would see effects on all bees?(5)\" . moreover this natural selection will ..."
0 "argument is that the" "...tional partnerships.   The formation of NATO after World War II and its persistence even after the end of the Cold War has puzzled many scholars. The argument is that the end of power imbalance or the threat that caused the formation of the alliance leads to automatic collapse of the alliance. Nonetheless, advanced stu..."
1 "You think that you" "...didn’t do what you asked me to do. That I basically said fuck you and then i did say fuck you.   This is where i think we run into the most issue.    You think that you were asking me to simply do something for you. Not be on my phone so much. Sounds simple enough. And in some ways it is.  What I don’t think you real..."
1 "disposable diaper that I" "...ows the used diaper in the trash bucket at the park and she finds a clean disposable diaper from the diaper bag that she opens.  I put on Abbie a new disposable diaper that I folds and close.  She then gets dressed by me in her clothes and I put Abbie pack in the stroller.  Chelsea has changed my wet disposable diaper and ..."
0 "trundle that was pulled" "...had withheld the truth from her, and in a way I had. What was a girl to do? I felt horrible. When I turned over and looked off the side of my bed the trundle that was pulled out last night and made, was shoved under the bed, the sheets, blankets and pillows neatly folded and stacked in my papasan. I felt my heart sink. It..."
"helped is that they" "...the computer itself. Computer let us communicate with the whole world  using social media apps like Facebook. So my opinion of computer interfered or helped is that they did both.  " 1
0 "report that is relevant" "...tive Officer have today considered and approved the condensed financial statements for the first half year 2016 and the financial information in this report that is relevant for the first half year 2016 ^together “the first half year 2016 report”). The first half year 2016 report has been prepared in accordance with IAS 3..."
0 ", that is their" "...people tend to focus on individual weakness or lack of values as the reason why people commit crimes. Ultimately, if someone chooses to commit a crime, that is their responsibility. The individual should pay the consequences if they get caught, but how about giving these individuals who committed the crime, whom a..."
1 "society that was dependent" "...ple are finally basing worth on honesty and kindness. Social classes are slowly being melted into each other.  The Great Gatsby gives examples of the society that was dependent on the social hierarchy and how the wealthy treated everyone else. In the past and present, the rich are at the top of the hierarchy. However, as the..."
0 "And that was even" "...following and Shikamaru could pick up on that. “It’s a subtle change. For me it was like…” he hummed then looked away and smiled, “it was like life.” And that was even more confusing for the dark haired man.  Shikamaru was terrible at explaining things. Like life?? What the fuck was that supposed to mean? “Hey there..."
0 "suddenly mean that I" "...e that can end in pain for you when you realize you can’t stop something from happening.”  ‘How the fuck wasn’t I paying attention? Does multitasking suddenly mean that I can’t listen to what people are saying around me? He’s also got another thing coming if he thinks I’m never going to ask questions when I know someon..."
"nursery that is simply" "...w you have just pooped in your disposable diaper Abbie. Lets get you changed and she takes Abbie with her lay her down on the changing station in the nursery that is simply a changing pad   " 1
0 "and that was how" "...o this day I can honestly say I grew farther than all the mentors I reached out to in the first place.   I focused on just one key thing with trading and that was how to make the fucking money, I didn't pay attention^to all the details people try to say are Important or even paying attention to what people had to s..."
0 "Provide evidence that teammates" "...edit with them (this also includes referral fees). Behavior: Positive behavior is actions showcasing humility and sharing with team.   Target Metric: Provide evidence that teammates are collaborating and sharing information. Information may be focused in confirming any and all success or evidence of such.  Experiment: May involve..."
1 "email chain that she" "...ing to find out a way to better help this customer and for this we need to know if the customer confirmed that payment type she will use.   I see the email chain that she was asking about making a deposit and not use boleto, evem know that Chyntia conformed that we do not offer this option, we want to make sure that th..."
0 "He that is born" "...ng a life partner. The scriptures says 'Lean not unto thy own understanding but in all thy ways, acknowledge Him and He shall direct your paths'. For He that is born of the flesh is flesh and he that is born of the Spirit is spirit. Talk about the winds that blow wherever it chooses. As a young and immature Christ..."
0 "site that is prototypical" "...es were described as “clear”, “simple” and “easy to read”, this gave the user a more positive experience. Research has shown a more simple and modern site that is prototypical will leave users with a better experience.   Aesthetically pleasing sites use images that communicates to the user and have contrasting colours that ..."
1 ") states that “" "...ease management and prevention, more smoking-cessation strategies, and policies, and potential treatments.(Csikesz & Gartman, 2014).     (Garvey, 2016) states that “Tobacco smoking is the most important risk factor of COPD”. Television advertisements, tobacco plain packaging, and smoking restrictions in open door ..."
1 "each that is all" "...n attendant there waiting for us we walk up to the front desk and talk to the attendant he said that this is a rest stop and here's 100 bronze coins  each that is all the money you will get to start your new life your room is number 32 on the 5th floor here's your key we finish serving breakfast at 10 you need to l..."
1 "have learned that the" "...l parks have proven to be a crucial asset in the science sectors.For example, the Grand Canyon is researched for archeology, ecology, and geology. We have learned that the Grand Canyon holds over 35 layers of sedimentary rock, which span over 550 million years old. There are also many fossils that were discovered at the..."
0 "is that" "...e were a part of a system that was going to be finally protecting the rights of all. […] Unfortunately what I see from these judgements increasingly, is that the purpose of the deprivation of liberty safeguards was not about protecting rights but to cover the back of the UK in terms of Human Rights legisla..."
1 "issue that is to" "...stored data on how their uses health services. Poor health status and lower than average life expectancy among travelers is an important inequalities issue that is to be adequately addressed in this proposal.     Program description  The project will enable the less fortunate residents of the Kent community to rece..."
1 "in thought that he" "...nd is very surprised, the part [Shinju’s Bane] worried him a bit because he didn't know what is it. By translation it means, God tree. He was so deep in thought that he nearly missed Izayoi’s comment.   \"A Gift Card is a super high-value Card that can store the manifestation of a Gift! It can even store Yō-san's [Gen..."
0 "and use that as" "...d.)    It can also be used by tourists visiting that City/Country. They can use the issue of the magazine that contains places of interest from there and use that as a tour guide.    The age can be anyone who is interested in photography and travel. Probably leaning more towards adulthood around the ages of 18-50 ..."
0 "figured that was probably" "...as not a violent one, and I am here because I am not long for the grave.” Ribahn said dispassionately.  Zera wanted to ask why she was in prison, but figured that was probably not proper prison etiquette.  Ribahn stepped away from Zera, and pulled out a roster of names, with titles of books next to them. \"I need you to look..."
1 "belief is that their" "      In spite of the development of these partnerships, Realists belief is that their impact on government hasn't changed, and States are pretty much as liable to go to war for resources just as they were some time recently.This debate..."
0 "never failed that during" "...they could handle, such as the narrator describes in these following passages: “Some families would sell out for nearly nothing and move away. And it never failed that during the dry years the people forgot about the rich years, and during the wet years they lost all memory of the dry years” (5-6). “It wasn’t very long unt..."
1 "study concluded that self-management" "...rolled trials took place between 2000 and 2011 to evaluate the benefits from Chronic Obstructive Pulmonary Disease self-management interventions; the study concluded that self-management interventions reduced the burdens on patients, improved patient physical activity, and improved total patient health (Bentsen, Langeland, & Holm, 201..."
1 "sword that is made" "... it takes to be a knight let alone a hero but still strived to become the strongest.   Intetsu is a pure black sword with a rectangular hilt. It is a sword that is made for both speed and power.   \"OK, if you won't come out then - \" Naruto trailed as he stepped forward and sliced the bush in half.   \"Yaaaaaa\" a femin..."
0 "Buddhists believe that Buddha" "...’ lives. Because of the life is given by the god. So, only god has the right to take it away. In Taiwan, the mainstream of religion is Buddhism, most Buddhists believe that Buddha will help everyone when people have any problem on the way of live. They think euthanasia is a kind of suicide and it is a selfish behavior. In most ..."
0 "states that" "... advice gain from health providers contribute to COPD patient in stopping smoking. (Tilert and Chen, 2015). The European Respiratory Society, (2016), states that a short advice given in less than 3 minutes by health providers add up to the quitting rate of smoking . The Tobacco Free Initiative (2003) stated th..."
1 "be asserted that meanings" "... the findings of earlier studies on perception towards rape (Hamby & Koss, 2003; Shalhoub-Kevorkian, 1999; Stewart, Dobbin, & Gatowski, 1996), it can be asserted that meanings of rape, sex, and even perceptions toward women are a matter of social-psychological and cultural context. For rape victims, for example, the meaning..."
0 "one beat that Shiroyasha" "...ness with those [No Name]. I thought they didn't wish to rebuild their Community anymore... but I heard a new recruit defeated a Divinity while other one beat that Shiroyasha in her own game. So I came to take look at the situation.\"  Galdo fell to his knees like he was knocked down by someone, but not by the 'Demon-kind' ..."
0 "Australia means that this" "... that supports it.   In conclusion, the fact that Type 2 diabetes is the fastest growing disease in the world and the sixth leading cause of death in Australia means that this disease is a major contemporary issue facing Australian society. The implications of this often preventable disease on the Australian people and the ..."
0 "also believes that the" "... public schools. As a single parent and a full time worker she feels “accommodations for childcare would cripple me and my family” (Aultman). Aultman also believes that the longer days to accommodate the smaller work week may hinder students’ academic achievement. “Being an ESE teacher has made me aware of the focusing i..."
1 "She knows that her" "...e loved because it wasn’t her secret to tell but also because she was truly scared of what her parents would do to him and how the Clave would react. She knows that her brother is scared of what other people think of him and didn’t tell to protect him. It taught me that loving someone can mean that you would do anyth..."
1 "softly that it’" "...houlder, pulling him closer to hold him against my heart while we sleep. He nuzzles between my breasts, leaves a kiss there, and then suckles, but so softly that it’s more like the ghost of a feeling. He sighs then, and rests his face back against my chest. \t“Rissa,” he says, so low it’s hard to hear, “I love you...."
1 "audit demonstrate that Health" "...d to assess the level of risk by using the checklist to form their own assessment.                   5.0       Discussion: The results of the current audit demonstrate that Health visitors are using the SafeLIVES checklist as part of their assessment to determine the level that domestic violence poses to families they are invol..."
0 "we think that they" "...n.  Bill and Melinda have asked the other billionaires to do the same, and so far most of them have signed up.  We will always have the greedy people we think that they owe nobody and that they think that everyone needs to earn their way.  All of these rich people all got started by someone helping them out either th..."
1 "team agreed that an" "...t principal.       Jerry needed more specialized assistance than could be provided in a public school setting. At the end of Jerry’s IEP meeting, the team agreed that an alternative placement was the best place for Jerry to receive the assistance he needed to succeed in a public school setting.  At this alternative pl..."
1 "Verify that you" "...r note. Verify that you are singing the correct pitch by playing it by itself on the piano. Play both pitches again and attempt to sing the top note. Verify that you are singing the correct pitch by playing it by itself on the piano. Repeat Steps 1 to 5 with five different intervals. Move to the next stage when yo..."
1 "which believes that anything" "...d in becoming a well-respected powerhouse. This goes in hand with what is known as the “American Dream”, as America tends to be an optimistic country which believes that anything is possible if enough work is put into it. Not only political leaders, but citizens as well believe that they hold a “candle” everyone else should fo..."
0 "be reminded that our" "...ing to listen” to Clinton’s pleas.  Speaking of influential families and politics, don't think that Caitlyn falls behind in bloodline. If you need to be reminded that our girl reigns from the millinery answer to royalty, the greatest American, Albanian born dynasty of Calabasas, The Kardashians then you have been livin..."
1 "towers that were home" "...orn from the two brothers who nearly ended it with the fires of war.  Both the Craven and the Blessed vanished into myth and only left behind the old towers that were home to the Titans. Serving as ruins to warn those who would attempt to recreate this folly And thus ends the creation story  Now comes deciding factions,..."
1 "and further that those" "... to a lower ability to engage with adaptive strategies, such as PBS (D’Lima, Pearson & Kelly, 2012). D’Lima et al. (2012) found that SR predicted PBS and further that those who engaged more with PBS, and had higher SR capacity, experienced less alcohol-related negative consequences (also see Araars & Adams 2008; Benton e..."
0 "warehouse that is clean" "...es promote the highest standard of professionalism by maintaining a work environment on the showroom floor, in the customer service desks, and in the warehouse that is clean, orderly and professional inside and outside.   The best way to ensure we all have a neat and tidy work area is to make sure that we all clean up aft..."
0 "Please assume that Brexit" "... the UK Economy and discuss the main opportunities and threats that macroeconomic changes to the business environment (due to Brexit) could create.  (Please assume that Brexit will indeed be implemented and focus on the medium run 1 to 5 years)  The London Home Property Market  The London property market is one of the key m..."
0 "to drink that tea" "... your smile? You smell… overwhelmingly sad and… I want to make you happy again.” Naruto’s shoulders sagged and he looked away. “I know you don’t want to drink that tea, but maybe we can compromise somehow. I could drink it too if you think that would help, although I don’t think it affects alphas the same way, you k..."
0 "I appreciate that you" "...ager takes a long, agitating sip of his drink before replying. “Oh Sehun.”  Sehun informs him.  Junmyeon scribbles down Sehun’s name in his notepad, “I appreciate that you trusted me enough to give your name, your total for today will be 10,510 won Sehun.” Sehun shrugs to himself before placing a surprisingly accurate a..."
0 "how is that a" "...ou have to have a job to move here, the vast majority of migrants who have moved here, work. They contribute a nett £5,000,000,000 to our economy, so how is that a bad thing? How many people have moved here and set businesses up or work in the NHS? A lot. Wouldn't you rather live in a country that people aspire ..."
1 "thereafter announced that it" "...nd the first quarter of 2002 (Beresford et al.). Less than a month after this $3.852 billion gimmick, the company filed for Chapter 11 bankruptcy and thereafter announced that it had discovered a further $3.831 billion in improperly reported earnings before taxes for 1999, 2000, 2001 and first quarter 2002. As much as $80 bill..."
1 "music that is presented" "...rcise are dissociation, arousal, and rhythm to human movement. Dissociation refers to distracting oneself from discomfort during exercise by enjoying music that is presented. Arousal is based on volume and tempo of music. Human movement and rhythm have been shown to synchronize in music which in turn can help with motor l..."
0 "“Well that’" "...ket. He had his mom write as many verses that would fit. “Be joyful in hope, patient in affliction, faithful in prayer,” Danica said. “Romans 12:12.” “Well that’s it for today,” he said. He really wished it was like real church. It was the closest they could get. He did wish he had a bible on hand. He loved re..."
1 "person believes that these" "...ing that skateboarding “[Attracts] people from all over the world [who] come to skate in hollyfield park,including..professional skateboarders.” This person believes that these professioal skaters then attract even more people to Hollyfield park to watch them perform. However, this argument is invalid because banning skatebo..."
0 "be concluded that “" "...y for self defence but also it leads to mental, physical and spiritual growth of an individual. It also reflects our glorious past. Therefore, it can be concluded that “Martial arts are worthy of preservation”.  Scope of the Study :  The scope of the study is not restricted only on highlighting the martial arts. It fo..."
1 "to consider that others" "...hinking of myself rather than the whole community. My decisions would affect me in a positive way more that it would for everybody else. I would need to consider that others may see the situation different or need different supports to fulfill their duties.  According to the ELI, I can be “too bossy” and this could cause ..."
0 "he decided that he" "...me Naruto had gotten everything he wanted it was well past midday. Sasuke was juggling several bags of groceries and various miscellaneous items when he decided that he'd just rent a wagon to help take all their things home and since he said that, Naruto decided to buy even more things. He'd decided to make his own f..."
0 "saw that it actually" "...eplied absent-mindedly while sliding his backpack next to the couch. Footsteps from upstairs started to get closer and Delana's eyes widened when she saw that it actually was Malcolm.  He looked at her angrily(still upset about his phone) and all Delana could think was:  'Well, isn't this interesting?' She thought, gla..."
1 "to ensure that children" "...or sexual orientation and consider the welfare of the child/ young person / vulnerable adult is paramount. The government takes every reasonable step to ensure that children, young people, and vulnerable adults are protected where staff and associates are involved in the delivery of protecting all from harm. All suspicion..."
1 "to ensure that she" "...e will communicate with the patient and his family effective communication to help patient heal faster. The nurse will manage the care of the patient to ensure that she gives the care to the patient and all his need is met. It is nurse responsibility to coordinate care that she provided to the patient to ensure the c..."
1 "and found that at" "... & Brien). SPD is a relatively recent diagnosis but the disorder isn’t new. In the recent years sensory processing disorder foundation has researched and found that at least 5 percent and as high as 16 percent of children have this disorder. Also 54 and 69 percent of ADHD children are over-responsive to sensory info..."
1 "I understand that as" "...will be conducting weekly GHangouts during the evening for the same purpose.     4 | Impact  What is most important to you when you deliver training? I understand that as a digital leader I must meet the staff at their current comfort level of using digital tools.  This WILL be a slow process but have maintained that T..."
0 "he that is born" "...an not unto thy own understanding but in all thy ways, acknowledge Him and He shall direct your paths'. For He that is born of the flesh is flesh and he that is born of the Spirit is spirit. Talk about the winds that blow wherever it chooses. As a young and immature Christian, I resisted the thought of God choosin..."
0 "users suggests that transactions" "...o identify individuals when coins are exchanged or spent and therefore the issue of trust comes to the fore.   The anonymous nature of cryptocurrency users suggests that transactions cannot be traced yet this is not the case. Indeed, online purchases often linked to an address and therefore an identity. Ledger is a permanent footp..."
1 "both believe that one" "...a simplistic lifestyle and that he is not just living with a small amount of things for no reason. Another similarity between the two authors is they both believe that one can find themselves and their souls through nature. Emerson says in the beginning of Nature, “Standing on the bare ground… I become a transparent eye..."
0 "had argued that NATO" "...ce of NATO past the Cold War, for which it was formulated to counter, is an alliance puzzle. Even in the early 1990s International Relations scholars had argued that NATO’s disintegration was eminent. These scholars were of the view that external threats warranting the continued persistence of NATO no longer existed. C..."
1 "and noted that “" "...ter, after enlisting the help of Soviet tacticians, the City of Christchurch, a steamship, had been seized by police in Calcutta with a cache of arms and noted that “the Indian police have an idea that Gadaries [sic] are secretly gathering arms” (Hindustan Ghadr September 1940, IOR/L/PJ/12/757). In 1927, the intell..."
1 "always tell that there" "...ste of time waiting and it's not really a \"pack\" no one cares for other people its basically just a crowd of people running away from the Kee. People always tell that there is hope, always thinking that I'm just another child afraid and weak but I'm anything but a child. They would not talk to me in such manner if they k..."
0 "lumbar bulge that it" "...2010). Idiopathic scoliosis only rarely causes pain in children and adolescents and often comes to attention only because of the hunched rib cage and lumbar bulge that it causes, or because of asymmetry of the shoulders, chest, or pelvis (Trobisch et al., 2010). During a clinical evaluation for idiopathic scoliosis, th..."
1 "We feel that Google" "... device (like a Roku, or Amazon Fire TV, or Amazon Fire Stick). The Discontinuation of the Nexus Player this year leaves an opening for a new device. We feel that Google will look to fill the void left by the Nexus Player with a new device. We are dubbing it Google ChromeTV. This new device will be more compact than t..."
1 "this means that Anne" "... after a lot of thought, she decides to stay at Green Gables and teach in a nearby town or village. A lot of people in Avonlea disapprove of this, as this means that Anne throws away her Avery scholarship and although Marilla tries to bring her off it, Anne is happy with her decision.  One evening, when Marilla and Ann..."
1 "I found that most" "...ly, I feel confident in presentation and communication.    I once served in the primary school as a tutor before starting my study in the university. I found that most of the primary school students are energetic and curious about everything. These two characters may create a situation that they are not able to stay..."
0 "and markets that Chow" "...nt.             To supplement our non-traditional installments, we want to utilize posters. Placing posters at local grocery stores and the festivals and markets that Chow will have a booth at.  Placement at grocery stores like the Kiva, Capella, Friendly Street Market, Market of Choice, Natural Grocers are ideal since ..."
1 "he knows that it" "...t she will be finish with the loan by the new year. But Krogstad is not worry about that, he wants to make sure his position in the bank remains, for he knows that it would be hard to him to find a job elsewhere due to his reputation, he needs to build his reputation and his life again for his sons. He threatens No..."
1 "activations that was identified" "...cluded; the dry riser locations and the nearest water hydrant location, this was identified to be next to lift shaft 2.  AT was asked for the current activations that was identified in the adjoining areas, it was seen to be  smoke heads activated  and could be seen that the heat had risen in this location.     LFB and AT identifi..."
1 "young people that the" "Ollarves1   Stress during the life span of adolescents Adults tend to tell young people that the teenage years are the “best of life.” Series like High School Musical embrace the idea, by showing young groups of students always happy, engaging in..."
1 "animals that were perfectly" "...he environment was undergoing a similar convulsion as it incorporated European flora and fauna that had never been part of it before. Some plants and animals that were perfectly adapted to life here had no defense against the newcomers, which spread over the land like a cancer. Others that had existed in a delicate balance as..."
1 "something that is better" "...It might be that this wasn’t part of the brief, or that it’s too big for this document (or for KCC alone given the national picture) or perhaps it is something that is better teased out through the implementation plan which is referenced.   However, given the tight timescales involved, I wouldn’t let the above delay in see..."
1 "and states that the" "...st as strong.  The biggest is that the average American voter feels that their vote does not count.  This discourages voter turnout in smaller states and states that the voter has a different belief than the state as a whole.  They feel they are just throwing their vote away, so why to bother, thus voter turnout is ne..."
1 "she suggests that this" "...cently established and will allow for analysis of whether victims' situations meet the international definition of human trafficking. If they do not, she suggests that this definition may not need to be maintained in Brazil. Considering the Anti-Trafficking Review of how the Brazilian government responded to human traffi..."
0 "” means that Hale" "... mood to possibly foreshadow what will happen for the rest of the chapter.   Act 4 #4 Paris’ comment, “Hale has returned to bring Rebecca Nurse to God” means that Hale is trying to bring Rebecca Nurse from the Devil to God as witchcraft is known to be associated with the Devil. This comment also shows Hale’s persist..."
1 "always respected that about" "...ders that only knew what their boss wanted things to look like and they took that on as their vision as opposed to having a vision of their own. [He] always respected that about [me]”.  Additionally, my Chief stated that I was genuine in my approach.  She stated, “you are genuine about wanting to take care of your folks.”   A..."
1 "blade that was infused" "...assault on Davin's moon. Unknown to them thought, the traitorous first chaplain of the word bearers had given the rogue planetary governor a powerful blade that was infused chaotic energy. This corrupted the planetary governor to chaos god Nurgle (dark tongue Nergl-eth). The chaos god “blessed” the moon with an outbreak ..."
1 ", that is a" "...of the medications it made me so dizzy and nauseous that I couldn’t even get up from the couch and I almost fell down due to how dizzy it made me feel, that is a danger to me.  Of course I have tried opioids for the pain but they did nothing at all for me and it was just better to take me off of them than risk..."
1 "who expressed that they" "...s were still in rows. As Allan Luke (2013) states, many teachers were resorting to “Default Mode”- teaching the way they were taught.  Those teachers who expressed that they were comfortable using technology were using SMARTboards as glorified overhead projectors. The consensus was that the secondary classrooms were still..."
1 "status that is capable" "...ions of health, wellbeing, illness and disease are defined for comprehension. An ideal way to define health in a broad conception is, ‘as a continuum status that is capable of determining ones in functionality, mental stability and ultimately, their life expectancy’ (Liamputtong et al. 2012).  Health was first defined in..."
1 "only think that they" "...ad Setting ahead goals  Think that your life is 1,000 pieces do you have a clear picture ahead of what your picture is going to be? People these days only think that they are never going to win, but that's not true one thing that my father told is that if i put my mind towards something I can accomplish it. Think that ..."
0 "have learned that Beethoven" "...ercise one of your valued tools that you use to analyze, understand, and improve your toolbox of techniques. Consider this: In this technique you may have learned that Beethoven uses commanding chords, strong accents, and clearly defined rests in his music. You also may have discovered how Mozart writes delicate lines with ba..."
1 "they argue that not" "...e learning contract as well as the set objectives. Bailey-McHale and Hart (2013) criticises the andragogy theory in relation to learning contracts as they argue that not all individuals are self-driven and motivated, just as you can have a bad mentor, bad mentees exist also by coasting along in their learning and deve..."
0 "shoot dates that I" "...e sets and locations were definitel eventful.  We had quite a few eventful moments throughout the shoot. From what I gather a few of them happened on shoot dates that I wasn’t on. There’s a story flying around about some sort of bondage wear that was found behind the wardbrobe at one of the locations. Definitely made..."
0 "disease indicates that it" "...n to educate the Australian community with regard to improving their health to avoid such conditions as Type 2 diabetes, the rising incidence of this disease indicates that it is a major contemporary issue facing Australian society and the health system struggling to cope.   Type 2 diabetes mellitus (most commonly referred ..."
1 "I hope that Jane" "...iners invite Jane to go back to London with them. I wish my uncle would do something like that. He does not live in London, but he lives close to it. I hope that Jane sees Mr. Bingley during her stay in London.                                           In Chapter 26                        In Chapter 27 and 28 \t\t\t\t ..."
1 "we found that there" "... between her job and her sister. However, they had a strong connection and they trusted each other, which made them easy. At the end of the interview we found that there is no communication with other social workers or psychologist to help in solving their problems. Finally, we encouraged them to keep supporting each ..."
1 "question that is on" "...ole class feedback.  The stress level of a whole class discussion is reduced.7  Whole class feedback. I will use the cards and ask the pairs the same question that is on the card.  See Appendix 5                     Appendix 5   Why do you think tourists come to Janitzio during the day of the dead?         How do peop..."
0 "not understand that their" "...tation she was expelled (Tougas 22). Even with the terrible events that happened to the Little Rock Nine, what the white community of Little Rock did not understand that their words, and their actions could not stop the extremely driven Little Rock Nine from fighting for what was right, or from getting their educations.    ..."
1 "methodology that was recently" "...y around consent and internal trafficking. Castilho discusses unresolved issues on rights of sex workers and migrants and points to a data collection methodology that was recently established and will allow for analysis of whether victims' situations meet the international definition of human trafficking. If they do not, she su..."
0 "instrument is that the" "...he maximum number of participants as possible at once in an economical way (Sekaran & Bougie, 2013:147).    The disadvantage of using such a research instrument is that the response rates are typically low and respondents are unable to clarify any doubts they may have (Sekaran & Bougie 2013:147). Furthermore, with low le..."
1 "MSS is that it" "... 1: Identify an MSS for Tony WIP - Oliver Intelligence Phase  A type of MSS is an Enterprise Resource Planning (ERP) System,  the concept behind this MSS is that it considers all of the organisation’s business processes, the implementation of an ERP solely depends on analysing the business and its processes and i..."
0 "data indicated that perturbation-control" "...struction was also shown in this paper. In the end, the monitoring results was revealed in order to estimate the construction quality. The monitoring data indicated that perturbation-control construction program achieved good results. The theoretical analysis and typical case shown in this paper is of valuable reference.  Key words: shiel..."
1 "have perceived that the" "..., emotional branding has occurred as a very significant and influential brand management paradigm (Gobe 2001; Zaltman 2003; Colegio, 2014). Companies have perceived that the love for a brand is an important reason to keep a good relationship with their consumers, therefore they use emotional branding, which is a consumer-..."
1 "and hoped that it" "...ly influencing what America is today.     The colonists did not have high expectations for self-government or individual freedom.  They just expected and hoped that it to be less destructive.  Some, like Thomas Jefferson, thought that by changing the government the colonists would be safer as well as happier.  To ma..."
0 "work suggests that his" "Assignment 1- 102085 Education and Policy  Option 1 Sarra’s work suggests that his success has been achieved by his ability to develop and embrace the Aboriginal identity of his students and the community. Critically analyse this st..."
0 "truly convinced that it" "...e should point out that unattainable goals cause discouragement. A realistic goal is one towards which we are willing and able to work because we are truly convinced that it can be achieved. Finally, goals must be time bound that is they must be reached within a timeframe. This creates a sense of urgency that prevents us ..."
0 "result found that the" "...  and Granger Causality to examine the effect of GDP on Pakistan Stock price  , They use monthly data period from January, 2001 - December, 2011. The result found that the GDP have not relationship with Pakistan Stock price                2.1.6  Interest rate determinant of stock market  Finance theory explains interest..."
1 "and saw that the" "...t.  August 17th, 1851 \t\tI heard a knock on my door that woke me up tonight. I went to go open it and saw a man through my peephole. I opened the door and saw that the man was indeed a runaway. I could tell by his tattered clothes and slim frame that he needed help. I told him to come in quickly before he was seen. ..."
1 "home that is under" "...vice skills. Lastly, the quality of the product is also a very important attribute to a pizza delivery service. I do not want a pizza delivered to my home that is under cooked with a sloppy appearance. The quality control of the product should have already been established by Pizza USA however, I would to see the sam..."
"done that was on" "...ear enough so this won’t be another issue in the future.  Time management in the classroom.  1 There were a few lessons where i didn’t get everything done that was on my lesson plan  2  3  4  5     " 1
0 "obesity that is obtained" "...de effect of any exercise at all. Muscle soreness and stress fractures, however, are nowhere near as serious as the health problems like diabetes and obesity that is obtained from the very little physical^upkeep that constantly seems to be affecting majority of Americans. As one can see, the positive additions to society t..."
0 "to show that the" "...le. Lowe holds the strong opinion that international treaties and case laws make references to the principle but there is still insufficient evidence to show that the concept is legally binding upon states’ pursuant to international law and can constrain their conduct. For example, he notes that despite several ref..."
0 "also testify that John" "...can testify that John had someone post on Facebook about Kaylee and  me in a very negative way. He told her personally that he had done that. She can also testify that John is not cooperative and often refuses to talk to me.   Jennifer Howington can testify to my integrity and work ethic and devotion to taking care of my..."
1 "I believe that it" "...How come you can not drag a clean break if you're not interested in a relationship. You say that you were too young, I do not want to accept, nor can I believe that it was the real motive. Is there another? But what should answer this question, do not you're going to anyway, on the other hand I'll never ask this que..."
1 "It seems that students" "...s for grades 9-10 Introduction  In examining disciplinary literacy and the expectations of students to be college and career ready, a problem arises. It seems that students are lacking the ability to synthesize their learning across disciplines.  Rainey and Moje (2012) identify this by suggesting, “too few young people a..."
1 "I feel that Mary" "...dea of what she was being accused of cause she has never been ill in her life.   \tMary was looked at as a plague, a danger to society.  In my opinion I feel that Mary was treated unfairly due to being an Irish domestic servant female, she was consider to have a temper, she didn't have anyone family to care or fight..."
1 "progression that is related" "...heme and in a major key. La Folia La Folia translates to ‘mad’, or ‘empty-headed’. While not required in a passacaglia by any means, there is a chord progression that is related to the Passacaglia. The progression offers a method of developing the ground bass pattern. This progression is known as La Folia. Depending on the ti..."
1 "I noticed that I" "...in her playpen by Carrie. Abbie is placed in the playpen and given a baby bottle and some toys, she is so tired that she falls asleep. When I wake up I noticed that I stink oh no I have both peed and pooped in my cloth diaper. Soon someone discover that I am in need of a diaper change, Carrie come over to my plaype..."
0 "and use that information" "...rs. The sales game has changed over the years. We now live in an era where buyers have the ability to do independent  research on prospective sellers and use that information to evaluate and compare them before ever agreeing to meet. If you do a bit of research on your own you’ll notice that, no matter what the brand or th..."
0 ") stated that heteroskedasticity" "...nt, there is diverse variances across the disturbance. On the other hand, it reflects homoskedastic if all the measurement are constant.   White (1980) stated that heteroskedasticity influences the efficiency of estimated parameter and covariance matrix. This will cause misleading the result for hypothesis testing. White test by O..."
0 "college that was almost" "...tential and marketability upon graduation. In Steve Jobs’ Convocation speech, he states “And 17years later I did go to college. But I naively chose a college that was almost as expensive as Stanford……” It’s also important to consider the major before entering college. One of the most important decisions you’ll make either..."
0 "know is that there" "...still do not know with confidence whether the long term effects of GMOs will eventually lead to the extinction of the natural environment. What we do know is that there are two competing public opinions and that we are legally required to balance the interests of all stakeholders. Nonetheless it is apparent that ESD ..."
0 "sure that it'" "...led spoofing) your phone's GPS and other settings should not be attempted unless you're a professional who knows what you're doing. But we're kind of sure that it's still a breach of your provider's terms of service. Final Verdict: Not worth it! Wrap It Up We hope this information has been helpful to you. In you..."
0 "hypothesis that was expressed" "Self-directed learning is a term used to portray an educational hypothesis that was expressed by Levett-Jones (2005) to have beneficial components. Despite the fact that there are valuable components there are equally negative segments that ap..."
1 "to recommend that to" "...d understand that right now all the member of the Board of Directors have relationship with executive management. From my point of view, i would like to recommend that to make sure to choose the Independent directors. Sometimes, the private business owners have trouble separating their roles as owner (shareholder) from..."
0 "melody that is complete" "...ose a melody each day. Create a trigger to start your activity. Choose five notes to use in your melody. Using these five notes, compose an eight-bar melody that is complete.  Set a timer, and give yourself 10 minutes to imagine, edit, and notate the melody. Write the melody down. It’s especially helpful if you sing the m..."
1 "research suggests that students" "... state or national level in their chosen sport. There is evidence to suggest that successful athletes are likely to choose PE as a career option. The research suggests that students are more likely to choose the profession of being a PE teacher based upon their involvement and accomplishments of sport, instead of their experience..."
1 "also stated that the" "...used English as a second language had a higher chance of major plagiarism and were less likely to consider it a serious problem. Volkov (2011, p. 24) also stated that the internationalism of classes proves challenging for academics who cannot tangibly write different assessments for English and Non-English students. Th..."
1 "me realize that you" "... four years of my high school career made me grow as an individual.  Seeing people requiring critical help in Louisiana after a recent hurricane made me realize that you can make a difference. This was only the beginning. I became a student representative on the City of Royal’s Planning Commission. I currently take pa..."
1 "of thought that indeed" "...powerful inside nations and globally. Despite, corporations have more value than the GDP of less-developed Nation States, pays will to Liberal school of thought that indeed NGOs are more important actors rather than States. Yet Realists continue to stress that despite the growth of these corporations, their influence on ..."
1 "I find that some" "... to make positive contributions to those around him or her. As parents can help their child to progress on what they are learning in school. However, I find that some parents will not bother on their children learning process which will cause no strong school and parent relationship. I believe that play should be t..."
1 "Zera figured that if" "...even certain who her cell block captain was. She tossed and turned trying to think of the best way to communicate without getting herself in trouble. Zera figured that if she could get the books she would be able to have a good standing in the prison, she wanted to make sure that she was not going to be confined to the..."
0 "states that" "...rsonal property, or their home can be searched.   (1791): The fifth amendment grants protection to criminal defendants. It prohibits double jeopardy, states that a person cannot be forced to testify against themself, and ensures that a person will receive  “due process of law” before facing criminal punishment..."
1 "could swear that his" "...h my arms crossed over my chest. \"You know I didn't get a chance to even get that close Darc, you were all over him like white on rice.\" \"Oh! Well, I could swear that his eyes changed color. The were so pretty, a light gray with flecks of blue in them. When you walked around the corner the changed all of a sudden, it w..."
1 "and learns that he" "...ding down stream. Soon the arrive at a human settlement beneath The Lonely Mountain and proceed to the mountain. Bilbo steals a golden cup from Smaug and learns that he has weak spot on his underbelly and informs a human archer, Bard, who kills Smaug, but Smaug burns his village, and son both the Elves and villagers ..."
0 "material suggests that the" "... the requisite degree of scientific uncertainty. The first condition, the threat of serious or irreversible damage, is triggered only when scientific material suggests that the development will impose a threat to the environment. The second condition, implies that there must be sufficient scientific material or evidence to s..."
1 "learned is that not" "...is pattern continues on and on and on I won't be the smartest person in the world no one ever is there's always new things to learn. But what I have  learned is that not one can ever be little me unless I let them. I had to learn on my own no matter how much support I had that no one tell  me that something is wrong w..."
1 "paper that is no" "...suggestions here represent the standard recommendations, and they will help you to create an effective score that is easy to read. Parts should be on paper that is no less than 8 x 11 inches for the image area, but the actual paper should be at least 9.5 x 12.5 inches. Concert parts are often printed on 10 x 13-inc..."
1 "anywhere that is not" "...osts and nesting places, will look for small openings in roofs, eaves or other architectural structures to facilitate entry. In airports, this may be anywhere that is not secure from entry such as in a hangar, terminal or maintenance building. Bat removal in these areas becomes crucial as bats (as well as any other nui..."
1 "mural that was created" "...ors.  Our mascot is the explorer which is represented by a bear cub. The school colors are kelly green and navy blue. In our entry way is a beautiful mural that was created by a former parent, Adam Summers. This year the staff voted on an ocean theme to create school spirit.     New Trails’ Mission: Where students excel,..."
1 "it states that  “" "...thlete’s use drug to enhance their abilities in competition. Athlete’s should not use those enhancements because of cheating potencial. In an article it states that  “By allowing everyone to take performance enhancing drugs, we level the playing field. We remove the effects of genetic inequality. Far from being unfa..."
0 "explains that" "...ally move, unlike most apps and games. Graham Thomas, a professor of psychiatry at the Miriam Hospital’s Weight Control and Diabetes Research Center, explains that “the advances in technology have promoted reduced physical activity and increased time in sedentary behavior, which comes with well-known health risk..."
0 "Tribunal concluded that the" "...iction to consider the Parties’ dispute concerning historic rights and the source of maritime entitlements in the South China Sea. On the merits, the Tribunal concluded that the Convention comprehensively allocates rights to maritime areas and that protections for pre-existing rights to resources were considered, but not adop..."
0 "she believed that if" "...ith terrible parenting and was never truly loved. She spent her time doing work and constantly craving the affection she never had. When she grew up, she believed that if she found a man to marry she would no longer have to search for love. She first married a man whose mother was just as abusive as her father had been..."
1 "to ensure that respondents" "...udy further?    Question 11, 16 (completed), 26 and 26 (Completing): What would you like to study further?    Pilot Testing of the survey    In order to ensure that respondents fully understand the questions and that the questions are not misunderstood a pilot study was performed (Sekaran & Bougie 2013:150).    Pre-testing i..."
1 "was told that if" "... call by name.  The Warden left her in the hands of other guards, who began processing her. Her long brown hair was plated tightly over her head, she was told that if she let it down it would be cut off. Several injections were given to her, more needles and bloody pricks, and blood drawn out from her arms. It was ..."
0 "think that is enough" "...n the Olympics. I want to play on the beach or on a court. The only problem is it just seems so impossible. I play recreation volleyball but I do not think that is enough. Hopefully when I go to high school I will make the volleyball team and make my way up. After school I plan the play in college and join the national..."
1 "I feel that this" "...ion. Plus, if someone does not pay attention they miss out on learning and get lower grades since they did not pay attention to the material. Lastly, I feel that this article really regards to the ignorance of students created by the new wave of technology in schools. "
0 "very concerned that someone" "...do was play.When they return home they discover that the wealthy merchant that lives across the street hid all his money in Flavia’s pantry.Flavia is very concerned that someone will steal it so she decides to build a trap.Later that night Flavia hears a noise and gets out of bed. Downstairs she finds her family's slave looki..."
0 "events that was written" "...he fire and didn't get burned. I strongly feel that the book, “The Outsiders” by S.E. Hinton. “The Outsiders” is a fictional story with non fictional events that was written in 1967. There are just a few reasons why I believe it should be saved.         One of the few reasons it should be saved is because it’s a coming-of..."
1 "to ensure that not" "...t’s the blood, sinew and muscle that brings the idea to life.  Because of this, we stay current on an array of technologies, platforms and frameworks to ensure that not only are our solutions as technology-agnostic as they can be, but also flexible to the needs of your IT demands. services Technical Documentation Sys..."
0 "would believe that without" "...ns to bring out the good in people. The ideals of Confucianism suggest that with minimal entanglement, societies have the ability to flourish.   Many would believe that without stable direction, societies inspired by Confucius may become consumed by internal pandemonium, Confucius’s followers relied on other features to crea..."
1 "but that was a" "... too good to be true. “So, where are you taking me?” I asked after he got in the car. “I, uh… Know a guy at La Pierre, downtown.” He said it casually but that was a five star restaurant on a first date. We walked in and we were seated at a table, upstairs by a window. The view was amazing, I couldn't believe it. ..."
0 "fire that was flying" "...s the only light was from these mushroom looking thing glowing in different colors i wondered deeper and deeper into the forest i came upon a blazing fire that was flying around in mid air not burning anything behind the fire there was these red wolf's dripping what seemed to be ice some how on the other side of the fi..."
0 "ve decided that you" "...in the doorway must have caught him off guard. He seemed to visibly relax now that he noticed me, however.  “So what do you supposed we do, since you’ve decided that you’re the oh-so-very smart one here?” North asked.  “I… don’t know,” Luke sighed. “I just know that we shouldn’t be sitting around deciding her fate, es..."
1 "Hale knows that Proctor" "...by suggesting otherwise.   Act 3 #17 Hale wants Proctor to have a lawyer because he knows that if he doesn’t get one soon, then he’ll end up in jail. Hale knows that Proctor has the odds stacked against him, and without a lawyer it is certain that Proctor will go to jail. With “ claim so weighty [it] cannot be argued by a..."
1 "conclusion that is what" "... the years and we can make plans where if something happens we can know what to do and what not to do also where to go and where you don't go.     In conclusion that is what my party mainly focuses on and ways we can help stop it.         "
1 "of research that I" "...rom BCU , It provides me the chance to join UK universities as a teaching staff. Another important reason to join this program is it matches the area of research that I’m interested in.  Finally I would like to mention my other interests. I enjoy reading technical articles and test new software packages. In addition ..."
1 "to think that Gaia" "\tIf the world has a consci-AH, how stupid of him. It has! Kiritsugu started to think that Gaia holds some grudge against him, always finding new ways to fuck his life. The day had been perfect and calm, without a cloud in the sky, birds singing..."
1 "I recognized that a" "...           I found that Tom Robinson, Jean Louise “Scout” Finch, and Arthur “Boo” Radley were the three mockingbirds for me. As the novel progressed, I recognized that a mockingbird (from my perspective) is someone who is insecure and maybe they don’t like to socialize or they don’t have that many friends. These “mock..."
1 "device is that it" "... (Normally 2 or 3)  with me it gets the most compliments. People always ask me where can they buy one (or can i have it lol). My main issue with this device is that it takes so long to fully charger and it only has an 8000mAh captivity. I do still recommend this device to all the aspiring Pokemon Trainers out there…..."
1 "had hoped that their" "...Salwa’s family members were respected. Conclusion ​The family interview was useful and effective. We felt Salwa and her sister were satisfied as they had hoped that their problem would be in consideration. The education from the (Nursing Family) was useful, effected interviewing and was very important for us to have li..."
0 "plus is that OLED" "...s whose pixels display a relative black. OLED has the added advantage of compacting components, which makes such televisions extremely thin.  Another plus is that OLED also promotes accurate color reproduction by supporting a larger number of colors than most other standards.  In terms of technology alone, LG’s TV i..."
1 "please ensure that the" "                 Event Safety Check List:    In readiness for an event to be held at Twickenham Stadium please ensure that the following information is supplied to the events team at least 2 weeks from event date.  Have the Building/De-rig Schedules been supplied?   Have Grap..."
1 "stress is that it" "... show employees and clients that we are competent in our field of study and capable of helping them with their problems. One last benefit that I must stress is that it is a national certification based on national standards and growing in recognition every day."
0 "or mouth that you" "...ssing your concerns and reasons for seeking cosmetic dental treatments. You should also ask yourself honestly what exactly it is about your teeth and/or mouth that you don’t like. By being totally honest, it will allow your dental practitioner to determine the best possible treatment plan meeting your specific conce..."
1 "also realized that it" "...under productive and scattered in the way I complete activities.  I’ll call it a little here and a little there and a lot of time on the computer.  I also realized that it take me a little more time to start an activity, than it does to begin working on something that I’ve already begun.   It’s much easier for me to pic..."
1 "Well that is exactly" "... for never give up and S stands for succeed. The meaning for never give up in the dictionary is to keep trying and never stop working for your goals. Well that is exactly what it looks like on campus also that you are on track to graduate or you're getting there. Now most important in my opinion is the S it is succeed...."
1 "so that it becomes" "... “outside the box,” you will find that writing elegant musical lines gets easier.    Incorporate some of these modifications in your own compositions so that it becomes easier to create music using non-standard rhythms. Composers should be able to notate anything they can conceive and imagine. If you have trouble wri..."
0 "rules that were put" "..., the workers in the research and engineering department at Cosmo Plastics felt as if their innovation and creativity was being restrained due to new rules that were put in place. These rules not only affected the morale of the employees but there productivity as well. There is also a distinct possibility that some em..."
0 "fact that is it" "...country sounds easy, fun and adventurous. Everyone gets so excited when they have to chance to study overseas. But do not let the excitement bury the fact that is it not easy. Some may think money and paying for tuition and day to day expenses are the hard part, in reality that may not necessarily be a big problem..."
1 "to ensure that children" "...or sexual orientation and consider the welfare of the child/ young person / vulnerable adult is paramount. The government takes every reasonable step to ensure that children, young people and vulnerable adults are protected where staff and associates are involved in the delivery of protecting all from harm. All suspicions..."
1 "daughter reported that Mr" "...’s Disease and was not even able to walk or talk, though Mr. Banks insists that she may still say a word or two spontaneously. She sat quietly as his daughter reported that Mr. Banks often calls the police on her every 2-3 months and he complained that she treats him as a child. He had this worker to speak with a family fri..."
0 "have experienced that it" "...ve, but most responsive sites are not mobile first, if only because the design process for mobile first is foreign enough from what most stakeholders have experienced that it can be a little uncomfortable to wrap your head around.   PROS AND CONS There are some very desirable benefits of designing mobile first: The site ne..."
0 "also shown that these" "... all the rubbish is washed into waterholes that are the only sources of water for the birds, mammals and reptiles that live in the area. Studies have also shown that these waterholes have a significantly higher bacterial level than those farther away.   Toilet Areas It is important that visitors only use the toilet faci..."
1 "and that it was" "...leep, Sara thought about how much she would miss nights like this with her mom.  She knew in her heart if the the house was livable she would move in and that it was the right decision to make, but she would miss her mom greatly. Waking to the warmth on her face from the rays of sunshine streaming in the window, S..."
1 "to ensure that they" "... automating the processes. It is also evident from the research that banks need to evaluate the rate of return on investment in technology beforehand to ensure that they invest in projects that have a high rate of return and take the shortest time to become profitable. 5.5 Areas of further research The study sought to..."
1 "such that it becomes" "...s, biases, and the relationship to the study, which may affect investigation.   Engagement................Allowing for adequate time to collect data, such that it becomes saturated.   Maximum variation ....Purposefully seeking variation or diversity in sample selection to allow for greater range of application of the f..."
0 "parents emphasize that their" "...nces for a child. “Some parents express that their child preferences are flexible because they do not want to prolong their wait for a child and some parents emphasize that their main priority is adopting a healthy child” (Moyer & Goldberg p2). The best way that couples cope with this stressor is by reconstructing their views ..."
1 "duty remains that of" "...date this statement. The Principal’s task is a very complex one. In spite of the complexness and the intensity of the Principal’s chore, his/her main duty remains that of ensuring that efficacious pedagogy and learning taking place. Donmoyer and Wagstaff (1990:20) put forward that instructional leadership “is no longer..."
1 "researchers claim that  those" "...l living things including substances like weeds (herbicide),  insects (insecticides), fungus (fungicides), rodents (rodenticides) and much more. Some researchers claim that  those pesticides are extremely  harmful for animals, and they eventually end in our bodies. Robin Mather discusses some of this unsafe pesticides  in “The ..."
0 "then that is not" "...n be good and bad. It can be good because it can increase the population of an endangered species. The bad news is you can create a destructive trait then that is not to hard. This may not be a safe option but it can help stop malaria and if it does what’s the problem. Your Reaction: Do you agree? Do you disagree? ..."
1 "and that it ultimately" "...licies include a living wage, free higher education and universal health care. Advocates of socialism believe that capitalism creates vast inequality and that it ultimately leads to imperialism, a hyper-form of capitalism.  Difference between Marxism and Socialism may be a bit difficult to understand to some. However, re..."
0 "eyes that were so" "...t me a new liver,’ MacGregor said, patting his stomach, ‘and went in for a set of kidneys while I was at it.’ He gazed at Matt with those bright blue eyes that were so much like Tom’s. Matt thought he was disgusting. He couldn’t wait for the man to go home” (Farmer 126). A strong section of character development is ..."
1 "to believe that he" "...when he is depressed. Thhis is where he still needs work and confidence. Tony does believe that with support he can make changes but he needs to come to believe that he can make those changes on his own.  R    R  R  R    6/14/16    6/14/16  6/14/16  6/14/16    Goal B:  Tony wants to feel confident in his relationship..."
0 "RCTs that were included" "...y through reading articles to include only laparoscopic APR with end colostomy for rectal cancer patients; therefore, providing a net result of three RCTs that were included to this literature review (Figure 1). These investigated articles are: Study I: Lopez-Cano, 2012 [6]. Study II: Vierima, 2015 [7]. Study III: Lopez-C..."
1 "shepherds that is designed" "...he sensitive skin and digestive system of the breed.  7. Wellness Large Breed Complete Health Formula  This is one of the top 10 dog foods for German shepherds that is designed to meet the nutritional needs of this type of dogs. It consists of more than four meat-based protein sources as well as chondroitin and glucosamine t..."
0 "and noticed that the" "...xt day James woke up to see the TV was no longer broken so he turned it on and continued life as usual. James had a long think as he walked to school and noticed that the school gates were a different colour to the usual green. How could it have turned yellow?!  The next day james woke up to see the school gates had ch..."
1 "personally say that you" "...eat.” Jack said.   “Hmph, yeah right.” Ana said not believing Jack’s word.   “I’m serious.” Jack said. “Look, coming from a single parent home let me personally say that you are doing a phenomenal job.”  “Well I can’t take all the credit.” Ana said as she rubbed Jack’s shoulder.  “Well thank you. Now if you will excuse me..."
0 "one point that he" "...elated to those of alt-country and singer-songwriter. He is then, the ‘postmodern’ outlaw whose fandom offers a symbolic resistance - even stating at one point that he “hated” country music, the genre that for so many years defined him.   Cultural capital, subcultural capital, and Ryan Adams’ symbolic resistance   B..."
0 "purity that it is" "...illate, we heat our oils at high temperature and low pressure, allowing us to eliminate any impurities and offer a product that is so high in THC/CBD purity that it is actually clear. It’s the cleanest way to vape!   Sales process  Research   Grading The first step in any sales process is proper prospecting. Before ..."
1 "was discovered that it" "...server as an encoded file, which must be decoded on the client side. Where in the process this file could be decoded was originally a mystery, but it was discovered that it could be decoded as it was loaded in through the tile load function. The default implementation of the tile load function simply creates a new Image ..."
1 "and concurred that it" "...ment to their customers with the deployment of smart monitoring and management tools. As such, Senapps has been researching proximity based solutions and concurred that it has the potential to drastically improve customer experience along with key employee processes. Thus, the Proximity Application Platform project is b..."
1 "to ensure that everyone" "...tiatives and 157 projects with summaries of what value we delivered for our customers and company.  We held open houses at three different buildings, to ensure that everyone from the executives to network technicians had an opportunity to see the breadth of work they’d all had a hand in making happen.  I have an eye for t..."
1 "grass patch that Matty" "...e left of me, so I went right. The square was going to be overfull in about two minutes so I speed walked to the front of the school. There was a big grass patch that Matty and I would always sit on. I found it and layed down, the grass was warm and relaxing. Him and I would always tell the stupidest things to each other..."
0 "lesson is that not" "...Lily watches in terror. The men call the police, lie and, blame the whole incident on Rosaleen. This is one of Lily’s first lessons in the book. This lesson is that not everyone is treated equally or fairly, just as life is not fair. From this experience she also learns that in her day and time, if someone is black t..."
1 "to believe that the" "...ccording to my ethical lens inventory my blind spot is belief that motive justifies method. Because I am so clear about my reasons for acting, I tend to believe that the motive justifies the method. I tend to believe that ethics is a set of universal rules that everyone must follow, just like I do. I follow the rules-..."
0 "she expressed that she" "...fish without water. She went on and told me that her only friend was mad at her because she always wanted to be with her boyfriend. On the other hand she expressed that she also have problems with her parents because of the same issue (Jerlay). Her answer was what I expected, keeping in mind that most adolescents start t..."
1 "to see that composers" "...imitation; you'll begin to learn why a composer employs a particular technique, which helps you make more intelligent choices as well. When you start to see that composers are intentional in the way they compose their music, you won’t be able to help but start thinking more intently about your own.  Once you know “the w..."
0 "humbly pray that you" "...George the Sixth, by the Grace of God, of Great Britain, Ireland, and the British Dominions beyond the Seas, Defender of the Faith, Emperor of India, humbly pray that you see fit to recommend to His Majesty that a reprieve be granted in favour of one Udham Singh, otherwise known as Azad Singh...We fervently believe tha..."
1 "he says that Elizabeth" "...lutely adorable, and shows how much he likes Jane. However, you can’t marry a man that you have just met. Mr. Darcy seems a bit rude, especially when he says that Elizabeth is “tolerable, but not handsome enough to tempt” him. He may think that of her apperance, but what about her personality? What if he met a woman who ..."
1 "eyes that were as" "... he went limping up and down the vestibule, with his grey hair sticking up in scrubbing-brush fashion, his shrivelled yellow face, and his large dark eyes that were as keen as any hawk's, and yet soft as a buck's. The whole room was hung with trophies of his numerous hunting expeditions, and he had some story about ..."
"me is that I" "One of the many unique things about me is that I’m bilingual - almost trilingual. I speak English, German, and my french is on its way to being fluent. Both of my parents are completely trilingual a..." 0
1 "money that is being" "... Country. Even in high standard of living Countries, the economy can falter, so the government has to make sure they keep a keen eye on the amount of money that is being put out into circulation. When they create^too much money, prices rise and inflation occurs. This is fine in the short-run because it helps create jo..."
0 "if that is not" "...fore everything went online, marketers would have to scour huge files of documents to find the addresses and phone numbers of potential customers. As if that is not hard enough, they would then call each one of them and try to convince them into giving them a deal. A large part of the bill from the marketing depa..."
1 "given that" "...lacks to attack or resist arrest (nine times more likely vs Whites) you would not expect those results. This narrative has to be explained (1).  Now, given that they've been profiled — given the inward and hurtful self-contentiousness that racism causes, it's easy to understand why they would resist, especial..."
0 "one assumes that the" "...loyment .Students expect to receive a better job and higher income due to their investment in education.    Ch-2  Ans.  3.In answering this question, one assumes that the young person has a steady job, adequate insurance coverage, and sufficient cash reserves. The young individual is in the accumulation phase of the in..."
1 "she believed that she" "...ammad 6years, Ms. Fathima 4years, Ms. Tiba 3 years and Baby Saddi 18 months.  As she stated that since her husband’s death, she became very tired and she believed that she always has so much to do. Salwa is Housewife and she had given up on things that she used to do such as attending classes at the University of Calgar..."
1 "effect is that you" "...erally horrific experiences that people go through daily With all road accidents in new zealand there are many affects the follow close behind.   One effect is that you may suffer minor or major injuries that may or not may only give you short term but long term injuries like multiple tissue bruising, conclusions and..."
1 "in jest that communicators" "...an relate to my days as an A1C and SrA.  Thus, the first aspect of my “way of doing business” relates to the area of communication.  It is often said in jest that communicators are the “worst” communicators.  The reasoning behind the stereotype is typical of societies perspective around field of cyber, whereas, troops intera..."
"to consider that before" "...sitive side for the mine, the mine has employed to date 2 500 people who constitute 20.8% of the population of the Rustenburg and the Mayor will have to consider that before opting for mine closure." 1
1 "matrix implies that the" "...olumns of a matrix would contain all of the words (lexical forms) of a language, while rows would contain all the meanings. An entry in a cell of the matrix implies that the lexical form of a column can be used^(in the appropriate context) to express the meaning of that row.                         The theoretical implica..."
1 "states that" "...ing at 42%.  Decades of video game technology has spanned over many generations. So our average gamer is not actually who we think they are. The ESA, states that the average male gamer is the age of 35 and a female gamer at the age of 45. Women age 18 or older represent a greater portion of the game-playing po..."
0 "which concluded that “" "...ues such as chronic headaches, diabetes, and sleep disorders are also associated with stress. The University of London also conducted a 20-year study which concluded that “unmanaged reactions to stress were a more dangerous risk factor for cancer and heart disease than either cigarettes or high cholesterol.” In addition,..."
1 "we hope that she" "...e has united America, no, she has united the world.  And while she probably must now move on to more important things like world hunger and genocide, we hope that she has enough time to still show us all how real and humble she is weekly on her hit reality series “I am Cait”.  I know that not everyone can be presid..."
1 "was identified that there" "...Venue Operations were dispatched to identify the cause of the activation,  access was made via lift shaft 3, when VO progressed along the corridor it was identified that there was a lot of smoke in the area, this was confirmed by other heads in this location being activated.  As per our procedure a call was made to the Fire..."
1 "modernism quotes that I" "....” -Bryan Appleyard. Those are two examples of modernism writing type, now people don't use this style that often anymore.  Here are some interesting modernism quotes that I found in Internet: “It's ugly, but is it art?” ― Randall Jarrell, Pictures from an Institution. \"That's because your mother wanted to show you off.\" ..."
0 "and that is very" "....” An interesting point is that meditation does not block negative things, in fact, “meditation can help us embrace our worries, our fear, our anger; and that is very healing. We let our own natural capacity of healing to do the work.” -Thich Nhat Hanh.  “We cannot solve our problems with the same thinking we used ..."
1 "pooped diaper that Abbie" "...ean cloth diaper from the cloth diaper stack that she opens, and she lifts up the feet of Abbie and slide the cloth diaper underneath the soaking wet pooped diaper that Abbie is wearing. Now I am wearing only my soaking wet pooped cloth diaper and nothing else, then Sonja begins with unbuttoning the buttons on my cloth dia..."
1 "just quote that from" "...\t. \t. \t. \t. \t. \t. \t. \t. \t. \t. \t. \t. \t. \t“Oh and may the odds be forever in your favor!” \t. \t. \t. \t. \t. \t. \t. \t. \t. \t. \t. \t. \t. \t. \t. \t. \t“You did not just quote that from the Hunger Games.” Attempt #4 Omniscient POV’s 3-E Classroom Lunch Break \t“Well now children,” Koro-sensei chirps happily, “I will be stopping in Par..."
0 "to say that I" "...\t Choose a p​assage ​that shows the fear​ felt by one of the main characters (part 5):            “I thought about this a lot, to be truthful. I have to say that I think the bravest thing I ever did was become friends with August. But I couldn't write about that, of course. I was afraid we'd have to read these o..."
1 "to recognize that conventionality" "...rom trying new things and taking risk , in other words I trade my creativity and spontaneity for feelings of security. to be less conventional I need to recognize that conventionality is a way of hiding myself and avoiding developing me as a person I need to focus on my unique strength and skills take moderate risks and challenges ..."
"It reasons that never" "...tually in trouble with others due to him helping me. One day I decided to finish my relationship with him, and I’m better now. \tFiaally the betrayal. It reasons that never unforgivable. " 1
1 "Many believe that the" "... over $73 billion (USD) dollars globally. Tied into the Technology Internet commerce, brought on by sex trafficking, is  the commercial sex industry. Many believe that the development of high-tech software,^video streaming capabilities, and advanced search results (much of what we get from Google) is credited to the sex..."
1 "band that was founded" "PäSH’s Biographies             1. Company’s Bio     PäSH is a musical band that was founded in the Southern district of Florida. The band was destined since 1981, but the actual planning didn’t start until 2015. Its sound derived from a Cari..."
0 "to say that I" "...lity to be taken ill and die from well known diseases we might choose to let parents decide what is the best for their children. Finally I would like to say that I believe that every parent choose the best for his/her child without any law or dictate from the government. The world and modern society is too compl..."
1 "he says that they" "...nters with a invitation to one of Jekyll's dinners. Guest takes the invitation and the letter given to Utterson by Jekyll. Comparing the handwriting, he says that they are from the same person. Utterson excuses Guess and after locks the letter in the safe, shocked that Jekyll forged it to cover up Hyde. Despite ther..."
0 "I understand that I" "...t and understand that plagiarism is a serious offence that can lead the College to commence proceedings against me for potential student misconduct. ​I understand that I have an obligation to inform the marker of any assistance I have had in the research for the composition of this assignment.   ​I have not submitted ..."
1 "I believe that this" "...ity knowing that they might not come back? Who will be selfless and put their life on the line to save those in Brazil? That being my interpretation, I believe that this article is not biased simply because the author doesn’t say anything that has my opinion on this article.    "
0 "team ensures that your" "...rease your sales while possibly decreasing the price you pay for shipping and packing.    We offer fast free shipping to all US, our logistics expert team ensures that your merchandise arrives on time and that you don't have to deal with costumes or pay them anything.  We’ve been able to help most of our clients get refu..."
1 "This meant that Betty" "...to the control systems (or they are ‘switched off’), the engine speed settings and the Schottel unit position remain as they were before the failure. This meant that Betty Cuthbert’s starboard engine remained at maximum speed with the Schottel unit vectored for maximum ahead thrust. The master received ‘speed’ and ‘stee..."
1 "which means that you" "... go back to A, you have two options. You can just cut and paste the original A section, which is kinda lame and lazy. Or, you could do an A’ section, which means that you’ve used the same basic melody but changed it up in some way.   Chapter 2: Composition Technique No. 2 Developing a Compositional Style To hell with a..."
1 "They state that Equality" "...nt also scares many residents in this society. When Equality 7-2521 showcased his electric glass box, the World Council of Scholars retreats from it. They state that Equality 7-2521 has committed many transgressions by creating this box, and immediately refuse his invention. In the story, the absence of technology proves t..."
1 "out that it would" "...e it would be like there no advantage to this major unlike the other ones plus it had a danger sign written all over it so i picked i would soon find out that it would be one of the best  of my new life the sidf said that i will be turned into a 10 year old child and sent to school for five years the school is where..."
1 "panels that were not" "...managed the clean room envelope for proper installation. I performed daily hands on inspection of all sealed joints. I marked areas of the clean room panels that were not properly  and worked with the Chinese’s mechanical contractor to fix. I did an inspection of the Carrier air handlers to be delivered for the job. Af..."
0 "to recognise that they" "...quire more out of them as a result of the changing work environment (Lent, 2013:5 ). To meet the expectations of employers and employees, people need to recognise that they need to take their careers into their hands and make career choices their responsibility (Baruch 2004:61). In this mini-dissertation, the career path..."
1 "he believes that a" "...e Mrs Linde a job. Torvald concerns himself  about women’s proper role in society. He assumes she is widow; that's why she is looking for employment, he believes that a proper married women should not work outside the home. Torvald shows content knowing his home is fit to society and what he believes to be proper. He..."
1 "was noted that many" "...at various levels of competition. 14 students said that they currently or previously coach netball. 7 students indicated that they teach swimming. It was noted that many of the students instruct swimming, dance and gym/personal trainer that they do this as employment.             Sport Participation   Figure 3     Foo..."
1 "loyalty that is seen" "...onents, which are liking, yearning and decision/ commitment. (S. Schlobohm et al.2016). They argue that meeting all three requirements leads to brand loyalty that is seen as the equivalent of Sternberg’s complete love.            Brands are a complex mixture of functional benefits and emotional connections, but they ar..."
1 "results show that a" "...ffect he has had on the results in schools in remote areas Australia.  Looking at statistics such as, school attendance teacher feedback and academic results show that a positive effect has occurred after staff  were educated within the parameters set out by the stronger smarter  Institute As they said the culture of ..."
1 "irony is that Goober" "...nd of course accepting the invitation. “The objective of the Vigils is to create their own order by making everything and everyone else collapse. The irony is that Goober caused this collapse.”  Chapter 6 Reveals a new source of evil which is Brother Leon. Him and Archie both share the same psychological warfare and co..."
0 "and that was good" "...as, thoughts, and musical constructs that I found fulfilling. Who cared what anyone else thought? I was writing the music that I felt a pull towards, and that was good enough for me. Ultimately, relying upon emotional constructs as your basis for writing is not a suitable long-term strategy. It borders on pathologic..."
1 "Victor believes that the" "...s, the first I had shed for many months, streamed from my eyes, and I resolved not to fall before my enemy without a bitter struggle” (Shelley,216).  Victor believes that the monster’s revenge will never end he will just keep coming and coming. He thinks of killing himself right now but he imagines that Elizabeth would be ..."
1 "liquid that is capable" "...suggestions, answer questions and showcase a shop’s products to customers  What is CO2 extraction? When high pressure is applied to CO2, it becomes a liquid that is capable of working as a solvent, stripping away cannabinoids and essential oils from plant material.  What is THC? Tetrahydrocannabinol (THC) is the main can..."
1 "ways that is what" "...the other will always pick up the slack in that quality.   When it comes to my best friend, Lyla, and I we share about 50% of our qualities.  In some ways that is what makes us friends. Gene and Phineas; however, share some qualities, but their differences keep them together.       The boys' view of the world could ..."
1 "I believe that I" "...tly scored 6.98 out of 10. However, I am of the opinion that theoretical work alone is of little use unless it is accompanied by practical knowledge. I believe that I would be a suitable applicant for research work in the college since I’ve always been inclined towards practical tasks and the everlasting quest to l..."
1 "stating that it’" "...MO labels. They say GMOs  do lead us to health problems as well it can cause  mammals to have severe  health complications. They demand transparency, stating that it’s  necessary to allow the consumers to be informed on  what’s  in their foods, and grant them the right to chose whether or not they will eat GMOs. Th..."
"“Is That a" "..., 103). Ultimately the reader can assume that Foster believes violence acts as a bigger symbol and adds more to a story than weather. Chapter Twelve: “Is That a Symbol?”         " 0
0 "Buddhists believe that Buddha" "...’ lives. Because of the life is given by the god. So, only god has the right to take it away. In Taiwan, the mainstream of religion is Buddhism, most Buddhists believe that Buddha will help everyone^when people have any problem on the way of live. They think euthanasia is a kind of suicide and it is a selfish behavior. In most ..."
0 "obstacle that is hard" "... caused. A big part of being proactive is to encourage yourself to be an even greater person than yesterday. This habit can also be used to handle an obstacle that is hard  to overcome. A good way to be proactive  is to use those baby steps that are provided at the end of each chapter to help you apply that habit faster..."
"Think that when" "...k that they are never going to win, but that's not true one thing that my father told is that if i put my mind towards something I can accomplish it. Think that when ever you doubt yourself. " 1
1 "respondents said that they" "...t 28 44   Total   Have not Coached/Instructed any Physical Activity 23   Have Coached/Instructed any Physical Activity 49     A significant number of respondents said that they had previously or^currently coach a competitive sporting activity, with 42 people saying that they had. While 30 respondents said that they haven’t h..."
0 "never failed that during" "...they could handle, such as the narrator describes in these following passages: “Some families would sell out for nearly nothing and move away. And it never failed that during the dry years the people forgot about the rich years, and during the wet years they lost all memory of the dry years” (5-6). “It wasn’t very long unt..."
"I believe that I" "...tting 4.0 all year. I have a positive feeling about Mrs. Rueger that she will definitely help me improve a great deal in writing this year. Over all, I believe that I will have a " 1
0 "to believe that the" "...fic or assist in the trafficking of a firearm, making it unlawful to deliver or receive two or more firearms where the individual knows or has reason to believe that the firearms are being, or will be, used in^a felony” (Lofstrom, 2015, Page 118). As part of the Brady Bill if the legislation can address gun traffickin..."
1 "problem is that this" "...applications, software and hardware being developed, it opens the door, on a global scale, for the sharing of information and communication. The only problem is that this new technology also allows criminals to gather and become more structured globally as well as use it to victimize unsuspecting women and children, al..."
1 "I noticed that they" "...re Channel 4 and Channel 7. I tried to put my personal bias aside and tried to watch the two news shows with a neutral view. When watching Channel 4, I noticed that they started off with two breaking news stories (after the weather forecast), one being a sad story about a shooting in an apartment and the other being a..."
1 "also saw that they" "...staircase leading down stair to something when they went down they saw everything that picture they took and action that they did is on a board! They also saw that they were part of a project called project Osiris and they found out that there parents are not there parents Eli's dad is a scientist that made it and it..."
0 "This means that you" "...ite self wants you to remember it, it must be a pivotal point for some reason to use in your life for the meaning or communication it can offer you.” This means that you accualy are in another parrele universe and can connect futre pass lives.  "
0 "one that is easy" "...t and consequent phrase. I'm going to demonstrate a simple binary form using “Twinkle Twinkle Little Star.” This composition is a familiar melody and one that is easy to understand. Antecedent Phrase The melody below is only part of a period. It is the part of the period known as an antecedent. The antecedent shoul..."
1 "to note that the" "... includes optimal resource allocation and supports high levels of student success.  (may need to be reworded)  Note:  Perhaps semantics but important to note that the DSS can provide data that is used to inform integrated planning and/or determine optimal resource allocation but the actual determination of optimal ..."
0 "Kika ensures that your" "... other key stakeholders. You cannot afford to present an unprofessional or inconsistent image in a competitive and crowded landscape. Partnering with Kika ensures that your organizational image achieves maximum positive impact on your target audiences. We understand how to create or revitalize an organization’s visual id..."
1 "members that were able" "...ht a concern, ask a question, or just chat about “anything”  That said, under “Leading the People” area, I was somehow unable to “connect” with those members that were able to communicate with those they performed the mission on a day-to-day basis.  This breakdown definitely hindered the full effectiveness and ultimate p..."
1 "those that it is" "...role. A person’s voice is a powerful instrument. Where if used correctly with enthusiasm and the appropriate use of body language, can really capture those that it is intended for on the receiving end. Regardless of the fact if it is a kaikaranga or kaikorero being conducted. Ensure to have good preparation along w..."
1 "character that was also" "...gossip. In society today men and women infidelity and cheating is more and predictable from man and woman.  ​Both Chekhov and Oates also have another character that was also mention in their stories, and it was played by the pet dog. The dog was what helps Anna to be recognize by Gurvo in their first meeting. The white Po..."
0 "with that is not" "...t it is going to be hard to integrate them into our school systems. The school system must change into something more innovative and new. The problem with that is not everyone learns the same way. The iPad is a tool for the educator to use you can’t just hand the kids an iPad and expect them to learn by themselves...."
0 "has determined that the" "...deral government can seize and seek civil forfeiture of real or personal property used to facilitate cannabis production and processing.  US congress has determined that the “illegal distribution and sale of marijuana is a serious crime that provides a significant source of revenue to large-scale criminal enterprises, gan..."
0 "be reminded that our" "...ing to listen” to Clinton’s pleas.  Speaking of influential families and politics, don't think that Caitlyn falls behind in bloodline. If you need to be reminded that our girl reigns from the millinery answer to royalty, the greatest American, Albanian born dynasty of Calabasas, The Kardashians then you have been livin..."
0 "suggested that it was" "...e India Office was outraged that the paper would favourably compare these two incidents and present them as “worthy of emulation.” Indeed, the Office suggested that it was engaging in “indirect incitement to further acts of assassination” (IPI to Mr. Silver 27 June 1940, IOR/L/PJ/12/758). Later, in the September 1940 is..."
0 "bag that is placed" "...r that fits me its amazing but its seems to me there seems to be folks that make strollers and baby stuff for adults even. Cassie takes with a diaper bag that is placed in the storage place in my stroller since my siblings takes with them a diaper bag in case I need to get my diapers changed during the ride outside. ..."
1 "This means that the" "...ubstandard housing indicative of an area “on the wrong side of the tracks.” This is where anthropologists would expect us to find the house of Rahab. This means that the picture not only shows the wall that had fallen, but the area of the city in which Rahab would have lived. What an interesting way to bring this stor..."
1 "Jammes  found that (" "...improved but  need additional medical therapy,  was seen in 4 patients (97%), and poor response to surgery was poor in 1 patient (2%) (8). Similarly, Jammes  found that (95%) of the patients in his study considered the outcome to be excellent or good (5). On other hand, Abbas E study showed that complete symptoms resol..."
1 "hypocrisy that is created" "...duce the amount of criminalisation within society however it still creates issues that affect the small minority groups.  With this there is a social hypocrisy that is created that stigmatises these small minority groups and allows for certain law violations within classes of people.      Marijuana and Legal Change vs Illic..."
"bacteria that is genetically" "...hat have successfully taken the DNA fragments. Each bacteria cell than produces insulin and large amount of insulin can be collected by culturing the bacteria that is genetically modified." 1
1 "situations that were stressing" "...n. I first asked her if there were any stessors in her life. At first she didn’t understand my question so I rephrased it and asked her if there were situations that were stressing her. She^immediately replied and said of course, I have the stress of finding a job, not having enough social time with my friends and a weight on my..."
1 "Draco argued that his" "...d to join the ranks of his fallen comrades that have gone up against Draco. This part of the river has always been considered Nari territory but when Draco argued that his kind had been here longer and he deserved the Depths. Anyone that thought otherwise ended up in fractions of what they once were. Tag moved his gaze ..."
0 ", that was a" "...It’s an Academy thing, just roll with it,” he said with a smile.   “Who’s going to stay with her tonight,” Kota asked, and every hand shot up.   “Okay, that was a stupid question, wasn’t it? Sang, how about you choose,” Kota said as everyone turned to look at me.   ‘Way to put a girl on the spot…’   “Mr. Lee an..."
1 "I found that Tom" "... read the story I tried to really take in the character’s personalities and think about who they are and how they were like mockingbirds.             I found that Tom Robinson, Jean Louise “Scout” Finch, and Arthur “Boo” Radley were the three mockingbirds for me. As the novel progressed, I recognized that a mocking..."
1 "but that was not" "... the role of the federal government was considered inevitable because it could not have been stopped. The way to avoid the war was to abolish slavery but that was not going to happen. The South needed the slaves and it became a crucial part of their society. Another way the war could have been avoided was if the No..."
0 "topic that is going" "... Response' intervention | Australian Human Rights Commission,\" n.d.). My view going into week 11 was with an open mind “I do not know a lot about the topic that is going to be spoken on today, the only thing I have heard was that certain areas in the Northern Territory were alcohol free zones.” (Week 11, Reflective Jo..."
1 "attribute that is important" "...omes to any home delivery service; Pizza USA should devise an order and delivery system that will ensure that customer orders remain correct. Another attribute that is important to me involves the quality of employees that will be representing and delivering the product to customers. I value high quality employees that go abo..."
0 "indicates that" "...ted to the presence of these favourable health occurrences.  The fact that illness and most diseases do not completely destroy health and well-being, indicates that there is more to it than the simplicity of it being present or absent.  Disease only hinders a health status and it is another determinant that can n..."
0 "result found that there" "...ysis the causality relationship between export and KLCI (Kuala Lumpur Composite Index) . Data period during from January 1996 to September 2013. They result found that there are is no significant （positive）.  Samontaray, et, al, (2014) studied the relationship between the Saudi export and Saudi stock market ,The data peri..."
1 "color that is seen" "...h a process that involves extracting the enzymes from the grain and utilizing it within the brew. During the process, a heating occurs that gives the color that is seen in beer today. The longer the barley heats the darker the color. Porters and stouts can obtain hints of chocolate or coffee and this is because of th..."
1 "investigation reports that emotions" "... Malin Danielsson, 2012, PP. 23).             Schouten and McAlexander (1995) found out that people can get emotional with brands. Earlier scientific investigation reports that emotions like love characterize consumers ‘feelings towards special consumption objects (Kleine and Kernan, 1989). Ahuvia (2005) also addresses love in consum..."
1 "they felt that they" "... also affects the individual’s level of happiness. For instance, more respondents from the Democratic party felt happier than the Republicans because they felt that they were more connected than others.  Question 3: The physiological and psychological processes Used in the study of empathy.  According to Lieberman and..."
1 "shadow that is casted" "... from her chair and walked out the door. No goodbye. No letter. She left like he did her.      “The Goodbye”  My ghostly father awaits in the gloomed shadow that is casted by the tree branches above. I walk through a field of silent bodies, but with screaming souls yearning to return to past lovers and unforgotten famil..."
0 "cloth diaper that she" "...arrie tells her, and  begins the diapering of Abbie. Now I am laying on the changing pad naked, and Carrie ask me to lift up my feet. She finds a new cloth diaper that she slide underneath my bum and she folds and fasten the cloth diaper. She puts a yellow diaper cover over my red diaper and I gets put on a pair of red ..."
1 "errors that were done" "...with this illusion but there will be a slight sensation in the process. I learned that the sight plays a part on what we feel on our bodies. Possible errors that were done was miscalibrated both halves of the body and miscalculation of results."
1 "same guys that Erica" "...ke those kinds of guys. The ones that would knock the books out of the one mentally challenged kid at our school. That was just wrong. Those were the same guys that Erica hung out with, and I wanted no part of their evil little clique. I did not know what to do about Mikael. We were skipping class and running off toget..."
0 "Castiel knows that his" "...ules and boundaries for Castiel to follow even in their younger days, though not without his reasons. It’s only the two of them, always has been, and Castiel knows that his brother takes looking after him as his highest responsibility.  He just wishes Michael would stop treating him like a child, especially as his birthd..."
1 "I realize that my" "...uccess of the students in classrooms where engagement is a priority.”  “Has made me more reflective and willing to try a few new things with tech.”  “I realize that my teaching practices need to be varied and adjusted according to the students in my class. Using many different teaching strategies is necessary. Good ..."
1 "unit that was validated" "... accomplished was better than just told “just do it”.  Additionally, Process improvement and resource utilization was a constant drum beat within the unit that was validated by my Quality Assurance Section.  The section was effective for me to fully implement my Commander’s inspection program to ensure I kept the pulse of..."
1 "anything that is not" "... Headstrong. Foolhardy. Unthinking boldness, wild carelessness and disregard for consequences. Perfectionist - A propensity for being displeased with anything that is not perfect or does not meet extremely high standards.   Character's soft spot: Humans?        Is this soft spot obvious to others? Yes? No?... Idk yet  ..."
0 "amount that is estimated" "... sexual exploitation “ is a multi-billion dollar business. In the US alone, it is estimated to amount to over 27 billion dollars per year.This is the amount that is estimated by the standard fees of a prostitute, assuming each forced sex worker had 3 or 4 engagements per day. Yet, most sex trafficking goes unreported becau..."
1 "mistake that it can" "...eps required to reterfly it completely changed the outcome. In future situations I need to look at all possible outcomes and not assume when I make a mistake that it can not be fixed, I need to force myself to own up to it and take all reasonable steps to fix it.      Q2) Choose ONE of the topics from tutorial this we..."
"now confirm that this" "...h and they won't stand for these inhumane acts? Will anyone do anything about it or will be let this issue grow until it will swallow us whole? I can now confirm that this article is unbiased bec" 1
1 ") states that “" "...icy makers and researchers to promote the importance of early interventions, diagnosis and such measures to the public population. (Welte et al., 2015) states that “the earlier the intervention, the grater the impact^on lung function”. Until recently, It was believed that targeting COPD at early stage was a pointl..."
0 "industry that is developing" "OEM Diagnostic Services will be joining a segment of the automotive repair industry that is developing quickly, mobile diagnostic services that specialize in Advanced driver-assist systems (ADAS). Recent legislation is requiring that all automakers nee..."
1 "means that" "...periencing peer pressure. If you allow people to step on you, then you probably have a lot of insecurities about your self-image. To think lose-lose, means that “if I’m going down, you are coming down with me.” This normally occurs when you are so worried about what other people do and think, you don't focus ..."
1 "I hope that you" "...solicit an opportunity to learn and contribute to my area of work by attaining masters in the field of Software engineering at your esteemed College. I hope that you will find in me a deserving and creditable student for your renowned College. I express my heartfelt gratitude for taking interest in my statement of..."
0 "indication that it would" "Analysis of President Roosevelt’s Letter to the Emperor of Japan The events before the U.S. entered the Second World War gave an indication that it would eventually enter into war and an attack on the members of the AXIS. Fundamentally, the U.S. had for a long time withheld its troops and looked for mo..."
1 "then decide that there" "...nd weaknesses and ways to make the melody better. For example, with our initial theme, let’s say you develop this little eight measure piece, and you then decide that there is something you don’t like about it. After analyzing the composition, you realize that you’re mostly repeating the melody verbatim in both sections,..."
1 "I feel that the" "...ssness throughout their poems. All three poems give the reader an image of how a homeless individual lives, facing the hardships they are faced with. I feel that the purpose of the poems is to give the reader a saddening and emotional approach, as the topic of homelessness can be very confronting.     "
1 "ve found that it" "...ppens, go back to these melodies and consider writing a piece based on them.  These themes are calling to you, and they are begging to be composed. I’ve found that it’s the melodies that you can’t shake that are the ones you should go back to and work out. There is one particular piece I wrote over a decade ago tha..."
1 "and that was there" "...nned to go when they have there serenity day firework go off like the Fourth of July here. They figured out that one plastic work car had a satellite and that was there way out. Fireworks go off and they are to they break the satellite and the break are broken and they all fall out of the car at different times and t..."
1 "younger officers that the" "... them and inspire them so they will not believe that I micro manage them. The other area that I need to improve upon is my mentoring capacity for the younger officers that the Air Force entrusts to me.  Within the last two years, the Air Force is sending brand new second lieutenants overseas to fill positions that more seas..."
1 "they discover that the" "... this time Nubia persuades the dogs into a little game of fetch. The three of them find all the dogs ever wanted to do was play.When they return home they discover that the wealthy merchant that lives across the street hid all his money in Flavia’s pantry.Flavia is very concerned that someone will steal it so she decides..."
0 "father that was disturbing" "...ve pastor at another church for about a year, and my job was extremely busy. I also had just started school and just had find a lot of thing about my father that was disturbing. Apparently, I was dealing with a lot at one end and did not know have to deal with my frustration, so I took it out on my wife. What my pastor told ..."
0 "decisions that were fair" "...s - Guiding Questions: Ask children for examples of times when they made decisions with friends, family members, or classmates. Ask: How did you make decisions that were fair? (Possible answers: We voted. We took turns. We talked about it.)  Background Knowledge Activation: Remind children of the discussion they had about ..."
1 "follow up that the" "...selling. One to one advertising with both sale precise targeting and also this is reliant on personal contact and marketing team efforts. Salespeople follow up that the product standards on time delivers are met and the buyer is satisfied not to create any legal implications.   4.3:  Show how and why international ma..."
1 "calories amount that a" "...eighs less requires fewer calories daily for maintenance reasons.   There are also different things that become vital factors while deciding the best calories amount that a Shih Tzu needs daily. For example, the age of the dog (a younger, growing Shih Tzu dog require a lot of calories compared to an adult Shih Tzu dog), ..."
1 "odds are that your" "...sense of your current technology situation. Fears about the cloud are sometimes based on a utopian vision of an organization's current situation. The odds are that your security isn't perfect, you don't have 100 percent systems uptime, and you may not have staff resources dedicated to IT management. In the cloud, sec..."
1 "so that it can" "... of my effort to prove my seriousness of wanting to better myself and attending Stanford in the future. Be able to score a 4 or better on my AP exams so that it can go to my college credit. Lastly, keep up my organization with my binder and not get lazy with it use my planner everyday writing down each and every ..."
0 "not that it won" "...coming a red giant) from being unknown to history. I guess I was feeling sad because I want life to amount to something but it seems more likely than not that it won’t. This should be a relief, I don’t have anything to prove or try to impress others. Although, evolution by natural selection have probably programme..."
1 "to acknowledge that I" "...te and the troops see him/her in the office then it could send mixed signals that the boss wants his troops to stay.  Consequently, I make it a point to acknowledge that I work late into the evening, but that I expect my troops to make every effort to leave at a reasonable time each day.  Additionally, I try never give ..."
"law is that some" "Another reason conscience is more important than law is that some laws are not fair, but are still accepted in society. For example, back in the 1800's, it was illegal to free slaves. But Harriet Tubman's conscience..." 0
1 "and say that I" "Grace Capeless    Hello. My name is Grace Capeless and to start off I would like to thank you all for coming and say that I am so glad to be able to be apart of this great ceremony today. Today we will be honoring a^very brave man named Ben Kamm who survived during the Hol..."
0 "would indicate that He" "...00 years of exile, under relentless persecution, became a nation again on 14 May 1948 the 'fig tree' put forth its first leaves. Jesus said that this would indicate that He was 'at the door,' ready to return.' ~ Mat 24:32 KJV Now learn a parable of the fig tree; When his branch is yet tender, and putteth forth leaves, ye..."
0 "is shown that every" "...s told.  The novel focuses on the conflict between the rules of civilization and the instincts of wickedness that reside in each and every person. It is shown that every person is capable of evil, and once taken from civilization, a person can only last so long before their rules start to fade away.This conflict is de..."
0 "figure shown that The" "...g.  The nominal effective exchange rate index also Steady rise.  Figure 2.2 is china after reform Shanghai Stock Exchange Composite Index  trend, the figure shown that The stock market index of the RMB exchange rate fluctuations make a better response. The index form July 2005.The index was rise all the way from the beg..."
0 "content that is familiar" "...sed in the lesson.  The teacher has a very approachable manner that helps ease the learners into engaging with the lessons content. By beginning with content that is familiar the teacher opens up the lesson to the prospect of developing their understanding and building upon known concepts. In this way, the teacher allows t..."
1 "have thought that the" "... young girl out of her thoughts. The said female turns to her side to find a blonde with deep blue eyes. If it wasn’t for the girl’s face, Hope would have thought that the blonde is a foreigner. She is tall, around 5’4 ft. The girl is wearing a grey skirt, a white dress shirt, and tie, but instead of a grey jacket, she ..."
1 "Panel agrees that the" "...cial statements.    4. Standard Formula for Calculating Demand (Annually Recalculated). Though many charter schools maintain waitlists, the Consensus Panel agrees that the length of a school’s waitlist alone may not necessarily be a valid or informative calculation of demand for the school, because of differences in enr..." 0
0 "I learned that adolescents" "...been thinking in my own way and have had serious problems with my family (Jerlay). I told her that I asked this question because through my research, I learned that adolescents don’t only deal with daily stressors but also experience a rapid change in cognitive, emotional and physical appearance. I ended the interview by tha..."
1 "life that is meaningful" "...u are going to pick yourself up and rebuild everything you once had. I mean look at the bright side of this situation you have the freedom to build a life that is meaningful to you away from your past .I also glanced at your phone last night when you were sifting through your emails and it seems that you have an eviction ..."
0 "they say that they" "...American Family Association, Tim Wildmon, has said that, following ‘Target’s logic’, a twenty year old should be able to get a ‘seniors’ discount’ if they say that they ‘self-identify’ as a sixty-five year old. This demonstrates some of the ignorance that the opposition to this policy have surrounding transgender peo..."
1 "also tell that Nikolai" "...g to.”  I didn’t turn around to look at him. I was so angry with the rest of the boys, that I was afraid to accidentally take it out on Luke. I could also tell that Nikolai was growing uncomfortable with this turn of events. He had his fists clenched and he was piercing Luke with a glare, so I gave a quick response, hopi..."
0 "believed that" "...st way to live was to follow the natural order of things. While Confucianism stressed some government involvement, Daoism and its leader, Master Lao, believed that the best government was one who did not govern. What mattered was spontaneity, non-interference, and acceptance of the world, rather than attempting ..."
1 "argument is that more" "...believe it did get slightly worse when the coalition government came in with many silly changes and a purposeful underfunding of the NHS. The counter argument is that more is spent now than 20 years ago but that's a basic argument because these days things cost more and more people use the NHS because of various issues ..."
0 "students that were struggling" "...students. Issues arose for teachers concerning additional needs education as it affected their salaries negatively, and provided no incentive to help students that were struggling or advanced as the key was mass progression. As for the students they, as a whole, would have been neglected and not experienced the proper education..."
0 "now discovered that China" "... rivers with strong current would reduce. Although the concept of windmills sprung from Bury St. Edmunds and traveled across most of Europe, scholars now discovered that China had been utilizing wind power as early as 2000 years prior. And they used it to both pump water and grind grains. Wheat fields grew as the world's po..."
0 "she believes that the" "... Exceptional Student Education (ESE) certified teacher at Madison County Central School and has been teaching for 9 years. As an experienced teacher, she believes that the shorter work week should not be implemented because students would lose a provided breakfast and lunch in public schools. As a single parent and a fu..."
1 "fully believe  that Saudi" "...e and younger, but change can only occur when the government sees that the unbalance of rights given to women needs to be fixed. With that in mind, I fully believe  that Saudi Arabia and other countries who limit women to participate should be banned from the Rio Olympic Games until great change is seen. I also believe that..."
0 "book is that to" "...istance between being taken and being missed, lives are changed” (Albom 28).  An important concept that Eddie doesn’t understand until the end of the book is that to move on, you must forgive. His entire life has been haunted by unsettled business that he has been avoiding. Examples include his relations with his ..."
0 "us think that they" "... those who tell us that they do not believe in the existence of God simply because no one has ever seen such a Being. In other words, they would have us think that they believe in only that which they have the ability to see. However, human experience daily teaches us that we actually believe a great many things whic..."
0 "Cross understood that Love" "...he never mentioned the war, except to say, Jimmy, take care of yourself. The letters weighed 10 ounces. They were signed Love, Martha, but Lieutenant Cross understood that Love was only a way of signing and did not mean what he sometimes pretended it meant. At dusk, he would carefully return the letters to his rucksack. Slow..."
1 "being told that your" "...for work as scheduled without notifying your supervisor. You will also be considered to have voluntarily resigned if you fail to return to work after being told that your absence is not authorized or if you do not return after a leave of absence as scheduled.   Involuntary Discharge A discharge is an involuntary separa..."
1 "will learn that he" "...rom retreating when he is depressed.  Objective 2B:  Tony will learn that people can care about him no matter what mood he is in.  Objective 3B: Tony will learn that he can continue to function and be in the world even when depressed and that he has something to offer the world at all times.   Progress towards goal: ..."
0 "softly that it’" "... again. “Shh,” into my hair. Lew steps back and lets go, but he tips my chin up with his hand so that I have to look at him. “Don’t cry,” he says, so softly that it’s just barely above a whisper.   \tSo here we are, just standing in this little cobblestone alley, looking at each other when he starts to lean down to..."
1 "I predict that it" "...97 million of total transactions. However,  because it is a prediction, the range should be between 5479 million and  6731 million.    And in Sep2015 I predict that it should rise to 6166 million of total transactions. However,   because it is a prediction, the range should be between 5519 million and 6847 million. ..."
1 "research is that the" "...e what they advocate for. This is attributable to mental stress that makes them change their behaviors accordingly. One fundamental assumption of the research is that the difference was due to hypocrisy paradigm. Confounder variables were checked by use of a control group (Stone, Aronson, Crain, Winslow & Fried, 1994)...."
0 "people believed that the" "...es Darwin did some research on his son and observed a delay in motor skills, learning skills and developmental growth (Royston, 2009).   In the past, people believed that the mother was responsible for Down syndrome (Royston, 2009). Any kind of sinful thoughts, alcohol or drug abuse or maybe her incompetent reproductive sy..."
0 "having confessed that strangers" "...LT In faith died all these, not having received the promises, but from afar having seen them, and having been persuaded, and having saluted them, and having confessed that strangers and sojourners they are upon the earth.  'In faith died all these' The Scriptures do not actually state that Enoch was translated alive to Heaven, ac..."
1 "reader discovers that the" "...may think for himself would prove to be a disadvantage. This means all the citizens are brainwashed to believe whatever they are told to be true. The reader discovers that the function of the society in Anthem is a collection of men and women believing they are all equal and one people. "
0 ") suggested that the" "...bing and poorly maintained services as well as lack of clean and decent water )in Nigeria  (Fotso, 2007) (Onwujekwe et al. 2012).   Ngure et al. (2014) suggested that the climatic condition as well as the geographical location of an area often plays an important role in the sanitation condition of a child. This was als..."
0 "author contends that ‘" "...on exists between what we recall individually or in a group, and what can be accessed via the internet to expand that memory or information base. The author contends that ‘There’s nothing wrong, after all, with having our minds expanded’ and that ‘No- body remembers everything’ (Wegner, 2012).     The author (Wegner, 201..."
0 "may indicate that initially" "...itation training it not only buffers self-reported psychological stress reactivity, but it also increases cortisol reactivity to stress. This pattern may indicate that initially brief mindfulness meditation training fosters greater active coping efforts, resulting in reduced psychological stress appraisals and greater cortiso..."
0 "Christou asserts that because" "...n the developing world. Finally, proponents argue that GMOs are economically sustainable and help developing countries secure future economic growth. Christou asserts that because GM crops provide higher yields with fewer inputs, farmers, particularly in developing countries are able to make profits through surplus production. ..."
1 "is that it leads" "...hese events, schools are teaching those students to be narrow-minded about the future and the past. Another consequence of teaching history this way, is that it leads children to misunderstand their past and have an overly simplistic mind. James Loewen writes about his experience teaching history: “But when I ask m..."
1 "I feel that Coehlo" "...ss is when Santiago asked the merchant to built a display case for the crystal. Even though it was a risky decision, it payed off in the end. So, now I feel that Coehlo used crystal to symbolize that there are many different types of crystals yet they are all delicate. Just like Personal Legends, everyone has a uniqu..."
1 "I understood that Trinity" "... was active not only in the famous gay club called The George and in the numerous gay and lesbian nights for students widespread during the week, but I understood that Trinity College, as well as most of the principal Dublin universities, had a very strong LGBT community, in fact the Queer society has always organized a lot..."
0 "irony that is slightly" "...cause it was the commandment he broke. When he forgets however, Elizabeth emphasis this irony by “delicately” saying “Adultery, John”. It is dramatic irony that is slightly humorous to the reader due to how they still haven’t resolved their conflicts (67).  Act 2 #28 The poppet is a symbol of Abigail’s control of society..."
0 "would think that I" "...ends’ or my future.’  “If it’s about Sang, then it would be worth the pain if I can possibly help prevent it,” I glared at him, getting angry that he would think that I would abandon or not risk myself for any one of my team members, even if they seemed to be okay with abandoning me.  “Fuck off, Gabriel,” he growled,..."
1 "I realized that there" "...time butt sometimes I will still  ashamed. it was when I stop thinking about what everyone else has to say about me or what I thought of myself, that I realized that there was nothing wrong with me that's just what I came to believe because I felt that I was different but I really wasn't and now I know but I'm just same..."
1 "society that was too" "...s, the rejection of European culture for having become too corrupt, complacent and lethargic, ailing because it was bound by the artificialities of a society that was too preoccupied with image and too scared of change. ’’ This new emerging culture destroy tradition and authority and have a huge impact in transforming ..."
1 "do expect that you" "...liarize employees regarding their privileges, responsibilities and other important information. IT IS NOT A CONTRACT or a legal document. However, we do expect that you will read, understand and follow the provisions of this handbook.   It is obviously not possible to anticipate every situation that may arise in the ..."
1 "fact that it has" "Plagiarism is an issue that is prevalent in Tertiary institutions and the workplace, avoiding the fact that it has become an issue in our society will not lessen the impacts of plagiarising students, consequently it must be dealt with. The definition of plagiarism..."
1 "the bugs that I" "...p on the bottom of the screen. Luckily, the company we were working with was able to provide me with a template file for the mobile site. I fixed all the bugs that I could find in the template and worked with a developer from the other company to solve the others.  About a month after the newly branded desktop sit..."
1 "coalition that is conducting" "...orces and their failure to share intelligence.There is little prospect that the terrorism threat in France, which is a prominent member of the US-led coalition that is conducting airstrikes against IS in Iraq and Syria, will fall any time soon.   IS and Al-Qaeda have made frequent threats against the West, including France, an..."
1 "they believe that if" "...n buy everything else then it can easily buy happiness also.   Can money really buy happiness? Some individuals seem to think so, as for most people, they believe that if you have a lot of money then you can buy happiness. The thing is, it depend, For instance, if you have been poor your whole life then becoming rich w..."
0 "think that" "... can breathe is your love.  Then sooner or later it's over, I just don't wanna miss you tonight.  And I don't want the world to see me, cause I don't think that they'd understand.  when everything's meant to be broken, I just want you to know who I am.\"                     I stare at the ceiling feeling the f..."
1 "used is that anti-trafficking" "...gainst Transnational Organized Crime and continuously reproduced. After this rationale for anti-trafficking efforts, the next justification typically used is that anti-trafficking efforts must be undertaken even though research is difficult and offers little evidence of the problem. The fact that victims are in a state of total..."
1 "have thought that ol" "... lose Palaven and I am the closest thing to a Reaper expert, so….. I’m advising” a small chuckle escaped Garrus when he said the advising. “Who would have thought that ol’ Garrus would  be an advisor.  Shepard introduces Vega to Garus and quickly explained how they know eachother. After the introduction Garus told them..."
1 "Sharon is that she" "...lood. This is an objective article to educate the public on the pros and cons of bloodless surgery verses blood transfusions. A positive factor about Sharon is that she really covers her research by really understanding the medical background and history of blood. She has a lot of sources that she uses and makes sure..."
1 "options that it felt" "...ng the summer before my senior year of high school. I have always been passionate about healthcare and service to others; however, there were so many options that it felt almost overwhelming with the options to choose from. After a long summer of debating with myself where I would apply to go to school, what I would ma..."
1 "That means that she" "...t shapes the dunes. And, if I have to, I will accept the fact that he has become a part of the clouds, and the animals, and the water of the desert.\" That means that she wants Santiago to do whatever he wants to do and in that time is he so dies, then Fatima will accept that he's become a part of he beauty earth.  14...."
1 "to assume that Sonia" "...ist school that she loves. She has a package of care from the local authority that includes respite. From the description in the scenario, it is fair to assume that Sonia’s care plan implies that she is under a level of restriction however further information would be required to assess whether her care plan represents..."
1 "and hoped that if" "... administrative quarters connecting both the research area and The Warden’s office, and the guard quarters. Zera was making mental notes of all this, and hoped that if she got her hands on some paper she could start to make a crude diagram of the prison. She still held hope that she could escape, perhaps even make i..."
0 "Thornton notes that this" "...physique or a suntan, it cannot be done at second hand.” Such is the nature of fandom, and of subcultural capital, which Thornton delineated in 1995. Thornton notes that this form of capital extends to the media, and hence fandom, and is less bound by class distinctions than Bordieu’s conception of cultural capital. It doe..."
1 "one guy that I" "...ound to face him. \"Sorry, I'm not used to this.\" I said sheepishly. I saw the look of understanding. I had never had a serious boyfriend, and this is one guy that I seriously was thinking about considering to be more than a friend. It scared me. These exploding feelings were making me feel like I was about to go ..."
1 "wrote down that they" "...n paper was a mission too, a ‘quest for self-discovery’, a statement about ourselves and our dreams. It was not anything eventful. A couple of people wrote down that they wanted to be actors, astronauts, singers, scientists. I wrote down nothing. It was the experience after the class that makes it   "
1 "I believe that I" "...ts who are not interested in study.   Furthermore, I taught both junior and senior secondary form students in the past 4 years. With this experience, I believe that I have sharpened my skill to communicate with others as well as the skill to deliver message effectively. Accordingly, I feel confident in presentation..."
1 "I feel that I" "...esides the homework exercises you give me at each training session.  With this change in my home (daily) training confident in myself everyday. Also, I feel that I will be able to take control over my behaviors.  I am just asking if you will give me a list of exercises every so often to work on independently to ..."
1 "list that was sent" "...ucation teacher of the date and time of their students’ meeting.  We cannot have people at the CSE meeting unless their name was on the participant’s list that was sent home.  Please have draft IEPs ready two school days prior to the meeting.                                     RELATED SERVICES  Cancelled and/or miss..."
1 "and believe that they" "...ve been subjected to ‘stigma’ either due to poverty or due to moral-weakness or wrong doing early in life tend to consider poverty as inherent factor and believe that they are born to be poor. This class of individuals develop cognitive poverty syndrome. The second class are those who have either not been deprived or wh..."
1 "is proven that not" "...e most proficient,and human safe pesticide is redundant.   It is higkhly likley that nenics are not the reason for the collaps of bee colonies .as it is proven that not all countres aThere is no definitive  study proving  pesticides are the only problem, for  bee colonies collapsing. Countries are not all suffering ,..."
1 "had shown that he" "... but perfection. \t In between those days, we texted each other quite a bit. I was so nervous about the guy because I liked him so much and so far, he had shown that he was definitely different from other guys. I loved the conversations we had; they were so silly, dorky, and cheesy but overall interesting. Talking to..."
1 "Mathematics prove that I" "...n the Academic Committee of my School's Model United Nation, for example, and my orientation towards academically demanding courses like Higher Level Mathematics prove that I am not only a dynamic student but a risk-taker student who is ambitious with demanding academic challenges.   Nevertheless, its remarkable to mention..."
"big deal that the" "...y would not have noticed the glowing green stump. This would have made the mood more relaxed and not as creepy. Also if it was day, it would not be a big deal that the headlamp went out at the beginning of the story." 1
0 "HEREBY CONFIRM that I" "..._ _______________________________________________________________________ _______________________________________________________________________   I HEREBY CONFIRM that I have read and understand Bethel^University - Department of Education’s conflict of interest policy and that my responses to the above questions are c..."
0 "Davis admitted that her" "...r the place, They song, danced, and  saw Betsy's favorite movie named The Dance of Reality \". Betsy described  this idea as \"rebirth.\" However, Kelly Davis admitted that her loved sister's idea still let her feel sad,but her family and her understood and respected her sister's choice because they knew Betsy endured too mu..."
0 "and that was dictated" "...d things that happened to me because I feel this is my way of confession, when my health conditions are slowly degrading.  So my life is an open book and that was dictated to the computer.       Some of the things that happened when we first came to this country may not be to exact detail because my memory is a little f..."
1 "research indicate that there" "...rs post the Financial Crisis of 2008 and after the stabilization of the Kenyan economy following the 2007 post-election violence. The results of this research indicate that there has been a significant investment in automation with a drive to involve customers in production and cut the related costs. Also, banks were seen to b..."
1 "firmly believe that Alice" "...nt of rules for each department within the organization. Essentially, their has to be some degree of operational variation between each department. I firmly believe that Alice Thornton has come to the realization that what works in one department of the Cosmo Plastics company may not necessarily work in another department o..."
1 "had said that they" "...never believed Lennie. She thinks that he’s nuts and never going to get a ranch with George(90). Everyone that knew about their dream (besides Candy) had said that they’d seen too many guys with the same ambition that never achieved it. This didn’t bring their hopes down until Curley’s wife was killed.  \tTheir dream ..."
1 "mind that is far" "...a moment. \"Then I will have to experiment with Draco to find the best solution. We know that in the dreamscape we can wield magic. But we also need a mind that is far more secure than your own to work in. You need training to control your wild magic and test your limits, my young liege lord. Perhaps...\" he lapsed i..."
1 "I hope that Mr" "...Elizabeth does not mention this conversation when she returns, which I think was also a good move, for her mother may have become very upset over it. I hope that Mr. Darcy does not marry his cousin                       In Chapters 59, 60 and 61                       "
1 "I feel that  the" "...ld not have been as successful if we were only given one year to plan and implement this project. Because we were given support for up to three years I feel that  the learning was more authentic. It also gave teachers time try new pedagogical strategies in their class and make the required adjustments along the way..."
1 "fact that it has" "...ributes of small size and bright color must be included, as well as the activities of singing and flying. Moreover, canary must inherit from bird the fact that it has a beak and wings with feathers. In order to make all of this information available when canary is activated, it must be possible to associate canary ..."
0 "we got that archery" "... others eighth graders in there too. I leaned down and as quietly as I could, I listened to their conversation. “...Think we could rule the school if we got that archery equipment, but that stupid door is locked!  We need to find the keys for it. Do you think we should start going around and proclaiming us rulers, nob..."
1 "Given that I" "...gh in this book to me was how little we really know about the past. I was amazed by the types of textbooks that students were supposed to learn from. Given that I just transferred from another school obviously has an impact on what I take away from this book. Though there were many things that I learned from th..."
1 "someone that was too" "...or shoot a text. DUring the 1700s they didn’t have any of the fancy smancy electronics like we have today. When they wanted to communicate or talk to someone that was too far to shout to, they would use a few different things. One is smoke signals. Smoke signals are when you light a big fire to send the black smoke int..."
1 "sociology reveals that an" "..., capitalism, and offers an opportunity to appraise how the State came to being and the system of public governance that has been adopted. Historical sociology reveals that an important part of looking at the State is by examining its changes and history over a period of time. A major characterization of any State, Country ..."
0 "the best that we" "...ically able to help.  I think that all life is valuable no matter if you are rich or poor.  We were put on this planet for a reason and we need to do the best that we can to help each other out.  If the United States where a poor country would we be getting help from other rich countries?  Yes, we would be getting ..."
0 "climate that is characterized" "...nna in the northern part of West Africa? (2.5)  African Transition Zone  African Tributary Zone African Transfer Zone African Transplant Zone  12.  A climate that is characterized as \"tundra\"? (2.5)  receives less than ten inches of precipitation.\t is incapable of sustaining animal life.\t is incapable of sustaining human life.\t..."
1 "and believed that residents" "... to the resident, family and other professionals within the team. Nurses expressed their unhappiness over family interference in the decision-making, and believed that residents at EOL would benefit from  palliative approach  rather than life-prolonging interventions. Consideration were given to avoid or minimise  residents '..."
1 "environment meant that there" "... of the adult to offer a warm and nurturing environment where the child felt safe to pursue their own curiosity.  Part of offering this safe learning environment meant that there was no corporal punishment.  Students were disciplined through reflection and dialogue to better help the child understand their mistakes as a means ..."
0 "eyes that were so" "...t me a new liver,’ MacGregor said, patting his stomach, ‘and went in for a set of kidneys while I was at it.’ He gazed at Matt with those bright blue eyes that were so much like Tom’s. Matt thought he was disgusting. He couldn’t wait for the man to go home” (Farmer 126). A strong section of character development is ..."
1 "to ensure that you" "...e dogs have exceptional nutritious needs of their own that anybody, as a potential dog proprietor, ought to take into account.   It is always crucial to ensure that you weigh the hair that a dog has, and also know the amount they weigh.   Caloric needs  With regards to the caloric requirements of Shih Tzu dogs, the n..."
0 "company that is based" "...activity do coal miners perform? (5.4)  primary secondary tertiary quaternary  27.  A man who lives in India Works in a customer service center for a company that is based in the United               States.  Which development helped create this economic opportunity? (5.5)  Lower costs for international transportation A..."
0 "softly that it’" "... again. “Shh,” into my hair. Lew steps back and lets go, but he tips my chin up with his hand so that I have to look at him. “Don’t cry,” he says, so softly that it’s just barely above a whisper.   \tSo here we are, just standing in this little cobblestone alley, looking at eachother when he starts to lean down tow..."
1 "also believe that Jekyll" "... feel as if whatever is written in the letter that was given to Utterson by Jekyll is going to only drive Utterson to find Hyde more. At this point I also believe that Jekyll is going to die at some point. He is either going to die because he is so ill, or someone is going to murder him at some point. As for Hyde, I am not..."
1 "predictions that it will" "...evel of carbon dioxide and sea level in the FSM was measured to be rising by ten millimeters per year, more than three times the global average, with predictions that it will rise up to six inches from the current level by 2030. Other effects of climate change such as king tides, storm surges, and coastal flooding had cont..."
1 "claims state that GMOs" "... the ultimate increase of cost will be, which is  as important,  because last thing the US needs is to add more on world hunger. People against those claims state that GMOs have been around seen early civilization. They made a case that no one has died or gotten sick from their products. They argue that organic activist ..."
1 "also testify that John" "...can testify that John had someone post on Facebook about Kaylee and  me in a very negative way. He told her personally that he had done that. She can also testify that John is not cooperative and often refuses to talk to me.   Jennifer Howington can testify to my integrity and work ethic and devotion to taking care of my..."
1 "strongly believe that the" ".... With protests about Michel Temer are constant, they’ve gone from millions to thousands to hundreds and now with five or six people left. Opinion: I strongly believe that the International Olympic Committee shouldn’t take away the voices of the people that payed to come to their event. First off, they payed to be a guest a..."
0 "stepmother decided that ‘" "...to take me into their broken family as best as they could. It wasn’t until I had to go back to my house for my things while the boys were busy and my stepmother decided that ‘running away with a boy’ deserved me to be tied to a stool and burned by a scolding hot showerhead. This is when the boys deiced among themselves that..."
1 "category that is available" "...u are trying to choose the most suitable product category for your business. I want to stress that you should try to choose the most relevant product category that is available. It is OK if the product category does not match up exactly, choose the closest one. You can find more details about choosing category in the file I'..."
0 "And that was even" "...following and Shikamaru could pick up on that. “It’s a subtle change. For me it was like…” he hummed then looked away and smiled, “it was like life.” And that was even more confusing for the dark haired man.  Shikamaru was terrible at explaining things. Like life?? What the fuck was that supposed to mean? “Hey there..."
1 ", that was reflected" "...hed When I lightly grazed the arm, that was being reflected, with sandpaper, he had said he felt a sensation in the other hand. When I tapped his knee, that was reflected, with a hammer, the leg that wasn’t reflected had twitched slightly.  Conclusion: I believe my hypothesis was correct. The test subject had felt a se..."
1 "I felt that the" "...st beautiful. This was evidenced by Masha talking her into going as a dwarf.         \tThe costumes were well done and fitted perfectly with the play. I felt that the costumes fitted the character’s portrayed in the play. The costumes were fitted well to the actor’s. I did not get the impression that they had been ..."
0 ") indicated that 60%" "...nt the onset of the disease, even in those individuals more prone (DA 2003). A report by the National Centre for Monitoring Diabetes (NCMD) (2002, p.9) indicated that 60% of Australians over 25 were overweight or obese and 44% of Australians over 18 did not take part in reasonable amounts of physical activity, thus pla..."
1 "member that is/" "...loping knowledge, beliefs and teaching methods in the context of physical education. It’s also significant to recognise that 20 students had a family member that is/has been a teacher.   Within Curtner-Smith’s study (2001) he suggested that there was a strong correlation of PE teaching students that also coached o..."
1 "then claims that “" "... defining a quest as a story that included “a knight, a dangerous road, a Holy Grail, at least one dragon, one evil knight, one princess” (2). Foster then claims that “the real reason for a quest is always self-knowledge” (3). To support his claim, he gives examples of other well-known works such as The Crying of Lot..."
1 "doctors agree that children" "...nowned Service Professor of Psychiatry, stated that 70%- 80% of children who believe they are transgender “spontaneously lost those feelings.”11 Some doctors agree that children are too young to make this decision and others are very supportive of transgender children. Some medical professionals support early childhood gender..."
0 "After that it had" "...ilk out of it. He had been so mad, he yanked it for my hand making milk spill all over my room and my floor. It was his most cherished thing of hers. After that it had gone up on top of the cabinet to be an everlasting memory for both of us. Later I found a picture of them on their honeymoon; in the background there..."
0 "it seems that with" "... of Micro Moments With progress and change being inevitable, the only way to weather it is to embrace the opportunities it provides, and increasingly it seems that with mobile these opportunity are Micro Moments - a term Google has coined to describe our collective movement towards short-term, increasingly mobile int..."
1 "differences are that it" "...eer Principles Surround yourself with smart people, learn from them. Don’t hang out with dumb people Treat seeking a job as a Full-time job, the only differences are that it does not pay, you are all alone and no one is watching you and you don’t have to do it.  Be street smart, know stuff The wealth creation process is B..."
1 "ll find that problems" "...e used by many successful people. The brain has a tendency to concentrate on the last thing you were thinking about while awake. While you sleep, you’ll find that problems are often solved for you, and you’ll develop technique you didn’t know you had.    Chapter 9: Composition Technique No. 9 A Little More Form The prin..."
1 "I fear that you" "...e too much about what others think. \t- It's not because you're lazy, you just don't have higher ambitions in life. I fear that you're unmotivated. \t- I fear that you're not taking care of yourself, not loving yourself. \t- I fear that because you don't have higher ambitions, you feel unfulfilled in your life \t- I f..."
1 "results show that the" "...and blue. Orange had three colours as well, pink (which didn’t progress through the paper), orange and yellow. Black only had one colour, black.  The results show that the colours in pens are not necessarily made up of blue, red or yellow. Blue and black have the least amount of attraction, while pink has the most.  Not..."
1 "was informed that the" "...ions liberalization bill.  President Mori signed the FSM Telecommunications Act 2014 into law on 3 April 2014.  However, in May 2014 the FSM Congress was informed that the World Bank would no longer provide the $40 million grant for the fibre optic connectivity, due to the enactment by the FSM Government of the telecomm..."
1 "it is that you" "...t to learn. John Lennon once said that “Life is what happens to you while you're busy making other plans”. If I have learned anything from this book, it is that you just have to stop and enjoy life while you can, before it is too late."
1 "Jackson that were previously" "... materials.  In order to effectively evaluate Google Docs as a collaborative tool, it is necessary to use the evaluation features identified by Darla Jackson that were previously discussed. The first feature to evaluate is the accessibility of Google Docs.  Since Google Docs is web based, all it requires is an installed web br..."
1 "albums that were hanging" "...that surrounds a sky blue water fountain, with his family’s tombstones around as well. When she went to Loretta Lynn’s house she saw her pictures and albums that were hanging on the walls. “Loretta’s house sets so far back, so we got to ride in a wagon pulled by a tractor up to it,” she said. “There wasn’t much to see at C..."
1 "is acknowledged that the" "...ieveth (faith) was stressed by this group as the only requirement for salvation in the statement.  Baptism is optional.   Which group is correct ? It is acknowledged that the methodology and the sampling of the population with so few surveyed , one can hardly arrive at a definitive answer. But one also has to acknowledge t..."
1 "I realized that I" "...'t know here I am thinking here it goes again but then nobody noticed and I wondered why didn't they. so one day I just looked in the mirror and then I realized that I'm not different at all that  Erb's palsy is something that makes me unique. I also believe that I deserve this scholarship because I will work very h..."
1 "fashion that is consistent" "...ry of poor performance and leadership. The process of decentralization will hopefully  allow each department head to run their unique department in a fashion that is consistent with company standard while allowing Cosmo Plastics to remain productive. The new procedures set forth should adequately address any issues that have..."
1 "He wished that someday" "...o work, robots worked, and the director gave orders. But in a room at A.I.R.C. Professor Viner, a brilliant scientist was working hard on his project He wished that someday he wanted to make an army of robots. So he snuck out of work and went to his underground home. He is making a chips that he can put in his army of th..."
0 "to say that —" "...ly. I can’t read. What I want to say is I owe all the happiness of my life to you. You have been entirely patient with me and incredibly good. I want to say that — everybody knows it. If anybody could have saved me, it would have been you. Everything has gone from me, but the certainty of your goodness. I can’t ..."
0 "think that" "...ike he belonged. At the moment Naruto was sharing bread, eggs and sausages into two plates with a small smile on his face as he hummed. Sasuke didn’t think that there were many more instances where Naruto could leave him longing and wonton but here was the blonde proving him wrong yet again. “Oh hey! You star..."
0 "he says that “" "...ail has played all the cards in her favor so far, and is able to manipulate the whole society to reach John Proctor.   Act 3 #3 What Giles means when he says that “he broke charity with that woman” is that he ruined his wife’s reputation and status through saying that she read books secretly. He says this, “openl..."
1 "simply replies that Hyde" "... into the house. The servant tells Utterson that Dr. Jekyll is out. Utterson questions why Hyde has a key to the old dissecting room, and the servant simply replies that Hyde has a key and that the servants are to obey to him. Hearing this Utterson leaves in complete shock and with the thought of Hyde having cruel intentio..."
1 "qualification that is being" "...ification will be disadvantageous to you?    The following questions dealt with the following secondary research objective:  What is the most popular qualification that is being pursued by trainee and qualified CA’s?    Question 10 and 25 (completed): What was the diploma/degree/certificate you most recently completed? List a..."
1 "I believe that we" "I believe in helping out our brother and sisters in need.  I believe in helping out when those in need cant help themselves.  I believe that we should use all the resources, the connections, and everything we can to help those in need.  Thats why I support AARP.  Ive seen that they really bel..."
1 "ink that is partially" "...uct.  A few obvious indications are as follows:  The emboss letter on the case is not not of a metal foil process but rather printed with substandard ink that is partially fading already.  Real foil letter is near permanent. The “model number” is etched on the underside of the bridge.  The model numbers are NEVER printe..."
1 "just forget that the" "...ly seeking answers to why they are different but receive no access to psychiatric health but  Rather than letting these so called facts get you down, just forget that the CDC also  added to that report that those very teens are dying because 70% of the community is HIV positive.  I can't seem to find anything wronaware..."
1 "people believed that the" "...es Darwin did some research on his son and observed a delay in motor skills, learning skills and developmental growth (Royston, 2009).   In the past, people believed that the mother was responsible for Down syndrome (Royston, 2009). Any kind of sinful thoughts, alcohol or drug abuse or maybe her incompetent reproductive sy..."
1 "showed that it was" "...much more reliable food supply.  Wheat forever changed the way man lived. Genetic analysis of the wild species of Einkorn wheat (Triticum boeoticum), showed that it was first cultivated in the Fertile Crescent. It was a successful crop in early agriculture, because of its ability to thrive in dry, windswept areas wit..."
1 "strategies that were developed" "...entered Design Strategy.   The use of empathy and really understanding the client's needs and wants has become a focus of mine.  By reading the seven strategies that were developed by Hilman Curtis, I undestand just how important these skill are and how important they are to any designer.  "
1 "character that was also" "...gossip. In society today men and women infidelity and cheating is more and predictable from man and woman.  ​Both Chekhov and Oates also have another character that was also mention in their stories, and it was played by the pet dog. The dog was what helps Anna to be recognize by Gurvo in their first meeting. The white Po..."
1 "article discovered that students" "...discovered that students deem plagiarism to be trivial in comparison to other cheating behaviour. The research conducted in the Youman (2011, p. 754) article discovered that students were undeterred in behaviours even though they were explicitly aware that their assessment would be examined with plagiarism detection software. Thes..."
1 ") reveals that the" "...ce of all groups at 3, 15, 24, and 30 months of age. Results Differential expression analysis Differential expression between the treatments (Figure 1) reveals that the largest changes in differential expression with age occur between 15 months and 24 months (Figure 1 B and H) regardless of the diet (Figure 1 J). On ..."
1 "he said that this" "...ldings fountain. We go into that brick building and there is an attendant there waiting for us we walk up to the front desk and talk to the attendant he said that this is a rest stop and here's 100 bronze coins  each that is all the money you will get to start your new life your room is number 32 on the 5th floor he..."
1 "to believe that health" "...households where domestic violence is happening are also directly harmed (SafeLives, 2015) Given the statistical evidences there is sufficient reason to believe that health visitors would have encountered clients who are either victims or survivors of domestic abuse. It is therefore imperative that Health visitors undert..."
1 "This represents that he" "...e. Piggy glanced nervously into hell and cradled the conch.        I chose this section due to the fact that this expresses Piggy’s mental attribute. This represents that he is anti social but at times could show that he could try to be independent although not entirely exerting it. This is important because it shows grow..."
1 "not believe that I" "...the expectation was missed, how to improve, and then use it as a teaching and mentoring moment...this will empower them and inspire them so they will not believe that I micro manage them. The other area that I need to improve upon is my mentoring capacity for the younger officers that the Air Force entrusts to me.  W..."
1 "expression that is written" "...trix of vocabulary\" (\"vocabulary matrix\") (Miller 1986; Miller et al. 1993). Miller used the term lexical form (\"word form\") to refer to the physical expression that is written or pronounced and meaning lexicon (\"word meaning\") to refer to the lexical concept which is expressed by means of a lexical form.   Also he argues th..."
1 "and believed that students" "...sonable members of a democratic society, Dewey believed in collaboration in learning.  He frowned upon the idea of using competition amongst students and believed that students should work together in cooperative groups to identify, address, and solve problems they observed around them.  In allowing students to familiarize t..."
1 "have understood that He" "... been burning since 586 BC!  From their prior knowledge of the Scriptures, which is something we are inclined to underestimate, Jesus' audience would have understood that He referred to national judgement. The concept of eternal torment in Hell would not have entered their minds.    John the Baptist issued warnings of imp..."
1 "I wish that everyone" "...rich or sucessful as the Bingleys or Darcys, they are still people. I always find that the poorest people seem to have the biggest hearts in stories. I wish that everyone could care about other peoples feelings enough to realize that mocking and bullying them does not help anyone. All it does is spread hate, and anger ..."
1 "protein that is toxic" "... can really guarantee they are okay for us? Another GM that isn't labeled is Bt (Bacillus Thuringiensis) a bacteria that naturally produces a crystal protein that is toxic to many pest insects. It's main goal is to protect the crop from pest by killing them. They can be found in potatoes, cotton, and corn.  In 1995 the ..."
1 ") reported that there" "... curtailing, or solving the problem? STEP 2: Justify Using an Interdisciplinary Approach In 2014 the National Human Trafficking Resource Center (NHTRC) reported that there upwards and over 3,500 sex trafficking cases reported in the United States. (National Human Trafficking Resource Center, \"Human Trafficking\"). The di..."
1 "I believe that this" "...gave them training on how to teach the kids with the iPads instead of just giving them and letting the students and teachers suffer the consequences. I believe that this article will open the eyes of some districts that are trying to do the same thing as LAUSD has already done.    http://time.com/3926875/ipad-use-clas..."
0 "also noted that while" "...ions and educators are, however, still expected to contribute to these capabilities as the cost of training are high (Barac, 2009:20). Employers have also noted that while they are happy with the theoretical knowledge gained at tertiary intuitions by trainee CA’s; there seems to be a distinguishable gap between the skil..."
1 "back is that I" "...thrive in uncertain situations, sometimes trying new concepts that do not work and they need the ability to bounce back from failure.    A recent set back is that I was unable to attend the final exam for economics, as I was under a lot of personal stress and needed to take medication to sleep. As a permanent pro..."
0 "was found that  the" "...ye coordination. But all the electronic devices can also have some distinct disadvantages as well. From a survey conducted with a group of parents it was found that  the predominant form of technology used by children is computers followed by mobile phones, games consoles, iPods and then digital cameras. These items a..."
1 "recognise signs that something" "...am, against the current. There is a fierce battle against the souls of our children, and therefore we cannot  be at ease in Zion. Children need us to recognise signs that something may have gone awry even if they are too scare to articulate what they are going through for fear of the consequences. We have to be astute at knowing..."
0 "once cried that:" "...nce these come to the top of this survey.      Argue ① Tradition 1. Purism?  An authority on Japanese literature, Ivan Moris (1925.11.29 – 1976.7.19) once cried that: “Unless something is done to curb the pollution of the vocabulary by English and pseudo-English words, the Japanese language will soon become as ugly..."
1 "means is that this" "...why the story is called that is because that this story is taken in an A.U. where the events of Alien Force to Omniverse never existed. Now what that means is that this is a story where there will be some noticeable changes such as Ben’s identity has never been exposed, that he still has the same Omnitrix from the or..."
0 "·      Ensure that you" "...e on professional conduct for nursing and midwifery student (2009) states, nursing student should  ·      Make sure people know that you are student  ·      Ensure that you gain their consent before you begin to provide care  ·      Respect the right for people to request care to be provided by a registered professional ..."
0 "and believed that it" "...f American ideals.   The Puritans were pioneers in the way that people viewed marriage and divorce as well. They viewed marriage as a legal contract, and believed that it could possibly be broken with due cause. In England, getting a divorce was a costly and hard process that sometimes a king couldn’t even manage. "
1 "he noticed that someone" "...cigars. We're not supposed to but we do everything that we can to get the best quality stuff. You should have seen his face is bright red fuming once he noticed that someone swiped his cigars. I prefer the cigars over the cigarettes. The cigarettes give a foul taste in mouth.   Life in the trenches are hard. One night in ..."
0 "I believe that Jesus" "...part of the gospel. The gospel must be obeyed. v.37 “and Philip said, If thou believest with all thine heart, thou mayest. And he answered and said, “I believe that Jesus Christ is the Son of God.” This is the confession, Peter taught him, and he believed and was baptized. They both went down into the water. They both ..."
0 "one that is more" "...dding any category that seems redundant and add a more specific category that you selected. If you can't find a category for your business, then pick one that is more general. Google can also detect category information from your website and from mentions about your business throughout the web. For example: \"Papa J..."
1 "she feared that if" "...sn't necessary. Once she had started college, Kaitlyn started to distance herself from Richard and depth their kinship a secret from those around her she feared that if he found out many in her circle were involved with the drug dealings and gangs, he would use the knowledge against her friends.    ELPHABA THROPP Fro..."
0 "Daniels dictates that the" "Sara Beeson Bartholomew A.P. United States History August 12, 2016  Daniels dictates that the Puritans created the backbone of the moral views of American culture, and that they never disappeared, only changed. His book, New England Nation: Th..."
1 "customers means that the" "...s on how my product looks to consumers, I could redesign the packaging so that it is more appealing to customers. A product that is more appealing to customers means that the product will sell and I will have to increase production in order to keep up with the demand of the product.   How the product is priced is also very..."
0 "false claims that their" "...g, Pisan Pongsapitch (พิศาล พงศาพิชณ์) of the National Bureau of Agricultural Commodity and Food Standards pointed out that many Thai businesses make false claims that their products are organic. The widespread problem has jeopardized the credibility of Thailand’s organic industry at the international level.  To tackle th..."
0 "I understand that you" "I believe my personal skills and experience are a very good match for the employee specification. I understand that you are looking for someone with a significant amount of experience in dealing with the general public. I currently work as a receptionist for the head o..."
1 ") asserts that the" "...s related to a concept. Grouping words in this manner encourages students to make connections and helps the remember them more readily. Mountain (2015) asserts that the CCSS requires students to read complex texts in each discipline and using a morphemic analysis can support students in building a multisyllabic acade..."
1 "realize that" "...th her former seven children. Rebecca’s treats the situation nonchalantly, saying that Betty will “wake when she tires of [the ailment]”, but doesn’t realize that Ann Putnam's children never got “tired” of the ailment (27). Rebecca doesn’t realize that her solutions don’t necessarily apply to different scenario..."
0 "been suggested that the" "...f achievement.   This theory has been criticized because no attempt was made to measure the relationship between satisfaction and performance. It has been suggested that the two-factor nature of the theory is an inevitable result of the questioning method used by the interviewers. It has also been suggested that wide and ..."
1 "will accept that he" "...e animals, and the water of the desert.\" That means that she wants Santiago to do whatever he wants to do and in that time is he so dies, then Fatima will accept that he's become a part of he beauty earth.  14.\tThe symbolism that is given from the two dead hawks and falcon is that they are approaching war. The falcon ..."
1 "socialism believe that capitalism" "...rmines the distribution of goods. Examples of socialist policies include a living wage, free higher education and universal health care. Advocates of socialism believe that capitalism creates vast inequality and that it ultimately leads to imperialism, a hyper-form of capitalism.  Difference between Marxism and Socialism may be a b..."
1 "sayings is that everyone" "...vation may be a way to keep that respect for authority intact. But isn’t questioning things good? School is about learning and one of the most common sayings is that everyone learns from their mistakes. Keeping a tiny blemish from the new generation will do them no good in the future. Keeping historical figures in the lime..."
1 "do realize that barely" "... seem to change. I looked up to face Darren. “I just realized everyone else is done- or almost done!” I said, Darren’s face was left unchanged. “ You do realize that barely anybody completely finished dessert right?” Darren stated in a cold voice."
1 "all that is left" "...d and paraded it through the streets of Paris   Immediate Consequences The Bastille was dismantled brick by brick by approximately 700 workmen. Today all that is left is two foundation columns! A mayor of Paris was appointed , Bailly, and the bourgeois militia took over as the National Guard under the command of Ge..."
0 "idea that is later" "...a sonata form composition would develop. As a composer, you don’t have to follow this outline exactly. Instead, think of the exposition as an opening idea that is later going to be developed in the development section before coming home to the resolution in the recapitulation of the composition. In a classical work, ..."
1 "Utterson notices that his" "... parties and been seen around more, but eventually it all came to an end. After a final dinner, Jekyll begins to turn away every visitor he receives. Utterson notices that his good health, as well as Lanyons, begins to decrease.  When Utterson visits Lanyon, Lanyon does not want to discuss or even hear about Jekyll. Once he..."
1 "to symbolize that there" "...rchant to built a display case for the crystal. Even though it was a risky decision, it payed off in the end. So, now I feel that Coehlo used crystal to symbolize that there are many different types of crystals yet they are all delicate. Just like Personal Legends, everyone has a unique and distinct one, but each one dese..."
1 "had thought that this" "...ense of what to do with himself with his medical license suspended. Unfortunately, at this stage of his life and with the lifestyle he had earned, he had thought that this kind of crisis would never happen in his lifetime for him; But, he had finally hit rock bottom.        “Hey, bartender I’ll have three more shots of ..."
1 "effect is that you" "...erally horrific experiences that people go through daily With all road accidents in new zealand there are many affects the follow close behind.   One effect is that you may suffer minor or major injuries that may or not may only give you short term but long term injuries like multiple tissue bruising, conclusions and..."
0 "API that is simple" "...is for it to be easy for users to request features and also make it simple for them to implement their own. This would perhaps be done by creating an API that is simple to use and understand.  \tAs far as other mapping libraries to experiment with, a Cesium prototype is currently in development. The goal of the Cesium..."
0 "believed that" "...  Legalism greatly differed from both Confucianism and Daoism. Legalism stressed complete government control. The leader behind Legalism, Master Xun, believed that men and women were innately bad and therefore required moral education and authoritarian control, aiding the inherently evil people to become good th..."
0 "reasons is that it" "...nitely has a Positive effect on society. \tPokemon Go has proven to be a benefit to society for countless reasons. The first and most obvious of those reasons is that it promotes exercise and requires players to actually move, unlike most apps and games. Graham Thomas, a professor of psychiatry at the Miriam Hospital’..."
1 "have shown that KRAS" "...red magenta and red, respectively. GDP is shown as a stick and colored yellow (carbon), and red (oxygen).   KRAS4b-calmodulin complex: Recent studies have shown that KRAS suppresses Wnt/Ca2+ signaling pathway by direct binding with calmodulin and that the KRAS4b-calmodulin interaction is attenuated by phosphorylation o..."
1 "does believe that with" "...ty to change those patterns but he is not confident that he can do this when he is depressed. Thhis is where he still needs work and confidence. Tony does believe that with support he can make changes but he needs to come to believe that he can make those changes on his own.  R    R  R  R    6/14/16    6/14/16  6/14/16  ..."
1 "Guinness claims that 232" "...color. Porters and stouts can obtain hints of chocolate or coffee and this is because of the dark malt that is involved during the brew. For example, Guinness claims that 232 degrees Celsius is the temperature that turns their barley “into a black state of perfection.”  Almost all beer will contain malts and will often bal..."
1 "I felt that after" "...like every session focused on the trauma and not helping with the issues. We seemed to talk about the event each and every time, over and over again. I felt that after months of this type of therapy, I wasn’t getting anywhere. I thought that we should be learning how to deal with the trauma and that never seemed to ..."
1 "fossils that were discovered" "...d geology. We have learned that the Grand Canyon holds over 35 layers of sedimentary rock, which span over 550 million years old. There are also many fossils that were discovered at the Grand Canyon; a trilobite fossil that is over 500 million years old. Even though it is a very primitive (simple) species, it had a complex eye..."
1 "Utterson agrees that the" "...ing back it wasn’t the right one. Utterson asks for some of the noted that were left by Jekyll and each are a formal letter begging for the medicine. Utterson agrees that the whole situation is off but still decides to be rational. Poole on the other hand keeps telling that the thing in the room is not Jekyll, and that it ..."
1 "program that was instituted" "...position as “Moscow’s chief recruiting agent where Sikhs are concerned” throughout the 1930s, and his correspondence revealed much about the training program that was instituted at KUTV. Singh not only provided the estimates for Indians studying in Moscow but also dictated the “devious routes” whereby students, so-called “Bac..." 0
1 "hair that was getting" "...w. Her blonde hair was very short since she was just 2 years old. Her blue eyes were playful. Matthew smiled at her. He ran a hand through his blonde hair that was getting pretty long. He actually kinda likes it. It can cover his brown eyes just right.  Sadly the other boys made fun of him since it wasn’t as long as the..."
0 "to ensure that the" "...ets of Kyoto, the scene for geisha has been fading away. It is ultimately counting on us to ensure that this parcel of the Japanese culture lives on, to ensure that the beauty of geisha is passed on. And what other better ways than to be one?"
1 "clean up that we" "...rns about the Violations Policy. We hope distributing the Violations Policy will answer many of your questions and concerns.  There are many items of clean up that we may be requesting of you that may seem new to you or bothersome to correct.  Please know that we will work with you in any way that we can to help yo..."
1 "one that is very" "...ncerns must be amongst the first, unless the actual first, of the things on ones’ schedule. It is usually the reasonable course one can take, and the one that is very possible to retain ones’ effort out of dilemma. If an individual need to include stakeholders in a participating process, the explanations are clear...."
1 "facility ensures that we" "...r lights. The result of combining indoor technology with a glass roof is the highest quality product possible. The size of our multi-acre Tier 3 grow facility ensures that we will always have inventory for your stash.  We spent years in a secret lab experimenting with different strain combinations, curing methods and extra..."
"to secure that their" "...lts to newcomers arriving to their destination much later than before. Opinion: I fully agree with the decision that the Brazilian airports have made to secure that their people and newcomers rec " 1
1 "and further that those" "...to a lower ability to engage with adaptive strategies, such as PBS (D’Lima, Pearson & Kelly, 2012).  D’Lima et al. (2012) found that SR predicted PBS and further that those who engaged more with PBS, and^had higher SR capacity, experienced less alcohol-related negative consequences (also see Araars & Adams 2008; Benton e..."
0 "she views that as" "... parenting, both physically, intellectually, and emotionally. The mother of this show has a complete disregard for societal norms and seems as though she views that as a virtue. She is rude, loud, uneducated, and very unhealthy. All these negative things a viewed as positive character traits to her. This warped view..."
0 "infants that were fed" "... treat the symptoms of withdrawal?       Breast milk is a nonpharmacological measure.  The evidence from this article supported my PICO question; the infants that were fed with breast milk had lower Finnegan scores and therefore a decreased need for medication (Abdel-Latif, 2006).   Nursing Implications The nursing impl..."
1 "experts say that some" "Summary: Terrorist threats and attacks have been higher than ever, but experts say that some threads seem unbelievable and almost fake. A recent pledge to ISIS from extremists in Brazil seems to be either a real proposed threat or a fake atte..."
1 ") suggested that SDG" "...ths amongst new-borns and children younger than five years of age in 2030 by improving lives of children everywhere around the world. Liu et al. (2015) suggested that SDG should enable all countries to reduce mortality among children under the age of five to 25 per 1000 live births, as 79 countries have child mortality..."
1 "CLIENT ACKNOWLEDGES THAT THE" "...ITH RESPECT TO THIS AGREEMENT, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO IMPLIED WARRANTIES OR CONDITIONS OF MERCHANTABILITY AND FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. CLIENT ACKNOWLEDGES THAT THE SERVICES ARE PROVIDED “AS IS” AND THAT EAST AGILE PROVIDES NO WARRANTIES, EITHER EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, AS TO THE COMPREHENSIVENESS OR RESULTS OF SERVIC..."
1 "Darcy writes that he" "...does money matter so much? I would rather be happy then have money. Or, if I had a significant amount of money, I would donate it to help others. Mr. Darcy writes that he did support Mr. W       \t\t\t\t \t              In Chapter 40 and 41                        In Chapter 43                        In Chapter 46           ..."
1 "he suggested that there" "... education. It’s also significant to recognise that 20 students had a family member that is/has been a teacher.   Within Curtner-Smith’s study (2001) he suggested that there was a strong correlation of PE teaching students that also coached or were motivated to coach competitive sport as part of being a physical educator...."
0 "nor evidence that the" "...discovered an unidentified human break through the doors of the laboratory and take a small locking box containing said Feion. Leaving no hand prints nor evidence that the person was ever there we have no such clues to where or who they are.” As I read this my mind began to wonder, who could have stolen the metal and wh..."
1 "partnership survey that we" "...te Assurance  Date: 08 August 2016     Subject: Strategic Partner Survey      I have attached the first draft report from Lake Market Research on the partnership survey that we commissioned in support of the Strategic Statement Annual Report.   The early headline findings were included in the annual report first draft circul..."
0 "NOTICE FURTHER that if" "...UARE, POLOKWANE at which address the Applicant will accept notice and service of all documents and processes in these proceedings.    BE PLEASED TAKE NOTICE FURTHER that if the Respondent intends opposing this application, Respondent is required   1.to notify the Applicant’s attorneys in writing by filing a Notice of Int..."
1 "footprints is that he" "...e knows that Huck’s becoming smarter than him,so that hurts his ego and he doesn’t want him to go to school any longer.  Motif Huck’s reaction to the footprints is that he notices that the footprints end near the house and he recognizes the boots that the unknown person is wearing. We can infer that he knows something i..."
1 "to understand that some" "...g Faith”  True faith lies within Heavenly held in the arms of our sins   Ever so gently caressed with our truthful hearts   Earning trust in our eyes to understand that some people are artists and some, themselves, are art. Viewing things with confidence and honesty Equating our perceptions and theories to possibilities R..."
1 "agency that  it would" "...re.  While this violated GE’s CSR policy of right to privacy and religious freedom, GE didn’t end up complying because they convinced the enforcement agency that  it would be damaging to bring this dispute to a public forum, which if GE refused or complied would happen. While GE was still doing business in China, in 201..."
1 "sociologist is that it" "...ing to distinguish one of them as self-constituting and autonomous (Gold-Thorpe 1991) Another way the account of the State is reflected by historical sociologist is that it is a highly complex system. Both international politics and societies are best understood as systems which are highly complex, closely integrated, an..."
0 "I felt that I" "...ment for me because she could have easily delegated someone else to do the job.   Being consistent with my work duties was also another obstacle that I felt that I needed to improve on.  With 13 years of service with the Federal Government I always made sure that the quality of my work assignments and duties wer..."
0 "Liberals counter that the" "...ather a failure in the balance of power. It is here that the two approaches differ greatest, as whilst Realists believe that war cannot be prevented, Liberals counter that the establishment of a powerful World Government could prevent war. Throughout history, the adoption of various International organizations has largely l..."
1 "d say that I" "...all be over,” he says, pressing me against his stocky body. If I had my sight I’d bite his nose clean off. “I would do it all over again, Tennyson. I’d say that I loved you a thousand times more, and I would have had your child, only to kill it, if I knew it would rid the universe of your kind.”  “But...but...b..."
1 "to say that normally" "...the 2,000 hectares planted in France, more than 1,800 are in the Bourgogne winegrowing region, from the Chablis region to the Mâconnais.  Now, I have to say that normally I’m not a huge fan of white wine, but I have to say I thoroughly enjoyed the flavour journey we took through the vineyard of Bourgogne.  We began the..."
0 "clear that" "... he became.  Throughout all of Psychology, there will always be a constant debate whether nature or nurture is truly the cause of one’s actions. It’s clear that when it comes to serial killers, it depends on the specific case. Whether it be nature, nurture or both each have an impact. Nature  was the cause of..."
0 "I imagined that a" "...ew decision,  though it kept them worried. \tThere I found everything inside that small school. From the Principal down to the school staff, never had I imagined that a populated environment could be so supportive. My grades shot up to all A’s. My artistic skills soared. My manners improved. I got good company and fr..."
1 "I think that the" "Jack McWilliams ?????? English 8/4/2016                     \t.The book takes place in New York City. I think that the place affects the    \tI think that the theme of the story is you should never give up. I think this because Ryder had so many chances to give up on f..."
1 "Regulations require that the" "...nt is obtained prior to reevaluation except when the District has taken reasonable measures to obtain consent and the parent has not responded.   The Regulations require that the District have a record of its attempts to request consent for reevaluation in meeting the reasonable measure requirement. At the very least, three at..."
0 "now that it wasn" "...etter to set some clothes out now before the sun is gone for good. I’ll start washing when we get home. Okay?\" Naruto asked but Sasuke had learned by now that it wasn't a question. Naruto was a homemaker through and through. Sasuke was going to remind the blonde that by the time they reached home they’d only have t..."
1 "consensus agrees that there" "...ave skyrocketed. The numbers are under heated contention (some researchers suggesting death tolls up to 95%, others calling that outrageous), but the consensus agrees that there were far, far more people here than we previously believed. Reports by the first Europeans to arrive, describing bustling cities and towns, vast irri..."
0 "infants that were breastfed" "... the article mentions women of a lower SES were more likely to choose bottle feedings (Abdel-Latif, 2006).  One strength of the study was that in the infants that were breastfed the researchers looked to see if there was a difference in being breastfed or being fed breast milk in a bottle/gavage feed (Abdel-Latif, 2006).  Tha..."
1 "suggested that" "I work at Apple Inc. This work requires me to use the problem solving steps at all time. In the video, John Paul Lobo, suggested that we ask for helpand brainstorm with my co-workers and managers to do a good job at the first time so our customers continue to be happy with our produ..."
1 ", that is 51" "...e overall impact, results show the tourism industry has remained resilient(TTCI,2013). In 2014, Tourist international arrivals was 1.14 billion people, that is 51 million than the previous year(UNWTO). Robb (2016) in his article points out that despite the wars, terrorism and disasters, Africa is not defined by..."
"who stated that he" "Called  Sunbelt Rentals, Inc  regarding missed ETA. I spoke with Matt who stated that he received email re-dispatched SR." 1
0 "“Is that good" "...hs to my panties, one finger moving gently up and down between my legs.  He pushes my panties aside and the tip of his finger is just at my entrance. “Is that good? God, you’re so wet for me.”  I’m whining in my^throat now, full of need, and two of his fingers move into me, moving inside of me, then tracing circ..."
0 "assumption is that an" "...nizations with expectations about their needs, motivations, and past experiences. These influence how individuals react to the organization. A second assumption is that an individual’s behavior is a result of conscious choice. That is, people are free to choose those behaviors suggested by their own expectancy calculati..."
1 "and insist that they" "So what will you keep doing/change next time?  Next time I will be more active and insist that they have the conversation. I would do this by joining in to give a good example and be more active in the exercise. I will also put the instructions on t..."
1 "to remember that the" "...o everything right but fail to see it grow. Preparing yourself for the conditions of a viral campaign is the best thing you can do and it’s important to remember that the one’s that did grow higher than ever expected was not by accident. The marketing campaign for The Blair Witch Project while small was meticulous, the..."
1 "study is that the" "...e processing (NLP), to compare sentiments from hospitals Facebook sites with the HCAHPS survey of discharged patients. The central hypothesis in this study is that the valence of comments as well as the number of stars posted in the Reviews section of the Facebook pages will predict hospitals’ HCAHPS scores on two g..."
1 ") noted that the" ".... According to Field (2009), regression analysis enables researchers to predict future outcomes based on predictor variables. Hernando and Nieto (2005) noted that the positive impact of technology was one and a half years after adoption. As such a cross-sectional research was undertaken over the period 2009 to 2014..."
1 "Chauvelin said that he" "...real identity of her as Marguerite St. Just and that he has learned that he broke into the “Fisherman’s Rest” to discover Armand had betrayed France. Chauvelin said that he released Lord Antony and Andrew Ffoulkes and they will meet the Scarlet Pimpernel at Lord Grenville's ball that night. Lady Blakeney was threatened t..."
1 "is key that Australia" "...stralia, Indonesia has encountered a developing number of its nationals making a trip to the Middle East to battle with terrorist associations. So it is key that Australia and Indonesia keep on building counter-terrorism collaboration, incorporating to manage developing difficulties, for example, remote contenders and c..."
0 "have witnessed that Caitlyn" "...some extra rays would help with their Vitamin D production allowing these depressed kids to be happier.  In her brief existence as a transgender, you have witnessed that Caitlyn has brought important attention to this manicured, well balanced, healthy community, but that's not it, she has united America, no, she has united th..."
1 "I feel that the" "... their lessons to fit the technological needs but they felt as if they were feeding the fire to the ignorance and disregard of the students. Finally, I feel that the main point of this article is to show how technologies creates a boundary between the student and teacher through an obstacle of the lack of attentio..."
"papers that were used" "... by discovering the engorgement of Education and Christianity in the history of Sri Lanka. Hope to find the educational methods reading the books and papers that were used by first century church in the bible.  " 1
1 "link that is not" "...ll provide you with an install CD and instructions on how to install it and keep it up to date.    E-mail attachments Any email attachment or emailed link that is not clearly explained in the email as^specifically relevant to your job should not be opened (clicked on). A common characteristic of all major business ..."
1 "but realize that I" "... programs that are available to help children” (Patterson, 1993).  In sum, I am rather confident in my abilities to serve as an instructional leader, but realize that I will need to improve upon my collaboration in order to respond to diverse viewpoints and utilize the appropriate community resources.    References  ..."
1 "concluded that" "... customized. Advantages, disadvantages & factors that impede co-production Co-production isn't limited to service delivery. Indeed, Nambisian (2002), concluded that customers could help with the creation, the testing of the product as well as offering support to the end users. According to Matthing et al (2004), ..."
1 "To ensure that the" "...estionnaire; and  Procedures followed to ensure confidentiality and anonymity of respondents.    Informed consent from the relevant parties at PwC    To ensure that the relevant Partner/Director provided consent to distribute the questionnaire to the trainee and qualified CA’s at PwC an email was sent to Anelle Schoe..."
1 "I believe that the" "...hile the other perishes. When Santiago sees this, it changes his status in society by saying that he could die the next day at the hands of war.  15.\tI believe that the most important thing Santiago has learned is that it is very easy to give up everything. He was on the urge of leaving everything he’s ever wanted, b..."
0 "that that is finally" "...ntroducing myself early. And welcome to class 3-E.” \tFollowing along, the rest of the students give me a bright smile and a little welcome. \t“Ah, now that that is finally over,” a slightly high voice next to me states; “I would like to personally welcome to class 3-E Miss Sinclair. Please call me Koro-sensei. Also, I b..."
"but that is not" "... make a great change, break at all with my former life, moving to a big city, take chance of all opportunities there will be, maybe I will fail, sure but that is not the point." 1
1 "bombs that were dropped" "...p the ball-shaped explosives and thrown them, completing the needed rotation for it to explode. People in Laos are still getting killed and maimed by bombs that were dropped two generations ago. While I^was reading this book I expected there to be at least some coverage in the chapter on Vietnam. There was nothing there. ..."
1 "objectives that were originally" "...time.   Figure 1: Visualization of tiled maps Boller, Ryan. \"GIBS API for Developers.\" EarthData. EOSDIS, 29 Sept. 2015. Web. 8 Feb. 2016.  \tThe four objectives that were originally presented to the project were the following:  The ability to dynamically change the scale and range of the data.  Ex. Be able to shift the scale of t..."
"eyes that were so" "...t me a new liver,’ MacGregor said, patting his stomach, ‘and went in for a set of kidneys while I was at it.’ He gazed at Matt with those bright blue eyes that were so much like Tom’s. Matt" 0
1 "I feel that the" "...dge someone before you know their story. In the end, Scout and Jem gained a sense of matureness through all the evil of adults and many other things. I feel that the three mockingbirds truly were innocent in^their situations. I can’t describe in words how happy I am that I read this book and truly had a valuable l..."
0 "and proves that rather" "...as such a good soul should”, it sets up her false accusation of being a witch later on. It makes Hale rethink his involvement in being a witch hunter and proves that rather than being a legitimate claim, that the trials were used to purposefully damage another townspeople’s reputation. Act 1 #30 The effect Miller creates..."
0 "score that is easy" "...n will deal with the format of your parts. The suggestions here represent the standard recommendations, and they will help you to create an effective score that is easy to read. Parts should be on paper that is no less than 8 x 11 inches for the image area, but the actual paper should be at least 9.5 x 12.5 inches. C..."
1 "one is that you" "...lace before you think about driving is have a really good sleep so that your not tired and which may lead to you falling asleep at the wheel. Another one is that you could watch your speed so that you are in control of your car. Never be under the influence of alcohol or any drugs otherwise nasty accidents may hap..."
1 "teaching that is a" "....  Lesson planning. 1 Because of my previous teaching experience I wasn’t used to making lessonplans/Language analysis sheets. I’m used to a style of teaching that is a little bit m 2  3  4  5   Time management.  Clear instructions. 1 My instructions to the class are sometimes not clear enough. I tend to elaborate to..."
"because that is false" "...s equal rights so important, are blacks killed by police more. No because that is false, whites are killed more often than blacks. Is it the wage gap because that is false. I could wr" 0
0 "Results show that CMV" "...l granite residual soil subgrade, the R square between CCMVs and relative compaction is arranged from large to small in the order by: CMV＞CCV＞AA＞MDP. Results show that CMV has more consistent and relatively^good linear correlation compared to other CCCMVs. CMV is selected as the continue compaction control index for nat..."
1 "I argue that the" "...philosophy. Yet, drag is an enduring art form with direct links to the transformative experience of aesthetics in the performing arts of the theatre. I argue that the incorporation of an ethico-aesthetic critique of drag as a radical feminist body art affords new conditions of possibility for what drag can do aroun..."
1 "to recognise that 20" "...t that teachers play a central role in developing knowledge, beliefs and teaching methods in the context of physical education. It’s also significant to recognise that 20 students had a family member that is/has been a teacher.   Within Curtner-Smith’s study (2001) he suggested that there was a strong correlation of PE..."
0 "I feel that I" "...et, talk moves and accountable talk have greatly impacted how I interact with students during class discussions In regards to professional discourse, I feel that I am trying to have conversations with staff and questioning my own thinking and theirs (although this is difficult) so that we want to change and hope..."
0 "2016 demonstrate that HAI" "...hylococcus aureus bacteraemia (SAB) HAI in Australia  Recent national statistics compiled by the Australian Institute of Health and Welfare (AIHW) in 2016 demonstrate that HAI of SAB are decreasing and below the national benchmark of 2 cases per 10,000 patient days. Although a positive statistic, SAB is still occurring at a..."
0 "instincts that were heightening" "...I knew he was pregnant you know.” It felt like a ton of steel had dropped in Sasuke’s gut. “I asked the doctor about it. He said it was my protective instincts that were heightening. Babies are such troublesome small things you know. Kiba’s powers increased too.” “They did?” “Yea. Not just his claws come out anymore. He can shift..."
0 "This shows that the" "...images of aggression and lack of cooperation have succeeded in their rebranding with the help international organizations and social re-construction. This shows that the effects of anarchy can be reduced and adjusted to pave way for the reconstruction of identities and creation of new relationships.  Besides, the conc..."
0 "Assistant is that a" "...o raise their salary or become an executive leader of a healthcare organization. (Krueger, 2016) One main difference between a Doctor and a Physician Assistant is that a PA does not go to a 4-year medical school and does not have as much of a work load as a Doctor. (Gap Medics, 2015) A PA’s career is more flexible, fo..."
0 "purity that it is" "...illate, we heat our oils at high temperature and low pressure, allowing us to eliminate any impurities and offer a product that is so high in THC/CBD purity that it is actually clear. It’s the cleanest way to vape!   Sales process  Research   Grading The first step in any sales process is proper prospecting. Before ..."
1 "Tzu that is weighing" "...hair that a dog has, and also know the amount they weigh.   Caloric needs  With regards to the caloric requirements of Shih Tzu dogs, the normal Shih Tzu that is weighing about 10 lbs will require about 350 to 400 calories daily for maintenance reasons.   A Shih Tzu dog that weighs more needs more calories every day. A..."
0 "same numbers that you" "...nd then […] you ley me inherit Marcel. The husband’s double whose room was the double of ours. […] I did not even have the guts to ask him […] if the same numbers that you and I did were the same number you did with him. […] You cheap, goddam fucking, godforsaken whore… I hope you rot in hell! You are worse that the dir..."
0 "and noticed that no" "... work assignments in a timely manner.  While being placed on the detail assignment and by be collaborating with such professionals I quickly observed and noticed that no matter what personal issues my co-workers and peers were experiencing and no matter how they may have felt about one another, they always managed to ..."
0 "also notice that their" "... or may even recall a growth spurt (Trobisch et al., 2010).  Grow spurts plays a major role in idiopathic scoliosis (Trobisch et al., 2010).  One may also notice that their shoulders are uneven (Trobisch et al., 2010). Idiopathic scoliosis only rarely causes pain in children and adolescents and often comes to attention o..."
1 "ll find that sometimes" "...elody should be made up of smaller motives. The motives should be used to create the B Theme and the C Theme in your composition. If you do this, you’ll find that sometimes you get some really good ideas. At other times, you might have ideas that aren’t so great, but you’ll always be developing your ability to work with ..."
0 "news are that we" "...newable resources, clean air, and clean water. Tuy tried to teach farmers not to use low cost measures and save lives instead. The two pieces of good news are that we can make a difference in a short amount of time and it only takes 5-10% of the world’s population to make a change. The three important ways are that..."
0 "they report that Transgenders" "...ple flocking to her adorning her in the finest designer duds and hanging on every word that come out of her mouth, why should we believe the CDC when they report that Transgenders are dying because 70% of the community is HIV positive.  Awareness in mental health ? What awareness needs to be brought to this perfectly manicured,..."
0 "not reveal that a" "...of this opioid antagonist in the newly marketed medication or overlook the ability of naltrexone to produce acute withdrawal. Pharmacy profiles might not reveal that a patient is on methadone maintenance or using opioid medications illicitly.  Patients may not always provide a complete medication history, and may no..."
1 "is reminded that this" "..., Krogstad reminds Nora that she has other things to worry about, he has figured out that Nora forged her dads signature on the promissory note. Nora is reminded that this is a serious offense. Because she didn't to save her husbands life she doesn't allow him intimidate her. Torvald returns and mentions he saw Krogstad..."
1 "occurred that is in" "...s occur in all companies. Many problems are simply due to misunderstandings. If something doesn’t seem right to you, or if you feel that anything has occurred that is in any way unfair to you, or if you have complaints or suggestions, the best way to proceed is to talk it over with your supervisor.  Your supervisor is..."
1 "investor thinks that the" ".../B Ratio (Price to Book) P/B ratio is used to compare the market price of the share with a company’s book value. If P/B ratio is greater than one the investor thinks that the company will grow in the future and they can earn more profit. Some stock P/B ratio is less than one means that something is wrong with the company. ..."
1 "like that was even" "... not get a check deposit from me but you get to keep money in your check. I am making do with this little bit of child support you give and you acted like that was even a lot, $690.20 a month does pay for shit. I used to get $1201.66 a month it's a big difference. You get to keep in your check over $500.00 that you d..."
1 "glad that it didn" "...those people a favor. It wasn’t about me, it never was. I was so angry when I woke up. He told me, you know, that worried him that I never said I was glad that it didn’t work. That would have been a lie, and I can’t tell a lie that big.” \tFinny’s eyes are so blue, like something finer than the ocean or the sky. A gi..."
1 "research suggests that individuals" "...te, Gorin, Raynor & Fava, 2006), mood (Berkman et al. 2011; Thayer, Newman & McClain, 1994), and learning (Zimmerman, 1990), among others. Generally, research suggests that individuals with lower self-regulation ability are less able to engage with adaptive techniques to keep themselves goal-focused and therefore are less likely to ..."
1 "Ensure that everyone" "...rt communication it is important to stay transparent and honest with progress and manage the expectations of the stakeholders throughout the project. Ensure that everyone is aware of the scope of the project and that scope creep doesn’t hinder the ability to meet the project’s deadlines.  "
"we conclude that we" "... the solution and evaluate the results to see if our decision was right. If everything is good, the customer got his product and is jubilant with it; we conclude that we chose the right resolution." 1
0 "surroundings are that of" "...he movie serves a purpose and brings out some feeling in the moviegoer.  Moviegoers are drawn into the realistic setting of the Shawshank prison. The surroundings are that of a factory with high walls and^layer upon layer of brick. Wire fences corral prisoners as they move from place to place. Dirt and rocks cover the yard..."
1 "but figured that she" "...ap. Ribahn shook her head at Zera, \" No, \" she said, \" I collect books tomorrow, you sort them for me when I bring them back.\" Zera was disappointed, but figured that she’d probably have to work her way to the prestigious position of book collector. She continued to circle dates with the cell block numbers with the clo..."
1 "she finds that the" "...e pretends to be Elaine because she is the only one not frightened of floating down the river in a flat. An she floats along the river, to her dismay she finds that the flat has a leak. She desperately paddles herself to one of the poles on the bridge and calls for help. To her relief, she sees a boat with someone in..."
1 "to ensure that the" "...lant to cater for the expansions and they also need the maintenance of their roads to fulfil their core mandate as town council. Their objectives are to ensure that the company pays for all the costs of their demands."
1 "I felt that it" "...ly absorbed in the memories and impressions because they have no reliable ways of dealing with  the world. After reading the descriptions of my type, I felt that it’s a true reflection of me. Self-reflection is very important to understand your strengths and weaknesses, to make changes to the areas we need to mak..."
"This shows that Lou" "...ence. Like a bug or a mouse scratching in the cupboard at night—you could get up and chase after it, or just go back to sleep and let it be.” Phrase: This shows that Lou Ann is starting to fell like   " 1
1 "lunch that is a" "...ickly let him know I have to pop out but I will be back usually his is ok as long as he knows.  Isaiah has also been eating little bits at recess and lunch that is a big step for him and I find if the buddies or I^sit with him he will eat a little, he is also playing footy/soccer and chased with the boys at recess..."
1 "world that was called" "...h! What's this!', a pull formed inside himself, like his soul had opened, and he screamed blacking out. A land beautiful as a paradise. It is a small world that was called the Land of the Eternal Spring and the Island of Apples in mythology, the utopia was thought to be derived from the island that produced the \"Apple o..."
0 "was worried that he" "...he app on his phone, he’ll never need to buy a newspaper. Also shopping. He likes the shopping apps because they make shopping easy and quick, but he was worried that he might spend too much money. I taught him that the shopping cart will show you how much money you’re spending. Grandfather likes to take the train in ..."
1 "This ensures that a" "...liberty safeguards. Mental capacity Act 2005 The mental Capacity Act 2005 its covers the two main important agendas of independence and safeguarding. This ensures that a person has the capacity to make their own decision and choices unless the individual demonstrated otherwise, Safeguards them with the consequences of..."
1 "I predict that it" "...0 million of total transactions. However,  because it is a prediction, the range should be between 5945 million and 7125 million.     Also in Jun2015 I predict that it should rise to 6097 million of total transactions. However,  because it is a prediction, the range should be between 5479 million and  6731 million. ..."
0 "was concluded that the" "...capable of testing loading times of resources, and by demoing the prototypes to potential users, mostly scientists, to see which they preferred.  \tIt was concluded that the LERC data type was the best for fast loading, however, the w10n data was the most precise. The drawback to w10n was that, for large data sets, it was..."
1 "Kansas ruled that the" "...Americans and whites have equal voting rights, however, there is still evidence of persistent discrimination in some parts of the country. A judge in Kansas ruled that the state can't require people to show proof of U.S. citizenship In order to vote. The state of Kansas was enforcing proof of citizenship In order to dis..."
0 "eyes that were as" "... he went limping up and down the vestibule, with his grey hair sticking up in scrubbing-brush fashion, his shrivelled yellow face, and his large dark eyes that were as keen as any hawk's, and yet soft as a buck's. The whole room was hung with trophies of his numerous hunting expeditions, and he had some story about ..."
1 "it showed that every" "...t resources we could use to our advantage to make our transition smoother and more pleasant. Discussing the transition into college was beneficial as it showed that every member of our group had fears and anxieties about an unfamiliar environment, and as WVU students we are equipped with resources and leaders that help..."
"’s that NiNI" "...need to head to class. We’ll meet at lunch okay? Everyone has eats at the same time.” He sighs when Junmyeon’s small frame disappears from sight. “Who’s that NiNI?” Jongin jumped" 0
1 "He reports that a" "...es his difficult job well.  The Superintendent is supporting of the police department and does not interfere with the Chief’s handling of incidents.  He reports that a current school board member, Cody Gregg,^is divisive, disruptive and spreads rumors and lies about the district administration. He is confrontational..."
1 "and hoped that they" "...roceed to looking for anything. When they were looking, Mark was looking worried cause he didn’t know where Paul went to. Mark stood there and waited and hoped that they didn't find anything. The 2 guys in the suits walk out of the camper  Mark said” im i free to go i would like to get back to working on my bike” The ..."
1 "“shows that most" "...completely different country. While some people are naturally gifted with linguistic talents, some need extra help. Steve Marshall's research article “shows that most students (88.9%) who report being in a position to speak another language also use or have used in the past a language other than English at home (86..."
1 "him that it was" "... a dark ash. He flicked his silver tongue in dismay. The clean up would be hell. Only 6 out of the 7 had survived the trip, which was an indicator to him that it was time to renew the pods. The Warden was probably going to be pissed, not so much at the loss of life, but at the prospect of paperwork he’d have to do..."
1 "study stated that individuals" "...ife events, and daily hassles on depressive symptoms. The three different domains were classified as stressful life events (SLEs). The results of the study stated that individuals who are continuously exposed to stress are at a major risk to suffer from depression. The study also indicated that there was considerable heterogene..."
0 "all that is needed" "...eir hand and the teacher moves around assissting where she feels fit. More often than not a simple question aimed to create enquiry into ones work is all that is needed for the learner to realise where their mistakes lie.   Conclusion:  What does the conclusion of the lesson entail? The learners are reminded of the o..."
1 "he stated that “" "...games are some of the best to really exercise and improve your cognitive abilities. According to an article by Romeo Vitelli, a doctor in Psychology, he stated that “research into action games show enhanced mental rotation abilities, faster and more accurate attention allocation, and higher spatial resolution in vi..."
1 "study reports that 40" "In terms of mental health findings, alcohol use dependance are commonly associated with mood disorders. One study reports that 40.7% of individuals with an alcohol use dependance who sought treatment concurrently had at least one independent mood disorder and 33% had at least on..."
0 "Police demonstrate that Udham" "...and his religious proclivities. Rather than a spontaneous act of individual terrorism, documents from the Home Office, India Office, and Metropolitan Police demonstrate that Udham Singh systematically targeted Michael O’Dwyer and other colonial administrators, revealing a deep attachment to the Ghadar Party and revolutionary an..."
"we believe that the" "At AARP, we believe that the golden years of a person’s life should not be about worrying about government cuts, health benefits, and their quality of life.  No. Not at all.  Lif..." 1
1 "I deem that my" "...s and technology of machining from the university, are giving me huge preferences in learning a tool path programming and a CNC field at all. Hereby, I deem that my skills utilizing today on a modern^manufacturing facilities, allows Siggemann & Menze GmbH to hire a highly disciplined and oriented employee. Consta..."
0 ". ensures that the" "...thin the country D. enhance safety by providing for and building up a military  E. ensures that laws will promote overall well being of the citizens F. ensures that the United States will femain a free nation  Article I What are the formal job requirements for the House of Representatives? must be at least twenty fiv..."
0 "I think that’" "... know it!’’ exclaimed Meechie, As he quoted one of his favorite lines from one of his favorite morning TV shows. “Momma you know I wanna know it all. I think that’s probably why the seasoned lady at church; the one with the dark shadow on her top lip and all the bird feathers in her giant hat told her friend, ‘H..."
1 "always feel that I" "...susceptible to feelings of jealousy and envy when  others draw attention from me. I constantly compare myself to others and trying hard to impress, I always feel that I need to be admired. I understood the fact that being less competitive   can result in higher quality results and a willingness to cooperate with othe..."
0 "realize that" "...th her former seven children. Rebecca’s treats the situation nonchalantly, saying that Betty will “wake when she tires of [the ailment]”, but doesn’t realize that Ann Putnam's children never got “tired” of the ailment (27). Rebecca doesn’t realize that her solutions don’t necessarily apply to different scenario..."
1 "to ensure that hotels" "... Health & Safety  In the United States, hotels and motels are regulated regarding proper practices with regard to cleanliness and sanitation. This is to ensure that hotels do not present a health hazard to customers by spreading disease or parasites. Inspections of this kind are handled by local inspectors and typically..."
1 "now understands that his" "...uminating and becoming stuck.   Progress towards goal: Tony has made some progress toward this goal. He can accept responsibility for his actions and now understands that his emotions and moods do not excuse him from being responsible for what he does in life. He has become able to recognize his thinking patterns and and e..."
1 "examined reasons that hospitals" "...concluding on wrong leg amputation is an example of lack of professionalism in care delivery process and violating HIPPA. Tucker and Edmondson (2003) examined reasons that hospitals fail in giving quality care came into a conclusion that \"Hospitals historically have relied on a dedicated and highly skilled professional workforce ..."
0 ", that is -" "...such as the cat fantasizingto transform into a lion. These fictional possibilities became a motivation and a symbolism for Oscar to achieve his dreams, that is - to perform in theatre in front of a large audience; hence conveying how existentialisn of an individal can help one flourish and develop.   "
1 "to believe that it" "...e” said the message from Brandon. She thought again that It's so hard to believe that after years of waiting, today is finally here. She was starting to believe that it might not ever come. Her phone vibrates again “I didn’t believe this day was ever going to come, I am so excited, and nervous, and OMG baby I am so i..."
1 "will ensure that they" "...m.  Communication channels between other stakeholders in the stadium require identifying and tested, such as TEL and other users of the stadium, this will ensure that they are not sending persons into the danger area.     This was a worthwhile test which showed the Stadium’s procedures working, it showedthe fire brigade..."
0 "we recognise that Agrippina" "...ounding his plot for Nero’s brutal behaviour and attempts to “poison” his mother.Through Suetonius’ account, “she had taken the antidote in advance”, we recognise that Agrippina was a strategic schemer who took careful measures against her own son to ensure her safety. However, these accounts are questionable and are possibly..."
1 "William claimed that the" "...y Communist Party, where they were burning the flags. On Wednesday in the afternoon close to the security entrance of the Quicken Loan Arena, Officer William claimed that the incident all happened when Johnson set himself and others on fire. So the police had to help them out and that is when the fights broke out. When the..."
1 "who believed that “" "...n was a kind, forgiving man to whom you could tell anything, while his wife Liza had a “finely developed sense of sin”(11) and was a devout christian who believed that “rewards came later”(12). Between the two of them their children were a wide range. Much like Adam and Charles Trask, both of whom were raised with str..."
1 "rumours that were milling" "...swered. When did you people start going to school? She asked, surprised that a Hausa/Fulani man is a university graduate. Only Allah knew the kind of rumours that were milling about us (Northerners) and Western education in their communities. My third surprise was when I asked her if she knew the name of the minister of hea..."
1 "can prove that the" "...ong academic writers and scholars, Article V (1)(e) as stated above provides that an enforcement of award may be rejected only if the objecting party can prove that the award has been set aside, suspended by a competent authority or not binding on the parties… the term “not binding” is not define, there is lack of cl..."
0 "I affirm that this" "...50 words ACTUAL WORD COUNT: 1244 words DUE DATE: 14/01/16 DECLARATION OF AUTHORSHIP    (To check the box double click on the box & select “Checked”) ​I affirm that this assignment is my own work. ​I have acknowledged in the text all sources – printed, electronic, and other – used in this assignment.  I have read and ..."
0 "was informed that I" "...lity of being hired on a permanent basis with promotion potential.  Within 3 hours after I submitted my resume and applied for the detail position, I was informed that I had an interview the next day. I was excited and a little nervous but somehow I managed to display a confident and positive attitude in which I truly..."
1 "excavation revealed that the" "...sts. Of particular importance is one of the outer walls of Jericho. The picture shows a portion of a wall that had crumbled outward. Beyond that, the excavation revealed that the outer section of the city (along the outer wall) was filled with substandard housing indicative of an area “on the wrong side of the tracks.” This is..."
1 "is considered that those" "...the nouns bipolar attribute values, and therefore are organized on the basis of binary oppositions (antonymy) or similarity of meaning (synonyms). It is considered that those adjectives that do not have direct antonyms have antonyms indirect by virtue of their semantic similarity with other adjectives that do possess anton..."
1 "be seen that marijuana" "...ty have taken up the culture of marijuana as well as the political changes that have had to be made to compensate for this change.  Therefore, it can be seen that marijuana has had the largest changes in terms of culture and legislation in modern society.  Marijuana culture and legislation is a good example as to how soc..."
1 "tasks that were neither" "...asks were these?  7%\tE-Mail Collaboration: 1%\tM-Miscellaneous: Fire Drills, Lockdowns, Errand 5%\tV-Travel: 13% Total What was the total time spent on tasks that were neither urgent nor important?  What types of tasks were these? 9% of my time 6%\tE-Mail Collaboration: 3%\tG-Non-Coaching Interaction: 9% Total Other notes, th..."
"dally realized that something" "...ng church to save Johnny from death. Johnny went into the church to save the kids and a  big piece of wood fell on his back immobilizing him. So when dally realized that something was wrong  \t" 0
0 "in that it has" "...ht counterpart, Leaflet (64 kilobytes3), which boasts simplicity and making “the basic things work perfectly.” Cesium is different from the other two in that it has the ability to display maps onto a 3D globe,^which allows for a more accurate picture of the world.4 Leaflet was decided against as many of its impor..."
1 "them see that if" "... wastefulness of the average consumer and it provokes thought about the things you through away. He is trying to target the average consumer and help them see that if someone can make a living out of the garbage there is a problem. He goes on to talk about the different stages you go through when you dumpster dive...."
0 "Understand that not" "...Barker (2013) note that it’s important not to seem too out of place on the platforms chosen and understand the basic principles the platform upholds. Understand that not every social media platform may be right for your campaign and find a way to work around that. Most users will see more authenticity in a self hosted..."
1 "clearly indicate that happiness" "Various articles and literature works coupled with the ongoing happenings clearly indicate that happiness has no price tag. Since the beginning of human evolution, there has been a saying that “money cannot buy anyone happiness.” Happiness refers to emoti..."
1 "” suggest that the" "...s been controversies in the past as to the precise nature of its rights. Greg Gordon in his book “Oil and Gas Law-Current Practice and Emerging Trends” suggest that the reserves are intact “ownerless.”  The regulation of the petroleum industry is through a licensing regime, which is basically between the secretary of..."
0 "never failed that during" "...an they could handle, like the narrator describes in these following passages: “Some families would sell out for nearly nothing and move away. And it never failed that during the dry years the people forgot about the rich years, and during the wet years they lost all memory of the dry years” (5-6). “It wasn’t very long unt..."
0 "Furnace that was once" "......and then we ran.      Hiding behind a dumpster, I thought about my parents, my friends Toby and Donovan, and even the broken body in the depths of Furnace that was once Toby Merchant. My body was bombarded by uncontrollable sobs that rose within me like a wave and crashed down on my exhausted body. Suddenly out of th..."
0 "Danforth realizes that he" "...nter, starting to sway back and forth with Danforth as Hales said to Danforth that he “[couldn’t] think you may judge the man on such evidence” (91). Danforth realizes that he has gone too deep to turn around and hopes that Proctor doesn’t spread the lies in order to save face.   Act 3 #6 Danforth’s statement, “We burn a ho..."
1 "be noted that at" "...r may add multiple contact information namely Phone Number, Email and Address, as highlighted above with the icon adjacent to those fields. It should be noted that at least one of each type of contact information is required. Additionally, the remaining fields are mandatory. The Clear button empties all the fields ..."
1 "number that was written" "...apon in the right hands. Zera had never mastered penmanship, it was a rare skill with everything being digital. She looked carefully at each name and number that was written on the list. Many were due tomorrow, and she wondered if she’d have to collect them all. Would she be allowed to wander the prison by herself? “Ribah..."
1 "and said that he" "...elped at, because it was one of the first times where I felt like I made a change in someone's life. On my break a veteran came over and talked to me and said that he appreciated me, I was so baffled because he was one that is to be appreciated. He mentioned he served in the Vietnam War. He shared some of his great..."
1 "and threaten that if" "...rs... And being stupid. If someone saw someone from there kingdom stealing or anything , they would rat them out. The queen or king would then banish and threaten that if the Kee were to ever come within a 100 metres of the kingdom that they would order there gaurds to open fire. Either something like that would hapen ..."
0 "something that is being" "... for human trafficking]. STEP 8: Create Common Ground between Concepts Being able to use my skills to combat this growing problem is a way of turning something that is being used for illegal activity and using it for the global good of mankind. Information Technology is not limited to one facet, but rather multiple facets..."
0 "was discovered that she" "...an abusive husband and father. She remained in this second marriage for sixteen years pretending that all was well. After her husband passed away, it was discovered that she had poured rat poison in his liquor jar and killed him. She married again and as a result murdered all three of her husband's and her children. After..."
0 "trial that is about" "...ars in the future. The phrase ‘that is about to come’ includes the verb ‘mello’ which was used to express imminence. When Jesus said ‘the hour of the trial that is about to come’ He meant it would happen soon.  It is interesting to note, ‘all the world’ is the Greek word ‘oikoumene’ meaning the Roman Empire, and ‘upon..."
1 "was told that his" "...to do.  4.\tWhat Santiago’s father says is true about him until what happens at the end of the novel. Santiago travels all the way to Egypt because he was told that his Personal Legend would be there, but he ends up coming back to Spain because it was never there. The whole point of his journey was to take him to his..."
0 "to escape that he" "...fect half sphere but made up of hundreds of hexagon tiles.  I stood on my toes and looked over the crowd that had gathered. Some kid was so desperate to escape that he took a bike lock and tried to break it. His hit didn’t even make a scratch. It seemed there was literally no way out. I stared at the dome for a whil..."
1 "and believes that someone" "...y with a check that Enfield immediately thought was forged, but was later proved real. Enfield concludes that blackmail was involved in the incident, and believes that someone lives in the strange door. Towards the end of the conversation Utterson asks Enfield what the name of the man was, and Enfield answers with “Hyde.” A..."
", that is critical" "...tems Administrator position. Leveraging my customer-centric mentality, and concern for the end user will bring me a focus and detail-oriented approach, that is critical in a cloud and security-focused role." 1
1 "If that is not" "...ther iwi tikanga and kawa if they are with the visiting party. Kaikaranga and kaikorero should have a strong affiliation to the area, marae or whare. If that is not the case at the very least they will have gained^the permission of the iwi or the group associated in order to conduct a karanga or korero on their b..."
0 "often perceived that I" "...n, is me welcoming my wild self. And I find that I am “turned on” every day – electric-alive – giving my Self the blessing of freedom. And yes, it is often perceived that I don’t care about serious situations or talk too much of the wonderful smell of my lover after he chops wood. But it is not this; it is me moving clos..."
0 "tasks that were normally" "... always displayed good team player ethics.  I noticed how they were always willing to step outside of the box and they always was willing to complete tasks that were normally not in their job descriptions.  Watching them come together as a team also made the office function more effectively.  Their main focus was to Get th..."
"like that is an" "...”* A-SU spoke with hesitation as several thoughts crossed its mind.* “But yours did.in a significant manner. Throwing your body of meat into the fray like that is an illogical action.”   " 0 1
1 "diaper pants that I" "...e slide underneath my bum and she folds and fasten the cloth diaper. She puts a yellow diaper cover over my red diaper and I get put on a pair of red diaper pants that I am wearing over my diaper cover. Abbie^then gets a t-shirt put on that is yellow and there is written baby on the t-shirt.   We should get the diaper..."
1 "her think that there" "... tension in-between the two as we see Putman  subtly accuses Rebecca when she says that with“God’s work you should never lose a child”; thus it makes her think that there is a possibility of witchcraft (28).   Act 1 #28 It is significant that Hale recognized Rebecca as a highly respected person because it will allow hi..."
1 "mirror figure that he" "...tes behaved during his performance, he saw how they watched him like a circus act, treating him by laughing at his antics. This caused him to see the mirror figure that he wants to be and feel the same longing for what I suppose now is freedom and hate him more out of jealousy.   D.E.J. #3 Key Passage Metacognitive Log ..."
1 "also says that their" "...a. If I were the mother of Lydia, I would be going out of my mind. I would probably have every police task force on this planet looking for her. Jane also says that their mother is e                       In Chapter 56                        In Chapters 59, 60 and 61                       "
1 "Hester realized that her" "...ter, Pearl. As a part of her punishment, she had to stand on the scaffold holding her baby as a bad example.While  people walk past disgusted by her, Hester realized that her sin will never be forgotten, and that she is just an example of a shameful woman. All of the negativity made her a stronger person, and in place of c..."
1 "also noted that the" "...mmissions and brokerage fees and reductions in staff levels. Their conclusion was technology was a complement to physical banking channels. The study also noted that the positive impact of technology was one and a half years after adoption. Positive financial performance was explained by lower staff costs and IT costs..."
1 "only taught that America" "...ny wrong. This practice creates citizens who don’t truly understand their past and are not ready for the future. In history classes, students are not only taught that America is the best, but that their leaders have always been infallible. Social and economic class determine the quality of education provided to students an..."
0 ", that was a" "...It’s an Academy thing, just roll with it,” he said with a smile.   “Who’s going to stay with her tonight,” Kota asked, and every hand shot up.   “Okay, that was a stupid question, wasn’t it? Sang, how about you choose,” Kota said as everyone turned to look at me.   ‘Way to put a girl on the spot…’   “Mr. Lee an..."
1 "am convinced that the" "...ach, I would hold a meeting so that staff has a comfortable environment to share successes, uncover concerns and most importantly reinforce habits. I am convinced that the first step in building a safe and a supportive school conduvive to academic excellence and success is to create positive climates. Research shows tha..."
1 "ascertain that" "...interview (held by March of each year) with your educational zone coach group. The early year(s) of this annual interview will be to get to know you, ascertain that you are on the right track with your local advisor and your plan for ministerial education, and guide you in the upcoming process of development and ..."
1 "Elphaba explained that he" "...either side and huddled together until one of the police officers came to inquire the whereabouts of their father. While her brother remained silent, Elphaba explained that he wasn't due home for a couple more hours, but there was a phone number on the fridge in the event of an emergency.  While the paramedics rolled Erica ..."
0 ", that is -" "...ying the classic crime fiction genre, the interrelations between the characters and themes of feminism, crime, and facades, expresses a strong message, that is - the issue within society's ignorance, as well as, challenges social assumptions of gender roles.   Day's role reversal and depiction of the protagoni..."
0 ", that is what" "...rthwhile, given that individual level of engagement may vary (Berkman et al. 2011), understanding any dispositional factors that influence feasibility, that is what explains the individual variability in the extent to which individuals engage with self-monitoring and PBS. In an effort to do this, one such disposi..."
0 "evaluations found that the" "... quality or outcomes of training (Bean, 2008).  Effectiveness of cross-cultural training   A comparison of immediate post-training and the subsequent evaluations found that the cross-cultural training had produced statistically significant differences in three areas:   understanding of organizational cultural diversity polic..."
1 "India given that their" "...r having whole genome sequences available to our hands we concentrated on Andamanese populations, which is one of the most interesting populations of India given that their very distinctive so-called “Negrito” morphology (Huxley 1870) and the unclassifiable language they speak (Abbi 2009).  Although Andamanese showed sim..."
0 "noted that" "...ers signal to firms the types of products they would like to buy, firms will divert their resources to producing more of those products. It should be noted that this stands in direct contrast with Say’s Law which is preferred by classical political economists. In order to maximize profits within their chosen ..."
0 ") suggest that teachers" "...respondents from 72 surveyed said that their main influence for taking up a career in Physical Education was because of a teacher. Capel & Blair (2007) suggest that teachers play a central role in developing knowledge, beliefs and teaching methods in the context of physical education. It’s also significant to recognise th..."
1 "it says that Arturo" "...kly at times, she teaches Arturo an important lesson in this book. Abuelita teaches Arturo to never give up your culture for popularity. In the story it says that Arturo got his named changed in school by his teacher. Arturo said, “I actually like my name. I think it will make me fit in more.”Later that night, Arturo ..."
0 "will assert that with" "...ents. Educators, in addition to all that they are asked to take on, are charged with becoming even more dynamic in their practice. This investigation will assert that with a multitudinous approach in teaching vocabulary, teachers can alleviate the pressures of implementing CCSS and support students in enhancing literacy..."
0 "Sali believes that the" "...trade set out by Chinese. Swiss Wellness chief Radek Sali wants to have Australian businesses to concern themselves with the Chinese consumers. Radek Sali believes that the Australian economy is uniquely positioned to prosper because of the Chinese consumers wanting premium brands that withhold health benefits. By taking..."
"that said that he" "... slowly in the early stages.  4 The tutors I saw followed a strict time schedule and got exactly where they planned to go. There was one tutor though that said that he didn’t plan t   5      " 1
1 "He found that Victorians" "...r. Apparently this has something to do with a historian somewhere with too much time on his hands who decided to undertake some research into beards. He found that Victorians and men at the turn of the^last century were more likely to have some form of facial hair.  </P> <P>That makes sense, after all razors were difficult..."
0 "collaborative tool that academicians" "...ul in the creation of a healthy collaborative classroom environment.  Mansor (2011) supports this conclusion when he states, “Google Docs is a useful collaborative tool that academicians can use.  It offers a more productive alternative of collaborating…”   Conclusion The creation of an educational environment that values collaboratio..."
1 "fact that it has" "...arrots, cranberries, spinach, blackberries and a lot of other great ingredients that boost the nutritional profile of this formula.  We also love the fact that it has a lot of fish which makes it rich in omega acids which keep your furry friend shiny, sleek and nice.   4. Evanger’s Grain-Free Meat Lover’s Medley wi..."
1 "to verify that the" "... the five missing ratchets. Without knowing (without seeing the three missing pieces I had to remove every item from the shelf of the storage shelves to verify that the three missing pieces were not underneath the storage shelves. As I thought about the task at hand I thought about ataraxia or being unmoved by the si..."
1 "important is that you" "...th followed by a minor third could act as a two-note motive. Write a series of non-rhythm defined intervals. The rhythm shouldn’t matter here. What’s important is that you are creating a series of intervals that convey a mood or tone. Advanced Exercise Harmony uses certain chords in a similar progression to create a har..."
0 "Britain that were informed" "...haran Singh Chima ultimately helped to establish after consulting with Rattan Singh in 1939, was integral to articulating an anticolonial politics in Britain that were informed by the Ghadar movement and animated by the trial and execution of Udham Singh. From its earliest history, the Indian Political Intelligence service w..."
0 "Surasak revealed that his" "...hose who were once forest encroachers would understand the importance of forest conservation and become protectors of the forests themselves. General Surasak revealed that his ministry will communicate with all sides to address land disputes and implement strict legal measures against influential persons to stop encroachmen..."
1 "believes that" "...rent cultures by allowing students from all over their world build their own student association. The Minister of Advanced Education, Naomi Yamamoto, believes that the cultural differences brought by internationals and the experience of BC students studying in other cultures will benefit everyone in the educatio..."
1 "quality that is commonplace" "...  Your frame clearly notes 135mm temples. The printing of the Cartier Logo and other information on the temples is inconsistent and of extremely poor quality that is commonplace with authentic Cartier eyewear. The lenses have the Cartier Logo engraved on the rear surface of the lenses rather than the front of the lenses on au..."
", that is your" "...s mission’s gonna be hard. You have to work hard and train hard - and there’s gonna be absolutely no play. It is not my responsibilty to keep you safe, that is your job, and if you g " 0
1 "have discovered that the" "... road accidents. Also the effects that follow all road crashes and lastly the solutions that drivers can put in place to minise risk while driving. I have discovered that the top three main causes are due^from speeding, being under the influence or drugs or alcohol and lastly distractions.  "
0 "to ensure that this" "...evoted is what makes them so magnificent.  Along the old streets of Kyoto, the scene for geisha has been fading away. It is ultimately counting on us to ensure that this parcel of the Japanese culture lives on, to ensure that the beauty of geisha is passed on. And what other better ways than to be one?"
1 "I noticed that US" "...to achieve my desired result. Moreover, pursuing master’s from an esteemed university is also very important. As I searched for University of choice, I noticed that US Universities are of higher standards and rich academics. Hence, my next dream is pursuing Masters from good US University. I learned that your univer..."
1 "he stated that “" "...ommunication, August 11, 2016). He feels that not being loved by his father hurt him more than the physical abuse. In another subsequent conversation he stated that “his father made him call his mother a whore and to this day feels guilty about it” (J. Doe, personal communication, August 11, 2016). James said his f..."
1 "again that It'" "...he covers. She walks back to the bed and picks up the phone.   “Good Morning, my soon to be official wife” said the message from Brandon. She thought again that It's so hard to believe that after years of waiting, today is finally here. She was starting to believe that it might not ever come. Her phone vibrates a..."
1 "I believe that money" "...n’t really matter as much because there would be a plentiful amount of money in your life already, and it wouldn’t be something desperately needed.   I believe that money can not buy happiness, and actually I believe that in some ways money can negatively consume your life which would not make you very happy. What I me..."
0 "department suggest that the" "...an foreign companies to capture assets and streams of revenues.  In any case, both the recent government reshuffle and the rising influence of an FSB department suggest that the Russian political and business landscape are probably changing. Those who appear to be benefiting the most from from these recent changes are silovik..."
1 "soon learned that he" "... after she had already fallen in love with him. They were a couple when she was only sixteen, and pregnant with me by the time she was seventeen. She soon learned that he was extremely controlling and wanted a way out, but no-one ever left him. So, instead, mum turned states evidence against him in return for a new ide..."
1 "hypothesis means that the" "...he best tool ever devised to discriminate between true and false patterns, to distinguish between reality and fantasy, and to detect baloney.The null hypothesis means that the burden of proof is on the person asserting a positive claim, not on the skeptics to disprove it.” I Want to Believe by Michael Shermer, Ph.D.  LIFEMO..."
1 "cannot believe that I" "...not find my wallet. I thought I left it at the gas station. We went back there and the attendant did not find any wallets nor someone turned it in. I cannot believe that I lost my wallet and I had a few hundred dollars in it too. When I got home there was a message on my answering machine… a lady had found it and starte..."
1 "Technology that is connected" "...tual development. When used appropriately, technology can introduce positive elements of children’s play and learning as they explore and experiment. Technology that is connected to what children already know and can build upon leads to greater motivation and self-direction.  Gaming and learning applications equip children to ..."
1 "here is that this" "... don't just spring up from nowhere. With big studios especially, no show gets launched without demographic research and focus groups. The sad reality here is that this show is indeed for someone, perhaps the producers overestimated our hunger for shocking reality television, but none the less, there was a audience f..."
1 "White stated that he" "On June 26th, 2016, I was contacted by Officer D. White (4769) in reference to a shooting call. Officer White stated that he was dispatched to the Valley Substation located 5408 2nd St NW where he made contact with Cody Lovell. Cody was bleeding from a gunshot wound to the ..."
0 "think that" "...n assured Clinton that “political hack” or not, she was “willing to listen” to Clinton’s pleas.  Speaking of influential families and politics, don't think that Caitlyn falls behind in bloodline. If you need to be reminded that our girl reigns from the millinery answer to royalty, the greatest American, Alban..."
1 "further proposed that as" "...enced less alcohol-related negative consequences (also see Araars & Adams 2008; Benton et al. 2004; Martens Taylor et al. 2004). D’Lima et al. (2012) further proposed that as PBS involve modifying drinking behaviours to avoid alcohol related negative consequences, they could be considered a type of alcohol specific SR. Sug..."
0 "Faye is that the" "...unday afternoon.”(214) This was the description of Ms. Kate Albey, a new prostitute that established herself quickly in Faye’s brothel. “What puzzles Faye is that the kid looks like a runaway girl except she’s a goddam good whore. She knows all the answers and all the tricks.”(214) Cathy is posing in yet another ne..."
1 "bound that is they" "...alistic goal is one towards which we are willing and able to work because we are truly convinced that it can be achieved. Finally, goals must be time bound that is they must be reached within a timeframe. This creates a sense of urgency that prevents us from continuously postponing action for hypothetical future time..."
0 "suburbs that were small" "...y and in nature while Willy Loman lives in a busy and crowded city. In Cars and Their Enemies the author recalls himself and his family growing up in suburbs that were small but were not isolated. He says on the subject of the towns, “Television is less important than in big cities, where the streets are far less safe and..."
1 "and saw that everyone" "...inter-dimensional being who wants to cause global destruction or world domination.’ he thought grimly, lying on the dirt he quickly observed the area and saw that everyone was alive, ‘minus one thing to worry about.’ he mused while using his arms to raise and stand up. He took his sniper which was on his side and carefu..."
1 "items that were going" "...Great computer skills   EXPERIENCE   Produce Clerk No Frills, Mississauga, Ontario\t\t\t\t\tJuly – August 2010 Responsible for sorting produce and ensured items that were going out for customer purchases were not damaged Organized and arranged items and placed them in its designated area  Unloaded products from the truck and..."
1 "to say that our" "... pattern of my academics will continue in my graduate studies as well. I also did an exploration in different fields of civil engineering .I am happy to say that our faculty members are very cooperative and helpful in our work. Civil engineering is observing an expeditious growth which is assuring an excellent fut..."
0 "be noted that this" "...sumers signal to firms the types of products they would like to buy, firms will divert their resources to producing more of those products. It should be noted that this stands in direct contrast with Say’s Law which is preferred by classical political economists. In order to maximize profits within their chosen compe..."
1 "examinations demonstrate that 5%" "...esophageal biopsy samples (2).    BE is a complication noticed in a group of patients with chronic gastroesophageal reflux disease(GERD),  endoscopic examinations demonstrate that 5% to15% of patients with GERD have BE (3, 4).    The goal of the treatment of BE is to prevent the complications of this condition in addition to achie..."
1 "is assumed that when" "...ional arbitral tribunal rely upon primarily is the contract agreement by both parties. This agreement is based not he principle of party autonomy. It is assumed that when a state submits to arbitration, it is an implicit waiver of immunity.       NEW YORK CONVENTION ON THE RECOGNITION AND ENFORCEMENT OF                ..."
1 "then mentioned that he" "...anti-depressant tablets.  DJ then added the first batch of tablets he was prescribed weren't great and the second batch put his blood pressure up. He then mentioned that he was trying his best to look after himself but his wife was experiencing health concerns during this period , breast cancer related so it all felt too..."
0 "school that is culturally" "... meet this goal.  When a school is supported by the government, the leaders are given many ways to improve the school.  School leaders need to have a school that is culturally responsive, data driven, and positive attitude toward change in demographics.  Schools can improve, but it takes support from many areas to see signi..."
"You say that it" "... since it was the first thing you  thought of i will presume that you think equal rights rank up there with things like poverty in the United States. You say that it does than " 1
1 ") expressed that the" "...BC,2016).   Corruption   Corruption and Nigeria almost seem to be synonymous (Kazeem 2015,AfricaNews 2016a). Global witness 2012(cited in Martini,2015) expressed that the embezzlements of funds is a major player^in regard to the underdevelopment of Africa. In this same report they claimed that their research shows that..."
0 "“Is that good" "...hs to my panties, one finger moving gently up and down between my legs.  He pushes my panties aside and the tip of his finger is just at my entrance. “Is that good? God, you’re so wet for me.”  I’m whining in my throat now, full of need, and two of his fingers move into me, moving inside of me, then tracing circ..."
1 "who says that her" "...uvelin sits down to await his meeting in which he already missed.  With the fear that he has yet caught the vigilante, Marguerite confronts Chauvelin who says that her brother remains safe but he will give Armand back once he meets the Scarlet Pimpernel. On the way home she remains worried for Armand.  When they get..."
0 "Is that the" "... stream of people going into Kierst, I asked Rebecca if we had to go in through that opening.“ Well, you don’t have a card yet right?” \t“No, not yet. Is that the line for getting a card?” I asked hoping she would say no. \t“No. That is the line for the coffee shop integrated in the front of the building. Since ..."
0 "After that is done" "... it in the diaper bucket where the used cloth diapers will be stored to the diaper bucket is full of used diapers then it’s time for a diaper wash.   After that is done Abbie gets put on some ointment and baby powder by her sibling Carrie who is makes her ready to be diapered again.  Abbie then gets the disposable di..."
1 "The diet that you" "...ifespan, then you will need to look for the best dog food for German shepherds with skin allergies so that you can feed your dog with healthy food.   The diet that you give to your German shepherd is very important as this breed of dog grows to become large dogs that weigh in between 70-100 pounds and when they are ..."
1 "evidence that is adequate" "...or change my mind if sufficient evidence is given.   February 9, 2016 What is meant by sufficient evidence? It is a term that is used to describe the evidence that is adequate enough to justify the bringing of a lawsuit. Adequate for the purpose; enough: sufficient proof; sufficient protection.  February 10, 2016 Sufficient..."
0 "All that is going" "Revenge of the Monkey Paw \tThe Smith family was a quiet, poor family who lived in the outskirts of London, England. All that is going to change.  A few years back, a family called the Whites acquired a monkey paw. This monkey paw wasn’t just a plain old monkey paw. The paw granted w..."
1 "value that was originally" "...e encoded PNG is the simplest data type. It takes the original data set and generates a PNG image where the RGB values of each pixel “store” the data value that was originally at that pixel. This creates images that are easily displayable by the client, however, the images are not usable for scientific visualization because..."
1 "and that is coming" "...r right now you will be in big trouble young lady.”  With no response back Jack forced himself into Hana’s room where he saw the most horrific scene (and that is coming from a man who has been in 3 tours). It was Hana sitting at her computer chair and was playing on her high end computer with a liter of mountain in o..."
1 "researchers believe that if" "... rich, thick description (Merriam, 2002).   All researchers attempt to design and implement good/ethical and trustworthy studies. Indeed, qualitative researchers believe that if a study is credible, it has to be good in the ethical sense and be trustworthy. A sound case study is significant and complete, utilizes alternative ..."
0 "amendment states that a" "...: The tenth amendment states that all rights not given to the federal government shall be given to the states or to the people.  (1795): The eleventh amendment states that a person cannot sue a state wothout permission.   (1804): The twelfth amendment describes presidential elections. The President and Vice President run ..."
0 "NOTICE FURTHER THAT the" "...That the Respondent pay the Applicant costs of this application on an Attorney and own client scale; and    3. Further or alternative relief.    TAKE NOTICE FURTHER THAT the affidavit of MR TAMBANI ELVIS MATUMBA annexed hereto will be used in support of such application.    TAKE NOTICE FURTHER THAT the Applicant has appoi..."
0 "in glorifies that “" "...and sex from a masculine point of view, they learn what men want, and through this “sex is held hostage by beauty”(pg). The culture we’ve been raised in glorifies that “unblemished skin and an hourglass figure are signs of health and fertility”8. The beauty myth teaches young children “what is beautiful is good”9 and ..."
1 "it true that your" "... questions. One girl in particular, Kaede Kayano, seems to be really interested in what Hope had said earlier about her lunch.  “So Sinclair-chan, is it true that your lunch compose of those three delicious slices of cake?” “Yes,” Hope answers with a shy grin, a tint of pink shines on her cheek; “I’m a bit of a swee..."
0 "prison ensured that she" "...ainly wake everyone in her row and become the most unpopular inmate.  Damn it,  her body suddenly lost the rhythm of her pleasure. Thinking about the prison ensured that she couldn’t achieve orgasm from her fantasy. The walls of her cell had finally encroached on her, the reality of her situation was solidifying. The scen..."
1 ", that is used" "...print, or having materials to overlay the desired shape upon. The Tracing version of Shirou was called by this name due to the unique aria, \"Trace On\", that is used for its activation. They discovered that its differs from the normal version in the fact that not only does it reproduce the shape and substance of a..."
0 "What is that?" "... silence. A desperate plea of panic rushed around in her gut. Mayhem whined. His eyes narrowed. He studied a distant cluster of sap weed trees.      “What is that?” Athena whispered to her wolf, both her hands grasped her rapiers—an extension of her after years of training.     Mayhem inched closer to the invisi..."
0 "side that was so" "... and started walking away, my mind had taken sides, the side that did not give a flying flip if Darcy was flirting with the smoking hot Dude, and the side that was so freaking jealous.   \"What? Really think I go for girls like her? She doesn't interest me, you do...\"   I turned, looking behind me at them, wondering..."
1 "helping prove that to" "... lines. Last, King suggested several books at the end of On Writing and Hocus Pocus was one of them. This novel emphasized Kings guidelines discussed helping prove that to write a piece of fiction following them will ensure being above average.  "
1 "it follows that the" "...nt. If disorder and entropy in the universe as a whole is constantly increasing until it reaches thermodynamic equilibrium, as the Law suggests, then it follows that the universe cannot have existed forever, otherwise it would have reached its equilibrium end state an infinite time ago, our Sun would have exhausted it..."
0 "Act  outlines that the" "... 2000 (Cth) and corresponding state legislations, such as the Gene Technology (GM Crop Moratorium) Act 2003 (NSW). Section 3 of the Genes Technology  Act  outlines that the main purpose of the Act is to ‘protect the health and safety of people, and to protect the environment, by identifying risks posed by or as a result ..."
1 "to think that you" "...ince they are trendy and cool every single day while yours just aren’t like that, there is a way you can address this problem. Rather than continuing to think that you look like a Shakespearean fool crossed dressed in bizarre clothes when you put on your t-shirts or jeans, there is a better way to live. Because let’..."
1 "knowing that it will" "...ry expresses about the death of Max and how it has affected her.  Having love comes through the making the most of the moment, even if it is lost and knowing that it will remain in one's heart. When singing to her husband in her hit 'Que Sera Sera', Doris Day asks how their life together will go, and he responds with '..."
1 "the best that you" "...         P       “You don’t have to like us, but you’re going to dance.”     “We don’t want PäSH to be the only band you listen to, but we want to be the best that you listen to.”       2. Nia’s Bio     Founder/Singer-Virginia Mahotiere (Stage name:Nia)   A talented female artist with a world-class reputation. Nia i..."
